Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on Hbrary shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http : //books . google . com/| 



TO 

I ^^7 



THE ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



THE ELEMENTS 



OF 



POLITICS 



BY 



HENRY SIDGWICK 



AUTHOR OF 
'THB MBTHODS OF STHICS' AND *THB PBINdPLBS OF POLITIOAL HOONOMT* 



SECOND EDITION, REVISED THROUGHOUT 



• « 






ILonlron 

MACMILLAN AND CO., Limited 

NEW YORK : THE MACMILLAN (X>MPANY 

1897 



Aatifiiti 



First Edition, 1891. 
S€C0Md Edition^ 1897. 















PREFACE 

(1891) Some years ago I was strongly impressed with the 
need of a book which would expound, within a convenient 
compass, and in as systematic a form as the subject-matter 
might admit, the chief general considerations that enter into 
the rational discussion of political questions in modem statea 
Though there were many valuable treatises dealing with 
particular portions of this subject, no English writer — so 
far as I knew — had, since Bentham, attempted to treat it as 
a whole : and though such a comprehensive treatment must 
necessarily be brief, it appeared to me that even this brevity 
would have some advantagea For such a general treatment 
as I had in view, however full, must be for practical pur- 
poses incomplete; and an exposition severely confined by 
limits of space would at any rate have the merit of keeping 
this inevitable incompleteness steadily before the minds of 
both writer and readers. The present work is the result of 
an attempt to satisfy the need that I have just described. 
The plan upon which it has been composed I have en- 
deavoured to explain in the first chapter : it only remains 
for me here to record the chief debts that I am conscious 
of owing to previous writers from whom I have derived 
ideas, and to express my gratitude to the friends who have 
aided me with criticisms and suggestions. 

My general view of Politics was originally derived from 
the writings of Bentham and J. S. Mill ; and the earlier 



VI ELEMENTS OF POUTICS 

portion of the book, which deals with the principles of 
l^islation, is to a considerable extent composed on the lines 
of Bentham's Principles of the Civil Code, But before com- 
posing it I have endeavoured to profit by the study of 
several more recent works on Jurisprudence and the Prin- 
ciples of Law; — among which I may mention especially 
Austin's Theory of Jurisprudence, Holland's Jurisprvdence, 
and Pollock's Principles of Contract In later chapters (xv. 
and xvL) of my first Part, which deal with international 
relations, I am under special obligations to Hall's Inter- 
national Law. I ought to add that in two or three chapters 
of this first Part — especially x. and xL — I have had more or 
less to go over ground already traversed by myself in my 
Principles of Political Economy, So far as this has been the 
case, I have not hesitated to borrow from my earlier work ; 
though I have tried as much as possible to introduce such 
differences of treatment as appeared to me appropriate to the 
different scope and aims of the present treatise. 

In the second Part of this book, which deals mainly with 
the structure of Government, the views that I have expressed 
have been partly derived from eo great a variety of sources 
that I find it difficult to estimate closely how much I owe 
to any one previous writer. Still, among the English books 
that I have studied with profit, I am conscious of special 
obligations to J. S. Mill's Representaiive Government, Bage- 
hot's English Constitution, Todd's Parliamentary Government, 
Dicey's Law of the Constitution, and Bryce's Am^erican Com- 
monwealth. I have also found Erskine May's Parlia- 
mentary Practice, and Anson's Law and Custom of the Con- 
stitution, most useful for referenca Among the foreign 
books from which I have derived ideas and information, I 
may specially mention the works of Gneist and Holzendorff, 
and Bluntschli's Lehre vom Modernen Staate ; also the series 
of monographs that make up Marquardsen's Mandbuch des 



PREFACE Vll 

offentlichen Bechts, as well as Dareste's Constitutions Modernes, 
and Demombyne's Constitutions Europ^ennes, Among 
American books to which I am indebted I may especially 
mention the Federalist, and Story's Commentaries on the 
Constitution of the United States : I wish also to acknowledge 
my obligations to the Political Science Quarterly — edited by 
the University Faculty of Political Science of Colimibia 
College ^ — and the Studies in Historical and Political Science, 
published under the auspices of the Johns Hopkins Univer- 
sity. Finally, in speaking of the works of others by which 
I have profited, I must not omit to mention an unpublished 
course of lectures on the relation of Political Science to 
History, delivered in the University of Cambridge by my 
friend and colleague, Mr. J. R Seeley, who has kindly 
allowed me to read it in MS.^ 

The books and articles by which, after arriving at certain 
conclusions, I have subsequently found my reasonings sub- 
stantially anticipated, are so numerous, that I forbear to 
attempt even a selection from them : but I shall make an 
exception in favour of Mr. Bruce Smith's Ltberty and 
Liberalism, on account of the fundamental importance of the 
current confusion of thought which this writer has anticipated 
me in attempting to remove.* 

In such a work as the present, there seemed to be a special 
need of securing a comprehensive and many-sided considera- 
tion of the various topics included. Impressed with the 
diflSculty of realising this unaided, I have allowed myself, in 
seeking conmients and corrections from others, to encroach on 

^ I regret that the work on Political Science and Comparative Constitu- 
tional LaWf recently published by a member of this faculty — Mr. J. W. 
Burgess — did not reach me till my own book was so far advanced that I did 
not feel able to make use of it. 

2 This course has been since published — after the author's death — under 
the title of Introduction to Political Science, 

^ I ought perhaps to add that my political views do not agree closely 
with those of Mr. Bruce Smith. 

a2 



VlU ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

the leisure and to trespass on the indulgence of my friends 
to an unusual extent. I am specially grateful to Mr. James 
Bryce, M.P., and Mr. A. V. Dicey, who have read through 
the proofs of the whole of the work in its original form ; ^ 
and whose suggestions and criticisms, and memoranda on 
special points, have been of the utmost value to me. 
The kindness of several other friends — among whom I would 
especially mention the Earl of Lytton, Mr. F. W. Maitland, 
and Mr. T. Thomely— has simUarly aided me with instruc- 
tive comments on selected portions of the book which I have 
submitted to them. One of these latter — Albert Rutson — 
whose stores of information and reflection were ungrudgingly 
placed at my service in several letters and conversations, 
has unhappily been taken from us before the completion of 
my work. 

Finally, for the index appended to the volimie, which I 
hope will materially increase its usefulness, I am indebted 
to Mr. James Welton, B.A., scholar of Gronville and Caius 
College. 

(1896) In preparing the second edition I have carefully 
revised the book throughout, paying attention to such criti- 
cisms of it as have fallen under my notice ; and have made 
numerous alterations and additions, mostly of a minor kind. 
The most considerable of these changes are in chap, i § 2, 
chap. ii. §§ 1 and 2, chap. xv. § 1, chaj). xviii. § 1, chap, 
xix., — where § 9 is new, — chap xx., especially in §§ 4, 5, and 
6, and chap, xxvii. §§ 4 and 5. Further, to make the 
drift of the discussion in the last chapter more clear, I have 
— besides minor changes in the chapter itself — added an 
Appendix containing in an enlarged form the criticism on 
Austin's view of Sovereignty, which was not very fitly 
placed in chap ii. of the first edition. 

^ Several chapters have been subsequently added, enlarged, or almost 
entirely rewritten, in consequence of the criticisms of my friends. 



CONTENTS 



CHAPTER I 



SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 



PAX3B8 



1. The Theory of Politics, as here expounded, is concerned 

with human societies, regarded as possessing Qovem- 

ment ......... 1-5 

2. Its primary aim is practical, to determine what the 

constitution and action of Qovemment ought to be : 
accordingly its method is not primarily historical . 5-10 

3. Its principles are based on psychological propositions not 

universally and absolutely true, but approximately true 
of civilised men. It does not profess to furnish a 
complete solution of particular problems . . . 11-15 

4. It has two main divisions ; one concerned with the 

Functions of Qovemment, internal and external, and 

the other mainly with its Structure . 15-17 



CHAPTER II 

FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 

1. Let us first examine the fundamental conceptions of 

Government, Law, Right, Obligation . . . 18-19 

2. We may regard the civil law of a modem civilised state 

as a body of rules laid down by the supreme Legislature 
of the State : but Austin's statement that the power of 
this Legislature is always legally unlimited requires 
qualification ........ 19-30 

3. " Obligation " denotes the relation of a rule or command 

to a will constrained by it : a '' Right " is the same 
fact regarded in relation to the person to whom the 
obligation is intended to be useful .... 30-32 



ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



CHAPTER III 

GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 



PAOK8 



1. AsauTnJTig generally an oiderly community, let us consider 

on what principle the laws defining the primary civil 

rights of the governed should be determined . . 33-37 

2. The ultimate standard here adopted is conduciveness to 

general happiness ....... 37-39 

3. There are various possible methods of promoting general 

happiness ; but the action of government in modem 
States IB mainly based on the Individualistic principle, 
which limits the internal functions of government to 
the prevention of mutual interference among the 
governed. Accordingly, I shall begin by examining 
the application of this principle to the chief questions 
of a civil code 39-43 



CHAPTER IV 

INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 

l.'jThe Individualism here worked out must be distinguished 
from that which takes Freedom — absence of physical 
and moral coercion — as the ultimate and sole end of 
governmental interference ..... 44-47 

2. An examination of the chief civil rights that modem 

governments actually aim at securing, under the heads 
of Personal Security, Property, and Contract, shows that 
the fundamental aim is not merely to prevent mutual 
coercion, but to prevent mutual harm and annoyance 
and interference with each one's efforts to procure the 
means of happiness ....... 47-66 

3. No Individualist would apply " Laisser Faire " except to 

sane adults : hence an Individualistic scheme must pro- 
vide for the sustenance and care of children, and regulate 
the relations of the sexes with a view to this 66-68 

4. The Individualistic determination of rights of property 

and contract will be discussed in the next two chapters. 
Besides the protection of these rights, legal repression 
of physical annoyance, of deception, of intimidation, of 
disturbance of social relations by slander or otherwise, 
is also to some extent necessary on the Individualistic 



CONTENTS XI 



PAGES 



principle — at any rate if interpreted, as here in a utili- 
tarian sense : though it is not always easy to define 
generally the conduct that law should prohibit . 58-66 



CHAPTER V 

ON PROPERTY 

1. The Right of Property in material things, as commonly 

understood, includes the right to use, to exclude others 
from using, to deteriorate or destroy, and to alienate ; — 
perhaps also to bequeath, but this last element I shall 
treat separately ....... 67-70 

2. On the Individualistic principle the "first discoverer" 

may be allowed to appropriate, if the opportunities of 
others are not thereby materially impaired ; but the 
appropriator of land will usually owe some kind of 
compensation to society for diminished opportunities of 
obtaining utility ....... 70-74 

3. Appropriation of land for cultivation carries with it the 

appropriation of vegetable products and tame animals. 
The cases of uncultivated land and wild animals are 
more doubtful : but the appropriation of the former 
and indirectly of the latter may be justified — from the 
utilitarian point of view here taken — by demonstrated 
increase of utility ....... 74-76 

4. Appropriation of the surface does not necessarily carry 

with it a right to all minerals below the surface : and 
in the case of rare and valuable minerals, it may be 
expedient not to give the owner an exclusive right of 
extraction. The appropriation of land reclaimed from 
water depends on the labour required for reclamation . 75-77 

5. Rights of partial use of material things may be appro- 

priated and transferred. Among other property-rights, 
copyrights, and — in a more limited degree — patents, 
may be justified on the Individualistic principle . . 77-80 

6. For general security, ancient honA fide possession must be 

admitted as a valid title to property .... 80-81 



CHAPTER VI 

CONTRACT 

1. Enforcement of Contract is fundamentally impoiiiant in an 
individualistic system. The term is here used in a 



Xll 



ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



wide sense, to include agreements modifying rights 
in rem as well as those that only give rise to rights in 
personam ........ 

2. It is generally expedient to enforce contracts, if delihe- 

rately made between persons possessing at the time 
mature reason, and without illegal coercion or intimida- 

3. or wilful or negligent misrepresentation of material facts ; 

4. and if the effects that they were designed to produce in- 

volve no violation of law or cognisable injury to the 
community ........ 

5. It may become, through change of conditions, impossible 

or on the whole inexpedient to fulfil a contract to 
render future services. In such cases the obligation of 
the promiser should be limited to — at most— compen- 
sation for damage suffered by the promisee through non- 
fulfilment The further restriction on the obligation 
which bankruptcy law admits is difficult to reconcile 
with Individualism ; but in the main it may be justified 
on utilitarian grounds ...... 

6. One-sided transfers of utility — including promises — 

should, if adequately evidenced, be enforced on the 
individualistic principle ...... 

7. Any form of collective ownership with ** limited liability " 

should be allowed, on this principle, provided its con- 
ditions are sufficiently explained by those who enter 
into it to those who deal with them .... 



rAoi 



82-86 



86-87 
88-90 



90-91 



91-96 



95-96 



96-97 



CHAPTER VII 



INHERITANCE 



1. Theoretically, Freedom of Bequest is a doubtful point in 

the Individualistic scheme : actually it is restricted in 
several modem states by old limitations in the interest 
of the family ; and sweeping limitations of it have 
been recently proposed in the interest of the com- 
mimity 98-100 

2. Limitations in the interest of children seem only justi- 

fiable, so far as necessary to secure children proper 
training and sustenance till they can provide for them- 

3. The consideration of the drawbacks of fiduciary owner- 

ship illustrates the theoretical difficulty of harmonising 
Freedom of Bequest with due Freedom of the survivors. 101-104 



100-101 



CONTENTS xin 



PAOK8 

4. The sweeping restrictions proposed by Bentham and Mill 

seem dangerous ....... 104-105 

5. Passing to Intestate succession, we' may approve of ex- 

clusion of collaterals — in the degree proposed by 
Bentham — and of equal division " by stocks/' on the 
ground of conformity to natural expectations . 105-108 



CHAPTER Vm 



REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 



1. To remedy wrongs Government may intervene by en- 

forcing Reparation or inflicting Punishment The 
distinction between the two is not quite so funda- 
mental as it is sometimes held to be ; because the 
primary aim of Punishment is Prevention, not Retri- 
bution, 109-114 

2. and the prevention of future mischief is an important 

— and generally the most decisive — consideration in 
determining when to enforce damages. At the same 
time it is practically important to maintain the dis- 
tinction ; since the governmental procedures appro- 
priate respectively to Reparation and Punishment are 
markedly different 114-120 

3. In some cases it is difficult to find a satisfeictory mode of 

Reparation : especially in the case of insults . . 120-122 

4. The adequate duegret of punishment is not easy to deter- 

mine : it may be reduced by increased efficiency of 
police and judicature. In selecting the Iwnd of punish- 
ment, the importance of Equability, Variability, 
" Exemplariness," "Frugality," and Remissibility 
should be noted 122-125 



CHAPTER IX 

PREVENTION OF MSCHIEF AND PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 

1. Besides actually enforcing Reparation and inflicting 
Punishment for wrongs. Government should punish in- 
citements to the violation of rights, intervene to check 
it when committed or threatened, allow self-defence 
and self-reparation in some degree, and imprison sus- 
pected criminals. It may usefully give warning 
against mischief, and watch processes liable to be 
attended by it 126-129 



XIV ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

PAOWB 

2. It has been disputed whether Government may properly 

prohibit acts merely because they involve a risk of 
mischief to others. But this kind of "indirectly 
individualistic" interference seems clearly expedient in 
some cases : nor can the amount of it be limited by 
definite rules; but, having inevitable drawbacks, it 
should be minimised 129-132 

3. This *MndirecUy individualistic" interference blends in 

practice with " paternal " interference in the interest of 
the persons interfered with ; the distinction between 
the latter and directly individualistic interference is 
sometimes subtle, — especially in cases of precautions 
against imposition 132-136 

4. There seems no adequate reason for condemning abso- 

lutely even *' paternal" interference (with sane adults); 
especially in mild forms ; such as interference by de- 
clining to interfere ....... 136-140 

6. Individualism of course admits paternal interference of 
Government to protect children from parental oppres- 
sion or neglect ; but the consideration of governmental 
aid to education carries us into the discussion of 
Socialism ........ 140—142 



CHAPTER X 

SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 

1. Lauter Faire rests on two assumptions : (1) ptychological^ 

" that individuals are likely to provide for their own 
welfare better than government ;" and (2) sociological, 
'Hhat the common welfare is likely to be best pro- 
moted by individuals promoting their private interest 
intelligently." The first excludes "paternal," the 
second "socialistic" interference. Neither assumption 
is completely true ....... 143-146 

2. In any case, on strictly individualistic principles, the ap- 

propriation of natural resources by individuals may be 
indefinitely restricted in the interest of the community. 
Apart from this, abstract theory shows several cases in 
which the individual's interest does not tend in the 
direction roost conducive to the common interest, — even 
assuming that utility to society is accurately measured 
by market value ....... 146-161 



CONTENTS XV 



PAOBS 

3. These cases largely explain the extent to which, in 

modem States, Uie provision of commodities is actu- 
ally undertaken or regulated by Government, with 
a view to benefit the community as a whole. This 
kind of interference may be called, in a wide sense, 
Socialistic 151-154 

4. Public expenditure for emigration, education and culture, 

art and science, is defensible on similar grounds . . 154-156 

5. An important amount of *' Socialism " (in this sense) is 

found in the civil law of the most individualistic of 
modem States — e,g, in the received limitation of copy- 
right, and the limitation of contract by bankruptcy . 156-157 

6. " Socialism," in a narrower sense, aims at greater equality 

in the distribution of wealth. Public ownership and 
governmental management of the instruments of pro- 
duction would tend to realise this ; but would arrest 
industrial progress and diminish the product to be 
distributed. Still the gain of reducing the actually 
existing inequalities of income is on the whole clear ; 
and expenditure directed to this end, in the way of 
equalisation of opportunities, is defensible on indi- 
vidualistic grounds ....... 157-163 

7. Governmental provision for the relief of indigence is 

necessary ; but the best method of making it is diffi- 
cult to determine. The rational determination of this, 
and of the limits of Socialistic interference generally, 
depends partly on varying social and political 
conditions 164-168 



CHAPTER XI 

THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNlfENT 

1. The effective performance of governmental functions 

involves legal repression of either overt resistance to, 
or indirect interference with, the discharge of official 
duty 169-172 

2. It also requires an extensive provision of (a) personal 

services — which, whether voluntarily or compulsorily 
rendered, must be mostly remunerated, — (6) material 
products of labour, and (c) land or other natural 
resources 172-176 

3. The supply of funds thus required — though tem- 

porarily they may be to a great extent borrowed — 
must in the long run be mainly raised by taxation (in 
a wide sense) 176-178 



xvi ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



PAOBS 

4. In distributing the burden of taxation, the principle 

'Hhat recipients of utility from Qovemment should 
pay in proportion to the utility received " should be 
applied so far as it is fairly applicable. But the 
utility of the greater part of the cost of Government 
cannot be thus individualised ..... 178-181 

5. In distributing the greater part of taxation, therefore, 

" equality of burden " should be the aim. But only a 
rough approximation to this is possible, especially as it 
is desirable that the contribution of the poor should 
mainly take the form of taxes on non-necessary con- 
sumption. Taxes on inheritance are «ut generis^ and 
may be fairly made a special burden on the propertied 
classes ......... 181-186 



CHAPTER XII 

GOVERNMENTAL ENCROACHMENTS AND COMPENSATION 

1. Qovemmental interferences with established private 

rights are in various ways inevitable : it is therefore 
important to consider how far compensation is conse- 
quently due to private persons ..... 187-189 

2. Except at special ciiscs the products of industry should 

generally be purchased by Government from voluntary 
sellers at their market value ; but land may be fairly 
taken compulsorily, at the price it would have had 
apart from the governmental need, together with com- 
pensation for any special loss which the previous 
owner suffers in consequence. But the public may 
claim as a set-off any additional value which accrues to 
the remaining property of the person expropriated, 
from the governmental use of the land taken. Other 
invasions of legally secured expectations of individuals 
should be compensated on similar principles . 189-193 

3. If changes in law determining rights of property — and 

analogous rights — inflict definite and considerable 
damage on individuals, a claim to compensation should 
be admitted ; but not necessarily to full compensation, 
so far as the most profitable use of the right was — 
before the legal change — a subject of general moral 
condemnation ....... 193-197 

4. Changes that aim at a more equitable distribution of 

burdens of taxation do not — speaking broadly — justify 
a claim for compensation. Nor, ordinarily, do changes 



CONTENTS XVil 



PAGES 



in the industrial action of Government, unless the 
amount of loss that they inflict on special classes is 
peculiarly sudden and severe 197-199 

CHAPTER Xm 

LAW AND MORALITY 

1. Positive Law and Positive Morality may he distinguished 

hy their respective sanctions. But they also differ 
importantly, regarded merely as intelligihle systems : 
since in the former case douhts as to what is law may 
be authoritatively removed by judicial interpretation, 
and divergences between what is and what o\bghi to be 
law may be removed by legislation .... 200-203 

2. But with morality it is otherwise ; hence there is much 

more vagueness, uncertainty, and variation in the estab- 
lished moral code than in the established law . . 203-206 

3. The danger of conflict with positive morality limits im- 

portantly the action of government ; on the other hand, 
positive morality is to some extent modifiable by the 
legislator 206-208 

4. Positive morality is further politically important, for the 

repression by censure of various kinds of mischievous 
acts which cannot so well be repressed by legal penalties, 
and for the encouragement by approbation of benefi- 
cent acts 208-212 

5. Primd facie it would seem reasonable for Government to 

provide and pay for teaching in morality : but there 
are strong arguments on the other side. Practically, 
the question for a modem Qovernment is how far it 
should subvent and control Churches. This will be 
considered later (ch. xzviiL) 212-216 

CHAPTER XIV 

THE AREA OF GOVERNMENT — STATES AND DISTRICTS 

1. It would be a great gain if the whole of civilised society 

could be brought under a common government, for the 
purpose of preventing wars among civilised men. But 
it is at present hopeless to aim at this . . . 217-220 

2. A State is an independent society of human beings, living 

in a certain degree of civilis^ order, and united by 
obedience to a common government, which exercises 
supreme dominion over a certain territory. Accord- 



XVlU ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



ing to the political ideal, practicallj now dominant, a 
State should be coextensive with a Nation ; i>. its 
members should be united by a further sentiment of 
community, not dependent on the existence of a com- 
mon government ....... 220-226 

3. Even where this is not the case, a part of a State is not 

held to be justified in attempting to secede from the 
rest with its territory, except on grounds of serious 
oppression or misgovernment ..... 226-229 

4. Membership of a State is determined primarily by birth 

— either ( 1 ) from parents who are members or (2) within 
the territory of the State ; — but partly also by consent, 
as expatriation is ordinarily free .... 229-232 
6. Local differences in laws, within the limits of a State, are 
largely due to historical causes ; how far such differ- 
ences ought to be retained is a balanced question. 
Other variations in legislation, and in other kinds of 
governmental interference, have a reasonable basis in 
diflferences of physical conditions .... 232-236 



CHAPTER XV 

PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 

1. The accepted rules of international duty are in the main 

based on the principle of mutual non-interference : and 
we may reasonably adopt this as the only principle 
generally applicable to the relations of civilised Statea 
In applying this principle to international relations, 
special questions arise ...... 237-246 

2. (a) From the incomplete definiteness and coherence of 

States as compared with individuals : for instance, the 
pai-tial interfusion of nations raises disputed questions 
as to the detennination of membership of a State, and 
as to the legitimate treatment of resident aliens . . 246-249 

3. Especially in the case of aliens who are fugitive law- 

breakers from, or otherwise hostile to, a neighbouring 

State 249-261 

4. (&) Tlie raXvmah of governmental control over portions 

of the earth's surface is analogous, but not precisely 
similar, to the raivmaJU of private property in land. 
Thus special questions arise in determining the legiti- 
mate extent of this dominion, and the modes of acquir- 
ing it ; also as regards the relations of members of 
different States, in territory not under civilised govern- 
ment 262-267 



CONTENTS xix 



PAGES 



6. (c) In international relations a contract made under un- 

jost coercion cannot be treated as simplj invalid . 257-258 

6. From the fact that the internal cohesion of States is 
liable to be broken, difficult questions arise as to the 
right of other States to intervene .... 258-262 



CHAPTER X\l 

THE REGULATION OF WAR 

1. If one State seriously infringes on the international rights 

of another, and obstinately refuses reparation, the latter 
must be held justified in resorting to force, if arbitra- 
tion is for any valid reason impracticable. And if 
neighbouring States cannot combine effectively on the 
side of justice, it only remains to impose impartially 
on both parties rules limiting the mischief of war . 263-267 

2. A belligerent must be allowed to inflict on his enemy 

such mischief as is likely to be effective in disabling 
him and inducing him to submit ; but he may be 
expected to abstain from such mischief as does not 
conduce to these ends importantly in proportion to its 
amount, whether the mischief be personal injuries, . 267-270 

3. or seizure of property : but he can hardly be expected to 

abstain from levying severe contributions, even on the 
property of non-combatants ..... 270-273 

4. As for neutrals — it is clear that belligerents ought not to 

injure neutrals, nor neutrals to aid belligerents in their 
warlike operations : but some difficult questions arise 
in the effort to reconcile these two principles with each 
other — and the latter with common humanity — in their 
practical applications ...... 273-276 

5. The regulation of civil war raises the further question 

when and how far insurgents ought to receive, from 
their own government or from neutrals, the rights and 
privileges of ordinary belligerents . . . .276-278 

6. Grave difficulties are raised by the question " how far 

agreements imposed on a State by an unjust victor are 

to be held binding " . .' . . 278-283 

CHAPTER XVII 

INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 

1. Among rules of international duty we may distinguish 
those of which the breach is commonly held to justify 

h 



XX ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



PAOB) 

force, from those of which the breach is only held to 

justify disapprobation and complaint .... 284-286 

2. But the distinction between the two is somewhat blurred 

by the widespread toleration of actual or threatened 
aggression on behalf of national interests, not justified 
by recognised rules of international right For various 
reasons, too, the definition of international rights must 
be much more imperfect than that of civil rights . 286-289 

3. Moreover, what is commonly called International Law 

differs from Positive Law within a State, and more 
resembles Positive Morality, in having the distinction 
obscure, and the transition gradual and indefinite, 
between rules that art^ and rules tliat cmjihi to be, 
established 289-292 

4. Still, in respect of the process of changing it. International 

Law occupies a position intermediate between Positive 
Law and Positive Morality ; and certain parts of it 
have reached a degree of definiteness which makes it 
resemble the former more than the latter. But this is 
not the case with the most important rules of inter- 
national duty 292-296 



CHAPTER XVIII 

PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 

1. International duty cannot be determined on the basis of 

exclusive regard for national interest, and must be held 
paramount in case of conflict with the latter. But 
it is generally — though perhaps not always — the 
interest of a State to observe the recognised rules of 
international duty, so long as it has a reasonable ex- 
pectation that they will be observed by other States : 
while in dealing with any State that will not observe 
them, these recognised restraints must be held to be 
correspondingly relaxed. It is a more doubtful (question 
whether a State ought to risk war to prevent high- 
handed aggression by another State against a third . 297-301 

2. Restrictions on free trade between States are inexpedient, 

economically and politically, for the community formed 
by the aggregate of the trading States ; and though they 
may in certain cases bring economic gain to the par- 
ticular State imposing them, they are not on the whole 
to be recommended ; — except possibly by way of re- 
taliation 301-307 



CONTENTS XXI 



PAGES 

3. The free admifision of aliens will generally be advantage- 

ous ; but in certain circumstances it may be the right 

policy to place restrictions on it . . . 307-309 

4. Extension of territory through conquest, even when it is 

not to be condemned as injurious to the conquered, is 
doubtful in policy : the disadvantages and drawbacks 
require to be carefully estimated in each particular 
case 309-312 

5. Expansion by conquest passes by gradual transitions into 

expansion by colonisation 312-314 

6. Emigration in itself, under ordinary circumstances, is 

rather to be regulated than systematically promoted by 
government: 314-318 

7. except where the emigration is into territory under the 

control of the same government, so that the disposal of 
unoccupied lands affords a means of promoting it . 318-321 

8. The management of the relations between colonists and 

'^ aborigines " is a matter of much difficulty, requiring 

careful regulations and restrictions . .321-327 



PAET II 
CHAPTER XIX 

METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 

1. When we ask how Government is to be constituted to do 

the work marked out for it, the need is at once manifest 
of (1) a Judicial organ to decide whether and by whom 
laws have been broken, and (2) an Executive organ to 
prevent and punish such breaches, and enforce repara- 
tion for wrongs inflicted by them, to manage the foreign 
relations of the State, and to levy the necessary taxes. 
Further, as a security against oppressive taxation, there 
is need of a Money-granting organ independent of the 
Executive 331-336 

2. The need of Legislation is also clear, in order that legal 

duties may be definite and " cognoscible," . . . 336-340 

3. and therefore of a Legislative organ — even if Govern- 

mental interference be restricted to the Individualistic 
minimum ..... ... 340-343 

4. If we admit — as modem States generally do — some 

amount of " indirectly individualistic," " paternal," and 
"socialistic" legislation, the need of a continually 



xxii ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

PAGES 

active Legislature becomes still more palpable ; and 
also the need of a larger and more complex Executive ; 
— tbougb part of the additional work thus rendered 
necessary may be assigned to semi-public institutions . 343-347 
6. It is important that Executive functions — whether 
coercive or non-coercive — should be carefully kept 
within the limits of the law ; and therefore supervised 
by a legislative organ wholly or mainly distinct from the 
executive : also the organisation of the Executive should 
be under the control of the " money-granting " organ, 
which, again, we may assume to be wholly or mainly 
identical with the Legislature ..... 347-35 1 

6. The Executive organ will therefore be normally sub- 

ordinate to the Legislature, as is, indeed, implied in the 
term " executive : '' — though it must be admitted that 
this term does not well describe the functions of the 
organ so called, so far as it deals with foreign affairs . 351-353 

7. The Judicial, as well as the Executive organ, should be 

distinct from the Legislature ..... 353-356 

8. But, for various reasons, the threefold distribution of 

Govermental functions among organs distinguished as 
Legislative, Executive, and Judicial, cannot be made 
complete ........ 356-364 

9. It is an error to think that systematic discussion of the 

proper construction of these organs is unprofitable 

because " constitutions are organic growths " . 364-366 



CHAPTER XX 

TIIK LEGISLATURE 

1. Legal experts should have a large and responsible share 

in legislation \ but representatives periodically elected 
by the citizens at large should constitute the whole, or 
a chief part, of the organ of legislation ; because such 
persons are more likely to have empirical knowledge 
of, and keen concern for, the legislative needs of the 
community, than legislators otherwise selected ; and 
their legislation is more likely to be acceptable to the 
governed ........ 367-374 

2. The representative system is also widely commended — 

perhaps too confidently — as tending to improve the 
electorate, intellectually and morally . . . 374-378 

3. Primd fade, the electorate should include all self-support- 

ing sane adults : but the exclusion of some may be 



CONTENTS xxill 



PAOES 

justified by special proof (a) that their interests will 
not suffer, or (&) that they will make a dangerously bad 
use of the franchise, through intimidation, bribery, or 
demagogy 378-383 

4. Extreme ignor<&nce, crime, and disgraceful conduct, 

pauperism, bankruptcy, are valid reasons for exclusion : 
there are also reasons of a different kind for excluding 
certain classes of employees, especially soldiers. There 
seem to be no adequate reasons for excluding women 
as such ......... 383—388 

5. The danger of legislation oppressive to the rich is ad- 

mitted : but the obvious plan of meeting it by allotting 
more electoral power to persons of wealth and education 
involves serious disadvantages and drawbacks . . 388-394 

6. The electorate should be divided locally, not by free 

combination : division into equal single-member con- 
stituencies has the advantage of simplicity, but the 
disadvantage of artificiality. In the case of electoral 
divisions with several members, the representation of 
substantial minorities should be secured by some form 
of the method of the quota ..... 394-400 

7. For the most part, the right to be elected should be 

extended coincidently with the right to elect : but it 
seems expedient to keep the post of legislator unsalaried 
— ^thus giving an advantage to candidates of inde- 
pendent means ....... 400-402 

8. Election in two stages is not to be recommended — except 

perhaps for a Second Chamber ..... 402-405 

9. The legislative assembly should be of moderate dimensions, 

working largely by Committees. Initiation of legisla- 
tion should be free to all members. The necessary 
qwofrum requires careful consideration . 406-407 



CHAPTER XXI 

THE EXECUTIVE 

1. For the efficient working of the Executive organ, especi- 

ally at crises, it is expedient that the most important 
part of its work should be under the control of a 
Supreme Executive ...... 408-412 

2. Generally speaking, the work of the Executive officials 

should be voluntary and remunerated ; and the workers 

in various grades appointed by official selectors . . 412-415 

3. Qualifications for the lower posts should be partly ascer- 

tained by external examinations : and it may be neces- 



XXIV ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

PAOEH 

sary, as a protection against political partisanship, that 
the examinations should be competitive, and entirely 
determine admission to the vacancies. As regards 
higher posts, a responsible superior official should have 
free choice among duly qualified persons . . 415-418 

4. Each department should have an individual head, for 
concentration of responsibility : but for some important 
decisions a council should be consulted ; and its con- 
sent should be required in certain cases . . . 418-420 

6. The tenure of office should be — formally or practically — 
on "good behaviour," subordinates being removable 
from particular employments at the discretion of the 
chief, but not dismissible from the service without a 
quasi-judicial inquiry ...... 420-422 

6. The heads of departments — with or without other persons 

— should form a Council or Cabinet that should be 
consulted on the most important Executive decisions. 
This Council should have an individual head ; and it 
seems most conducive to efficiency to give him the 
appointment — and perhaps the dismissal — of the heads 
of departments : but it does not seem expedient to 
concentrate formally in his hands the iK)wer and re- 
sponsibility of Supreme Executive control . . . 422-426 

7. But the relation of the Cabinet to its head must largely 

depend on the relation of the Supreme Executive to 

the Legislature 426-427 

8. We may note the difference in this respect between 

the English and the German types of Constitutional 
Monarchy 427-428 



CHAPTER XXII 

RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 

1. The simple subordination of the Executive to a single 

assembly is objectionable ; partly as leading to excessive 
interference of Parliament in administration, especially 
dangerous in foreign affairs ..... 429-432 

2. Other disadvantages attend the system of a Parliamentary' 

Executive, with large powers, but simply dismissible 

by the assembly 432-434 

3. These disadvantages are somewhat reduced, in the English 

constitution, by the power of dissolution which the 

Cabinet possesses ....... 434-437 



CONTENTS XXV 



PAGES 



4. The formal monarch, in the English type of polity, is on 

the whole a valuable, but not an indispensable, institu- 
tion : but his value depends on his retaining as much 
real power as is compatible with complete Parliament- 
ary Government ....... 437-442 

5. He need not necessarily be hereditary . . 442-443 

6. The English type of Parliamentar}' Government leads 

naturally to a certain fusion of legislative and exe- 
cutive functions ....... 443-444 

7. The harmony it maintains between Legislature and 

Executive is a great advantage, but it is liable to be 
realised at the expense of serious drawbacks, especially 
instability and inexpertness of ministers . . 444-447 

8. Simple Constitutional Monarchy affords a means of 

avoiding these drawbacks ; but it vests dangerous 
powers in an irremovable individual, for whose com- 
petence there is no adequate security. . 447-451 

9. This last danger is avoided by the plan of a Periodical 

Executive ; which is exemplified by the " Presidential 
System " of the United States, but also admits of a non- 
monarchical organisation . ..... 451-455 

10. The Executive should have some power of practically 

legislating alone : but such power should be carefully 
limited — especially if there are long intervals between 
parliamentary sessions. The Executive should also 
have some share — though probably less than has 
become customary in England — in the legislative 
work of Parliament ; and a special control over finan- 
cial proposals may advantageously be given to it . 455-459 

1 1. The Legislature cannot conveniently be restrained from 

dealing with particular cases in general legislation ; 
but it should be restrained, by law or custom, from 
interfering with the selection of individuals for 
executive work, and from intervening directly with 
the management of foreign affairs, except in certain 
cases of special importance where the consent of the 
supreme legislative and money-granting organ seems 
ordinarily indispensable ..... 459-462 

12. Some precautions are needed to obviate the danger of 

undue influence, exercised by the executive on 
members of Parliament ; especially the latter should 
be generally incapable of holding the subordinate 
executive offices ....... 462-464 



XXVI ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

CHAPTER XXIII 

TWO CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 



PAOBB 



1. A second chamber is likely to be osefol in checking 

hasty legislation, impeding combinations of sinister 
interests, and supplementing the deficiencies of the 
primary representative assembly .... 465-468 

2. To give the two chambers co-ordinate powers is the 

simplest plan : but it creates a difficulty as regards 
financial control, and is generally unsuited to Parlia- 
mentary government : it is more suitable where the 
Supreme Executive holds office for life or for a fixed 
period . ........ 468-473 

3. A senate designed to be co-ordinate in power with the 

House of Representatives should be elected, directly or 
indirectly, by the citizens at large by some method 
calculated to render it less amenable than the other 
chamber to transient movements of popular feeling. If 
its power is more limited, other modes of appointment 
are suitable ........ 473-478 

4. The functions of the chambers may be conveniently 

differentiated in various ways ..... 478-480 



CHAPTER XXIV 

THE JUDICIARY AND ITS RELATION TO OTHER ORGANS 

1. The Judiciary should be in the main separate from the 

Legislature ; but (a) the Legislature should somehow 
avail itself of judicial experience ; and (6) the highest 
Court cannot well be deprived of the power of making 
Law to some extent ...... 481-484 

2. The Judiciary should decide legal questions relating to 

constitutional as well as civil rights, including member- 
ship of the Legislature ; but the latter should be final 
ju(]^ of its own procedure and order . 484-487 

3. For the security of private citizens, it is important that 

the Judiciary should be as independent of the executive 
as possible ; this should be kept in view in determining 
the appointment and dismissal of judges . 487-489 

4. This is one ground for introducing an improfessional 

element into judicial tribunals ; but this is also 



CONTENTS xxvii 



PAOB8 



advocated on other grounds. This introduction may 

take various forms, of which the jury is one . 489-492 

5. There are strong grounds for some introduction of 

judges other than professional lawyers, where special 
experience of affairs is required for right judgment; 
but, speaking generally, the weight of argument seems 
against the use of a jury in civil trials ; there are, how- 
ever, special reasons for adopting it in criminal trials . 492-499 

6. There are important differences in the machinery 

appropriate to civil and criminal cases respectively ; 
especially a public prosecutor is required for the 
latter ; though private prosecutions should also be 
idlowed, unless judicially checked .... 499-502 

7. Appeals should generally be allowed on questions of law ; 

it is more doubtful how far they should be allowed on 
questions of fact If the power of pardon is used as a 
substitute in criminal cases, it should not be practically 
exercised by the executive alone .... 502-504 

8. The specialisation of the judiciary is a difficult question ; 

in particular, it is doubtful whether there should be 
"Administrative Courts" for any disputes of right 
between government officials and private persons . 504-507 

9. A special tribunal for dealing with official misconduct 

of which the mischief falls on the public is in some 

cases necessary, though difficult to construct . 507-510 



CHAPTER XXV 

LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 

1. Partially independent organs of local government are 

required to realise the full advantages of representative 
government ; but they involve certain drawbacks and 
dangers, and the independent power allotted to them 
requires careful limitation ..... 511-514 

2. The division of areas and functions will be determined 

by various considerations ; among which — apart from 
historical causes — the degree of separation of interests 
on the one hand, and the value of uniformity and 
system on the other band, are most important . .515-517 

3. The division of functions may be illustrated by road- 

making, sanitary intervention, poor -relief, and the 
prevention and punishment of crime . . . 517-521 

4. An extensive devolution of legislative powers on local 

governments has some advantages ; but they are out- 



XXVlll ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



PAOB« 

weighed by the attendant drawbacks — at least in the 
case of a tolerably homogeneous community, of which 
the parts are in active mutual communication .521-525 

5. Local Governments should be constructed on the general 

principles before laid down for the organisation of the 
central government, but with important differences in 
their application ....... 525-526 

6. In some cases governmental powers may properly be 

entrusted to representatives of sections of the com- 
munity not locally defined ; but such cases are 
exceptional ........ 526-529 



CHAPTER XXVI 

FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 

1. If the powers of local Governments are — for historical or 

other reasons — extended beyond a certain point, the 
State becomes practically composite ; if the component 
parts are politically co-ordinate and constitutionally 
separate, it becomes Federal ..... 530-532 

2. Federality implies a constitutional division of powers 

between the Governments of the part-states and the 
Government of the whole, by which a substantial 
autonomy is secured to the former ; and some expres- 
sion of the separate political existence of the part-states 
in the structure of a federal Government is natural, 
though not essential. A federal Constitution will tend 
to be stable ; but there should be some legal process 
of changing it ....... 532-537 

3. The distinction between a Federal State and a Confedera- 

tion of States having a common organ of Government 
may be variously drawn ; but it seems essential to a 
well-organised Federal State that the common Govern- 
ment should enter into important direct relations with 
individual citizens . . . .537-539 

4. Points of peculiar importance in the construction of a 

Federal Government are (1) the appointment of the 
organ that decides disputed questions of constitutional 
interpretation ; and (2) the provision of adequate 
security for the divergent interests of the part-states. 
This latter presents a specially difficult problem where 
the parts are few and unequal ..... 539-542 

5. A Federal Union enables its members to enjoy most of 

the military and economic advantages of large states, 



CONTENTS XXIX 



PAORH 

with the minimum saciifice of local independence and 
individual freedom ; the inconveniences of a federal 
state are chiefly weakness of internal cohesion and 
diversity of localised legislation . . 542-544 

6. The relation of dominant states to dependencies has 

usually a partial resemblance to one or other of the 
forms of federal union — with the fundamental distinction 
that the members of any dependent part-state have no 
control over the common Government of the whole. 
Such dependencies chiefly arise either through (1) Con- 
quest — in which case the form of government will 
reasonably vary with the amount of coercion required — 544-546 

7. or (2) through Colonisation. In this latter case the 

most expedient relation between mother-country and 
colony will partly depend on the character and future 
destiny of the colony ; but in any case the Colonial 
department of the Central Government has a difficult 
task, and should be very carefully organised . . 546-550 



CHAPTER XXVII 

THE CONTROL OF TIIE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 

1. In West -European States generally, the share of the 

people at large in Government is confined to the 
election of legislators ; it is therefore very important 
to ascertain precisely the relation which is or ought to 
be thus established between electors and elected. A 
common view of representative government is, that the 
" people govern through their representatives '* . . 551-553 

2. If this view is sound, it would be desirable to give the 

electorate a more direct and complete control over their 
representatives than is attempted in any European 
country except Switzerland ; but I think, on the 
contrary, that it should be the constitutional duty of 
the elected legislator to act on his own judgment . 554-558 

3. I think, however, that the direct intervention of the 

citizens at large is desirable in certain special cases ; 
chiefly (1) to settle a disagreement between two legisla- 
tive chambers, or (2) when changes are required in a 
rigid constitution, not alterable by the ordinary process 
of legislation ........ 558-560 

4. A rigid constitution, if the rigidity be not excessive, is a 

useful barrier against hasty fundamental changes ; but 
it has some drawbacks — especially the difficulty of 



XXX ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



PAGBS. 

linding an unexceptionable organ for deciding con- 
stitutional disputes ....... 560-566 

5. Constitutional rules other than structural should be 

based on special reasons for distrusting the judgment 

of the ordinary legislature ..... 566-569 

6. Such rules may be needed to protect the freedom of 

individuals from legislative encroachment ; but it is 
difhcult to make them very precise without hampering 
the legislature unduly. Examples of this class are 
rules protecting free speech and freedom of the press . 569-571 

CHAPTER XXVm 

THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 

1. Political Government— of the coercive association called 

the State — is only one species of government The 
voluntary associations found in modem political 
societies have a kind of government, distinguished 
from political government by its very limited power 
of inflicting penalties ...... 572-574 

2. A special danger of obstinate disobedience to Government 

arises in the case of such associations, when their aims 
conflict with those of Government, through the con- 
sciousness of strength which association gives ; this 
danger may constitute an adequate ground for special 
repressive intervention. Similar reasons for special 
intervention are applicable in the case of political 
meetings ........ 574-577 

3. Moral coercion — by acts not illegal apart from their 

coercive purpose — ^may be exercised by such an associa- 
tion to an extent gravely mischievous ; but it is difficult 
to lay down legal rules that will effectively prevent 
the mischief, without too severely restricting freedom. 
This applies especially to industrial associations ; 
which may also be economically mischievous to the 
community as a whole, through monopoly. . 577-583 

4. Churches perform a function useful to the State, which 

seems likely to be better performed if they are kept 
independent of the State — apart from the danger of 
conflict between Church and State. How far this 
danger justifies a permanent interference of Govern- 
ment to avert it is a more difficult question, — the right 
answer to which seems to vary with circumstances . 583-585 

5. If special control over Churches is required, a compara- 

tively unobjectionable mode of exercising it is by 



CONTENTS XXXI 



PAGES 



granting certain religious associations certain minor 
privileges and indirect endowments, which they would 
be afraid of losing in case of conflict If the Church 
possesses funds derived from private sources, a more 
drastic kind of interference will be easy in case of 
conflict, — and may be expedient even apart from 
conflict ......... 586-588 



CHAPTER XXIX 

PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 

1. The natural division into parties for political purposes 
would seem to be multiple, not dual ; whether the 
parties are based on similarity of convictions or on 
community of interests ...... 589-593 

S. The decisive impulse towards a permanently dual 
organisation of parties appears to be given by the 
desire to carry elections, — especially elections in which 
the Supreme Executive is directly or indirectly ap- 
pointed. ........ 593-595 

3. The dual party system tends to diminish the instability 

that attaches to Parliamentary Qovemment^ and to 
render the criticism of governmental measures more 
orderly and circumspect ; but it tends to make party- 
spirit more comprehensive and absorbing, party- 
criticism more systematically factious, and the utterances 
of ordinary politicians more habitually disingenuous. 
It also aggravates the defects of representative govern- 
ment in other ways ....... 595-600 

4. Certain remedies, partly political, partly moral, may be 

suggested for these evils ; the former will vary with the 

precise form of government adopted .... 600-603 

CHAPTER XXX 

CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 

1. The current classification of forms of government is 

originally derived from the results of Greek political 
experience ; but the modem use of the leading terms 
is materially different from the Aristotelian use . . 604-609 

2. We may distinguish two different conceptions of the 

fundamental principle of democracy. The first is ex- 
pressed in the proposition " that Government should rest 
on the active consent of the majority of the governed.'' 



XXXll ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



PAOES 

This is not, however, understood to imply that this 
majority should have the right to interfere authorita- 
tively in any and every governmental decision . . 609-613 

3. Hence the principle of democracy, as ahove conceived, 

may be accepted without accepting the further proposi- 
tion " that any honest and self-supporting citizen is as 
well qualified as any other for the work of government'' 
Its acceptance is therefore compatible with a full 
admission of the need of specially qualified persons for 
the greater part of the work of Government . 613-616 

4. In fact the representative system combines the principle 

of aristocracy — in the sense of " the rule of those best 
qualified to rule " — with that of democracy ; it also 
tends to have a useful element of oligarchy, if the 
representatives are unpaid ..... 616-619 

5. The principle of monarchy is also to an important extent 

reconcilable with that of democracy .... 619-622 



CHAPTER XXXI 

SOVERBIGNTY AND ORDER 

1. The question where Supreme Political Power actually 

resides in a State cannot be satisfactorily answered 
without a careful definition of Political Power. Political 
power, in an orderly society, is exercised by or through 
some organ of government ; it is the power exercised 
in such a society by persons whose directions to other 
members of the society will be enforced, if necessary, 
by physical violence — though the fear of this violence 
is not the sole motive producing obedience to such 
directions 623-625 

2. The power exercised by any individual or body of persons 

on an organ of government is not strictly political 
power, imless the former is able to withdraw or 
diminish the governmental power of the latter . . 626-628 

3. It is doubtful how far a body that can dismiss an organ 

of government is to be regarded as its political superior 
(1) if it can only dismiss at certain periodic intervals, 
or (2) if it is not completely capable of corporate action 628-630 

4. In a certain sense it is true that the mass of the people 

in any country is the ultimate depository of political 
power. But in other than democratic states this power 
is unconsciously possessed, unexercised, and largely un- 
feared. Still the wishes of the community impose 
some limits on governmental power, even in un- 



CONTENTS xxxiii 



PAOKA 



democratic commiinities, through the fear of disorder ; 
and, for a similar reason, leaders of opinion outside 
Government have a share of political power . 630-633 

5. If we ask where supreme political power rests in a State 

with a given governmental structure, we must extend 
further the assumption that it is " orderly '' ; we must 
take ^ order " to include performance of the assigned 
functions, on the part of the different organs of 
Qovemment 633-638 

6. The actual complexity in the distribution of political 

power will be further illustrated by considering the 
question " where supreme political power resides," in 
relation to the chief forms of Government distinguished 
and discussed in previous chapters .... 638-643 

7. The effective physical force of different sections of the 

community is by no means proportioned to their 
numbers. A standing army of professional soldiers is 
therefore a source of danger to a State . 643-645 

8. A moral right of insurrection, as an ultimate resource 

against misgovemment, must be admitted in a 
democratic community, no less than under other forms 
of government . 646-650 

Appendix (on Austin's view of Sovereignty) . 661-658 



CHAPTEE I 

SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 

§ 1. On moral questions, in our age and country, most 
persons are accustomed from comparatively early years 
to pronounce confident decisions; sometimes arrived at 
intuitively, or at least without conscious processes of 
reasoning, sometimes the result of rational processes of 
more or less length. The citizens of a modem state — at 
least if it is under government in any degree popular — are 
similarly accustomed to decide imhesitatingly many, if not 
all, of the political questions which the course of their 
national life brings before them: but in this case, to a 
greater extent than in the former, the decisions are arrived 
at as the result of conscious reasoning from certain general 
principles or assumptiona Now, the primary aim of the 
Political Theory that is here to be expoimded is not to 
supply any entirely new method of obtaining reasoned 
answers to political questions; but rather, by careful 
reflection, to introduce greater clearness and consistency 
into the kind of thought and reasoning with which we are 
all more or less familiar. In order to arrive at sound con- 
clusions on practical questions — I do not mean infallible 
conclusions, but conclusions as free from error as human 
beings, in the present stage of their development, can hope 
to reach — much detailed knowledge is needed which the 
general theory of politics cannot profess to give: it can 
only point out the nature and sources of this further 

B 



^ 



2 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

knowledge, and the manner in which it is to be applied. The 
general theory of politics ought to classify the considera- 
tions by which any given political question should be 
decided, and indicate their general bearing on the question : 
but the degree of weight to be attached to each species of 
considerations in any particular case is usually difficult to 
estimate precisely without special experience : so that the 
main practical use of the theory is to show how experience 
is to be interrogated. Still, clearness and precision in our 
general political conceptions, definiteness and consistency in 
our fundamental assumptions and methods of reasoning, 
though they do not constitute anything like a complete 
protection against erroneous practical conclusions, are yet, 
I believe, of considerable practical value ; and the system- 
atic effort to acquire them deserves an important place 
in the intellectual training of a thoroughly educated man 
and citizen. 

We may appropriately begin by trying to attain clear- 
ness and precision in our general conception of the subject 
investigated. In the first place, it seems to me convenient 
and in accordance with usage to draw a distinction, — 
which is sometimes overlooked, — between " Politics '* and 
the "Social Science," or, as it is now most commonly 
called, Sociology. I take the former study as having a 
narrower scope than the latter : Sociology, as I conceive it, 
deals with human societies generaUy ; Politics with governed 
societies regarded as possessing government, — that is, societies 
of which the members are accustomed to obey, at least in 
certain matters, the directions given by some person or body of 
persons forming part of the society. The difference between 
the two subjects is not indeed great, if we merely consider 
the number of human beings included in either case ; since 
the great majority of mankind are, and have been in his- 
torical times, members of political or governed societiea 
Still, we know of inferior races who only exhibit this 
characteristic doubtfully and imperfectly : as Mr. Spencer 
points out (Princ, of Soc. § 228), " groups of Esquimaux, 
of Australians, of Bushmen, of Fuegians, are without even 



SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 



that primary contrast of parts implied by settled chieftain- 
ship. Their members are subject to no control but such 
as is temporarily acquired by the stronger, or more cunning, 
or more experienced." Such groups, therefore, lack what we 
now regard as an essential characteristic of political society, 
though they can hardly be excluded from the range of 
•* Sociology " or the " Social Science." ^ 

But we are more concerned to note that the members 
even of societies that have settled governments have 
relations to each other of the greatest importance, which, 
though they could hardly be maintained without govern- 
ment, are still, in the main, not determined by it : and, 
accordingly, in those branches of social science which 
are primarily concerned with these other relations, the fact 
of government drops properly into the background. Con- 
sider, for instance, the industrial or professional system 
of modem communities, by which men are distinguished 
from and related to each other as physicians, teachers, 
masons, carpenters, etc This vast system of relations, 
with all the minutely subdivided organisation of labour 
which it involves, has been in the main constructed with- 
out the direct action of government : though, no doubt, it 
could not be maintained without the enforcement, through 
governmental agency, of rights of property, contracts, etc ; 
and though it has been importantly modified — to a varying 
extent in different ages and countries — by direct govern- 
mental interference. Accordingly, it has been possible for 
the followers of Adam Smith to separate almost entirely the 
study of the industrial organisation of society — imder the 
name of "Political Economy"* — from the study of its 

^ Even in the case of superior races, in a primitive condition, it is often 
difficult to find anything that can be properly called government — except 
during war. Thus Burokhardt {Notes on the Bedouins^ i. pp. 115-6) tells 
us that though "every Arab tribe has its chief sheikh, and every camp 
is headed by a sheikh or at least by an Arab of some consideration," stiU 
*' the sheikh has no actual authority over individuals . . . his commands 
would be treated with contempt, but deference" may be ''paid to his 
advice." 

' In my Principles of Political Economy (Introduction, ch. ii. § 2) I have 
pointed out that the term ** Political Economy " was originaUy used to denote 



4 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

political organisation : and this separation I hold to be in 
the main expedient, though it is liable to be carried too far. 
We have also to note — what is sometimes overlooked by 
writers who lay stress on the analogy between the organism 
of an individual man (or other animal) and the ''social 
organism " — that human beings, considered in respect of 
their industrial or economic relations, fall into groups differ- 
ing widely, both in extent and in sharpness of definition, 
from the groups into which they are combined by their 
political relations. Thus most of the citizens of any Euro- 
pean community have, through foreign trade, economic 
relations of more or less importance with the members of 
some other communities : and not a few of them have a 
closer economic connection with some foreigners than they 
have with most of their fellow-citizens. 

There are other relations of various kinds by which 
civilised men, in the present age, are socially connected 
into groups not coinciding with either of those just 
discussed. Some of those groups — religious societies 
being the most important example — have a kind of 
government, and may therefore be called qtuisi- political. 
But, as they exist in modern^ countries generally, they 
differ from political societies in the important character- 
istic that the government of such a quasi-political group 
cannot inflict on its members any (mundane) penalty more 
formidable than exclusion from religious ceremonials and 
from voluntary social relations ; whereas the penalties in- 
flicted by the government of a political society — at any 
rate if its political character is fully developed — extend to 
deprivation of liberty, property, and even life itself. Other 
groups again — for example, those constituted by the pos- 
session of a conmion language and literature — have, as 
such, no government at alL The influence exercised on 
the lives of individuals by both kinds of relations consti- 

an art rather than a science — the theory of right governmental management 
of national industry, and not the theory of the manner in which industry 
tends to organise itself independently of governmental interference. 

* I mean by "modern" the type of State now prevalent in Western 
Europe and America. 



SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 



tutee a very important part of the whole fact of social 
organisation ; but I only refer to it here in order to make 
clear the distinction above drawn between " Social Science " 
or "Sociology," which treats of human society generally, 
and " Politics," which treats of political societies regarded in 
their political aspect : — i,e, as under government. Such a 
society, when it has attained a certain degree of civilised 
order, and is in settled occupation of a certain portion of 
the earth's surface over which its government exercises 
supreme control, we call a State.^ 

§ 2. The question, however, still remains how far Politics y 
can be properly or advantageously separated from the general 
science of society. To this question J. S. Mill (Loffic, B. 
vi. ch. ix. § 4) appears to give a decidedly negative answer. 
He says that there can be no separate science of govern- 
ment; government being the fact which of all others is 
most mixed up, both as cause and efiFect, with the qualities 
of the particular people or of the particular age : in treating 
of the phenomena of government we have to take account 
of "all the circumstances by which the qualities of the 
people are influenced." He holds, accordingly, that "all 
questions respecting the tendencies of forms of government 
must stand part of the general science of society, not of any 
separate branch of it." Of this general science, as he after- 
wards explains (ch. x. § 2), " the fundamental problem is to 
find the laws ciccording to which any state of society pro- 
duces the state which succeeds it and takes its place." And 
the solution of this problem, as he goes on to explain, can 
only be advantageously attempted by a method primarily 
historical : we must obtain from history empirical laws of 
social development, and afterwards endeavour to connect 
these, by a process which he calls " inverse deduction," with 
" the psychological and ethological laws which govern the 
action of circumstances on men and of men on circum- 
stances." In Mill's view, in short. Theoretical Politics can 
only be scientifically studied as one part or application of 
the Science or Philosophy of History. 

1 See chap. xiv. § 2. 



^ 



6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Now, I agree with Mill in holding that the scientific 
study of the structures and functions of the different 
governments that have actually existed in human societies 
cannot well be pursued in complete separation &om the 
scientific study of other important elements of the societies 
in question : whether the aim of the student is to ascer- 
tain the causes of the differences in such governments or 
to examine their effects. But I do not think that there 
is any fundamental difference, in this respect, between the 
study of political relations and the study of economic 
relations, or, again, of religion, of art, of science and philo- 
sophy, as factors of social life. In each of these cases the 
student concentrates his attention on one element of human 
history which can only be partially separated from other 
components of the whole complex fact of social development. 
Experience seems to show that this kind of concentration, 
and consequent partial separation of historical and socio- 
logical study into special branches, is unavoidable in the 
division of intellectual labour which the growth of our 
knowledge renders necessary in a continually increasing 
degree. I think, therefore, that it must be accepted in the 
study of Polity no less than in other departments of 
History and Social Science : though I quite admit that it 
ought never to be carried so far as to make us forget the 
influence exercised on government by other social changes 
— for instance, by the development of thought, of know- 
edge, of morals, of industry. 

In any case the study, at once historical and scientific, 
of Political Society, and the general science of society of 
which this study is a more or less separable element, are 
undoubtedly studies of great interest : and it is possible — 
perhaps even probable — that when they have reached a 
further stage of development they may take the leading 
place in any rational and systematic method of answering 
the political questions with which we shall be concerned in 
the present treatise. At present, however, I do not think 
that this is the case. 

As has been explained, the primary aim of these 



SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 



lectures is to set forth in a systematic manner the general 
notions and principles which we use in ordinary political 
reasonings. Now, ordinary political reasonings have some 
pra^cal aim in view: to determine whether either the 
constitviion or the action of government ought to be modified 
in a certain proposed manner. Hence the primary aim of our 
study must be similarly practical : we must endeavour to 
determine what ought to be, so far as the constitution 
and action of government are concerned, as distinct from 
what is or has been. And in the systematic reasonings by 
which we seek to arrive at such practical conclusions I 
conceive that the historical study of the forms and functions 
of government can at present only occupy a secondary 
place. 

For, first, it must be observed that History cannot 
determine for us the ultimate end and standard of good 
and bad, right and wrong, in political institutions ; — whether 
we take this to be general happiness, or social wellbeing 
defined somehow so as to distinguish it &om happines& 
This ultimate end we cannot get from history ; we bring it 
with us to the study of history when we judge of the good- 
ness or badness of the laws and political institutions which 
history shows us. 

Secondly, supposing that we are agreed on the ultimate 
end to which our political eiSTorts should be directed — and I 
think the majority of my readers will probably agree in 
taking it to be general happiness— still, the study of past 
history appears to me only to a very limited extent useful 
in determining our choice of means for the attainment of 
the end here and now. 

This is partly on account of the inevitable defects of 
the study of human history — the difficulty of ascertaining 
past events with sufficient fulness and accuracy to enable 
us to establish trustworthy generalisations as to their causal 
relationa But it is still more due to the very characteristic 
which gives the history of civilised mankind its special 
interest for the philosopher — viz. that it is concerned with 
that part of the knowable imiverse in which change most 



8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

distinctly takes the form of progress : so that each age has 
its own problems, in the solution of which the assistance 
that we can obtain from a study of preceding ages can only 
be of a subordinate kind. Even granting that History 
scientifically treated may enable us to decide, at least 
roughly and approximately, how far particular laws and 
institutions have tended to promote human happiness or 
social wellbeing in past ages ; we cannot hence legitimately 
infer, in any direct and cogent way, what structure or 
mode of action of government is likely to be most con- 
ducive to happiness here and now. This, indeed, the 
advocates of what is called the '' historical method " have 
usually maintained with especial emphasis : they have been 
especially anxious to urge that the value of all political 
institutions is " relative," and that those best adapted to 
promote social wellbeing in any given age and country may 
be in the highest degree unsuited to different circumstances 
and a different stage in the development of hiunan society. 
They have, it is true, chiefly urged this "relativity" as 
a reason against applying our current political maxims in 
judging the events and institutions of the past : but their 
argimients seem equally valid against attempts to base 
present maxims of policy on inductions from past history. 

It may be said, however, that so far as we have ascer- 
tained the true laws of development of political societies, 
we shall know what government is to be and do in the 
future, no less than what it has been and done in the past. 
I grant that a scientific study of political history must, in 
virtue of its scientific character, aim at prevision ; indeed 
it has hardly earned a title to the name of science, imtil it 
can supply some rational forecast of the future. But any 
such sociological forecasts — in the present stage of develop- 
ment of political science — can only be vague and general, 
if they are kept within the limits of caution and sobriety ; 
and any guidance that may be derived from such forecasts 
for the problems of practical politics must be mainly 
negative and limitative, and can hardly amount to positive 
direction. It may be useful in preventing us from wasting 



SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 



our efforts in the attempt to realise impracticable ideals : it 
may show us to some extent, with some degree of prob- 
ability, which of the characteristics of our own political 
society will increase in importance as the years go on, and 
which will decrease : it may thus lay down for us certain 
lines within which our choice of governmental institutions 
and laws is necessarily restricted : but it can hardly, I con- 
ceive, instruct us how to choose within these lines. For 
instance, suppose that we know in this way— I am far from 
affirming that we do know — that in the course of one or 
two centuries all nations now civilised will have adopted 
some form of democracy: this will render it useless to 
inquire what kind of aristocracy would be best adapted for 
any of these nations, but will not materially assist us in 
determining the particular form of democracy most likely 
to be conducive to its wellbeing. It would no doubt be a 
mistake to disregard such probable forecasts: and they 
have, in fact, been kept in view throughout the composition 
of the present treatise; and I have considered carefully 
how far they may reasonably be held to modify conclusions 
otherwise arrived at. I have not, indeed, found that the 
extent of this modifying influence has been great : but had 
it been greater, it could, I think, only have been of the 
limitative kind above described. Grant that we know all 
that the most confident of scientific historians would claim 
to know of the irresistible tendencies of social and political 
development ; the question still remains. What, within the 
limits set by these tendencies, is the best mode of organising 
government and directing its action ? And the more we 
believe in a law of development tending to make the future 
specifically unlike the past, the less direct assistance can be 
expected from our knowledge of what the structure and 
fimctions of government have been, in determining what 
they ought to be. 

I do not mean to imply that the student of the Art of 
Government can derive tw positive assistance at all from 
history. Notwithstanding the continual process of change 
and development through which political societies pass, the 



lo ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

fundamental aims and conditions of the work of government 
do not change so quickly and completely from age to age 
that we can learn nothing as to the right methods of working 
from the action of states and statesmen in the past. And 
the same may be said of the qualities of human intellect and 
feeling, on which the determination of the appropriate 
structure of government will properly depend. It would 
therefore be rash to afi&rm that suggestions of practical 
value may not be derived, in particular cases, from the 
study of problems analogous to our own which have been 
dealt with by statesmen in other ages and coimtriea But 
it will, I think, be generally admitted, with regard to all 
but very recent history, that any practical inferences that 
may be drawn from such a study must generally be of a 
very indirect and imcertain kind : — that we can never safely 
reason '' Because such a law, such a form or institution of 
government, such a measure or line of policy, was suitable 
in Greece or Bome or any mediaeval coimtry, or even in 
any European state of the sixteenth, seventeenth, or 
eighteenth century, therefore it would be suitable here 
and now." 

The case is different when we turn to the recent history 
of States on a level in civilisation with our own. Here, 
no doubt, we find that statesmen and thinkers are often 
grappling with practical problems closely similar in their 
nature and conditions to those with which we have to deal. 
Still, even these modem facts, for a student of the general 
principles and method of practical politics, appear to be 
chiefly vtduable in the way of suggestion, or as a test of 
results otherwise obtained ; the particular instances afforded 
of success or failure of certain political institutions or modes 
of governmental action being rarely in themselves sufficient 
to justify confident general inductions as to the expediency 
of adopting such institutions or modes of action in modem 
statea It is rather when we pass from the general theory 
to a particular application of it, that the study of these 
anidogous cases, if conducted with a due regard to differences 
as well as resemblances, becomes of great importanca 



I SCOP£ AND METHOD OF POLITICS 1 1 

§ 3. On the whole, then, I think that, for the porpofle 
of general political reasoning that has a practical aim, 
induction from the political experiences which history 
records can only be employed in a secondary way.^ 
But if this be so, by what other rational method can 
we deal vrith the questions of Practical Politics? The 
method commonly adopted in political reasoning that 
appeals to general principles is the following : we assume 
certain genertd characteristics of social man — characteristics 
belonging not to mankind imiversally, but to civilised man 
in the most advanced stage of his development : and we 
consider what laws and institutions are likely to conduce 
most to the welfare of an aggregate of such beings living 
in social relations. The present work is an attempt to 
render this method more systematic and precise: the 
practical principles defined and applied in it are accord- 
ingly based on certain general assumptions as to human 
motives and tendencies, which are derived primarily from 
the ordinary experience of civilised life, though they find 
adequate confirmation in the facts of the current and 
recent history of our own and other civilised countries. 
These propositions, it should be observed, are not put 
forward as exactly or universally true, even of contemporary 
civilised man ; but only as suf&ciently near the truth for 
practical purposes As instances of these fundamental 
assumptions, I may give what Bentham^ lays down as 
" propositions upon which the good of Equality is founded," 
viz. that, generally speaking, " each portion of wealth has as 
corresponding to it a portion " — or, more exactly, a " certain 

^ Such, I may observe, is the method actually employed, not only by Ben- 
tham and James Mill, but even by J. S. Mill, in his b'eatise on RepreseiUaUne 
OovemmerU — notwithstanding the views expressed in his Logic of the Moral 
Sciences to which I have above referred. I have no right to suggest that Mill 
had consciously abandoned the general conception of the relation of Politics 
to History which we find in his Logic : but when he came to treat with a view 
to practical conclusions the question of the best form of Government, he cer- 
tainly dealt with it by a method not primarily historical : a method in which 
history seems to be only used either to confirm practical conclusions otherwise 
arrived at, or to suggest the limits of their applicability. 

^ Principles of the Civil Code, Part I, ch. vi. 



12 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

chance" — of happiness: that "of two individuals, with 
equal fortunes, he that has the most wealth has the greatest 
chance of happiness '' ; but that " the excess in happiness 
of the richer will not be so great as the excess of his 
wealth." Of these propositions the last, as Bentham says, 
is not likely to be disputed : but the first two, if universally 
stated, any one with any wide experience of human beings 
will probably be disposed to contradict : it is easy to find 
both persons to whom it has manifestly been a misfortime 
to have been made suddenly richer, and persons who have 
not appreciably lost happiness by having become suddenly 
poorer. But it remains true that — other things being 
equal — an overwhelming majority of sensible and reason- 
able persons would always prefer a larger income to a 
smaller, both for themselves and for those whom they 
desire to benefit, and all that Bentham is concerned to 
maintain — ^all that he requires to assume for the establish- 
ment of general rules of legislation — is that this great 
majority of sensible persons would be right in the great 
majority of cases. 

As another of these fundamental assimiptions, let us take 
a proposition of J. S. Mill's,^ viz. that " each person is the 
only safe guardian of his own rights and interests." This 
proposition, of course, is only intended by Mill to apply to 
sane adults — and, to avoid controversy, I will for the pre- 
sent suppose (what, I hardly need say, is not Mill's view) 
that it is only applicable to adult males : since it is not 
clear that the common sense of mankind considers women 
generally to be the safest guardians of their own pecuniary 
interests. Even among male adults it is not difficult to 
find instances of persons not insane, who are so recklessly 
passionate or self-indulgent, or so easily deluded, that a 
wise parent or friend would prefer to place any gift or 
bequest intended for their benefit in the hands of trustees. 
Still it remains broadly and generally true that this pro- 
position is, as Mill says, an " elementary maxim of prudence " 
on which men commonly act without hesitation in their 

* JiepresentcUive Oovemment, cli. iii. 



I SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 13 

private affairs: and it is primarily on this ground of 
common experience that he maintains the validity of this 
maxim as a principle for the construction of the '' ideally 
best polity"; though he appeals for confirmation to the 
specifically 'political experience which the history of op- 
pressed classes in different ages and countries abundantly 
furnishea 

These and other fimdamental assumptions of deductive 
politics we shall have to discuss more fully in subsequent 
chapters : in which I shall consider carefully the limitations 
and exceptions to which they ought to be taken as subject. 
Here I will only say that, while it is a grave and not 
uncommon error to treat generalisations as to human 
conduct which are only approximately true as if they were 
universally jind absolutely true, it is a no less serious mis- 
take — and perhaps it is at the present time the more 
prev£dent and dangerous mistake — to throw a rule aside as 
valueless, or treat it as having only a vague and indefinite 
validity, because we find it subject to important limitations 
and exceptions. Whereas the truth is, that in most cases 
our knowledge, in any real and important sense, of a general 
truth relating to human action and its motives and effects, 
develops along with our knowledge of its limitations 
and exceptions : until we have a definite and clear appre- 
hension of the latter, we cannot have a firm grasp of the 
former. This will, I think, be abimdantly illustrated in 
the exposition of political principles that follows : I have 
said enough for the present to illustrate the general nature, 
and to give a 'prima facie justification, of the method which 
I shall be mainly engaged in developing. For myself, 
while I regard this method as useful and even indispens- 
able, I quite admit the importance of bearing constantly in 
mind its inevitable limitations and imperfections. It must 
never be forgotten that no particular nation is composed of 
individuals having only the few simple and general char- 
acteristics which are all we can include in our conception 
of the civilised man to whom our abstract political reason- 
ing relates. An actual nation consists of persons of whom 



14 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the predominant number have, besides the general char- 
acteristics just mentioned, a certain vaguely defined complex 
of particular characteristics which we call the ''national 
character " of Englishmen, Frenchmen, etc ; among which 
sentiments and habits of thought and action, formed by 
the previous history of the nation, must always occupy a 
prominent place: and a consideration of these particular 
characteristics may properly modify to an important ex- 
tent the conclusions arrived at by our general reasoning. 
Thus I may conclude, from the point of view of abstract 
theory, that by taking twelve plain men and shutting them 
up in a room till they are unanimous, I am likely to get 
but a blunt and clumsy instrument for the administration 
of criminal justice : but this defect may be more than com- 
pensated by the peculiar confidence placed in this instrument 
by a people whom the unbroken tradition of centuries has 
taught to regard trial by jiuy as the ''palladiiun of its 
liberties." So again, no one constructing a legislative organ, 
composed of two chambers, for a newly-founded community 
of modern civilised men, would propose that membership of 
the second or revising chamber should be handed down from 
father to son, like a piece of private property : but, in a 
country that has long been led by a hereditary aristocracy, 
a chamber so appointed may have a valuable power of 
resistance to dtmgerous popular impulses which it may be 
difficult to obtain by any other mode of appointment. 

These are questions which we shall afterwards have to 
discuss : I only refer to them now by way of illustration ; 
and in order to warn the reader that, in my opinion, no 
questions of this kind — ^regarded as practical problems pre- 
sented for solution to a particular nation at a particular 
time — can be absolutely and finally determined by the 
method which I shall try to work out in subsequent 
chapters. At the same time, this general treatment of 
the subject cannot fail, in my opinion, to be useful, provided 
that we are not misled into regarding it as complete 
and final: useful, not merely as a preparatory exercise, 
but because considerations of the general kind with which 



I SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 15 

we shall be concerned must always form an important part 
of the discussion of any question of practical politics, though 
they have to be combined with — and to a varying extent 
overruled by — considerations of a more special kind.^ 

§ 4. The study of Politics, then, as I shall treat it, is 
concerned primarily with constructing, on the basis of 
certain psychological premises, the system of relations 
which ought to be established among the persons governing, 
and between them and the governed, in a society composed 
of civilised men, as we know them. I shall refer not unfre- 
quently to actual laws and political institutions : but chiefly 
by way of illustration, or to give concrete particularity to 
conclusions which would otherwise remain general and 
vague. The inquiry has two main divisions, (1) one relat- 
ing to the Work or Functions of Government, and (2) the 
other to its Structure or Constitution: £doug with the 
latter I have thought it convenient to include a general 
inquiry into the relations, moral as well as leg£d, that ought 
to exist between government and the governed, besides such 
relations as are already defined in the determination of 
governmental fimctions; and also an inquiry into the 
relation of the state to voluntary associations of political 
importanca In deciding which of the two main divisions 
is to be taken first, we seem at first sight to be in a 
dilemma. On the one hand it may be fairly said that 
the first, in logical order of discussion, ought clearly to 
precede the second ; for in investigating the best constitu- 
tion we are considering the- fitness of Government as an 

^ The least reflection will show that in ordinary political discussions 
reference is continually made to propositions laid down as true of civilised 
man generally, not merely of the English species of civilised man. Why is 
strong resistance made to legislation interfering with freedom of contract T 
Because it is thought that men in general are likely to know their own 
interest better than any government can know it for them ; or that they are 
likely to gain more in vigour of intellect and character by being left to 
manage their ovm affairs than they are likely to lose materially tlirough 
foolish contracts. Why is it thought expedient to increase the number of 
peasant proprietors f Because it is thought that men in general will labour 
more energetically if they receive the whole advantage resulting from their 
labour. And, similarly, in other cases of current interest. 



i6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

instrument to do a particular work : and in such a con- 
sideration we ought to get as clear an idea as possible of 
the work that has to be done before we proceed to consider 
how the instrument ought to be constituted. On the other 
hand it may be urged with no less plausibility that in the 
matter of government, as in private afiTairs, we cannot 
decide what it is prudent to attempt till we know what 
means we have at our disposal for effecting our ends. And 
in truth neither department of the subject can be entirely 
left out of view in studying the other. But on the whole 
it seems the best solution of the difficulty to begin by 
considering what government ought to do ; bearing in mind 
that — so far as our conclusions on this point go beyond our 
experience of what governments actually have done — they 
must not be regarded as final until we have considered 
the prospect of obtaining a government qualified to 
carry out the work which we have judged to be desirable 
if possibla I propose, therefore, to begin by consider- 
ing the Work of Gk)vemment. Here, again, doubt may be 
raised as to whether we should consider first Internal or 
External Functions — i.«. the action of government on the 
members of the community governed, or its action in 
relation to other communities and individuala It is un- 
deniable that, in early periods of human history, the most 
pressing need of government is created by war, and that, in 
many cases, a predominant influence has been exercised on 
its development by this need. Still, in the consideration of 
civilised polity, it would seem that the Internal Functions 
of Grovernment should properly occupy our attention first, as 
being more essentially implied in our general notion of 
political society ; since we can conceive — indeed many have 
looked forward to — the union of the human race under one 
" parliament of man " ; or, again, we can conceive a political 
society so much separated from others by physical barriers 
as to have no external relations of much importance. 

Further, it should be observed that the External Action 
of Government usually involves Internal Action, — often of 
a very important kind. Thus, though the primary object 



I SCOPE AND METHOD OF POLITICS 17 

for which an army is raised is usually to fight a foreign 
enemy, still, in the work of raising and disciplining such an 
army in modem states, an important and peculiar exercise 
of governmental functions in relation to the governed is 
normally required. 

I shall begin, then, with the Internal Fimctions of 
Grovemment. Here the establishment and administration of 
Law is admittedly the most important : and to this accord- 
ingly our attention will be first directed. Hume indeed 
asserts, in a well-known essay, that " we are to look upon all 
the vast apparatus of our government as having ultimately 
no other object or purpose but the distribution of justice, 
or, in other words, the support of the twelve judges. Kings 
and parliaments, fleets and armies, officers of the court and 
revenue, ambassadors, ministers and privy -councillors, are 
all subordinate in their end to this part of administration."^ 
There is some exaggeration in this statement ; — since {e.g,) 
the objection that a French province has to being conquered 
and annexed by Germany is not due mainly to a fear of a 
bad administration of justice by Grerman judges, but more 
to the national sentiment which makes it desire to remain 
a part of the French state. Still Hume's view is so far 
true as to make it proper for us, in considering the work 
that government has to do, to direct our attention first to 
the establishment and administration of a good system of 
Law. But before we proceed to the consideration of what 
Law and Government ought to be, it is desirable to under- 
take a preliminary inquiry into the characteristics that are 
essentially implied in the commonly received notions of 
Government and Law. To this we will proceed in the next 
chapter. 

^ Hume, Moralf Politiealy and Literary Essays^ Part I. Essay V. 



CHAPTER II 

THE FUNDAMENTAL C0NCKPTI0N8 OF POLITICS 

§ 1. An eminent writer/ who treats of the " Logic of Politics," 
distinguishes a '* preliminary branch" of the science of 
Politics, which he regards as an essential preparation for a 
practical no less than for a purely theoretical study of the 
subject, though it does not itself include an answer to any 
practical questiona This preliminary study, he explains, 
deals with the structure and functions of government not as 
they ought to be, but as they must be ; that is, it teaches 
what is essentially involved in the idea of political govern- 
ment, and explains the necessary instruments and methods 
of government — laws and their sanctions, executive com- 
mands and judiciid decisions, the establishment of rights and 
obligations, etc. Its aim is to make clear by discussion and 
definition these and other general notions that enter into our 
complex conception of political society; but it does not 
inquire into the operation and tendency of any particular 
kinds of laws or executive commands, or of any particular 
organisation of the judicature or other governmental in- 
stitutions ; nor does it urge the preference of any one law 
or institution to any other. " It explains the meaning of 
monarchy, aristocracy, democracy, but does not teach which is 
the best form. It shows what is the nature of punishment, 
but does not say which punishments are the most efBlcacioua 
It explains the nature of a dependency, without arguing the 
question — should colonies have a separate government ? " 

^ Mr. Bain, in his Logic ; Induction, oh. viii. 



CH. II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 19 

I agree with Mr. Bain in recognising the value of the 
study thus marked off as preliminary.^ To obtain clear and 
precise definitions of leading terms is an important, and not 
altogether easy, achievement in all departments of scientific 
inquiry : but it is specially important in our present subject. 
But in most cases it seems to me most convenient, in such 
a treatise as the present, not to separate our discussion of 
the meaning of essential terms from our discussion of the 
practical questions in which the terms are used. I therefore 
propose, generally, to defer examining the definitions of such 
terms as " property " and " contract " till we come to consider 
what rights of property and of contract should be maintained 
in a well-ordered society : and similarly I shall not attempt 
to deal with the difficulties of determining precisely the 
separation between " legislative " and " executive " functions, 
until we are about to inquire how the organs exercising 
these functions should be constituted. But some preliminary 
discussion of the fundamental conceptions " Grovernment," 
" Law," " Right," " Obligation " is almost indispensable, 
before we begin to consider the general principles on which 
Government ought to act in establishing and maintaining 
legal rights among the governed, and compelling the 
performance of their legal obligations : and in the course of 
this discussion a provisional view of the characteristics and 
relations of the leading internal functions of government will 
naturally be given. 

§ 2. First, for clearness, we will confine our attention to 
the political conditions of an orderly modern state. Here 
reflection shows us that the notions of Government and 
Law are closely connected. The essential characteristic of 
Government, as we commonly conceive it, is that it gives 
commands, general and particular, to members of the 
commimity governed : — meaning by a " command " a direc- 
tion to do, or abstain from doing, a certain act or class of 

^ This preliminary branch, if worked out in complete separation from the 
practical inquiries from which Mr. Bain distinguishes it, might be called 
" Formal " as contrasted with '* Material " Politics ; it would include, as a 
portion, the study of general jurisprudence, as now commonly distinguished 
from the theory of legislation. 



20 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

acts, combined with an announcement, express or tacit, of 
some penalty to be inflicted on those who do not conform to 
such direction. A subordinate organ of Government is one 
whose power of issuing such commands is limited by the 
commands of a superior organ : a Supreme Government is 
one that is not so limited. On the other hand, the essential 
characteristic of the Laws of any commimity is that they 
are general directions as to the conduct of members of the 
community, for disobedience to which a penalty ^ of some 
kind will normally be inflicted by the authority of Govern- 
ment. This penalty is by no means the only motive 
which prompts ordinary citizens to obey the laws ; nor is 
it necessarily the chief motive ; but it is — or is believed to 
be — generally indispensable as an inducement to secure 
adequate conformity to the law. In order, then, to the 
complete establishment of any proposed law in a community, 
it is necessary not only that the law should be definitely 
determined and declared, but also that an adequate penalty 
should be actually inflicted on any person who transgresses 
it, whenever, after impartial investigation, the fact of the 
transgression and the degree of its gravity have been duly 
ascertained. Now it is clear that the functions (1) of laying 
down the law, and (2) of investigating and deciding cases of 
alleged infringement, may be separated from each other ; and 
also (3) from the actual infliction of the penalty and the per- 
formance of whatever other acts are required for the effectual 
execution of the laws — such as the organisation and direction 
of the military force of the commimity to crush any open 
resistance to its government. These three functions, then, 
are those primarily distinguished as " legislative," " judicial," 
and " executive." 

^ The word '* penalty " must be here understood in a wide sense : since 
the penalty may consist only in the enforced payment of damages to a 
private individual injured by the violation of the rule ; or may be merely 
negative, and consist in the withdrawal from the law-breaker of some 
governmental protection of his interests to which he would otherwise have 
been entitled. In the case, again, of 9trvaidi of Qovemment, the penalty 
may be merely reprimand or dismissal. Finally, as we shall see, the penalty 
ordinarily incurred by subordinate legislative bodies for illegal law-making 
is merely the annoyance of finding their laws or bye-laws declared invalid. 



II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 21 

In a subsequent chapter we shall see reasons for assign- 
ing these functions, in a great measure, to separate organs 
respectively : and we shall have to consider how to deal with 
any disagreement and conflict that may arise among these 
organs. But for the present, when we are considering the work 
that has to be done rather than the method of doing it, we may 
assume generally that the different organs of government — 
legislative, executive, and judicial, superior and subordinate, 
central and local — will all co-operate harmoniously : so that 
we may speak of any or all briefly as " the government." 

We may say, then, that in the modem state the notion 
of Law — in the sense in which we are now concerned with it 
— involves the notion of Government, and vice versa. But this 
mutual implication of the two notions has only been reached 
slowly and gradually in the development of political society. 
Historically, Law first appears in the form of Custom 
existing from time immemorial, and conceived by rulers and 
ruled to be equally binding on both, — obedience to it being 
mainly caused by habit, and by fear of general disappoval 
and its consequences, rather than by any special fear of 
governmental penalties. And for a long time after the 
intervention of government to enforce law has become 
regular and fimdamentally important, the greater part of 
the changes actually made in law are not made in the way 
of express and conscious legislation. In consequence of this, 
it would be a mistake to suppose that the whole body of 
laws in force, even in any modem State, has actually been 
laid down by a legislative organ recognised as such. In 
some countries, indeed, where Law has been codified, this 
would be formally true ; but in a great measure only formally, 
as the substance of a new code usually consists, in the main, 
of laws previously in force. But in such a country as 
England the supposition would not be even formally trua 
For a great part of our Law consists of old customary rules 
modified and added to by the decisions of judges; who 
either (1) while professedly interpreting pre-existing rules, 
have extended, restricted, or in some way further defined 
them ; or (2) have overruled them in accordance with what 



22 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

they regarded as higher principles of justice or equity.^ And 
it is to be noted that this conception of a higher law valid 
independently of human legislation, lingered till a very late 
stage of our civilisation. Thus we find that Blackstone, 
while defining Law as " a rule of civil conduct prescribed by 
the supreme power in a state/' still recognises a " Law of 
Nature" which claims our obedience without being so 
prescribed, and is indeed '' superior in obligation to any 
other " law. In virtue of this Law of Nature, Blackstone 
declares, men have '' natural rights, such as life and liberty," 
which " receive no additional strength when declared by the 
municipal laws to be inviolable " ; which " no human legisla- 
ture has power to abridge or destroy, unless the owner shaU 
himself commit some act that amounts to a forfeiture." 
Such language was by no means peculiar to Blackstone ; a 
doctrine of this kind was prevalent among jurists of the 
eighteenth century. But it is now, on the whole, antiquated: 
and, indeed, it seems to involve a grave and dangerous con- 
fusion between (1) Law as it is, here and now, in any given 
community, and (2) Law as it ought to be, the ideal by 
which Positive Law ought to be judged and, if possible, 
rectified Such an ideal, if it is a true ideal, must of course 
coincide with or be based upon '' those eternal and immutable 
laws of good and evil, to which the Creator himself conforms, 
and which he has enabled human reason to discover," — 
which Blackstone calls " Law of Nature," — so far as any 
such eternal principles are held to be discoverabla But it 
would be a serious error for any individual Englishman to 
suppose that this ideal, as conceived by him, was actually 
established as law in England at the present day, so far as 
it diverges from the laws laid down by Parliament, or defined 
by a series of judicial decisions : and any language which en- 
courages a man to claim, as valid here and now, rights not 
secured by the actually established law of his country, is 
dangerously revolutionary. 

^ The principles haye often actually been deriyed from some foreign 
system of law, but their application has been justified not by their source, 
but by their intrinsic superiority. 



II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 23 

Is then — it may be asked — the power of government 
to introduce new laws theoretically unlimited in a 
modem state? The answer to this question requires 
careful consideration. First, we have to observe that 
Law, in the political sense in which we are now con- 
cerned with it — the law of a state, — ^is only one species 
of a genua In a wider sense the term "law" may 
be properly applied to any general rule which directs 
persons to do or abstain from doing a class of acts, and 
for disobedience to which some penalty may reasonably be 
expected by the persons disobeying. Thus when we speak 
of the " laws of health " we mean a set of rules of conduct, 
the breach of which is held to entail an appreciably increased 
chance of disease. So again, the rules of morality, regarded 
as the expression of God's will, are, by all who believe in a 
moral government of the world, properly conceived as the 
" Law of God." It is to be observed, however, that — since 
there are usually considerable variations of moral opinion 
and sentiments within the limits of the same modem com- 
munity — rthe true or Divine Code of morality, as conceived 
by any reflective individual, may diverge importantly from 
the body of rules supported by the prevalent opinion of his 
community at any given time, — ^which for distinction sake 
may be called the " Positive morality " of the community. 
Both Positive morality, and Ideal morality as conceived by 
any individual may come into conflict with the law of the 
state: it is a familiar experience that a law actually in 
force is condemned as unjust and oppressive or otherwise 
immoral by a minority of members of the community; 
and even when the opinion of this minority becomes the 
prevalent opinion, the law does not therefore at once cease 
to exist, — ^though, in a state under popular government, its 
days are then numbered. When such conflict occurs, it is 
in most cases admittedly the moral duty of an individual 
to obey the laws of his state even when they are bad, and 
when, if he had supreme legislative power, it would be his 
moral duty to alter them : at the same time it is also gener- 
ally recognised that Positive Law may sometimes command 



24 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

what morality and religion forbid, and that in such cases 
there is a moral obligation to disobey the law. Conse- 
quently — as a modem government has only a very limited 
power of modifying the moral opinions of the governed — 
its legislative power finds in positive morality two kinds of 
limits, one more completely effectual, but wider and less 
practically operative, the other narrower but more elastic. 
That is, there are among the conceivable commands of 
government some which would certainly be disobeyed so 
widely that they could not be enforced; while there are 
others which would probably be obeyed by the bulk of the 
community, so long as they were not revoked, but would be 
so strongly disapproved that government would have a power- 
ful inducement to revoke them. The former limit may be 
assumed to exist in every political society ; but it is usually 
impossible to determine exactly where it lies, since govern- 
ment is ordinarily restrained from approaching it by its 
desire to avoid popular disapproval of the less intense kind : 
though the effectiveness of this narrower and more elastic 
limit varies very much in degree, with differences in the forms 
of government and in the extent to which active political 
interests are developed among the members of the society. 

The power of government, then, in a modem state is 
limited not only by its own morality — or by the law of God, 
so far as itself recognises principles of religious duty, — 
but by the prevalent moral opinion of the community; 
especially by opinions, resting on custom and habit, as to the 
proper nature and limits of governmental coercion. But 
can we ever properly say that the power of government is 
limited by Positive Law ? 

This question has been answered in the negative by 
leading English publicists -} and, as we shall see, there is 
usually some sense in which the negative answer is true ; 
but it is sometimes a very peculiar sense, requiring to be 
carefully explained and limited. 

At first sight it may seem that a supreme government 
cannot be subject to strictly legal restraints; since the 

^ See espeoiaUy Austin's Juruipr\tdefiux^ vol. i. ch. vi. 



II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 25 

effectual restraint of law lies in the fear of some penalty 
which government will inflict, and no supreme government 
can be alarmed by the dread of its own penaltiea And 
this is obviously true in the case of simple monarchy, or 
any form of government where the supreme rulers have a 
lifelong tenura So far as such rulers are actually re- 
strained by constitutional rules — commonly regarded as 
laws — which purport to limit their legislative or other 
powers, it is not a fear of strictly legal penalties that 
restrains them; it is rather a fear of disobedience and 
resistance rendered peculiarly formidable by the fact that 
the moral sentiment of Order and Law-observance — which 
ordinarily co-operates with the fear of legal penalties in 
producing obedience to government — ^will be at least partly 
on the side of those who disobey and resist a government 
that is breaking recognised constitutional rules. 

If, however, supreme rulers only hold power for a limited 
time, it is quite conceivable that, when they have laid 
down their power, they may suffer strictly legal punish- 
ment, inflicted by their successors, for unconstitutional 
legislation. But though this is conceivable, I know no 
modem constitution which provides for this kind of punish- 
ment of persons invested with legislative power who have 
made unconstitutional laws. In fact, so long as the legis- 
lative and executive organs of a supreme government 
co-operate harmoniously, and the judicial organ applies 
unquestioningly the law laid down by the legislature, the 
restraint placed on governmental action by constitutional 
rules alone— apart from prevalent opinion, which may in a 
particular case be opposed to some constitutional rule — is no- 
where greater than the corresponding restraint in the case of 
simple monarchy : and it may easily be in practice less, since 
a popularly elected organ of government, receiving the mani- 
fest support of the majority that elected it, is not unlikely to 
be bolder than a monarch in defying a constitutional restraint. 

The case is different in such a constitution as that of 
the United States of North America; where the judicial 
organ, being separate from the legislature and independently 



26 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

constituted, has normally the function of deciding whether 
the laws made by the latter are consistent with the funda- 
mental laws of the constitution. No one doubts that in 
this case the legislature is under strictly legal restraints. It 
is true that the legislators have no other penalty to fear — 
beyond the censure of public opinion — except the annoy- 
ance caused by wasted labour. But this is ordinarily the 
only judicial penalty inflicted on subordinate bodies to 
which a closely limited legislative power has been granted 
by a superior legislature : thus in England a railway com- 
pany ^ is judicially restrained from making bye-laws beyond 
the limits of its authority, only by the fear that such bye- 
laws will be declared invalid by the judges if any attempt 
be made to enforce them. If then, in such a constitution 
as that of the United States, there were any fundamental 
laws laid down as unalterable, it could not be denied that 
the highest legislative organ in such a constitution was 
under strictly legal restraints, — so long, at least, as the 
independence of the Supreme Court of Judicature was 
maintained. But in fact no modem state has such a 
constitution: every modem constitution contains some 
provision for altering it, from which no rule that it 
contains is exempted. For instance, in the constitution 
of the United States a provision for alteration, extending 
to all the clauses that circumscribe the legislative power 
of Congress, is made as follows : — 

"The Congress, whenever two -thirds of both Houses 
shall deem it necessary, shall propose amendments to this 
constitution, or, on the application of the Legislatures of 
two-thirds of the several States, shall call a convention 
proposing amendments, which in either case shaU be valid 
to all intents and purposes, as a part of this constitution, 
when ratified by the Legislatures of three-fourths of the 
several States, or by conventions in three-fourths thereof, as 
the one or the other mode of ratification may be proposed 
by the Congress." 

^ The bye-laws of an English railway company have to be approved by the 
Board of Trade: battherestraintthusexeroisedisnotstrictlyajudicial restraint. 



II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS rj 

Here, then, a fresh ground is afforded for those who argue 
that a supreme government cannot he subject to legal 
restraint ; and this ground is actually taken by Austin and 
others. They admit that in the United States the legisla- 
tive power of Congress is strictly limited by law — that 
(«.^.) Congress is legally restrained from making an " ex post 
facto law" by a clause in the constitution forbidding it. 
But, they argue, the complex body consisting of Congress 
and the Legislatures of three-fourths of the separate states ^ 
— provided these Legislatures are all agreed — ^is not similarly 
limited. This complex body can constitutionally rescind 
the clauses prohibiting ex post facto laws, and every other 
clause of the constitution, and make, or authorise the 
making of, any law that it pleases : its power is therefore 
legally unlimited. There can be no doubt that this con- 
tention is true: the only question can be whether this 
complex body is properly called the " sovereign " or " supreme 
government" of the United States, Congress being only 
allowed the title of a subordinate legislature. We need 
not decide a merely verbal issue : but it is important to note 
that, if the word " government " is so used, it is used in a 
sense materially different from its ordinary meaning. For 
ordinarily we conceive an organ of government to exercise its 
functions regularly, at comparatively short intervals: for 
instance, while historians regard the English House of 
Commons as an organ of government in England during 
the later Middle Ages, they do not commonly treat the 
States-General in France as an organ of government during 
the S€une period, because it only came into existence irregu- 
larly, at intervals of several years. But similarly, the 
complex body that has unlimited legislative power in the 
United States does not act at all for long periods ; during a 
period of more than sixty years, from 25 th September 
1804 to 1st February 1865, this unlimited sovereign of 
the United States remained completely inactive. Surely 

^ I omit the complioation introduced by the altematiye method of 
summoning conventions ; since it is in the power of Congress not to adopt 
this method. 



28 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

it strains language to say that during these sixty years 
citizens of the United States " habitually obeyed " this 
inert composite entity ? 

If it be replied that this complex body possessed power 
legally unlimited during the period above mentioned, though 
it did not exercise it, the answer i^in must be that the 
statement is true in a sense, but misletiding if made 
without qualification. It is true that it might without 
illegality have altered every rule in the constitution : but 
the statement ignores the fact that it was the legally 
determined structure of the body in question — the difficulty 
of bringing about the required majority of two-thirds in 
both Houses of Congress, and the required agreement of the 
prescribed number of legislatures — ^which practically pre- 
vented action of this or any other kind. It seems truer to 
say that in this and similar cases there is an actual organ 
of government whose commands are habitually obeyed, and 
a possible organ of government whose power is legally 
unlimited : but that the two do not coincide, and that the 
latter may at any given time be incapable of coming into 
operation at all, owing to the balanced state of opinion. 

In the case of England the difficulties just explained 
do not arise: since the ordinary process of legislation 
is also the process by which the Constitution is changed. 
We can say with indisputable truth that there are no legal 
limits to the authority of Parliament in England:^ in 
endeavouring to ascertain what the law of England 
is, we never ask what Parliament has authority to do, 
but only what it has done. But a new difficulty arises 
in communities like our own as reg£u:ds the attribution of 
sovereignty or supreme power. Are we to say that in 

^ It may be observed that the legal view of the omnipotence of Parlia- 
ment, now generally accepted, was not completely reached till a compara- 
tively late period of English history : even so late as the eighteenth century 
we find — not merely in the vague generalities of the writers of law-books, 
but even in the more particular dicta of judges — thd recognition of legal 
principles limiting the legislative power of Parliament. Thus Holt affirms 
that '' if an Act of Parliament should ordain that the same person should be 
party and judge, it would be a void Act of Parliament." 



II THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 29 

England sovereignty is to be attributed to the complex 
body formed by (1) the Monarch, (2) the House of Lords, 
and (3) the House of Commons, or ought we to substitute 
for the third element of the sovereign the constituencies 
which choose the House of Commons ? ^ On the one hand, 
the constituencies in England certainly cannot make laws, 
nor have they a constitutional right to invalidate laws 
made by Parliament. No private Englishman will suffer 
any legal penalty for disobeying a resolution passed by the 
most decisive majority of the electorate ; and no law-court 
would admit such a resolution as a valid excuse for dis- 
obeying a law laid down by Parliament. On the other 
hand, it may be plausibly maintained that by the power 
of dismissal when election time comes round the con- 
stituencies can keep their representatives in " habitual 
obedience." ^ 

These and other difficulties I shall discuss in subse- 
quent chapters ;* but this preliminary discussion has seemed 
necessary to explain why, while I adopt substantially 
Austin's conception of the relation of Law to Grovemment, as 
applied to the civil law of a modern political community in 
its latest stage, I prefer in stating it to avoid the difficulties 
of Austin's notion of sovereignty. The question " where 
supreme power ultimately resides " is one that it is most 
important to ask with regard to any political society : but 
it is a question to which, in my opinion, any simple general 
answer is liable to be misleading, and the discussion of it in 
the form appropriate to the present treatise will come more 
fitly after we have considered in detail the proper constitu- 
tion of the different organs of Government. 

In the first part of our inquiry, then, which relates to 
the work of government, it will be enough to assume that 

^ A similar question of course arises in the case of the United States — or 
any state with a constituent body distinct from the ordinary legislature — as 
regards the action of the ordinary legislatures, within the limits fixed by the 
constitution. 

^ Austin's statements on this point appear to me hopelessly confused and 
inconsistent. See Appendix A. 

' See chap, xxvii., and especially chap. xxxi. 



30 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

the society with which we are concerned includes one or 
more persons or bodies, who, so feur as they agree, possess 
legislative power circumscribed by no definite limits ; and so 
may be taken to constitute a supreme legislative organ, 
whose general rules, defining the rights and obligations of 
private members of the community, will be habitually obeyed 
by the bulk of the community. I shall assume that any 
transgressor of these rules, ascertained to be such by the 
judicature, will be punished by the executive government, 
which will be able to bring overwhelming force to crush 
any openly recalcitrant member. I shall assume that these 
organs co-operate harmoniously, keeping each to his proper 
sphere, so that we may habitually speak of them as one 
Gk)vemment. And, finally, I shall assume that the Laws 
with which we are concerned in our theory of legislation 
are rules which, if they have not actually emanated from 
the resolutions of the supreme government, may at any rate 
be regarded as having its approval, being maintained by 
penalties inflicted by its authority. It is the connection 
of Law with Government on the one hand and Penalty on 
the other on which it appears to me important to lay stress 
— understanding the connection in either case to be taken 
as normal, and approximately universal in a well-ordered 
community, not as absolutely universal^ 

§ 3. In the preceding discussion I have spoken of law 
as deteimining the (legal) rights and obligations of private 
members of the community. The terms used in this defini- 
tion, though sufficiently familiar, require some further 
explanation in order to make their import as clear as 
possible. 

Let us begin by considering the term " legal obligation." 
By this we express the relation of a general rule or 
command, enforced by the authority of government, to the 
member or members of the community whose civil conduct 
it is intended to controL The law is conceived as exercising 

^ See chap. xiii. I may repeat that the word *' Penalty " is to be under- 
stood in a wide sense, to include negative as well as positive penalties, and 
'< damages *' as weU as punishment proper. 



11 THE FUNDAMENTAL CONCEPTIONS OF POLITICS 31 

a certain constraint on the will of such person or persons ; 
and it is this constraint that the term ''obligation" ex- 
presses. A similar constraint is exercised in the case of 
"moral obligations" by the conscience of the individual 
who lies under the obligation, and the moral opinion of the 
community of which he is a member.^ 

It is not quite so easy to see what is meant by the 
term " legal right " ; ^ and perhaps the most convenient way 
of making this clear is to examine the relation of Bights to 
Obligations according to the ordinary use of both terms. 
A little reflection will show that we cannot conceive Bights of 
anyone individual without corresponding Obligations imposed 
on others. Thus -4's right of property in any material thing 
necessarily implies obligations imposed on B, C, 2>, etc., to 
abstain from interfering with ^'s use of the thing : similarly 
any right to services that A may have in consequence of a 
contract implies that the other party to the contract is under 
an obligation to render the services : so again, if a child 
has a right to education, some one is under an obligation to 
educate it. It is not, however, similarly clear that the 
imposition of Obligations on one or more individuals always 
involves the granting of Bights to other persons. Consider 
{e.g.) the legal obligation on Englishmen to abstain from 
suicide, vagrancy, or keeping gambling-houses : there do not 
appear to be in these cases — as in those just considered — 
any definite Bights belonging to assignable individuals 
which are violated if the obligations are not fulfilled. Still, 
when we reflect on the interest that the community at large 
has in the observance of the laws in question, it does not 
seem strained to say that the community has a right to 
their observance. 

^ The distinction — and possible divergence in particulars — between what 
any individual believes to be moral truth, and the moral opinion of his 
society, must always be borne in mind. 

' The difficulty of defining " a right " is increased by the fact that while 
we recognise in ordinary discourse that there are moral as well as Ugtil rig?U$, 
and that the two kinds of rights are not always coincident, we still frequently 
speak of ''rights " without clearly distinguishing which of the two we mean. 
At present I am concerned with legal rights ; but the definition that I pro- 
pose to give may easily be applied, mutatis mutandis^ to moral rights. 



32 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, ii 

Comparing these cases, I arrive at the conclusion that " a 
right" is really an obligation regarded from a different point 
of view : i,e. regarded in relation to the person to whom the 
obligation is intended to be useful In the case of such 
rights as the right of property, the rule which binds or 
obliges the members of the community to abstain from inter- 
fering with the owner's use of the appropriated thing has at 
the same time the effect of securing or protecting the owner's 
freedom of action in respect of the thing in question : and 
hence some thinkers have conceived a "Right" as being 
essentially "secured or protected liberty." But there are 
other cases to which this definition clearly would not apply: 
e.g. when a child is said to have a " right to education " there 
is no liberty secured to the child, but merely an obligation 
imposed on other persons of rendering it certain positive 
servicea^ 

Accordingly, in forming a definite conception of any 
right, it is indispensable to ascertain the obligation implied 
in it, and the persons on whom this obligation is thrown. 
For instance, in speaking of rules determining the rights of 
private members of the conmiunity, we may imply either 
obligations imposed on private persons, or obligations im- 
posed on members of the government. The distinction 
thus drawn is important in separating the discussion of 
the work that Govemment has to do from the discussion 
of the methods and instruments by which the work should 
be dona It will be somewhat further developed in the 
next chapter. 

^ Some writers hold that a legal right implies that the person who is 
said to have the right must be able to obtain, by a legal process, redress or 
punishment from any violation of his right. I agree that such redress or 
punishment must be somehow obtainable — otherwise the rule professing to 
determine the right would not deserve the name of a law : but it does not 
seem to me necessary that the individual whose right is violated should 
himself have the right of suing or prosecuting the violator : it seems to me 
better to regard this latter as a secondary and additional right, which is 
ordinarily given for the better security of the first, but may in some cases 
be withheld. Thus I should say that a destitute pauper had a legal right to 
relief in England, because the poor-law officials are liable to punishment if 
they refiise him relief, though the pauper himself cannot sue or prosecute 
them. 



CHAPTER III 

THE QKMEBAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 

§ 1. In the preceding chapter we have been concerned 
with the general conception of Law, in the strict political 
sense, — the " law of the land/' which judges and magistrates 
are appointed to administer and enforce ; as distinct from 
other kinds of recognised rules of conduct, — such as those 
contained in the moral code, the code of honour, the code 
of social behaviour, — ^which are also in a looser sense called 
moral laws, laws of honour, social laws. Law, in the sense 
in which we are primarily ^ concerned with it, is a body 
of rules intended to control the conduct of members of a 
political society, for the violation of which penalties may 
be expected to be inflicted by the authority of the govern- 
ment of that society ; and which, therefore, may be regarded 
as imposed by government. For, though they may not 
have actually been laid down by any existing person or 
body of persons whose orders are habitually obeyed by the 
rest of the community, there is always some possible 
combination of persons and bodies which is recognised as 
competent to modify them; and any resistance to them 
may be expected to be overborne by the force which the 
habitual obedience of the community places at the dis- 
posal of government. This general definition of law is 
of course applicable not specially to laws as they ought 
to be, but to good and bad laws alike: it states the 

^ The propriety of the phrase ** international law ** will be discussed later. 
See chap. xvii. 

D 



34 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

characteristics which, in accordance with usage, we agree to 
consider essential to the right application of the term " law/' 
in its special political sensa Hence the discussion of this 
definition belongs to the study of actual laws as they are 
and have been, no less than to the study of the principles on 
which an ideal system of legislation ought to be constructed : 
it forms, in fact, a region common to the two studie& 
At the same time, though the definition carefully avoids 
any implication that the law spoken of is good, right, or 
just, it does not altogether exclude an ideal element from 
the conception of law, and of the community to which the 
law belongs : for it assumes that the orders of government, 
whether good or bad, are habitually obeyed by the bulk of 
the community: whereas in many communities at many 
times the greatest practical difficulty and the most urgent 
practical need has been not to get the (so-called) government 
to issue good orders, but to get them generally obeyed when 
they have been issued. When, however, the commands of 
persons attempting to govern are widely disobeyed with 
impunity, though such persons are still by courtesy com- 
monly called a government, we do not come into serious 
conflict with common sense by affirming that they do 
not really govern, and that their impotent commands are 
not really laws: and it is in the stricter sense of this 
affirmation that I shall generally use these fundamental 
terms. 

Bearing, then, in mind that the political community we 
are considering is assumed to be orderly and not anarchical, 
so that government is able to bring irresistible physical force 
to crush any open disobedience to law ; let us now proceed 
to consider on what principles laws ought to be established 
and administered. First, however, it will be convenient 
for the present to take a narrower view of the Law for 
which we are to lay down principles, than that given in 
my definition ; by excluding any rules which relate to the 
appointments and duties of persons exercising governmental 
functions, such as the rules issued to the subordinate 
officers of government in (c^r.) the Home Office, or any 



Ill THE GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 35 

similar departments of the executive. Such rules would 
not ordinarily be called " laws," except so far as they are 
laid down by Parliament: but in any case they do not 
form part of the law that is primarily the subject of our 
present investigation : for we are considering the establish- 
ment and maintenance of Law as a main part of the work 
which government should be constructed to do: whereas 
these administrative rules relate to the manner in which the 
complex instrument for performing governmental work should 
be constituted and kept in action. The Law then, for deter- 
mining which we have now to lay down principles, should 
be conceived as a body of rules intended to control the 
conduct of private persons, so far as they are stcbjects but 
not in a narrower sense servants of government. 

Accordingly, in considering the rights that a good 
system of legislation ought to secure to such persons, I 
shall for the present omit rights that correspond to obliga- 
tions imposed not on other private persons, but on members 
of the government itself. It is important to note this, 
because among what are commonly recognised in free 
countries — or countries struggling towards freedom — as 
" fundamental rights of individuals," there are several 
important cases in which the obligation that constitutes 
the other aspect of the right is a governmental obligation. 
Such, for instance, are the right to freedom of speech and 
of the press, the right to freedom of assembly, free exercise 
of religion. In any country where these rights are not 
completely realised, it is through the action of government 
that they are withheld or impaired : hence it is convenient 
to distinguish these as constitutional rights from the civU 
rights with which we are now primarily concerned. Whether 
the governmental obligation corresponding to such a con- 
stitutional right is strictly legal, or only moral or quasi- 
legal, depends on conditions which will be appropriately 
considered in the second part of the treatise ; in which I 
shall examine the structure of the different organs of govern- 
ment, and the relations of government to the governed. I 
will here only observe that the establishment and the 



36 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

maintenance of such rights do not form part of the 
ordinary work of Government-regarded as a harmonious 
whole ^ — ^in the same sense in which the enforcement of 
l^al obligations on private citizens forms part of its work ; 
but only in the negative sense that it is bound not to 
encroach upon such rights. 

There are, however, other governmental duties of a 
positive kind, which have a closer connection with civil 
rights, as they are directly required for the effective realisa- 
tion of the latter : I mean especially the work to be done 
by governmental officials — judges, magistrates, policemen, 
and others — for the prevention or reparation of wrongs to 
individuals. These will be most appropriately considered 
later on:^ after we have discussed the civil rights, of 
which the actual or threatened violation gives occasion for 
the exercise of these preventive or reparative functions of 
Government. For somewhat similar reasons, I reserve the 
consideration of the obligations that it is expedient to 
impose on ordinary members of the commimity in the 
interest — so to say — of government, i,e. in order to enable 
government to perform its work efficiently ; — as, for instance, 
the general obligation imposed on male adults to assist, 
when occasion arises, in the repression of crime and the 
maintenance of order. At present, I wish to concentrate 
attention on the rules by which the mutual relations of 
private members of the community — as contrasted with 
their relations to the government — should be determined, 
so far as these rules require the aid of governmental force 
to secure their adequate observance. 

But again, when we examine those rights of private 
individuals that correspond to obligations imposed on other 
private persons, we find that one class of these also only 

^ This qualification is indispensable, because, as I shall hereafter explain, 
I regard it as a normal part of the duty of the Legislative and Judicial 
organs of goyernmont to prevent encroachments by the Executive organ on 
the constitutional rights of private persons : — the Executive being ordinarily, 
by the nature of its functions, under the strongest temptation to such en- 
croachments. 

* See chaps, viii. and ix. 



Ill THE GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 37 

come into operation in consequence of the violation of other 
rights ; such as the right to compensation for injury wilfully 
or carelessly inflicted, and the right to repel violence by 
violence. Such remedial rights are obviously to be regarded 
as secondary and subordinate to the antecedent rights, the 
violation of which renders them necessary : they only come 
into operation because law is imperfectly obeyed— or perhaps 
in some cases imperfectly defined. The rights which we 
may distinguish as primary, and which we should begin by 
determining, are rights which would be established and 
operative if the law was perfectly defined and perfectly 
obeyed. 

§ 2. What then are the principles on which the laws 
defining the primary civil rights of private members of a 
civilised community should be constructed, or the criteria by 
which the goodness or badness of any actual body of such 
laws should be tested ? In answering this question, I do 
not seek, as I said in my first chapter, to propound and 
establish any new principles, not recognised in ordinary 
political thought and discussion ; my aim is merely to render 
somewhat more precise in conception the principles that I 
find commonly recognised, and to make their application to 
particular cases as dear and consistent as possibla 

In the first place, we are all agreed that laws ought to 
be just or not unjust : ^ and by this we do not merely mean 
that they ought to be justly administered — i.e. that the 
general rules of law ought to be impartially applied without 
" respect of persons " to the particular cases brought before 
the courts for judgment — but we mean also that these 
general rules themselves ought to be framed so as to avoid 
injustice. But when I try to give a definite signification 
to this principle, the only signification I can find which 
would really carry with it universal agreement is, that all 
arbitrary inequality is to be excluded: that persons in 

^ I say ** or not unjust," because it would be commonly recognised that 
there is an ideal justice which we cannot hope to realise in the legal relations 
of the members of any actual community. But we shall certainly agree in 
holding that laws ought not to be unjust. 



38 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

similar circumstances are to be treated similarly; and 
that, so far as different classes of persons receive different 
treatment from the legislator, such differences should not 
be due to any personal favour or disfavour with which the 
classes in question are regarded by hiuL This agreement 
therefore gives no positive guidance as to the plan on which 
our impartially framed laws are to be constructed : it does 
not enable us to say how far and on what grounds persons 
in different circumstances are to be treated differently. 

I think, however, that we may go a step further, and 
claim general — if not universal — assent for the principle 
that the true standard and criterion by which right legisla- 
tion is to be distinguished from wrong is conduciveness 
to the general "good" or "welfare." And probably the 
great majority of persons would agree to interpret the 
" good " or " welfare " of the community to mean, in the last 
analysis, the happiness of the individual human beings 
who compose the community ; provided that we .take into 
account not only the human beings who are actually living 
but those who are to live hereafter. This, at any rate, is 
my own view. Accordingly, throughout this treatise I shall 
take the happiness of the persons affected as the ultimate 
end and standard of right and wrong in determining the 
fimctions and constitution of government 

I draw special attention to the inclusion of posterity in 
my statement of the ultimate end of legislation : because it 
appears to me that whatever force there is in the argu- 
ments urged ^ against the view that the end of government 
is the happiness of the individuals governed, depends on the 
conception of these individuals as present, actually existing, 
members of the particular community in question. I fully 
concede that there are crises of national life in which it is 
the duty of the present generation of citizens, the actually 
living human beings who compose any political community, 
to make important sacrifices of personal happiness for the 
" good " or " welfare of their country," and that this good or 
welfare cannot be completely analysed into private happiness 

1 Kg, by Bluntschli. Thwry of the State (translated), Book v. 



Ill THE GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 39 

of the individuals who make the sacrificea I should add 
that there are cases in which it is the duty of the members 
of one political society to make sacrifices for the good or 
wel£Eu*e of other sections of the human raca But I hold 
that if this good is not chimerical and illusory, it must 
mean the happiness of somt individual human beings : if 
not of those living now, at any rate of those who are to live 
hereafter. And I have tried in vain to obtain from any 
writer who rejects this view, any other definite conception 
of the " good of the Stata" ^ 

If it is urged ^ that there are many most important 
sources of the happiness of human beings with which 
government has little or nothing to do, and which it will 
only make a mistake if it tries to control — art, literature, 
and for the most part industry — the answer is, that it 
appears from this very argument that the limits of govern- 
ment interference in these departments are capable of being 
determined on utilitarian principles ; for the argument is 
that interference beyond those limits will be demonstrably 
the reverse of useful — will be not conducive to the general 
happiness. 

§ 3. We have thus arrived at the utilitarian doctrine 
that the ultimate criterion of the goodness of law, and of 
the actions of government generally, is their tendency to 
increase the general happinesa The difficult question how 
far, if at all, the interests of any one community are to be 
postponed by its government to the interests of other 
sections of humanity is one that it will become necessary 
to deal with at a later stage ; but we are hardly called upon 
to consider it when we are discussing the internal functions 
of government — the principles of its action in relation to 
the governed. The happiness then of the governed com- 
munity will be assumed as the ultimate end of legislation, 

^ E,g, Bluntsohli, l,c, (Book y. ch. iv.) speaks of ''development of a 
people's natural gifts " and the '' perfecting of a people's life ; " bat I know 
no criterion for determining wherein the perfection of life consists and for 
distinguishing the right development of natural gifts from the wrong de- 
velopment, if the utilitarian criterion be rejected. 

^ As by Bluntsohli, he. Book v. ch. iii. § 2. 



40 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

throughout the nine chapters that follow.^ But even the 
acceptance of this principle gets us very little way towards 
a system of legislation : since we find it admitted equally 
by persons difiPering profoimdly in their political aims and 
tendencies: indeed, there is scarcely any widely spread 
political institution or practice — however universally con- 
demned by current opinion — which has not been sin- 
cerely defended as conducive to human happiness on the 
whole. Hence, when we have agreed to take general 
happiness as the ultimate end, the most important part 
of our work still remains to be done : we have to estab- 
lish or assume some subordinate principle or principles, 
capable of more precise application, relating to the best 
means for attaining by legislation the end of Maximum 
Happiness. 

Now when we consider the difierent ways in which the 
happiness of individuals may be promoted by laws, the most 
fundamental distinctions appear to be two. 

I. In the first place, legal control may be exercised in 
the interest of the person controlled, or of other persons : the 
government may either aim at making each of the individuals 
to whom its commands are addressed promote his own 
happiness better than he would without interference, or they 
may aim at making his conduct more conducive to the 
happiness of .other& So far as the former is the avowed 
aim of government, its control resembles that properly exer- 
cised by a father over his children : accordingly this kind 
of governmental interference is commonly spoken of as 
'' paternal ; " and I shall adopt this as the most convenient 
name for it. The term is used with more or less sarcasm, 
because such interference — as applied to sane adults — is 
commonly regarded as being in general imdesirable in 
modem civilised communities. The groimds for this 
opinion are chiefly these: (1) that men, on the average, are 
more likely to know what is for their own interest than 
government is, and to have a keener concern for promoting 

I Except 80 far as the pain of inferior animals is also taken into account, 
in legislation prohibiting cruelty to animals. 



Ill THE GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 41 

it, SO that, even supposing paternal legislation would be 
generally obeyed, even its direct eflTects are likely to be on 
the whole mischievous — taking into account the annoyance 
caused by coercion ; and (2) that, even if its direct effects 
are beneficial, its indirect effects in the way of weakening 
the self-reliance and energy of individuals, and depriving 
them of the salutary lessons of experience, are likely to out- 
weigh the benefit : while (3) such laws are specially liable 
to evasion, since, in cases where they are felt to be 
coercive, there will usually be no private individuals who 
feel directly interested in the effectiveness of the coercion — 
the persons whom the laws are primarily designed to benefit 
being the very persons who require to be coerced. It is 
further held that, even if any little good were done by 
this kind of legislation, it would not be worth the ex- 
pense entailed by it both of money and of the energies of 
statesmen needed for other functions: and finally, that 
there is a serious political danger in the increase of the 
power and influence of government that would be involved 
in a consistent application of the " paternal " principle. I 
shall consider hereafter how far these arguments are valid 
to the complete exclusion of this principle : at present it is 
enough to say that neither in current political reasoning 
nor in the actual facts of legislation is anything more 
than a very subordinate place now ever allowed or 
claimed for its application. We are all agreed that, in 
the main, the coercion of law is and ought to be applied 
to adult individuals in the interest primarily of other 
persons. 

II. But here a second fundamental distinction suggests 
itself The services which an individual is legally bound to 
render to others may be positive or negative : they may con- 
sist in doing useful acts, or in forbearing to do mischievous 
acts. Now there is no doubt that the constant rendering of 
reciprocal positive services is indispensable to the production 
of the greatest attainable happiness for the human beings 
who compose a modern civilised commimity ; aU agree, 
indeed, that such exchange of services has continually to 



43 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

become more complex and elaborate, if we are to realise the 
economic advantages of that development of industry which 
the progress of the arts continuallj renders possible. And 
most of us would readily accept, as a moral ideal, what I 
may call ethical as contrasted with political socialism ; that 
is, the doctrine that the services which men have to render 
to others should be rendered, as far as possible, with a 
genuine regard to the interests of others : that, as J. S. Mill, 
after Comte, lays down, " every person who lives by any 
useful work should be habituated to regard himself, not as 
an individual working for his private benefit, but as a public 
functionary," working for the benefit of society ; and should 
regard " his wages of whatever sort ... as the provision 
made by society to enable him to carry on his labour." 
But it is widely held that it is the business of the moralist 
and the preacher, not of the legislator, to aim at producing 
in the community this habit of thought and feeling; and 
that it will be on the whole conducive to the general good 
to leave the terms of positive social co-operation — except so 
far as it is needed to prevent aggression — to be settled by 
private agreement among the persons co-operating. It is 
held, in short, that what one sane adult is legally compelled 
to render to others should be merely the negative service of 
non-interference, except so far as he has volimtarily under- 
taken to render positive services ; provided that we include 
in the notion of non-interference the obligation of remedy- 
ing or compensating for mischief intentionally or carelessly 
caused by his acts — or preventing mischief that would 
otherwise result from some previous act This principle for 
determining the nature and limits of governmental inter- 
ferences is currently known as " Individualism," and I shall 
refer to it by this name ; the requirement that one sane 
adult, apart from contract or claim to reparation, shall 
contribute positively by money or services to the support of 
others I shall call " socialistic." I shall also apply this 
term to any limitation on the freedom of action of in- 
dividuals in the interest of the community at large, that is 
not required to prevent interference with other individuals. 



Ill THE GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LEGISLATION 43 

or for the protection of the community against the aggression 
of foreigners.^ 

The legislation of modem civilised communities then, is, 
in the main, framed on an Individualistic hasis ; and an im- 
portant school of political thinkers are of opinion that the 
coercive interference of government should be strictly limited 
to the application of this principle. I propose, accordingly, 
in subsequent chapters, to trace in outline the chief charac- 
teristics of the system of Law that would result from the 
consistent application of the Individualistic principle to the 
actual conditions of human life in society. I shall then 
examine certain difficulties and doubts that arise when we 
attempt to work out such a consistent and exclusive indi- 
vidualistic system : I shall analyse the cases in which, in 
my judgment, it tends to be inadequate to produce the 
attainable maximum of social happiness : and I shall con- 
sider to what extent, and under what carefully defined 
limitations, it is expedient to allow the introduction of 
paternal and socialistic legislation, with a view to remedy 
these inadequacies. 

^ The distioction and relations between these two meanings of the term 
'* socialistic " will be fully discussed later. See chap. xii. 



CHAPTER IV 

INDIVIDUALISM AND THE INDIVIDUALISTIC BflNIMUM 

§ 1. In this and the four following chapters I propose to 
work out in some detail what I may call the "Individualistic 
minimum " of governmental interference : that is, the dis- 
tribution of legal rights and obligations among private 
persons that results from applying the Individualistic 
principle, as strictly as seems practically possible, to the 
actual conditions of human life in society. But before I 
proceed to this examination, it ought to be noted that some 
Individualists view this principle in a light fundamentally 
different from that in which I have regarded it in the 
preceding chapter. They hold the realisation of freedom 
or mutual non-interference to be not merely desirable as 
most conducive to human happiness, but absolutely desirable 
as the ultimate end of law and of all governmental interfer- 
ence : an ideal good which would be degraded if it were 
sought merely as a means of obtaining pleasure and avoiding 
pain. This opinion, however, may I think be shown to be 
inconsistent with the common sense of mankind, as expressed 
in actual legislation, and even with the practical doctrines — 
when they descend to particulars — of the thinkers who 
profess to hold it.^ For the kind of laws which Indi- 

^ In arguing against any opinion as to ultimate ends, either in the ethics 
of private conduct or in i>olitics, there are two lines of demonstration open to 
the assailant : (1) Demonstration of inconsistency, if the person holding it is 
known, or may be presumed, to hold any other opinions with which it is not 
reconcilable, and (2) Demonstration of paradox, or proof of the inconsistency 
of the doctrine in question — or its consequences — with views commonly 



CH.iv INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 45 

vidualists generally agree to recommend may be shown to 
require for their justification a utilitarian interpretation of 
the individualistic principle: that is, they require us to 
conceive, as the general aim of law and government, not the 
prevention among the governed of mutual interference with 
freedom in the ordinary sense, but the prevention of mutual 
interference with each one's pursuit of happiness for himself 
and his family. And I think that the attempt to show this, 
under each of the chief heads of individualistic legislation, 
will be the best way of clearing up our general conception 
of the individualistic principle ; while at the same time it 
will afford a convenient opportunity of surveying the whole 
range of the subject before we proceed to consider it in 
detail 

Let us begin by examining the usage of the words 
" Freedom," or " Liberty " — which I take to be synonymous. 
When employed without qualification " freedom " signifies 
primarily the absence of physical coercion or confinement : 
A is clearly not a free agent if B moves his limbs, and he 
is not free if he cannot get out of a building because B has 
locked the door. But in another part of its meaning — 
which from our present point of view is more important — 
" freedom " is opposed not to physical constraint, but to the 
moral restraint placed on inclination by the fear of painful 
consequences resulting from the action of other human beings. 
There is, however, some disagreement as to the extent of this 
latter meaning : it is disputed whether the moral restraint 
that impairs my freedom may be caused by fear of any other 
man's action or only by fear of governmental action. The 
latter view was taken by Hobbes, who regarded the " state 
of nature " — that is, of no government — as a state of un- 
limited liberty, though also one of intense mutual fear. 
But this view is paradoxical : it seems absurd to say that it 
is contrary to liberty to be restrained by dread of the 
magistrate, and not contrary to liberty to be similarly or 

accepted. The former method, however, is chiefly available in controversy 
with particular individuals, which I do not here profess to undertake. I 
therefore only suggest it here in a general way. 



46 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

more painfully restrained by dread of the lawless violence 
of a neighbour : we should generally agree with Palej that 
not only happiness but liberty is less in the Hobbist state 
of nature than in a well-ordered political society. If it be 
granted, then, that my liberty is impaired by the restraint 
on volition caused by fear of the acts of himian beings 
generally, the statement sometimes made that " every law is 
contrary to liberty " is misleading, though in a sense true : 
since the diminution of liberty caused by the fear of legal 
penalties may be more than balanced by the simultaneous 
diminution of private coercion. It may be fairly said that 
the end of government is to promote liberty, so far as 
governmental coercion prevents worse coercion by private 
individuals. 

We have, however, to observe that freedom is sometimes 
attributed to the citizens of a state, not because the govern- 
mental coercion applied to them is restricted to the pre- 
vention of private coercion, but because it is exercised with 
the consent of a majority of the citizens in question. 
Indeed, the notion of " liberty " in this sense — which may 
be distinguished as ''constitutional liberty" — has had a 
very prominent place in political discussion. I do not wish 
to discard this use of the term altogether : but I think it is 
liable to be misleading. It may be fairly alBirmed that a 
hody of persons is " free " — in the ordinary sense — when the 
only rules restraining them are in accordance with the 
corporate will of the body : but it is only in a very peculiar 
sense — liable to collide markedly with the ordinary meaning 
of the term that " freedom " can be therefore affirmed of 
every mewhtr of the body. It is obvious that my inclina- 
tions may be restrained to any extent, and in the most 
annoying way, under a government of which the supreme 
control is vested in the mass of the citizens, if I have the 
misfortune to belong to the minority of this body : while, 
again, it is quite conceivable that under a despotic govern- 
ment I may be subject to no further coercion than is 
necessary to prevent worse coercion by private persons. 
Accordingly, when I speak without qualification of freedom 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM in 

as belonging to individuals, I shall not mean constitutional 
freedom, but civil freedom as above defined — absence of 
physical and moral coercion. 

It is certainly conceivable that the maintenance of '' equal 
froedom " in this sense should be taken as the ultimate and 
sole end of legislation, and of governmental interference 
generally. But in fact, as I have said, all governments 
and most Individu£tlists practically go beyond this, and 
aim at protecting the governed from pain — and loss or 
diminution of their means of gratifying their desires — caused 
by the action of other human beings. In so doing, I 
maintain, they adopt by implication a utilitarian view of 
the mutual interference that law ought to prevent, — even 
while expressly disavowing the utilitarian criterion. 

§ 2. Let us proceed to particulars: and take first the 
class of rights which Blackstone distinguishes as '' Personal 
Bights." We find that under this head aU civilised systems 
of law aim at securing the personal safety of individuals no 
less than their personal liberty ; i,e, they seek to prevent 
the infliction of physical injury or pain — even serious 
physical discomfort that can hardly be called pain — as well 
as the imposition of constraint. No doubt physical injury 
or pain usually involves a kind of constraint; since the 
injured man, even if not physically disabled, is prevented 
from doing what he likes by the fear of the recurrence 
of the injury. This is an important reason for preventing 
physical injury, and the main reason for making the 
mere threat of inflicting such injury a legal offence : but 
it would be absurd to maintain that assault and battery are 
prohibited solely on account of their tending to produce 
subsequent alarm in the person assaulted and battered, 
sufficient to have a coercive effect on his conduct: all 
would admit that they ought to be prevented, even if 
such coercive effect did not follow. Hence common sense 
clearly requires us to imderstand the non-interference, 
which such prohibition secures, to include not only 
non-interference with Freedom but non-interference with 
Happiness. 



1 



48 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

This is still more obviously true as regards the interfer- 
ence with physical comfort, prohibited imder the head of 
nuisances ; and I think it is also true of the attacks on 
reputation, which all civilised nations aim at preventing by 
law. No doubt such attacks may be a form of moral 
coercion : but it is not thought that my right to be pro- 
tected against calumny depends on the question whether 
my action has been or is likely to be modified by the 
unmerited dislike and contempt which the calumny has 
caused. Again, the defGunation of A by B undoubtedly 
tends to impair A's ability to gratify his desires, by 
rendering it difficult for him to obtain the co-operation of 
othera But it palpably strains the common notion of 
freedom to say that A is less firee merely because other 
people will not do what he wants them to da And as B*s 
freedom is directly and palpably diminished if he is pro- 
hibited from saying what he thinks of A, the restraints of 
the law of libel can hardly be justified if freedom — in any 
ordinary sense — and not happiness, be taken as the ultimate 
criterion. 

Again, Individualists — and legislators generally — agree 
that where law has not succeeded in preventing injury to 
person or reputation, it ought generally to enforce on the 
wrongdoer pecuniary compensation for the mischief, imless 
the injury is one that does not admit of being repaired ; — 
so as to bring about a condition of things approximating 
as far as possible to what would have existed had there 
been no injury. From the point of view of utilitarian 
individualism this duty is clear ; but if freedom be taken 
as an absolute end, it is difficult to show how the loss of 
freedom can properly be compensated by money. For if it 
be said that the richer man, as such, enjoys more freedom 
than the poorer, the fundamental aim of Individualism — 
to secure by law equal freedom to all — seems to transform 
itself into the fimdamental aim of extreme Socialism, to 
X^secure equal wealth to alL 

This leads us naturally to consider the application of 
the individualistic principle in the department of law which 



N 
\ 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 49 

is concerned with the protection of property. The Indi- 
vidualistic minimum of governmental interference is com- 
monly stated to include " protection of property " as well as 
of '' person " : and it is obvious that we are boimd to prevent 
any interference by one man with the property of another, 
if we suppose private property already instituted; since, 
in fact, the legal institution of private property mewM 
the prohibition of such interference. But the institution 
itself can hardly be justified by the general principle of 
Individualism, if we take freedom — in the ordinary sense 
— as an ultimate end, without any regard to utility ; it would 
rather seem that the end would be most completely realised 
by preventing A from thwarting B's actual use of material 
things, without going so far as to support B in the permanent 
exclusion of other men from the enjoyment of things that 
he has once used. The case is different if we interpret the 
principle in a utilitarian sense. From this point of view the 
protection of exclusive use is obviously required in order 
that individuals may have adequate inducement to labour 
in adapting matter to the satisfaction of their needs and 
desirea The natural reward of labour is the full enjoyment 
of the utility resulting from it; without the prospect of 
this natural reward — or of some adequate substitute for it 
— ^we could not expect much of the labour to be performed. 
Hence, from the point of view of utilitarian Individualism, 
the law ought clearly to aim at securing each individual 
from the interference of others with his enjoyment of the 
results of his labour: and, in fiEU^t, the provision of this 
security is often simply stated as the end, by reference to 
which private property is to be justified 

It ought, however, to be observed that this principle 
does not directly justify the appropriation of material things 
in their original or unlaboured condition : and if, on the 
utilitarian ground above given, A is held to interfere with 
B by using matter to which B has applied his labour, it 
cannot be denied that B's claim to exclude A from this matter 
involves some interference with A, if it appreciably restricts 
A's power of adapting matter to the satisfaction of his needs 

E 



50 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and desirea Still, I conceive that private property may 
be clearly justified on the individualistic principle — taken 
in a utilitarian sense — so far as it can be shown either (1) 
that the thing appropriated would not practically have been 
available for human use, if the appropriator had not laboured 
in seeking for it ; or (2) that his appropriation does not 
materially diminish the opportunities open to other persons 
of obtaining similar things, owing to the natural abimdance 
of such opportunities. On one or other of these grounds 
it is easy to justify the appropriation of such things as fish 
caught in the open sea, or wild animals, plants, or even 
minerals, found in large tracts of uncultivated country. 
And it has been maintained by Locke and others, that in 
the '' beginning and first peopling of the great common of 
the world " the appropriation of land was similarly justifiable, 
" since there was still enough and as good left, and more 
than the yet unprovided could use." But however true 
this may have been in a primitive condition of human 
society, it seems evident that social development has long 
since deprived this justification of any validity ; and now, 
at any rate, the individuals who have not inherited land 
do not find "enough and as good" within their reach. 
Accordingly, in the case of land, the principle of mutual 
non-interference is, I conceive, only applicable in a limited 
and qualified manner. And, in fact, when the question of 
regulating the appropriation of land has been practically 
presented to modern states in a simple form ^ — for instance, 
in relation to land as yet unappropriated, in a newly 
colonised coimtry — it has not commonly been held that 
individuals desirous of using such land, for agricultural 
or other purposes, have a right to claim the exclusive use 
of as much land as they may find it convenient to 
occupy. The question how such land is to be allotted 
I shall consider more in detail in the next chapter. 

^ That is, in a form not complicated by the consideration of established 
rights of private property, which could not justly be abolished without 
compensation. The general question of compensation for established rights 
mil be considered in chap. xii. 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVID UAUSTIC MINIMUM 51 

Here I am chiefly concerned to point out that Abso- 
lute Individualism supplies no method of dealing with its 
difficulties. 

So far I have tacitly cussumed that the labour necessary 
to adapt matter to human uses can be sufficiently encouraged 
by appropriating to the labourer the thing so adapted. 
There is, however, another case of property, of considerable 
importance in modern civilised communities, where quite 
peculiar obligations have to be imposed on non-owners : I 
mean the case of " patents " and " copyrights," by which the 
exclusive use of certain products of intellectual labour is 
secured to the producers or to their grantees. Here, from 
the nature of the labour, the only way of securing its results 
to the labourer is by prohibiting other members of the com- 
munity from imitating them. At the same time, such an 
interference with the freedom of action of the persons 
prohibited is difficult to justify from the point of view of 
absolute individualism ; since it cannot be shown that this 
prohibition of imitation tends to secure the persons con- 
cerned from physical or moral coercion. But it certainly 
tends to secure the greatest possible independent production 
of utility, assuming that the results that would be attained 
by imitation are such as the imitators could not possibly 
have arrived at independently. On this assumption, indeed, 
property in the results of intellectual labour, protected by 
patents and copyrights, is more simply justifiable on the 
(utilitarian) principle of mutual non-interference, than 
property in material things: just because the labour is 
not " mixed " with matter. To what extent the assumption 
is in different cases legitimate I shall consider in the next 
chapter. 

That an individual who has been allowed to appropriate 
anything should be allowed to transfer his rights over it 
wholly or partially to another is from any individualistic 
point of view obvious : since such transfer involves no fresh 
interference with the freedom of others, while its prohibition 
would involve interference with the transferrer's freedom — 
provided always that the transfer is really a free act. But 



52 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

it has to be observed that this proviso, if Freedom is taken 
in the ordinary sense, is inadequate to justify the generally 
accepted conditions of the validity of such transfers. For 
it is commonly understood that such transfers ought not to 
be valid if obtained by force or fraud ; but the proviso only 
justifies invalidation when the transferrer is coerced or 
intimidated by illegal violence, since it is surely strained to 
say that a man's freedom is impaired by fedse representations 
on the part of the transferee.^ On the other hand, from 
the utilitarian point of view, it is easy to see that the 
deception of A by B tends to interfere generally with B's 
pursuit of his ends: and, in particular, that freedom to 
transfer property is only expedient because the transferrer 
may be generally presumed to have consulted his own 
interest in making the transfer. But if he has been deceived 
by fiEdse representations this presumption obviously fails: 
and it also fails if the transferrer was for any other special 
reason clearly incapable of forming a sound judgment as to 
the value of the thing transferred or the considerations that 
induced him to transfer it. Thus we see the expediency of 
making the legal validity of such transfers depend on con- 
ditions tending to exclude not merely coercion but decep- 
tion, and also inadequate rationality on the part of the 
transferrer : and such conditions are in fact imposed in the 
legal systems of all civilised countries. 

So far I have spoken of transfers between living persons : 
it remains to consider how, on the principle of non-interfer- 
ence, property is to pass from the dead to the living. It is 
obviously expedient that when a man dies some definite 
successor or successors to his various rights of property should 
be determined somehow : but it is less clear how far the 
will of the dead person should be allowed to determine it. 
On the one hand, it may be urged that it can hardly be an 
interference with a man's freedom of action to preclude him 

^ If we say generaUy that freedom is impaired through inteUectual error 
caused by the action of others, we shaU have to say that the majority in a 
democracy is not free when it is misled by demagogues : and this would 
surely be a paradox — though a suggestive paradox. 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 53 

from having any influence on mundane afi&irs after his 
death : on the other hand, if he could own property and 
transfer it up to the moment of death without encroaching 
on the freedom of other members of the community, it is 
hard to see how this can be interfered with by a transfer 
that takes effect after death. Each of these opposing 
negations is, I think, valid ; so that the problem is insoluble 
if Freedom — in the ordinary sense — ^be taken as an ultimate 
end. But from the point of view of Utilitarian Individual- 
ism the individual's freedom is valued as a means, not to his 
own happiness alone, but to the general happiness : and the 
abrogation of the power of bequest would remove from him 
an important inducement to the exercise of industry and 
thrift in advancing years, for the benefit of others whose 
happiness he desires to promote — ^whether from affection or 
regard for posthumous reputation, or any other motive.^ A 
restriction of bequest in the interest of children or other 
near relatives would not be exposed to the same objections ; 
but such a measure is hardly justifiable on the individualistic 
principle — except in the special case of children unable to 
provide for their own livelihood. It is a different question 
whether a man should have full power to determine for an 
indefinite time after death the manner in which the wealth 
owned by him is to be used, otherwise than by determining 
his successors in ownership. There are strong reasons for 
restricting this power, which I will consider later ; here I 
will only say that if it were not allowed to some extent, 
persons desirous of posthumously regulating the use of 
their property would try to effect this by bequeathing it to 
persons pledged to carry out their regulations, and would 
probably in a large measure succeed ; and it would require 
strong grounds of social utility to justify us in encouraging 

^ It may be added that the abrogation of the power of bequest would, in 
the present condition of average human motives, be likely to be largely 
inoperative, except in cases where death was sudden and incapable of being 
foreseen ; since most men would prefer either to exchange their capital 
somehow for a life-income or to transfer it in old age — or when the prospect 
of death was otherwise near — to the objects of their preference, rather than 
leave it to be absorbed by the State. 



54 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

such persons by complete legal impunity to violate their 
pledges to the dead. 

In the last argimient it has been assumed that the per- 
formance of contracts to render future services should in 
general be made legally binding. This is, indeed, a cardinal 
tenet of Individualists : I do not, however, see how it can 
be clearly deduced from the principle that adopts Freedom 
as an ultimate end ; since a man would be more completely 
free — in the ordinary sense — if his volition at any given 
time could not be legally restricted by any previous expression 
of will as regards the future : though his power of attaining 
his ends would, of course, be diminished by his being less 
able to rely on the future actions of others. Moreover, if 
we take the realisation of freedom to include the perform- 
ance of contracts freely entered into, it would follow that — 
if freedom be the ultimate end — such contracts ought to be 
legally enforced in aU cases in which they do not tend to 
impair the freedom of any third party. But no actual system 
of law attempts anything like this : in England («.^.) no 
engagement to render personal services — except the marriage 
vow — gives the promisee a legal claim to more than pecuni- 
ary damages; all such contracts, if imfulfiUed, turn into 
mere debts of money so far as their legal force goe& And 
from a utilitarian point of view this limited and qualified 
enforcement of contract is justifiable : since, on the one 
hand, it is necessary for social wellbeing that men should 
rely generally on the fulfilment of mutual engagements; 
and, on the other hand, what is primarily important from a 
utilitarian point of view, is not that A should perform his 
promise to B, but that B should not be damaged by A*s non- 
performance.^ From this point of view again there are 

^ It is easy to see that the performance of a promise to render personal 
services may in certain cases cause loss or inconvenience to the promiser, far 
outweighing the utility to the promisee : so that — from the point of view 
of utilitarian individualism — it would be an excessive interference to en- 
force specific performance, provided that the damage to the promisee 
through non-performance is of a kind that admits of adequate pecuniary 
compensation. In other cases, in which pecuniary compensation would 
be inapplicable or inadequate, there is a different utilitarian reason for 




IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 55 

obvious reasons for imposing certain further conditions on 
the legal validity of engagements for future conduct, even 
when freely entered into: similar in the main to those 
already noticed as limiting the legal validity of the transfer 

§ 3. We have now examined briefly the chief heads of 
what may be called the "individualistic minimum" of 
primary governmental interference so far as sane adults 
alone are concerned : viz. (1) the Right of personal security, 
including security to health and reputation, (2) the Bight 
of private property, together with the Bight of freely 
transferring property by gift, sale, or bequest, and (3) the 
Bight to fulfilment of contracts freely entered into. We 
have found, under each head, that— speaking broadly— the 
kind of legislation which modem states agree to adopt, and 
practical persons agree to recommend, is not capable of being 
justified on the principle of taking Freedom — in any ordi- 
nary sense of the term — as an absolute end. It requires 
for its justification an individualistic maxim definitely 
understood as a subordinate principle or " middle axiom " of 
utilitarianism : ix, that individuals are to be protected from 
deception, breach of engagements, annoyance, coercion, or 
other conduct tending to impede them in the pursuit of 
their ends, so far as such protection seems to be conducive 
to the general happinesa This conclusion will guide our 
subsequent attempt to work out in more detail the concep- 
tion of the "individualistic minimum''; and it will also 
be found fundamentally important when — ^in Chapters ix. 
and X. — we come to consider the reasons for going beyond 
this minimum. 

We have now to observe that this utilitarian interpre- 

not enforcing specific performance of contracts to render personal services, 
viz. that the utility of the service to the recipient depends on qualities which 
cannot be secured by legal coercion. E,g, a painter can be forced to paint a 
picture, but he cannot be forced to paint such a picture as his customer, in 
making the contract, desired to obtain. Still, if the end of Law were not 
utility but the realisation of Freedom, and this were taken to include the 
enforcement of contracts freely made, the logical course would be to enforce 
specific perfonnance, so £u as possible, in all cases in which the promisee 
desired it. 



56 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

tation of the individualistic principle is still more obviously 
necessary when we proceed to deal with the fact that under 
the actual conditions of human life no society consists 
entirely of sane adulta Every society contains a large 
number of persons with regard to whom the most thorough- 
going individualist recognises the absurdity of maintaining 
that they require no more from others than non-interference 
and observance of contract : it is imiversally admitted that 
some legal provision must be made for supplying limatics 
and children with the means of subsistence, and some 
authority vested in some persons to restrain them from 
actions mischievous to themselves as well as to others. 
The case of children is, of course, by far the most import- 
ant Here, if we once admit that, with a view to the 
general happiness, the burden of supporting, directing, and 
training children must be legally placed somewhere, no 
Individualist can doubt that it must be thrown on the 
parents: since it would obviously be the gravest inter- 
ference with an individual's freedom of action to compel him 
to contribute to the support of an indefinite number of his 
neighbours' children.^ Indeed, we may say that a State 
that had gone so far in the direction of communism as to 
undertake the burden of providing for all the children of 
its members could hardly stop short of completely com- 
munistic institutions. To secure the efiective performance 
of parental duty, as thus defined, some provision for the 
registration of births in the names of both parents would 
seem to be required : but it is not easy to justify, on the 
principle of absolute Freedom, the refusal, which is found in 
the legal systems of all European communities, to recognise 
any connubial contracts that do not contemplate a perma- 
nent and monogamic union. Both this refusal, and other 
restrictions on the free union of the sexes, such as the pro- 
hibition of marriage between near relatives, are, I conceive, 
only justifiable on the basis of utilitarian Individualism : 

^ It may be added that Individualism will clearly justify restrictions 
on bequest in the interest of children, in the special case of children being 
too young at the time of their parents* decease to provide for themselves. 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 57 

t.e. as indirectly necessary to provide for the due support 
and education of children by their parenta The exact kind 
of regulation which, from this point of view, would be most 
expedient in a modern civilised society is, I think, impos- 
sible to determine from any general consideration of human 
nature, in which the inherited customs and sentiments that 
actually govern the relations of the sexes in such societies 
are left out of account. And since it seems to be funda- 
mentally important, for the attainment of the general end 
at which law aims in this department, that a strong unre- 
flecting moral aversion should be felt for the conduct 
legally prohibited, it would probably be inexpedient in 
an elementary treatise to weigh the utilitarian argu- 
ments for or against particular details of the marriage 
law. It is sufficient to say generally that the individual- 
istic legislator must judge all actual or proposed restrictions 
on the free imion of the sexes from the single point of view 
that has just been indicated : in respect, that is, of their 
tendency to secure due provision, control, and training for 
children until they are old enough to become ordinary 
members of an individualistic commimity. 

Assuming the marriage union to be, under ordinary 
circumstances, indissoluble, it seems necessary to maintain 
by law the right of the husband to the society of his wife ; 
and, on the other hand, to give the wife the right of obtain- 
ing from her husband the means of subsistence, so £Btr as 
her own income from property or earnings does not suffice 
for this purpose ;— either right being of course liable to 
forfeiture on account of conjugal infidelity or other gross 
misbehaviour. Whether it is desirable — with a view to 
" prevent domestic dissension or distrust " — to go beyond 
this in the way of extending the husband's control over the 
wife's property or actions, and correspondingly extending 
the protection given by law to the wife in case the husband 
misuses his powers, is less easy to decide ; but we may say 
that the burden of proof lies entirely with those who 
advocate such further restrictions on freedom. As regards 
the definition of parental duties and rights, it seems clear 



S8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

that — on our principle — the period of parental control 
should not be prolonged beyond the time at which the child 
reaches physical and intellectual maturity ; and that, as the 
growth towards maturity is gradual, legal independence 
should also be reached by degrees. It is more doubtful 
whether it accords with the individualistic principle to 
extend the legal duty of parents to children beyond that of 
giving care and sustenance up to the time at which they 
can earn their own living, and such training as will enable 
them to earn it; the point will be considered when we 
come to deal with bequest and inheritance.^ 

To sum up, I conclude that I am in harmony with 
common sense in taking, as the fundamental basis of indi- 
vidualistic legislation, the principle of mutual non-inter- 
ference, understood in a utilitarian sense. On this view, 
the general aims of individuaUstic legislation may be stated 
as follows: (1) To secure to every sane adult freedom to 
provide for his own happiness, by adapting the material 
world to the satisfaction of his needs and desires, and 
establishing such relations with other himian beings as 
may in his opinion conduce to the same end ; (2) to secure 
him from pain or loss, caused directly or indirectly by the 
action of other human beings — including in this loss any 
damage due to the non-performance of engagements made 
without coercion or deception ; while (3) throwing on parents 
the duties of care, sustenance, and education of children, 
until they are able to provide for themselves, and regulating 
£Btmily relations — and to some extent the relations of the 
sexes generally — with a view to the better performance of 
such parental duties. To the chief legal rights and duties 
established under this last head I shall occasionally refer as 
'' family " rights and duties ; but, for the most part, I shall 
abstain from examining them in any further detail. 

§ 4. Let us now proceed to consider more fully the 
chief particular rights which the general right to non- 
interference is found to include, when we seek to realise 
it under the actual circumstances of human life in society. 

^ Chap. vii. 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 59 

The following appear to be the chief ways in which A 
may interfere with B's interests or happiness — otherwise 
than by physical constraint or confinement, which I need 
not further discuss : (1) By impeding his efforts to adapt 
his material environment to the satisfaction of his needs and 
desires: (2) by breach of contract: (3) by causing him 
physical injury or discomfort : (4) by interfering with his 
relations to other human beings : (5) by false statements, 
leading him to act or abstain from acting in a manner detri- 
mental to himself: (6) by moral coercion or intimidation: 
(7) by causing him mental annoyance of some other kind. 
In the chapters that follow I shaU be chiefly concerned 
with the rights and obligations to be established imder the 
first two heads : since the regulation of the use of material 
things — and especially of that exclusive use which is the 
essence of property, — and the determination of the condi- 
tions of legally valid contracts, are the most important 
topics in a general survey of civil law from a political point 
of view. Contract is the main link by which the complex 
system of co-operation that characterises a modern civilised 
society is knit together : while the most marked differences 
in the outward lives of ordinary members of a modem 
society depend mainly on differences in the extent of their 
rights of property ; and consequently the acquisition of pro- 
perty is usually the most prominent aim of the actions of 
such persons in their most important social relations outside 
their own families. Under the remaining heads much 
fuller discussion is needed, to work out a sufficiently 
precise statement and adequate justification of the rules 
practically required ; but of this further discussion, in such 
a treatise as the present, only a brief indication can be 
given. 

The general problem, presented to an individualistic 
legislator in different forms under these different heads, is 
that of adequately protecting A from loss, pain, or alarm, 
caused by the action of B, without unduly suonoying or 
hampering B. In many cases experience alone can enable 
us to determine the best middle course to take between 



6o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

opposite dangers: but we may note some of the general 
considerations by which this course will be determined. 

I. It is one of the most obvious duties of men living in 
society to avoid causing physical injury or discomfort to 
others : and where avoidable damage or serious annoyance 
of this kind has been even unintentionally inflicted through 
carelessness, there is a iprima facie ground for exacting 
adequate compensation from the doer to the sufferer of the 
harm.^ But we may reasonably go much further in re- 
pressing acts of this kind, when demonstrably done with 
intent to injure or coerce, than we ought to go in repressing 
similar acts done without any such intention : partly be- 
cause an act externally the same becomes indefinitely more 
annoying and alarming when its intention is malevolent or 
coercive, partly because it is not usually a severe or dan- 
gerous restriction on any one's freedom of action to preclude 
him from efforts to annoy or alarm othera For instance, 
it may be slightly annoying to be pushed or jostled in a 
crowd : but if this annoyance were treated as a wrong, the 
care imposed by the duty of avoiding it under all circum- 
stances would be a much greater burden than the annoy- 
ance it was designed to remedy ; we may, however, reason- 
ably treat as an ofience any pushing or jostling with intent 
to annoy. 

II. The same point is important in considering how far 
A is to be legally restrained from causing loss or annoyance 
to B by interfering with his relations with other persona 
Here, however, we must first notice another distinction of 
fundamental importance : the interferer may either induce 
other persons, in domestic or social relations with B, to 
violate actual obligations, or he may merely induce them to 
abstain from making agreements with B, or rendering him 
services not legally dua The general expediency of pro- 
hibiting the former kind of interference is obvious : a man 
who knowingly commands or persuades another to commit 
a wrong should be regarded as himself a wrong-doer. It 

^ A more difficult case is that of pure accident without anything like 
negligence. This will be discussed in a subsequent chapter (viii. § 2). 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 6i 

should be noted^ however, that some qualification of this 
principle is required in the case of breaches of contract: 
so far as the strict fulfilment of contractual obligation 
is properly not made legally obligatory in certain cases, 
but only adequate pecuniary compensation for non-ful- 
filment.^ It would clearly not be right in such cases 
to inflict any penalty on one who had advised a breach 
of contract, unless he had also advised non-payment of 
reasonable compensation, or imless his advice had been 
given with a demonstrable intent to injure or coerce 
the promisea But in the case of contracts where strict 
performance should be legally compulsory — such as con- 
tracts to pay money,* or transfer other wealth — consistency 
requires that the ofiering of inducements to break the con- 
tract should be regarded as a wrong. 

There is more difficulty where the acts to which the 
interferer ofiers inducement are acts in themselves lawful, 
though seriously damaging or annoying to B. For acts of 
this kind are inevitable incidents of industrial competition. 
E,g, to obtain the advantages of competition, in stimulating 
and rewarding good management of business, A must be 
allowed to persuade B's customers to desert him en masse^ 
and transfer their custom to A, even though the result may 
be industrial ruin to B. Accordingly, in such a case it 
seems right to have regard partly to the ulterior intention ; 
if the interference damaging to B is designed to promote 
A's business interests, in the ordinary course of the com- 
petition for industrial prosperity, it must be treated as 
legitimate — if otherwise lawful — ^in a society individual 
istically organised : but if its aim is demonstrably to injure 
B, it may be regarded as falling within the class of inter- 
ferences which — if the mischief they cause be considerable 
— ^may be proper subjects for legal repression.^ 

One specially important mode in which a man's relations 

^ See note to p. 54 ; and chap. vi. § 5. 

' I do not here consider the general release from the obligation of debts 
obtained through bankruptcy. See chap. yi. § 5. 

' The propriety of interference of this kind, when its aim is coercive 
without being demonstrably malevolent, will be considered presently. 



62 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

to other human beings are liable to be injuriously affected is 
by statements damaging to his reputation : at the same time, 
a most important part of the mutual services which the 
members of any society are capable of rendering consists in 
pointing out defects in the character and conduct of others. 
Here, accordingly, the problem of preventing as far as pos- 
sible injury to reputation without doing more harm by 
restricting freedom of communication, is peculiarly difficult. 
The simple solution of allowing true damaging statements to 
be made but prohibiting false ones, is not satisfactory : since 
to penalise every untrue damaging statement, even though 
made in perfect good faith, would render the functions of 
warning and criticism too dangerous; on the other hand, 
there are true statements of which the publication would 
be clearly mischievous, — as the pain and bitterness caused 
by them would much outweigh their utility in the way 
of warning. Perhaps we may distinguish three classes of 
cases: 

(1.) There are certain public occasions in which the 
importance to the community of a full and candid utterance 
of a man's belief seems to be so great as to outweigh entirely 
the risk of harm to private reputations from such utterance. 
Thus, according to English law, " the freedom of speech and 
debate in Parliament " cannot be " impeached or questioned 
in any place outside Parliament " ; again, an action will not 
lie against a judge for words spoken by him judicially, nor 
against a witness in any case for anything relevant said in 
the course of judicial proceedings. And these securities 
seem to be required for the due performance of legislative 
and judicial functions. 

(2.) In other cases in which it is, generally speaking, 
clearly advantageous to society that men should com- 
municate to others beliefs honestly entertained by them 
respecting the character or conduct of third parties, such 
statements, however injurious to the reputation of their 
objects, should not entail a liability to legal penalties, 
even if they turn out to be unfounded ; unless they can be 
shown to have been made from some improper motive, or 



IV INDIVIDUALISM AND INDIVIDUALISTIC MINIMUM 63 

with reckless disregard of the ordinary means of ascertaining 
truth. Examples of this class are confidential commimica- 
tions about the character of a servant ; warnings given by 
a solicitor to a client^ or a guardian to a ward ; " fair com- 
ments" on matters that have been brought before the 
public. 

(3.) In cases where there is no clear general probability 
of any considerable advantage to society from the free com- 
munication of candid opinions, the importance of protecting 
individuals from damage to reputation would seem to out- 
weigh the general considerations in fetvour of freedom of 
speech. In such cases, even if a man utters his honest 
opinion without malevolence, he should do so at the risk of 
having to make reparation if any statement seriously in- 
jurious to others should turn out to be false in any material 
point.^ 

IIL A somewhat similar problem is presented in the 
case of injury done to a man by fsilse statements made not 
ah(mt him but to him. If statements of this kind can be 
shown to have been made with intent to mislead, it seems 
clear that they — ^as well as other deceptive acts — should be 
repressed by making the deceiver liable for any serious 
damage caused by his deception. But if there is no demon- 
strable intention to deceive, the question is less easy ; since 
it would seriously hamper the freedom of human inter- 
course if a man were held legally responsible for all the 
harm done by statements made to other men without an 
exact regard to truth. If, however, A makes statements to 
B with the deliberate design of inducing him to act in a 
certain way for the promotion of A's interests, it is specially 
incumbent on him — and not too much to require — that he 
should resist the temptation to make statements which 
he does not know to be true, in the hope that they may 
turn out to be so ; hence, in this case, not only consciously 

^ It is more doubtful whether a man should be liable to be punished 
even for true defamatory statements, irnless he can show that it was for the 
public benefit that they should be made ; but probably it should be illegal 
to make such statements from malice, or with a view to private gain. 



64 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

fiEdse but grossly reckless statements, which actually cause 
material damage, miay fairly be regarded as wrongs needing 
reparation. 

IV. Under the head of moral coercion or intimidation, a 
distinction has to be taken similar to that which has already 
been pointed out in considering interference with social 
relations. There can be no doubt that to cause alarm by 
doing or threatening wrongful acts, or to endeavour by 
any kind of threats to induce a man to do wrongful 
acts or abstain from fulfilling definite duties, are wrong- 
ful interferences, which call for legal repression. But 
when A, by threatening to do something in itself legitimate 
but damaging or annoying to B, induces B to act in a 
manner opposed to B's interests or inclination, but not in- 
volving a breach of legal duty, it is a more difficult question 
how far this kind of intimidation can properly be regarded 
as a legal wrong fix)m an individualistic point of view. We 
can hardly lay down that an intention to coerce renders an 
act wrong which would otherwise be legitimate, no less 
than an intention to injure. For there are many cases in 
which a coercive intent is also plainly beneficent, either in 
the interest of the person coerced or of the community : as 
when a father notifies to a son that he will lose a legacy if 
he runs into debt, or when persons are restrained or re- 
claimed from vice by fear of exclusion from social relations. 
It would be paradoxical to regard such warnings and 
exclusions as wrongs, merely because they are intended 
to be coerciva Again, coercion of a certain kind is a 
natural incident of commercial exchanges : the buyer forces 
the seller to lower his price by refusing to buy, and mce 
versd. All we can say is that, whenever the direct or main 
intent of any action is to induce a man by fear of damage 
to do what, apart from such inducement, he would consider 
to be opposed to his interest, the action is at least of 
doubtful legitimacy from an individualistic point of view ; 
in fact, cases similar to those above mentioned may easily be 
found which would be generally disapproved ; e,g, if a father 
were to warn a son that he would lose a legacy if he did 



IV INDIVIDUAUSM AND INDIVID UAUSTIC MINIMUM 65 

not join the Chiirch of Eome, or if an employer were to 
give notice that he would engage no workmen who declined 
to take a pledge of abstinence from tobacco. So again, a 
trader would be widely censured who sold his goods at 
unremunerative prices in order to drive another trader out 
of the businesa In short, conduct of this kind lies on the 
ambiguous margin between what an individualistic code 
should allow and what it should prevent: and it cannot 
be said to be contrary to the individualistic principle to 
subject such conduct to legal repression in any special case 
in which a demonstrably coercive intention was combined with 
mischievous results — ^provided that this special case could 
be clearly defined and distinguished from other cases. A 
particular case that is free from difSculty is where the 
act threatened is one that either ought not to be done at all, 
or ought to be done with a view to the public benefit ; — such 
as an accusation of crime. The wrongfulness of threaten- 
ing an act of this kind with a view to private gain, to be 
obtained by inducing persons whom it might harm to 
purchase the threatener's silence, is easily recognised and 
defined. Another case that specially invites the legislator's 
attention, as specially menacing to the freedom of indi- 
viduals, is where a number of persons combine to intimidate 
by threatening acts which, though not illegal apart from 
their coercive purpose, are demonstrably threatened and 
carried out for this purpose.^ 

y. It remains to consider how far the causing of mental 
annoyance, without demonstrably malevolent intention, is to 
be regarded as an interference which law ought to prevent. 
Eeflection will at once show that we cannot hope to prevent 
this with anything like completenes& B may be offended 
by the colour of A's dress or the cut of his beard, his 
movements in public, or the expression of his opinions 
and sentiments; but it is obvious that the attempt to 
shield B completely from annoyance thus caused would 
involve tenfold more vexatious interference with A Ex- 
perience alone can enable us to determine roughly what 

^ This case wiU be further discussed in a subsequent chapter (xxviii.) 

F 



66 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, iv 

kinds of sensibility to mental annoyance are so keen and 
widely spread as to render governmental interference desir- 
able for their protection. It is to be observed that in 
many cases mental annoyance is commonly combined with 
harm or loss of some other kind. This is the case with 
attacks on reputation, which we have already considered : 
and in other important cases of ofiensive and annoying acts 
prohibited by law in modem civilised communities, we find 
that such acts have, at least an indirect tendency to cause a 
violation of some legal rule that rests on other grounds. 
Thus indecency is prohibited because the sentiment it 
offends is indirectly protective of the institution of the 
family; and I conceive that the primary aim of law in 
prohibiting blasphemy is not merely to prevent the mental 
pain it causes to believers in the established religion, but to 
prevent religious beliefs from being weakened, on account 
of their importance to social order. 



CHAPTER V 

ON PROPERTY 

§ 1. In the present chapter I propose to consider the main 
regulations in respect to Property which a consistent legisla- 
tion on the basis of utilitarian individualism will include. 

It will be convenient first to take the common notion of 
the " Right of Property " and analyse it into its elements : 
and, so far as these elementary rights are separable, to 
observe the different grounds for maintaining them separ- 
ately or in combination in different casea For clearness, 
we will, in the first instance, limit our consideration to 
property in material things. 

We may begin by observing that the most widely- 
extended right secured to members of an orderly community 
in respect of material things is merely a right to use 
transiently, to make the material thing a means to the 
satisfaction of needs and desires, not necessarily combined 
with any power to exclude another from using the same 
thing immediately afterwards, — or even at the same time, 
so far as this second use does not actually impede the first 
The obligation corresponding to this right is merely that 
of not interfering with actual use. And in the case of 
things of which the utility does not result from human 
labour, and which can be used simultaneously or success- 
ively by an indefinite number of persons, without any 
considerable amount of mutual interference, our principle 
can only justify us in securing to individuals unhampered 
and not exclusive usa Thus, if a piece of land is most 



68 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

useful on the whole as an area for common recreation, 
it is obviously inexpedient to allow it to be appropriated 
in separate portions for the separate use or enjoyment 
of particular individuals. Considerable portions of the 
earth's surfeu^e have, in the most civilised societies, been 
kept out of private ownership for this reason.^ 

It is not, however, the mere right of unhampered use 
which constitutes the most essential element in the Bight 
of Property, as commonly conceived: but the right of 
excltisive use. This is always implied in the idea of 
appropriation : but the obvious utilitarian grounds for it 
are different in different cases. Some kinds of things — 
such as food — ^if used as such at all, can only be used once, 
and therefore by a single individual : so that the undis- 
turbed use of them is impossible without appropriation. 
In other cases it is obvious that at any rate the most 
effective use of the material thing in question — either for 
immediate enjoyment or as an instrument or material for 
producing things directly consimiable — ^requires that the 
user should have the legal right of excluding other persons 
from any similar use of the thing, or any action materially 
affecting its physical condition, at least for a considerable 
period of time. If a field is to be used for the cultivation 
of crops it is obviously expedient, even in a primitive con- 
dition of agriculture, that it should be under the exclusive 
control of one person— or of a group of persons acting in 
concert — at least during the time that intervenes between 
one harvest and another: and as the art of agriculture 
develops, the requisite period of exclusive control continu- 
ally tends to become longer. 

More often, however, the ground for legalising the ex- 
clusive use of material things does not lie in the fact that 
the things are thus obviously made more useful, but in the 
fiEict that their existence — in the form on which their 

^ In the case of land, such a right of unexcluaive use may be retained 
for certain purposes, while appropriation is allowed of other utilities deriv- 
able from the land — as when A owns land, but a right-of-way over his land 
is secured to the world at large. 



ON PROPERTY 69 



utility depends — is due to labour spent in producing and 
guarding them, which could not have been expended if the 
labourer had not been able to count on the exclusive enjoy- 
ment of his results : and it is, as we have seen, from this 
point of view that the right of property is commonly 
justified by Individualists But, whatever its raticmale may 
be, it is this right of excluding all others permanently from 
interference with a particular portion of matter, which we 
have to regard as the most essential element in the Bight 
of Property in material things. 

We may observe that in the case of non-exclusive no 
less than of exclusive use, the protection from interference 
which law gives to the user may be of an indirect kind. 
Thus, where the water of a stream is used to turn the 
wheels of a succession of water-mills in its descent, it would 
be obviously inexpedient to allow the water to become the 
property of any of the millowners : but in order to encourage 
them to make the water useful in this way it is expedient 
to protect them against a diversion of the course of the 
stream at any point above their mills. And on similar 
grounds the owner of a house is not merely protected 
against the forcible entry of a stranger, but for the loss 
of utility caused by the pollution of the surrounding 
atmosphere. How far such protection of A from indirect 
interference should be given, where it involves a material 
restriction on the freedom of action of other persons, can 
only be settled in any particular case by a carefril balance 
of conflicting inconveniences. 

We have already noticed that the utilities of some things 
— such as food and fuel — are completely exhausted in a 
single use; sometimes, again, as in the case of clothes, 
ordinary use involves gradual deterioration. In either case 
it is not practicable to separate the Bight to use the thing 
from the Bight to destroy it, totally or partially: and, 
accordingly, this latter right is included in the common 
notion of the right of property. If, however, in the normal 
and proper use of a thing it either does not tend to be 
deteriorated, or tends to have its original utilities continually 



70 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

restored, it is possible and may be expedient to secure to an 
individual the exclusive use of it for life or a term of years, 
without also allowing him to destroy or deteriorate it. Thus, 
when land used for agricultural purposes is let on lease, some 
provision against deterioration is generally expedient. 

Finally, the right of property is commonly held to include 
the Bight to Alienate by gift or exchange during life ; and 
perhaps also the Bight to Bequeath. But either of these 
may be separated from the right of exclusive use : in fact, 
this separation is not unusual when the right of exclusively 
using a thing of comparatively permanent utility is limited 
in tima The application of the term "Property" to a 
right so limited is perhaps unusual, but I think it is more 
convenient to use the term, with a qualification, in this 
wider sense. If the right of deterioration and the right of 
alienation are withheld, the right of bequest is usually 
withheld along with them ; in which case the right of 
ownership is reduced to the right of exclusive use during 
life ot for a term of year& At the same time, as was 
before observed, freedom of bequest is a much more dubious 
deduction from the general principle of Individualism than 
freedom of use or of alienation during life ; I have there- 
fore thought it most convenient to treat the right of 
bequest separately. I shall accordingly mean by the " Bight 
of Property " — when used without qualification — the com- 
plete right of exclusive use, including the right to destroy 
and the right to alienate ; but not necessarily the right of 
bequest. 

§ 2. I now pass to consider how this right of property 
should be acquired. In the first place, it is clear that in 
a modem society where the right of property — including the 
right of transfer by sale or gift — and regulations determining 
the succession to property after the owner's death, are fully 
established, the most important part of the material wealth 
owned at any time will have been obtained by transfer 
during life or inheritance. The conditions imder which 
such transfer should be allowed, and regulations for bequest 
and intestate inheritance, will be considered separately here- 



ON PROPERTY 71 



after : at present, therefore, I confine myself to the con- 
sideration of the legitimate origin of property in things not 
yet appropriated. We have seen that the moral right to 
the produce of one's labour constitutes, in the individualistic 
view, the principal justification and basis of legal rights of 
property. But simply to place this moral right under the 
sanction of law, by laying down a general legal rule securing 
to each individual the results of his labour, would be 
obviously inadequate: for a man does not create matter 
by his labour, but only modifies it : and the fact that he 
has spent his labour on material to which he had no right 
could at most give him a right to an equivalent for the 
additional utility that it has thereby acquired. It is 
necessary, therefore, in a system of law, to determine how 
the individual's rights stand in relation to matter htfore it 
is modified by labour. 

Here, first, it is to be observed that a thing may require 
search, or pursuit, and perhaps the exercise of skill or 
strength in capture, in order that it may be obtained 
and used for human purposes; and that then the labour 
of seeking or hunting is really invested in the thing before 
it comes into a man's possession. On this ground, as was 
before said, the simple rule of appropriating the thing 
so found or captured to the individual finder or capturer 
is an unexceptionable application of the individualistic 
principle, provided that other men's opportunities of obtain- 
ing similar things are not thereby materially diminished. 
The thing with all its utilities is not an excessive reward 
for his labour, if any one else can get as much by similar 
labour. It is therefore reasonable that wild animals, that 
are not in any degree the product of human labour and 
care, should belong to those who have effected their capture : 
and that other things admitting of being moved and carried 
oflf should — imless they have already been appropriated, 
or are found upon or in appropriated land — become the 
property of those who have first physically seized them. 
But in the case of most useful inanimate things human 
labour is primarily required not for search or capture, but 



72 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

to foster their growth on the surface of the soil, or to 
extract them from beneath the surface : thus, in order to 
obtain them it is necessary that the land should be 
appropriated, at least temporarily, to the exclusive use of 
the labourer: and the question is how this can be done 
without encroachment on the rights of other persons. 

In a country as fully populated as the civilised countries 
of Europe are, appropriation has already gone so far that 
this question does not arise in any simple form : ^ it is, 
therefore, most convenient to consider it in reference to 
land in a country newly colonised. How shall we decide 
how much land any individual in such a country is to be 
allowed to take possession of ? The most obvious answer is, 
as Locke suggests, that each may appropriate as much as he 
can really occupy and efTectively use. But, first, as I have else- 
where said,^ " the use of land by any individual may vary 
almost indefinitely in extent, diminishing proportionally in 
intensity — t.g. it would be absurd to let any individual 
claim possession of the whole ground over which he could 
himt, as against another who wished to use it for pasturage : 
but if so, ought the shepherd, again, to have possession as 
against a would-be cultivator, or a cultivator as against a 
would-be miner." Even if such difficulties as these could 
be overcome, a more fundamental objection would remain, 
viz. that the condition necessary to justify appropriation of 
any utilities on the individualistic principle — that other 
men's opportunities of obtaining similar utilities were not 
materially diminished — would soon become impossible to 
fulfil : newcomers would find no land as good as that which 
had been first appropriated. It must be admitted that 
private property in land involves a substantial encroachment 
on the opportunities of applying labour productively which 
— were it not for such appropriation — would be open to 

^ It is tme that the transfer of common land to private ownership is a 
process still going on in England : but the land that is thus transferred is 
already the subject of definite rights belonging to a particular group among 
the members of the community, and cannot be appropriated without the 
consent of a definite proportion of this group. 

' Principles of Poliiieal^Eeonomy, bk. ilL oh. iv. § 12. 



ON PROPERTY 73 



individuals now landless : on the other hand, appropriation, 
at least for a term of yeaxs, is manifestly required, on the 
principle of utilitarian Individualism, to stimulate and 
reward the most energetic and enlightened application of 
labour to land. It would seem, therefore, that the only 
practicable application of our principle is to allow the 
requisite appropriation but to secure adequate compensation 
for the encroachment involved in it. The predse extent 
to which appropriation should be allowed, and the manner in 
which the compensation is to be taken, are questions that 
have to be decided, I conceive, by a careful balance of expedi- 
enciea The simplest plan would be to sell the land freely 
to the highest bidder for what it would fetch, and invest the 
proceeds for the permanent benefit of the community. But 
it cannot be said that the individualistic principle requires 
the method of sale to be adopted rather than the method 
of lease : and as land tends to increase in value as a country 
becomes more densely populated, it seems probable that 
the prospective increase of value, accruing independently 
of the owner's energy and enterprise, will not be adequately 
represented in the sum received for the sale of the land ; 
so that the compensation thus directly secured to future 
generations, for the opportunities from which they are 
excluded, is not likely to be adequate. On the other hand, 
it is for the general good that the individual cultivator's 
energy and enterprise should be encouraged as much as 
possible, and complete ownership is the most simple and 
effective way of encouraging it. What scope is to be allowed 
to those opposing considerations cannot, I conceive, be deter- 
mined without special experience : and in practically decid- 
ing the question we should have to take into account the 
moral and intellectual qualities likely to be possessed by 
the government that, if the system of leases be adopted, 
will have the delicate task of artificially providing for the 
lessee that encouragement of industry and thrift which 
the system of private ownership gives him naturally.^ 

^ It is to be observed that I am here only dealing with the application of 
Individualism to land-tenure in a new country. The question whether land 



74 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

So far we have been considering the arrangements ex- 
pedient for a community dealing with newly-occupied land. 
But it would seem that our judgment on proposals for 
taking land back into the possession of the community in 
a district where it has, in the main, been completely appro- 
priated ought reasonably to be determined by the same 
kind of considerations, — with the very important difference, 
that in the latter case we have to take into account the 
cost of compensating existing proprietors.^ 

§ 3. To whatever extent the surface of the earth is 
rightly appropriated to the exclusive occupation of indi- 
viduals, its vegetable products will, of course, belong primarily 
to the occupier ; as — generally speaking — no one else can 
enjoy them without his consent : and so far as their growth 
is altogether due to human exertion and care, or admits of 
being materially aided thereby, the encouragement of such 
labour and care is, as we have seen, a main ground justifying 
the appropriation of the soil So again, where the labour 
and care of the occupier is directly applied to tame animals 
that feed on the natural produce of the soil, the appropria- 
tion to him of the progeny of the animals is similarly 
justified. By " tame " animals we mean such as are 
normally within the control of some man, so that they can 
at any time be physically taken into possession by him : 
if they stray beyond his control, it is through accident or 
the enticement of other men, and their ownership is 
normally ascertainable by some natural or artificial mark. 
It is obvious that the exclusive use of such animals may 
be appropriated to individuals without much more difficulty 
than that of inanimate things. The case is different with 
animals which we call " wild," i.e. which require some 
process of capture, uncertain in its results, before a man 
can take possession of them.^ Still, if their existence is 

should be granted on easier tenns to encourage emigration belongs to a later 
part of the discussion. See chap. x. on ''Socialistic Interference." 

^ See chap. xii. 

^ The criterion adopted by the Romans for distinguishing ''tame " from 
" wild " animals — and widely followed in modem law — was the "animus 



ON PROPERTY 75 



entirely or largely due to the labour applied by the 
holder of the land, our general principle will justify 
us in prohibiting other men from taking possession of 
them, so far as their ownership is clearly ascertainable — 
as {e.g.) if they belong to a particular rare speciea Where 
this ascertainment is practically impossible, the prohibition 
would be futile : but even then, so far as they can be 
prevented from straying, their exclusive use is indirectly 
secured by appropriating the land. It is, however, obvious 
that in the case of land whose only useful produce consists 
in wild animals and vegetables, capable of living and 
thriving without human labour or protection, one main 
argument for allowing appropriation is absent. Still, the 
appropriation of such land — assuming a fair compensation 
for the utilities thus withdrawn from the community — 
seems to be a legitimate application of the individualistic 
principle, provided that its appropriation tends materially 
to increase the utility obtainable from such land: in 
considering which we have to take into account the enjoy- 
ment derived from hunting wild animals, as well as the 
utility of the animalB when captured. The theoretical 
question is simply whether the whole amount of utility 
obtainable when the land is allotted to the exclusive use 
of individuals, is clearly greater or less than the whole 
amount of utility that may be expected to result from 
leaving it common : but, of course, in any concrete case the 
balance of utilities may be difficult to ascertain.^ 

§ 4. There is no necessity that the appropriation of the 
surface of land should carry with it an exclusive right to 
extract the minerals which lie below the surfekce ; and their 
existence is obviously not in any way due to the labour and 

revertendi." A creatare that had a *' disposition to return " after straying 
was tame : if it had no such disposition it was wild. It might have it and 
lose it : it then relapsed into its natural wildness. It seems to me, however, 
that it is rather the owner's prospect of getting possession of the animal than 
its own state of mind which is primarily important fix)m a utilitarian point 
of view. 

^ The question how far market value can be taken as a measure of utility 
will be discussed later. Gf. chap. x. § 6. 



76 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

caie of the individual who has appropriated the surface, or 
of any suheequent owner. If, indeed, such minerals are of a 
common kind, it would be a needless and vexatious interfer- 
ence with the freedom of the owner of the surface to prevent 
him from appropriating them ; since he cannot thereby gain 
any material advantage which might otherwise have been 
enjoyed by other members of the community. If, however, 
the minerals are at once so rare and useful that a consider- 
able extra value is obtainable by the labour spent in 
extracting them, as compared with other labour, it is hardly 
in accordance with our principle, that this extra value 
should be appropriated by any one member of the com- 
munity, to the exclusion of the rest ; except so far as it 
is needed as a reward for the labour that has to be spent, 
on the average, in searching for the rare mineral This 
last consideration is of course important: and since 
the owner of the surface is generally in the best position 
for ascertaining what lies beneath it— especially if he is 
allowed to extract common minerals — there is an obvious 
utility in allowing him to appropriate even the rarer and 
more valuable contents of the earth; since the total 
amount extracted will thus tend to be increased to the 
advantage primarily of the producer, but indirectly of 
others also. Whether this gain to the commimity is likely 
more than to compensate for the loss of the extra value 
of rare minerals which the government might secure, in 
whole or in part, if property in the surface were strictly 
separated from property in the contents, is a question which 
only experience can enable us to answer ; and which may 
perhaps require a different answer in reference to different 
minerals, and different social and industrial conditions. The 
same may be said as to the expediency of providing for the 
contingency that the owner of the surface may not be well 
qualified either to ascertain the presence of minerals hidden 
some way below the surface, or to decide whether their 
extraction will be remunerativa Such provision may be 
made, in accordance with our principle, by retaining for 
members of the community generally the right of extract- 



ON PROPERTY 77 



ing mineralB from land which, for ordinary purposes, has 
been allowed to pass into private ownership; under con- 
dition of paying adequate compensation to the owner 
of the surface, and avoiding certain parts of his land 
where their operations would be likely to cause special 
inconvenience. 

The exact determination of the limits of private and 
common property in land is, as we have seen, a matter 
which has to be settled by the aid of special experience on a 
balance of conflicting considerations ; it has, in fact, varied 
very much in different ages and countries in which private 
property in moveables has been completely established. 
There are, however, important and extensive portions of the 
earth's surface which individuals have never been allowed 
to claim for their exclusive use, — their utility being clearly 
greater when they are not appropriated. Among these are 
the portions which are covered by the sea or by navigable 
rivers. But since the boundaries of these portions are not 
permanently fixed, but in many cases change continually — 
though, for the most part, very slowly — a question arises 
as to the ownership of the strips of dry land that are from 
time to time won from this watery region : and it may be 
instructive to consider briefly the general rules for deciding 
this, as illustrating the limits of Individualism firom a 
utilitarian point of view. If such accessions to terra firma 
take place by the mere action of natural forces, and cannot 
be materially aided by human labour, it is obvious that no 
individual can have a claim to them, and that the increment 
of value which the neighbouring lands receive through the 
change ought to belong to the community. So far, on 
the other hand, as the acquisition or maintenance of the 
new land requires labour, it is reasonable to let it become 
the property of those who are in the best position to apply 
the required labour, — that is, generally speaking, of the 
proprietors of the neighbouring land, — unless uniformity of 
action is on special grounds desirable, as may be the case 
with low land protected by dykes. 

§ 5. So far we have been considering the Right of 



78 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

property, according to the commonest conception of it, 849 
implying the right to exclusive enjoyment of the entire 
aggregate of utilities derivable from some portion of matter. 
Before leaving the subject we may observe that rights 
coming under the general head of property may be created by 
division into fragments, if I may so say, of the permanent 
right of exclusive use of some material thing. Such 
division may arise, in the first place, by mere limitation in 
time of the right of exclusive use ; which will, of course, 
involve a corresponding limitation of the right to alienate 
or bequeath, and a withdrawal of the right to destroy or to 
deteriorate, except so far as some degree of deterioration 
is involved in the normal use of the thing. In the case of 
moveables generally, this is the only division of utility 
which can, from the nature of the case, be conveniently 
introduced ; but in the case of land, certain special uses and 
advantages may be, and frequently are, secured separately 
to individuals who do not own the remainder: such as 
the right of hunting or fishing on the land of another, 
the right of pasturing cattle, of digging turf, etc. In the 
historic development of private property in land, such par- 
ticular rights of use may have come into being as relics of 
a general right to share the utilities of land not completely 
appropriated, secured by custom to the cultivators of the 
neighbourhood. But in the modem community that we 
are now contemplating as organised on the individualistic 
principle, such a separation of utilities would only arise by 
consent, except in the case of utilities which it is clearly 
to the advantage of the community to reserve to the public : 
such (e.^.) as rights-of-way. 

Another important class of rights of property, in which 
the objects appropriated are not material things, are those 
rights to non-imitation, by which the results of intellectual 
labour are protected ; whether these results are of the nature 
of technical invention, secured by patent, or literary pro- 
ducts secured by copyright As I have already said, though 
the legal interference with the actions of other men required 
to protect these rights is of a very peculiar kind, it seems a 



ON PROPERTY 79 



clear application of the individualistic principle ; so far as 
it is indispensable for giving the needed encouragement to 
industry, and is limited to results at which the persons pro- 
hibited from imitation could not possibly have arrived by 
independent effort. But in the case, at least, of patents, it 
is very difficult to prove this impossibility. " It is almost 
always within the limits of human probability that in pro- 
tecting a technical invention we may be preventing the use 
of a similar invention which might otherwise have been 
made by some one else ; indeed such coincidence of inven- 
tions may even be said to be positively probable, wherever 
several ingenious minds are simultaneously pondering over 
the best method of meeting some definite technical need." ^ 
Hence patents generally must, I think, be regarded as involv- 
ing some chance of encroachment on the opportunities of 
others, which must be supposed to increase as time goes on ; 
and this seems a valid argument, from an individualistic 
point of view, for limiting the duration of this kind of 
property. In the case, however, of literary products, this 
difficulty is to a great extent absent ; it arises only, if I 
may so say, on the margin of the right, in considering the 
exact degree of resemblance which ought to be held to con- 
stitute an inMngement of copyright. There can be no 
encroachment on the opportunities of others in a prohibi- 
tion to reprint Hamlet ; though it may be doubtful how 
far, if the copyright of Shakespeare's plays were in force, 
another treatment of the same plot ought to be interfered 
with. For this reason, any limitation of the duration of 
copyright to a period falling short of the author's life is 
not defensible on individualistic principlea Even the limita- 
tion actually established in our own and other systems of 
law, by which copyright ceases at a certain time after the 
author's death, requires a special utilitarian justification : ^ 
since the mere fsrct that the utility produced by a certain 
kind of labour cannot be adequately protected without 
legally prohibiting imitation, is not in itself a reason why 

^ Principles of Political Economy ^ book iii. chap. iv. sect. 6. ' 

' See chap. x. § 5. 



So ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

such utilities should be less completely or permanently at 
the disposal of the labourer. 

For completeness it should be noticed that there are 
other kinds of rights besides those discussed, which are 
commonly regarded as rights of property — and for ordinary 
purposes, rightly so regarded, as being both valuable and 
transferable, and so substantially equivalent to a certain 
amount of material wealth. Of these the most important 
class are rights to receive money, which belong to the 
class of rights arising out of contract, to be discussed in 
the next chapter. It may be noted further that we may 
even properly count as a part of a man's wealth a habit or 
tendency of action on the part of others which is advan- 
tageous to him, even though it is not in any way enforced 
by law, provided it is transferable : as («.^.) the so-called 
"good- will" of a business. The only political question 
of importance that arises with regard to this species of 
private wealth is how far Government can rightfully diminish 
or destroy it without compensation, by some action otherwise 
legitimate.^ 

§ 6. Hitherto I have been treating of things that have 
not yet been appropriated. Whatever has once become 
property usually continues in this condition, so long as it 
has any value ; being transferred, as we have seen, by sale 
or gift during life, or through inheritance at death. In 
exceptional cases, however, it may happen that what A has 
thrown away as useless may be thought useful by 6 ; if this 
is the case, it is obvious that B should be allowed to 
appropriate it. 

We have now completed our survey of the chief modes 
of legally acquiring rights of property, — apart from transfer 
by consent, and succession through bequest or intestate 
inheritance, with which the two following chapters will 
be concerned. But an important question still remains. 
Suppose a man is found dealing with a thing as his own 
without being able to prove that he has ever legally acquired 
property in it : what is to be his legal position ? When 

^ See chap. xii. 



ON PROPERTY 8i 



we consider the numerous ways in which evidence of legal 
title may accidentally fail, it becomes evident that, for the 
sake of peace and security, the actual possessor of anything 
must be recognised as having the rights of a proprietor, 
unless there is positive evidence to show that it legally 
belongs to some other person or has been wrongfully with- 
drawn from public use. And, for the sake of security, to 
free men from the apprehension of unknown claims at any 
time arising, it seems necessary to go further, and recognise 
the claim of ancient land fide possession, even against a title 
of a difierent kind, after a certain interval of time has 
elapsed during which no assertion of this other title has 
been put forward. This interval should be sufficiently 
long to leave ample time for the assertion of claims in 
ordinary cases, but not longer than is required for this 
purpose. 

So far I have supposed the possession to be hovd fide. 
Grenerally speaking, this condition should be strictly main- 
tained, since there is no sufficient reason for ever putting an 
end to the insecurity of a consciously wrongful holder of 
property : if such a person desires the peace of an honest 
man, he should confess and repair his wrong. Only some- 
times after revolutions or civil disorders even ill-gotten gains 
have to be guaranteed to the possessors, for fear lest a too 
widespread apprehension should lead to a renewal of the 
disorder. 

Note. — The difficult question whether a good title should ever be 
allowed to arise by transfer out of a bad one — as in the case of an innocent 
purchaser of stolen property — will be discussed subsequently under another 
head. 



G 



CHAPTEE VI 

CONTRACT 

§ 1. In a summary view of the civil order of society, as 
constituted in accordance with the individualistic ideal, 
performance of contract presents itself as the chief positive 
element, protection of life and property being the chief 
negative element Withdraw contract — suppose that no one 
can count upon the fulfilment of any engagement — and 
the members of a human community are atoms that cannot 
effectively combine ; the complex co-operation and division of 
employments that are the essential characteristics of modem 
industry cannot be introduced among such beings. Suppose 
contracts fireely made and effectively sanctioned, and the 
most elaborate social organisation becomes possible, at least 
in a society of such human beings as the individualistic 
theory contemplates — gifted with mature reason, and 
governed by enlightened self-interest. Of such beings it is 
prima fade plausible to say that, when once their respective 
relations to the surrounding material world have been 
determined so as to prevent mutual encroachment and secure 
to each the fruits of his industry, the remainder of their 
positive mutual rights and obligations ought to depend 
entirely on that coincidence of their free choices, which 
we call contract. Thoroughgoing individualists would 
even include the rights corresponding to governmental 
services, and the obligations to render services to 
(Government, which we shall have to consider later : 
only in this latter case the contract is tacit. According 




CHAP. VI CONTRACT 83 

to this view> an enlightened Englishman is a person who 

resists the 

*^ Temptations 
To belong to other nations/' 

because the Grovernment of his country gives him a fairly 
good bargain in the way of governmental services, includ- 
ing enjoyment of public property; in return for which 
advantages he has tacitly undertaken to pay the taxes that 
Parliament determines, serve on a jury if required, become 
a special constable if called upon in case of a riot, and 
otherwise render to Government such services as the law 
enjoins. This doctrine I do not now examine;^ I only 
refer to it to show the far-reaching importance of the notion 
of contract in the individualistic view of the organisation of 
society. 

What we have now to do is to discuss the chief condi- 
tions by which the legal enforcement of ordinary civil 
contract has to be restricted, in order that the function 
assigned to it in the individualistic ideal of society may be 
performed most effectively, and with least attendant mischiei 
But, before we proceed to this, we must notice an important 
ambiguity in the meaning of the term contract In its 
widest sense the (legal) term contract denotes any act in 
which "there is a concurrence of two or more wills in 
producing a modification of the legal rights of the par- 
ties concerned." * It includes, therefore, those transfers of 
property by consent which were mentioned in the preceding 
chapter ; which, of course, affect not only the mutual legal 
relations of the contracting individuals but also their relations 
to other members of the community. " Thus, if a man goes 
into a shop and buys a watch for ready money, a contract 
has taken place. The watchmaker and his customer have 
united in a concordant expression of will, and the result has 
affected once for jdl their legal rights." Previously to the 
transaction cdl other members of the community were legally 

^ See ohap. ziv. § 4. 

^ This quotation, and those which follow in this section, are taken from 
Professor Holland's Jurisj^rvdt'nMi chap. xii. 



84 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

bound to abstain from handling the watch without the 
watchmaker's consent, and to compensate the latter for any 
injury that might be caused to the watch through their 
negligence ; henceforward it is the customer whose consent is 
required, and to whom compensation will be due. In short, 
the agreement of these two persons has affected what jurists 
call their " rights in rem "; i.e. rights corresponding to obliga- 
tions imposed on other members of the community generally. 

But in its narrower and more usual sense the word 
contract denotes an agreement that only confers what 
jurists call a " right in personam " ; i,e. a right correspond- 
ing to an obligation imposed only on a particiQar individual. 
E.g. " Suppose that instead of the instantaneous sale of the 
watch, the agreement has been merely for its purchase at a 
future day ; " in this case there is a contract that does not 
transfer the ownership of the watch, but merely imposes 
on the watchmaker an obligation to sell the watch at the 
time and for the price agreed upon, and gives the customer 
a corresponding right, capable of being enforced against the 
watchmaker, but not directly affecting his legal relations 
with other persons. 

Now, from the point of view of formal jurisprudence 
the difference between the two kinds of agreements is 
doubtless fundamental But in a general discussion 
of the functions of government, the distinction appears 
to me to have only subordinate and secondary im- 
portance. We have already had occasion to notice that 
if rights in personam are valuable and transferable, they 
come to be regarded for practical purposes as a kind of 
property: under ordinary circumstances, my control over 
" money in the bank " being practically as complete as my 
control over money in my purse, I naturally think of the 
two "moneys" as property of the same kind though 
differently situated: it is indifferent to me that in the 
former case my legal right only consists in an obligation 
imposed on the banker to pay me coin or bank notes 
on demand, while in the latter case the world at large 
is under an obligation to refrain from meddling with 



VI CONTRACT 85 

my sovereigns. And, speaking more generally, we may 
say that, from our present point of view, the resemblances 
between (1) sale or other agreement by which jwopcr^y is 
transferred, and (2) an agreement giving the legal right 
to a future transfer of property or to some other service, 
are more important than the difiTerencea In the most 
important cases of either — and those to which our con- 
sideration may conveniently be limited in the first in- 
stance — there is a transfer of utility, from A to B, in 
view of a corresponding transfer of utility on the other 
side ; and not only axe the general grounds of expediency 
for giving legal force to such agreements mainly the same 
in both ca,ses, but the special conditions under which it is 
inexpedient to give them such validity are also to a 
considerable extent similar. 

It will therefore, I think, save trouble to direct attention 
first to the conditions of valid exchanges of utility which 
are in some degree common to the two cases: and then 
consider the conditions pecidiar, from the nature of the 
case, to agreements to which the term contract is more 
ordinarily limited, — Lt. in which the utility that one of 
the parties agrees to transfer is BLfutwre service. 

§ 2. With regard, then, to both kinds of agreements, 
it may be laid down as a general rule that legal validity 
shoiQd be given to all exchanges of utility (1) made 
between persons possessing at the time mature reason, if 
they have been made without (2) coercion, or (3) wilful or 
careless misrepresentation on either side; and (4) if the 
effects they were designed to produce involve no violation 
of law or damage to third parties or to the community at 
large. This rule is based on a general presumption that to 
carry into effect agreements made under these conditions 
will promote the interests of the parties agreeing, without 
causing mischief to others ; this presumption being an im- 
mediate deduction from the individualistic principle that a 
sane adult can on the whole be trusted to provide for his 
own happiness if secured from interference. But if any 
of these conditions is not fulfilled, the presiunption so 



86 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

fax fails, and there is a 'prima facie ground for inter- 
fering to prevent or modify the agreement, or allowing it to 
be invalidated in whole or in part ; so far as this can be 
done without disappointing the legitimate expectations of 
persons other than those who made the agreement. Let us 
examine more closely the different kinds of conditions 

The first condition, that the agreeing parties shoiQd be 
at the time in possession of mature reason, excludes — or at 
least sets aside for further consideration — the agreements of 
the three following classes of persons: (1) those who have 
not yet come to the full use of reason ; (2) those who have 
lost it for an indefinite period through disease ; and (3) those 
who have transiently lost it through intoxication, or some 
similar causa It does not follow that cdl such agreements 
should be incapable of being legally enforced : — e,g. there is 
a manifest expediency in the regulation that minors should 
be legally capable of making contracts of a kind clearly 
beneficial to them. But there is in all these cases prima 
facte need of some limitation of the general rule of enforcing 
agreements : since the intellectual condition of one of the 
parties concerned precludes any general presumption that 
the agreement will be for the advantage of both. 

Our second condition was that exchanges of utility, to 
be valid, should be made without coercion. Here the 
term " coercion " requires careful definition. So far as it 
merely means illegal coercion — i,e. etctual or threatened viola- 
tion by one party of the other's legal rights — the condition 
presents no difl&culty : it is manifestly inexpedient, generally 
speaking, that the law should supply inducements to illegal 
conduct by securing advantages to the law-breaker.^ But 
suppose that A induces B to enter into an agreement 
by threatening some act or omission which is not illegal 
or in itself immoral, but which will as a matter of fact be 
seriously annoying to B ; while it is not conducive to A's 

^ I do not know why — as is commonly said to be the case in English law — 
the '* duress" that renders a contract voidable is confined to '* actual or 
threatened violence or imprisonment"; and does not include the threat of 
irreparable injury to property. I can find no justification for this restriction. 
The role in the Indian Code is wider and more reasonable. 




VI CONTRACT 87 

interests otherwise than by enabling him to obtain B's 
consent to the agreement, and certainly would not have 
taken place except for A's desire to obtain this ; — ^is there an 
adequate reason for invalidating such agreements, or inter- 
fering to discourage them ? It is not easy to give a decided 
general answer to this question: on the one hand, it is 
obviously desirable to prevent pressure of this kind, so fSEtr 
as this can be done without causing mischief in other ways ; 
on the other hand, it seems difficiQt to prevent it in any 
complete way, without seriously interfering with the freedom 
of persons to declare intentions in themselves innocent.^ 

It is another question whether the law should inter- 
fere to prevent or discourage a contract in which A gains by 
the distress of B, even though A is in no way responsible for 
the distress nor legally bound to relieve it. Such a contract, in 
popiQar political discussion, is sometimes said not to be free ; 
but it seems clear that, on the individualistic principle, there 
is no ground whatever for interfering to prevent it, if it be 
granted that we have the ordinary reasons for assuming that 
it places B in a better position than he would have been 
apart from the contract. If A is not legally bound to help 
B merely because he is in distress, and if he is firee to con- 
tract or not as he likes, the law cannot consistently oblige 
him to make an exchange of utilities — if he makes one 
at all — more fevourable to B than he would make with- 
out legal interference : at any rate this cannot be defended 
on the ground that B is "not really free," in the sense 
in which individualistic legislation aims generally at secur- 
ing his freedom. How far any limit shoiQd be placed 
on B's power to bind his future actions under these cir- 
cumstances, is again a different question which we shall 
consider later.* 

^ The *' Undue influence " which renders a contract voidable, according to 
English law, seems in some cases to include pressure of this kind, at least 
according to the dicta of the Judges. But I am informed that these dicta go 
beyond the decided cases ; which do not support the general proposition that 
an agreement obtained by " pressure " is invalid, if by *' pressure " is meant an 
expressed intention of doing something lawful but injurious to the other party. 

' See § 5 of this chapter. 



88 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 3. Let us now examine the third of the conditions above 
mentioned : that there must be no wilful or negligent mis- 
representation of material facta We may begin by observing 
that — notwithstanding the general presumption above stated 
—experience continually shows us caaes in which an exchange 
of utility has actually been disadvantageous to one of the 
parties, owing to an erroneous idea of the value of the thing 
or service bargained for. The question then arises how far 
the law should interfere to prevent or repair this dis- 
advantaga Now it is obvious that if a seller's erroneous 
idea of the value of a purchased commodity, even when 
shared by the buyer, were broadly held to be a ground for 
treating the transfer as substantially invalid, the insecurity 
thus introduced into agreements would be so widespread as 
to be intolerable : no purchaser {t,g^ of a picture would ever 
know whether the exchange was really completed or not. 
The only question that raises any doubt is, whether A should 
not be bound to disclose all material facts known to himy 
which are such as would affect B's judgment if he knew 
them, supposing B to be a person of ordinary common sense. 
I think that our first impulse would certainly be to affirm 
that he ought: but reflection seems to show that if the 
knowledge was of a kind that it was equally open to B to 
acquire, it accords with our principle, that A should profit 
by his superior knowledge, and B bear the loss arising from 
his ignorance, — ^provided that his mistake is not caused by 
wilful or careless misrepresentation on A's part. And even 
when — as in ordinary cases of sale — the seller may be 
supposed to have superior knowledge of the qualities of 
the articles sold to the buyer : still it is prima fouyie in 
accordance with the principle of mutual non-interference 
that each should be left to ascertain unaided the adaptation 
to his own needs and desires of the thing or service that 
he transfers or receives in exchange. 

There are, however, certain kinds of exchanges, in which 
one of the parties is from the nature of the case generally 
placed at an obvious and marked disadvantage as compared 
with the other, in respect of his means of acquiring know- 



VI CONTRACT 89 

ledge upon the subject to which the agreement relates : in 
which, therefore, there is a special utilitarian argument for 
giving him legal security that the statements on the other 
side are not only true as fax as they go, but substanticdly 
complete. Contracts for the allotment of shares in com- 
panies afford a familiar example of this class.^ And there 
is a different class of cases in which concealment of material 
facts seems to be a reasonable ground for allowing an 
exchange to be invalidated: i,e. when the exchanging 
parties stand in a special relationship {e.g, solicitor and client, 
or ex-guardian and ex-ward), in which A would naturally 
suppose B to be advising him for his (A's) own good. Still, 
in either of these cases, the reason for invalidating the 
agreement seems hardly consistent with the fundamental 
individualistic assumption that government may safely leave 
a sane adult to take care of his own interests. 

Putting aside these special cases, we may say that the only 
adequate ground for invalidating an exchange of utility freely 
made between persons in possession of mature reason — if it 
turns out disadvantageous to one of the exchangers through 
his ignorance of material facts — ^is that this ignorance has 
been caused by the other party to the exchange in some 
active or positive manner, and not merely negatively through 
non-disclosure. Here, however, a further limitation seems 
necessary, to avoid a degree of interference that would do 
more harm than good. It seems inexpedient to lay down 
that every misleading statement made by one of the ex- 
changers, which has in any way contributed to induce the 
other to enter into an agreement disadvantageous to himself, 
is to invalidate the agreement or give a legal claim to 
reparation : to lay this down would hamper too much the 
general freedom of conversation between human beings, 
whenever there was a possibility that the conversation might 
iQtimately lead up to an agreement.^ So far, then, as innoc&nt 

^ In Roman Law the principle of ''caveat emptor" was overruled in 
respect of '' vitia latentia corporis,'* which the seller was bound to disclose. 

' Another important reason for this limitation is sugggsted by Sir W. 
Anson, who says (Law of Contract, Pt. ii. ch. iv. § 2) : " The process of com- 
ing to an agreement is generally surrounded by a fringe of statement and 



90 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

misrepresentation is concerned, it seems sufficient to provide 
that each party to an agreement should be responsible for 
the truth of any statement that substantially formed a part 
of the agreement, i.t. any statement upon the truth of which 
it was understood by both sides to be conditional. 

The case is different where there has been a demon- 
strable intention on one side to deceive the other : all kinds 
of acts prompted by such intention, if actual mischief to 
the person deceived follows, may reasonably be regarded as 
violations of the utilitarian principle of non-interference, 
and are prima facit proper subjects for legal repression. 
And it seems right to extend the notion of " deceptive acts," 
to include cases in which the act itself, that caused or con- 
tributed to the erroneous belief of the other party, was not 
designed to deceive, but in which the erroneous belief caused 
by it was known to the agent and allowed by him to remain 
uncorrected. 

§ 4. Finally, we laid down that the expediency of legally 
recognising the validity even of agreements apparently ad- 
vantageous to both the contracting parties was limited by 
the condition that the effects which the agreement was 
designed to produce involved (a) no violation of law, and (6) 
no cognisable damage to third parties or to the commimity 
at large. By the iSrst of these two conditions it is not 
merely meant that the execution of any promise legally 
enforced must not involve a violation of law — it would, of 
course, be absurd that an otherwise illegal act should become 
not only legally permissible but even legally obligatory, 
merely because the agent had expressly undertaken to per- 
form it. The more important part of my meaning referred 
to cases in which the promise which there is a question of 
enforcing, is not itself illegal, but in which the prospective 
illegal conduct of the other party to the contract constituted 
the whole or part of the inducement to make the promise : 
in such cases to give legal validity to the promise is obvi- 

discussion, and the Courts might find their time occupied in endless questions 
of fact if it were permitted to a man to repudiate his contract, or bring an 
action for the breach of it, upon the strength of words used in conversation 
preceding the agreement." 



VI CONTRACT 91 

ously objectionable, as affording indirect encouragement to 
the doing of illegal acts. In itself it is quite lawfiQ for me 
to give a ruffian a £5 note; but if, having promised to 
give him £5 if he would horsewhip my enemy, I were 
compelled by law to fulfil the promise, the law would be 
indirectly serving to increase the inducements to illegal 
horsewhipping. 

The ground for stating separately the second limitation 
(6) is not quite so easy to see. If, it may be said, there 
are any acts so mischievous that promises to perform them 
— and even contracts made in consideration of promises 
to perform them — ought not to be enforced, how 
comes it that such acts are not prohibited by law ? The 
answer to this question will perhaps be more easily given 
when I come to consider the different modes and degrees of 
governmental interference for the prevention of mischief, 
and the different drawbacks that attach respectively to these 
different modes and degrees. I shall there point out that 
the kind of governmental interference which consists in 
refusing to interfere — of which the refusal to recognise 
contracts is one species— is not open to some of the objec- 
tions that may be urged against interference by direct legal 
prohibitions and penalties actively enforced by law courts : 
there may, therefore, be a margin of conduct harmful to the 
community which may expediently be prevented by the 
former milder mode of interference, though it would do 
more harm than good to repress it by the latter more in- 
tense method. 

§ 5. In the last two paragraphs we have had chiefly in 
view contracts in the narrower and more usual sense of the 
term — i.e. agreements to perform future services. Let us 
now consider what further limitations of the validity of 
contract pecidiar to agreements of this kind are expedient. 

It is evident that if there are no such limitations, a 
man may exercise his freedom for its own destruction by 
contracting himself into slavery: and an individualistic 
system that allowed this would defeat its own fundamental 
aims. Still, the question is not free from perplexity. For 



92 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

any binding contract to be performed at a future date must 
diminish to some extent the contractor's freedom of action 
when the time arrives. How then, it may be asked, can a 
line be drawn ? If A may pledge himself to work for B 
for a year under conditions, why not for life unconditionally, 
if he judges this to be for his own interest. How can any 
limitation be justified except on the anti-individualistic 
assumption that the average man cannot estimate his own 
future interest as well as government can ? 

The answer is that the individualistic principle does not 
rest solely on the assumption of the actual superiority, 
generally speaking, of the individual's practical judgment 
where his own interests are concerned : it is based partly on 
a belief in the ediLcative value of freedom as developing 
foresight, and not only foresight, but the moral qualities of 
self-reliance and energy. Hence it is not on the whole 
opposed to individualism to treat as invalid any contract 
resigning the rights to personal liberty and security and 
the right to acquire and dispose of property : it merely 
implies that the general assumption that the individual can 
be trusted to look after his own interests has at a certain 
point to give way to the general assumption that freedom 
is good for him. 

It does not follow that there should be no enforcement 
of agreements to render personal services for an indefinite 
time.^ No doubt the performance of such a compact 
may become — through change of circumstances — indefinitely 
more inconvenient to the promiser than it is advantageous 
to the promisee. But this may easHj occur in the case of 
agreements for a definite, even for a comparatively brief, 
date : and the diflSculty may be met, consistently with our 
principle, in a more satisfactory way without imposing a 
limit of tima For, as has been before said, what is 
important from the point of view of utilitarian In- 
dividualism is, not so much that promises should be 

^ By the French law indefinite contracts of personal service are not 
allowed. See CJod. Civil, 1780: "On ne pent engager ses services q}i*k 
temps, ou pour une entreprise determin^e." 



VI CONTRACT 93 

strictly kept, as that the recipients of promises should not 
suffer from their breach. Hence, generally speaking, when 
the contract relates not to the transfer of property but to 
persoiuil services of any kind, it will suflace to exact from 
the promisee adequate compensation for breach of contract : 
so that practically the legal obligation arising out of such 
a contract will be merely the obligation to pay a sum of 
money if it proves inconvenient to fulfil the contract 

But a further limitation is needfiQ : since the pres- 
sure even of pecuniary liabilities that a man cannot hope 
to discharge may, from an economic point of view, be a 
serious approximation to the condition of slavery: as it 
must materially impair the stimulus which freedom gives 
to industry, if a man's debts are so great that all he can 
hope to gain by his labour is legally due to others. Hence 
in all modern systems of law there is an important limita- 
tion on obligations to pay money ; for all debts cease to 
be legally due from what we call "discharged bank- 
rupts" — i,t, persons who have proved their inability to 
pay and given up their property for division — however 
rich they may become after their bankruptcy. The 
utilitarian justification of this arrangement is, that the 
relief from debt thus given — ^while generally necessary to 
restore to a bankrupt the ordinary inducements to useful 
industry — involves no material sacrifice of the interests 
of creditors.; since, even if their claims were kept legally 
valid, they would stiU have no effective means of com- 
pelling the defaulting debtor to earn the funds required 
to satisfy them. The general force of this reasoning is 
undeniable; though on the other hand there seems to be 
no reason why the relief given to the bankrupt should be 
so complete as to remove all inducement to repair the mis- 
chief he has caused to others ; it seems therefore expedient 
that a bankrupt who has not paid his debts should remain 
in a position of marked social inferiority.^ 

^ I think (e.^.) that he should be deprived of all political franohise ; and 
that his legal immunity should depend on his name being kept in a register 
open to public inspection. . 



94 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

But, again, before the time has arrived to render the 
service agreed upon, it may have become impossible or 
illegal to render it On whom shoiQd the loss through 
this non-performance fall ? Let us first take the case of 
physical impossibility. Grenerally speaking, it woiQd seem 
that the person who undertakes to perform a service ought 
to ascertain before undertaking it whether it is in his power 
to perform it, just as the recipient ought to ascertain 
whether it is worth while to pay the price asked : using 
economic terms we may say that the pTomuer*s business 
is to know the conditions of supply, while the promisee's 
business is to know the conditions of demand. So that, 
if the subsequently manifest impossibility is one that might 
have been foreseen, the promiser shoiQd be held responsible 
for damage through non-performanca In many cases, how- 
ever, it is either implied in the language used, or may be 
assumed from the nature of the case, that it was the 
intention of both parties that the promiser should be only 
bound to perform if performance be possibla For instance, 
if a contract is made to render artistic services requiring 
special physical qualifications — such as singing — for a 
certain payment; just as it may be assumed on the side 
of the purchaser of the service that what he intends to 
bind himself to remunerate is not merely the performance 
of certain actions, but the production of certain aesthetic 
effects by means of them ; so, it may be assumed on the other 
side, that it is not intended that the artist should be con- 
sidered to have failed to perform the contract, if, at the time 
fixed, he is physically disqualified from producing the desired 
efiTects. Perhaps a similar limitation of intention may be 
assumed where the performance of a contract becomes 
illegal through change in the law. At any rate, it seems 
clear that the promiser cannot reasonably be expected to 
foresee such changes: it is burden enough in a modern 
civilised community to be legally assumed to know the law 
as it is : it would be intolerable if one also had to foresee 
what is going to be a year hence. If, however, A has 
paid money to B or performed a service, with a view to 



VI CONTRACT 95 

B's performance of a future service which, in the meantime, 
has become illegal through a change in the law, the money 
should be returned or the past service remunerated. 

§ 6. So far I have examined the conditions under which 
legad validity should be given to agreements in which both 
parties receive some utility. It will be evident that the 
limitations expedient in this case should also be applied — 
so far as they are applicable — ^to one-sided transfers of 
utility : but it may be questioned whether the legal en- 
forcement of agreements of this latter kind should not be 
still further limited ; since there is obviously not the same 
'prima, facie ground for considering the agreement advan- 
tageous to both parties. Still it would clearly interfere 
with freedom of action if A were not allowed to transfer 
property to B, merely because there was no commodity or 
" valuable consideration " received by him in return ; and it 
does not at first sight appear why he should not be com- 
pelled to render a service to which he has voluntarily bound 
himself under similar circumstances. There is, however, in 
our law, a provision that there must, generally speaking, be 
valuable consideration to make a promise enforceable, imless 
it is made with special formalities; and this provision 
seems to be approved by the most esteemed living writers 
on this branch of law. Apparently it is thought that 
persons should be able to bind themselves by gratuitous 
promises, but that some special solemnity should be re- 
quired (1) as a protection of the inconsiderate, and (2) as 
evidence of the fact that the promise was really made 
— ^''preappointed" evidence. The former argument is 
obviously an introduction of the " paternal " principle ; but 
there seems to me to be force in the latter, from our present 
point of view, owing to the greater difficulty, in the case 
of such one-sided promises, of distinguishing a statement of 
a benevolent intention, not intended as a pledge, from a pro- 
mise really understood as such on both sidea Still, on the 
individualistic principle, it seems clear that any adequate 
evidence of a one-sided promise ought to be accepted, and 
that it ought to be as valid as a contract in which an ex- 



96 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

change is made, — that is, if we are merely considering the 
claim arising out of such a promise as a single and separate 
claim. It is another question whether we should enforce a 
two-sided promise rather than a one-sided one, if we have 
to choose between the two; t,g. as against an insolvent 
estate, whether a gratuitous promise should be allowed to 
rank along with promises given for value. Here, I think, 
we should certainly decide in the negative on utilitarian 
grounds : it is much more important that men should rely 
on bargains than that they shoidd rely on one-sided promises 
— not to speak of the need of providing that persons prac- 
tically insolvent should not be able to create " friendly " 
creditors : on similar grounds it is necessary to invalidate 
even gifts of property made by persons who cannot pay 
their debts. 

§ 7. I proceed to notice a special operation of contract 
which is important as determining a modification of owner- 
ship. When we were examining the general desirability 
of securing to individuals the right of exclusive use of 
material things, the question might have been raised : 
Why appropriate to individuals ? Productive labour, under 
modern industrial conditions, is usually the labour of many 
co-operating. Why not allow appropriation to a group of 
persons ? And the answer clearly is that we ought to allow 
this, provided the group is so organised as to be capable of 
corporate action, — or at least that the property rights of 
members of the group are definitely determined so as to 
avoid conflict in management and enjoyment. But our 
principle obviously requires that the organisation of such a 
group should be determined by free contract among its 
members, — on the ground that men in general can deter- 
mine on what terms they can combine better than govern- 
ment can determine for them. Again, if such collective 
ownership is to be as useful as possible it must be allowed 
to carry with it the capacity of being the subject of rights 
arising out of contract ; and, obviously, the corporate body 
or "artificial person" who possesses these rights must 
equally be the subject of contractual obligations, and obliga- 



VI CONTRACT 97 

tions attaching to property. But a little reflection will 
show that obligations can only be to a limited extent trans- 
ferred to such an artificial person by the real persons com- 
posing it. It is evident that such persons cannot be allowed 
to diminish their general responsibility for the observance of 
the rights of others ; it would be absurd that by any com- 
pact among themselves they should be able to contract 
themselves out of prior legal obligations to other men ; there- 
fore, if any act is done in the name of an artificial person, 
by which such obligations are violated, all the persons con- 
cerned in doing or ordering the act must be held responsible 
as individuals 

The case is different with obligations arising out of con- 
tract: it is clearly in accordance with the individualistic 
principle that a group of persons should be allowed to con- 
tract on the basis of " limited liability," provided this is 
clearly understood by the other party to the contract, since 
the latter can always decline to enter into the contract if the 
security seems insufficient. In short, on the individualistic 
principle, the only legitimate end with which legal restraints 
can be imposed on the formation of corporations capable of 
holding property and making contracts is that of securing 
clear intimation of their formation to the rest of the com- 
munity, and clear distinction between their acts and the 
acts of the individuals composing them. Some part of our 
actual regulation of joint-stock companies is clearly designed 
to realise this end, and is therefore simply individualistic ; 
though other rules can only be interpreted as intended to 
protect the ordinary members of the company against the 
mischievous consequences of leaving too much to their 
directors.^ 

^ Such rules belong to the species of governmental interference, which I 
shall discuss in chap, viii., as "indirectly individualistic" or " paternal." 



CHAPTER VII 

INHERITANCE 

§ 1. The right of Bequest, and the title to property arising out 
of it, comes naturally to be considered after the rights arising 
out of contract Indeed, a bequest made and cux^pted under 
conditions may be regarded as a kind of contract between 
the dead and the living. It follows that bequests should 
only be treated as valid under limitations generally similar 
to those which we have minutely examined in the case of 
contract ; i,e, they must be liable to be invalidated, in whole 
or in part, by the absence of mature reason, or the presence 
of coercion or deception. It has to be observed, however, 
that where bequest operates some fresh legal intervention 
would be necessary even if there had been no bequest; 
since it would be manifestly opposed to the interest of the 
community that the wealth left by a dead man should be 
liable — like things thrown away during life — to become 
the property of the survivor who seized it first There 
must therefore be in any case a Law of Intestate Inherit- 
ance : and it might seem simpler to consider first the plan 
on which such a law should be constructed, before proceeding 
to discuss the conditions under which bequest should be 
allowed.^ But, on the whole, it seems to me better to adopt 
the opposite order ; since, when wills are allowed, any rules 
deviating widely from normal customs of bequest would be 
likely to cause painful disappointment of expectation : hence 

^ This is {e,g.) the order in which Bentham (Civil Code, Part ii. chapters iii. 
and iv.) deals with the two questions of " Wills " and "Intestate Succession." 



CHAP. VII INHERITANCE 99 

the regulation of intestate succession will reasonably be 
determined to some extent on different grounds, according 
to the nature of the restrictions placed on the right of 
bequest 

To many Englishmen at the present day the right not 
only of distribtUing one's wealth after death, but of order- 
ing the details of its use for all time, seems to De. naturally 
and almost necessarily included in the Eight of Property, — 
that is, unless the wealth has been given or bequeathed 
to the owner under special limiting conditions. In fact, 
however, the right of free bequest is of comparatively late 
growth in the development of society. As Maine has pointed 
out,^ " in all indigenous societies a condition of jurisprudence, 
in which testamentary privileges are not contemplated," 
precedes that in which free testation is permitted; and 
even in mediaeval law we find that liberty of bequest 
was at first closely limited by the rights of the testator's 
widow and children. The power of diverting the whole 
of a man's property from the family, or of distributing 
it quite capriciously, is not older than the later portion 
of the Middle Ages. "When modem jurisprudence first 
shows itself in the rough,"* wills are rarely allowed to 
interfere with the right of the widow to a definite share, 
and of the children to certain fixed proportions, of the 
common inheritanca And similar restrictions are actually 
maintained in the French Civil Code and several other legal 
systems ; partly owing to the remarkable persistence of the 
older view of family right — ^when so much of less ancient 
origin was swept away in the revolutionary era — ^but partly, 
no doubt, from the desire to prevent the inequalities result- 
ing from primogeniture. 

I have allowed myself this brief historical digression, 
because it is almost required to explain the peculiar position 
which this point in the individualistic scheme occupies at 
the present day. 

Freedom of Bequest, on the one hand, hcu3 not completely 
emancipated itself from the old traditional restraints in the 

^ Ancient LatOf p. 177. * Z. c p. 224. 



lOO ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

interest of the family ; and, on the other hand, it is assailed 
by new limitations, proposed in the interest of the com- 
munity. Now we have before seen that Bequest occupies 
a somewhat different position from other rights included in 
our common conception of the Right of Property, when the 
question of allowing it is treated on purely individualistic 
principles : since the consideration of it seems prima facie 
to lead us to an '' antinomy " — a pair of irresistible argu- 
ments on opposite sides of the question.^ From a utilitarian 
point of view, indeed, the encouragement that the right of 
bequest gives to industry and thrift seemed to be a decisive 
consideration in favour of allowing it. This consideration, 
however, though decisive in favour of some freedom of 
bequest, does not clearly negative the imposition of greater 
restrictions on bequests than we think it expedient to impose 
on a man's power of transferring property during his life. 
An individualist, therefore, may admit such restrictions, 
in the interest either of the testator's family or of the 
community, without a palpable abandonment of his fimda- 
mental principla 

§ 2. Let us then consider first restrictions in the interest 
of the family, as being the older : and, for the sake of de- 
finiteness, let us suppose such a plan of restriction as that 
adopted in the French code. Suppose that a man's pro- 
perty, if he has three or fewer children, is ideally divided 
into equal shares exceeding by one the nimiber of his 
children, only one of which he is free to bequeath away 
from them : while, if he has more than three children, he is 
free to bequeath away from them one-fourth of his property, 
but no more ; as regards the rest, he cannot deprive any 
child of its equal share, except for special causes judicially 
proved. 

The objection to such a measure seems to be that, 
granting it to be desirable that a man's property in a general 
way should go to his children, the testator evidently 
has special means of ascertaining his children's wants and 
deserts ; so that any variations from equality of distribution 

^ See p. 58. 



VII INHERITANCE loi 

which he may be induced to make, if free bequest is allowed, 
are likely on the whole to correspond to variations either in 
their wants or their deserts. On the other side it is urged 
that the disinheriting of children is liable to give a painful 
and undeserved shock to reasonable expectations: and no 
doubt cruel disappointments may thus be caused. But 
similar mischief may be done in other cases by the tacit 
encouragement, without any definite and provable promise, 
of expectations of gift, bequest, or other aid : and in such 
cases it is generally recognised that the repression of wrong 
must be left to morality, since law can only protect expecta- 
tions arising out of definite and demonstrable engagements. 
And if it be thought that in the present case some special 
legal interference is needed, owing to the strong support 
that common opinion gives to the expectations of children 
to inherit their parents' wealth, it would be easy to prevent 
the shock of disappointment by requiring a parent who 
wished to retain his freedom of bequest to notify this to his 
children before they attained a certain aga The real issue 
therefore is not whether the disappointment of expectations 
of inheritance should be prevented, but whether the law 
should intervene to create such expectations. I know no 
adequate justification for such interference, so far as it 
provides that a number of human beings, after being 
properly educated, shall not have to depend on their own 
exertions for subsistence : but it is expedient to secure to 
all children support and proper training until they can 
provide for themselves, and it appears to me to be in 
harmony with the individualistic principle to limit the 
power of bequest so far as is necessary to secure this result 
§ 3. So far I have considered the bequest simply as 
having the effect of dividing the property among children ' 
— or other persons — who receive it in complete ownership. 
Suppose, however, that a child or grandchild is an infant 
at the parents' death ; it is obvious that the property must 
be given to some one to hold in trust for it We thus 
introduce the notion oifidudary as distinct from "beneficiary 
ownership ; in which the management of property is sepa- 



I02 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

rated from the enjoyment of it. The necessity for such 
trusts in the case of young children is manifest ; but when 
we consider the expediency of allowing fiduciary ownership 
to be extended beyond what is required for this purpose — 
as («-^) by permitting parents to pass over children and 
bequeath property to be held in trust for descendants yet 
unborn — the conclusion, from our present point of view, is 
more doubtful On the one hand — besides the general 
argument for freedom of bequest — there would in some 
cases be a difficulty in arranging the succession to property 
in accordance with the testator's view of the needs and 
deserts of his descendants, unless such remote trusts were 
allowed. On the other hand, fiduciary ownership involves 
the drawback that a trustee cannot be expected to be as 
much interested in the management of property as an 
ordinary owner would be : while, if he is controlled by con- 
ditions imposed by the testator, there is the further objection 
that the testator's foresight of the future is limited, so that 
after his death an arrangement manifestly imdesirable may 
be legally unalterable. This latter objection applies with 
especial force to property left to public objects: if the 
testator's design is carried out it may become worse than 
useless, owing to change of circimistances, even when it was 
originally well conceived. 

Similar questions arise as to the expediency of allowing 
ownership that is not fiduciary, but limited in time or 
restricted by conditions, to be created by bequests, — or by 
any legal act that continues to take efTect after the death 
of the person imposing the limitations or conditions. E.g, 
when a man thus becomes an owner of land for life only, he 
is likely not to have sufficient inducement to apply capital 
in improving the land ; and the inalienability necessarily 
involved in such life-ownership may keep the land in the 
hands of a person who has neither skill nor capital to deal 
with it in the best way. 

These and similar difficulties are only particular cases of 
the general theoretical difficulty that besets the individual- 
istic system — even when interpreted in a completely utili- 



vii INHERITANCE 103 

tarian sense — if it is taken to include freedom of bequest. 
Granting that men in general will extract most satisfaction 
out of their wealth for themselves, if they are allowed to 
choose freely the manner of spending it, it obviously does 
not follow that they will render it most productive of 
utility for those who are to come after them if they are 
aUowed to bequeath it under any conditions that they 
choose. On the contrary, it rather follows from the funda- 
mental assumption of individualism that any such pos- 
thumous restraint on the use of bequeathed wealth will tend 
to make it less useful to the living, as it will interfere with 
their freedom in dealing with it. Individualism, in short, 
is in a dilemma. The free play of self-interest can only be 
supposed to lead to a generally advantageous employment 
of wealth in old age, if we assume that the old are keenly 
interested in the utilities that their wealth may furnish to 
those who succeed them : but if they have this keen in- 
terest they will probably wish to regulate the future em- 
ployment of their wealth ; while, again, in proportion as 
they attempt this regulation by testament, they will 
diminish the freedom of their successors in dealing with 
the wealth that they bequeath ; and therefore, according to 
the fundamental assumption of individualism, will tend to 
diminish the utility of this wealth to those successors. Of 
this difficulty there is, I think, no general theoretical solu- 
tion : it can only be reduced by some practical compromise. 
Thus the creation of fiduciary ownership for the benefit of 
young children may be limited by requiring the children to 
be living when the bequest takes effect, or born within a 
certain period after that date. Again, the general dis- 
advantages of fiduciary management, and of management by 
a limited owner — ^which have been specially noted in the 
C£ise of land — may be minimised by securing to the trustee 
or life-owner an inalienable right of selling the land or 
other property, provided he invests the proceeds of the sale 
in securities of a certain class.^ Finally, in the case of 

^ The disadvantage of fiduciary ownership is obviously not great, if the 
function of the trustee is confined to that of receiving the income of " safe " 



104 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

trusts for public uses — usually of a permanent kind — it 
is desirable that the government should have a general 
-power and duty of invalidating useless or mischievous be- 
quests ; and of revising and modifying the employment of 
the funds bequeathed, after a certain interval of time or 
after any important change of circumstances. 

§ 4. The restrictions on free bequest, which the discussion 
in the preceding section has led me to propose, are such as 
English legislation has long recognised as expedient. But 
limitations of a much more sweeping kind have often been 
recommended by thinkers who would have shrunk from 
interference with any other of the rights commonly included 
in our conception of the right of property; and, in par- 
ticular, by the influential utilitarian writers on whose work 
the present treatise is chiefly based. In 1793-5, Bentham 
proposed — in connection with an " extension of the law of 
escheat," of which I will presently speak — that, in case of 
failure of near relations, the power of bequest should only 
extend to half the testator's property.^ Half a century later 
J. S. Mill ^ stated that were ' he " framing a code of laws 
according to what seems best in itself," he would." prefer to 
restrict not what any one might bequeath, but 'What any 
one should be permitted to acquire, by bequest or inherit- 
ance. Each person should have power to dispose by will 
of his or her whole property ; but not to lavish it in en- 
riching some one individual" — even a near relation — 
"beyond a certain maximum, which should be fixed 
sufficiently high to afford the means of comfortable inde- 
pendence." It appears to me, however, that any interfer- 
ence with free bequest, so serious as that contemplated in 

investments that do not practically require looking after, and investing any 
annual surplus in similar securities. If, indeed, a very large portion of the 
capital of the country were in this condition, the industrial progress of society 
might be hampered by the difficulty of finding capital for new undertakings : — 
but this danger is hardly within the range of practical politics. 

^ It ought to be said that in the TraiUs de Lccfislation^ published by 
Dumont in 1802, from Bentham's MSS., this restriction is only suggested 
in a doubtful and hesitating manner. — See Principes de Code Civile, Part ii. 
ch. iv. 

' Political Ecanamy, Book ii. ch. ii. § 4. 



VII INHERITANCE 105 

either of these proposals, would dangerously diminish the 
motives to industry, and — what is here, perhaps, more 
important — thrift, in the latter part of the lives of the 
persons who came under the restrictions Moreover, any 
interference running strongly counter to the natural inclina- 
tions of such persons would be likely to be extensively 
evaded by donation before death.^ Probably aU that can 
be safely attempted in the way of limiting bequests in the 
interest of the community-beyond the regulations proposed 
in the preceding paragraph— is a tax on inheritance, con- 
siderably increased when bequests are received by others 
than near relations. 

§ 5. I now pass to consider how intestate succession is to 
be regulated. I have before pointed out that the question of 
intestate succession vnll tend to be determined in different 
ways, according to differences in the legal rules and normal 
habits of bequest ; since, where wills are allowed, rules of 
intestate succession deviating widely from the ordinary habits 
and customs of bequest would be likely to cause painful 
disappointment. Hence, assuming freedom of bequest, we 
have two distinct principles for determining the law of intes- 
tate succession ; we may either keep as dose as possible to the 
general customs of bequest, or may be guided by considera- 
tions of general expediency. But general expediency can, 
I conceive, lead to no sdection of heirs outside the circle of 
those for whom the deceased was either morally bound or 
naturally disposed to provide. The question, therefore, can 
only be between distribution within a defined circle and 
appropriation by the community. 

By the nature of the case this question cannot receive 
a perfectly definite answer, except in relation to the actual 
state of opinion and custom in a particular age and country. 
But we may say generally that any gain thus obtainable 
by the community would be purchased at too great a cost 
if it involved bitter disappointment to individuals, of a kind 

^ This is admitted by Mill, who consequently thought that '* the laws of 
inheritance have probably several phases of improvement to go through before 
ideas so far removed from present modes of thinking will be taken into serious 
consideration." — Pol, Eeon, Book v. ch. ix. § 1. 



io6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

calculated to excite universal sympathy ; — as would be the 
case if a man's children or grandchildren lost their inherit- 
ance through his accidental intestacy. I do not, however, 
think that this result would follow in England from the 
adoption of Bentham's scheme for distributing intestate 
inheritance.^ The chief points in this are : — 

(1) That half the common property shall go to a 

widow after her husband's death,* and the rest be 
divided among his descendants, if any ; and that, 
on the decease of a widow, her property shall be 
similarly divided among her descendants. 

(2) That there shall be equal division " by stocks " and 

not by heads ; i,t, that if a child dies before his 
father, leaving children, his share shall be divided 
among his children in equal proportions ; and so of 
all descendants. 

(3) That if a person has no descendants, his property 

shall go to his parents; or, if either parent is 
dead, to his or her descendants. 

(4) That, in default of near relations — as defined by (3) 

— it shall escheat to the State. 

Here the exclusion of primogeniture and of the rights of 
cousins and grandparents, involved in recommendations (2) 
and (4), are to be noted as markedly opposed to existing 
English law. On both these points J. S. Mill is in sub- 
stantial agreement with Bentham; only he would press 
the principle of (4) still further, holding that " no rights 
should be acknowledged in collaterals, and that the property 
of those who have neither ascendants or descendants should 
escheat to the State." ® It seems to me that, on account of 

^ See Principles of the Civil Code, Part ii. ch. iii. 

^ Bentham assumes that while the enjoyment of the property of married 
pairs should be in common, the legal ownership of such property should be 
vested in the husband. 

' If all prejudices could be put aside, Mill would like to reduce the share 
of descendants, in the case of intestacy, to a '^just and reasonable provision ; 
that is, such a provision as the parent or ancestor ought to have made ; their 



VII INHERITANCE 107 

the relations of affection that normally attach any person 
to the other descendants of his parents. Mill's proposed rule 
would, in cases of accidental intestacy, cause painful dis- 
appointment to natural expectations. But I think that the 
actual expectations of remoter relatives are mainly created 
by the law ; and that, if the law were altered, they would 
not exist, under ordinary circumstances, to any extent 
worth considering. I think, therefore, that the exclusion of 
collaterals in case of intestacy — in the milder degree pro- 
posed by Bentham — would furnish a legitimate source of 
revenue to the community, it being understood that any 
hardship that might arise from it in special cases, in which 
the declared and unrevoked intention of a deceased person 
had been prevented from realisation by sudden death, might 
be recognised and remedied by the grant of a share of the 
inheritanca 

As regards the principle of distribution within the 
intestate's family circle, it would seem that Bentham's 
proposal of equal division, by stocks and not by heads, is 
more in harmony with ordinary domestic sentiment, and 
the expectations arising out of ordinary customs of bequest, 
— and also more in accordance with the individualistic prin- 
ciple ^ — than any other rule which could be conveniently 
laid down. 

Equal division of an intestate's property might no doubt 
cause some disagreeable shock to expectation in England, 
in the case of large landed estates which are customarily 
settled on the eldest living descendant of the eldest line. 
On the other hand, similar disappointment — causing prob- 
ably more distress — is now liable to be given to small 
owners of land and houses, who have never intended in- 
equality of division ; and this latter class of persons would 
appear to need the care of the legislator more than the 

circumstances, capacities, and mode of bringing up being considered." But 
he recognises that this suggestion is not within the range of practical politics. 
See Political Economy ^ Book v. ch. ix. § 1. 

^ Equal division by heads obviously tends less than equal division by 
stocks to maintain the individual's responsibility of providing for the 
children he brings into the world. 



io8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, vii 



former, as the richer landowners may be more safely pre- 
sumed to know the actual state of the law at any time, and 
therefore to guard against the effects of intestacy, if they 
dislike them.^ It would seem, therefore, that the balance 
of argument is against maintaining primogeniture by law, if 
we consider merely natural expectations, and leave general 
expediency out of account ; and it does not appear that the 
general expediency of primogeniture has ever been supported, 
or could be supported, by argimients that individualists 
oould approve. It is chiefly defended on the ground that 
large landowners are more likely than small ones to manage 
their relations with tenants and labourers on other than 
strictly economic principles; but, from an individuaUstic 
point of view, this can hardly be regarded as a result at 
which the law ought to aim.« 

^ I suppose that the persons who have land to leave by will, and who wish 
to " make an eldest son/* are an insignificantly small minority ; since eldest 
sons are usually made by settlement imJUr vivos, 

' In this part of my treatise I am primarily concerned with the individual- 
istic system. But — as I shaU not have occasion to refer to the present topic 
again — I may add that (apart from expectations arising out of custom) I do 
not know any arguments worthy of serious consideration, from a socialistic 
point of view, in favour of the right of primogeniture. 



CHAPTEE VIII 

BEMEDIES FOR WRONGS 

§ 1. We have now surveyed in outline the rights which, on 
the individualistic principle, should be secured by law to 
private members of the community, so fer as they corre- 
spond to obligations imposed upon other private individuals. 
The main positive obligations, as we have seen, are (1) the 
duty to perform such engagements as have been deliberately 
made without constraint or culpable misrepresentation ; and 
(2) the duty of parents to support and train children. The 
other obligations are chiefly negative — to abstain from per- 
sonal constraint and from acts causing physical injury or 
serious discomfort to others; from interference with the 
exclusive use of certain portions of matter, and certain 
results of intellectual labour ; and from certain sources of 
mental annoyance, especially defamation, and deception that 
results in mischief; also from interference with the rights 
involved in the institution of the family. 

We have now to consider how the fulfilment of these 
obligations is to be secured, and how the mischiefis arising 
out of their non-fulfilment are to be remedied. We must 
bear in mind that, on the individualistic principle, strictly 
interpreted, Grovemment is not concerned with the pre- 
vention or reparation of mischief, except so far as it is due, 
directly or indirectly, to the action of other men. It may 
be that, at a particular time and place, the forces of external 
nature — irruptions of floods or wild beasts, or flights of 
destructive insects — are more formidable sources of mischief 
than the malice or carelessness of men, and that complex 



no ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and carefully-arranged co-operation is required to guard 
against the evils which they tend to produca But, accord- 
ing to the individualistic principle, it may be doubted 
whether this co-operation should be compulsory ; whether 
any one should be compelled to join in protecting others 
from harm which he has not himself in some way positively 
contributed to cause, either by his own acts or by voluntary 
acceptance of the responsibilities resulting from other men's 
acts, — as for instance, by becoming owner of dangerous 
instruments, animate or inanimate. I shall hereafter^ 
argue that where the need of such organised co-operation 
is clear and urgent, the application of the individual- 
istic principle may legitimately be extended to include its 
enforcement ; but, at present, it seems best to confine our 
attention to governmental interference designed to prevent 
or remedy mischief manifestly caused by human action. 

In considering this interference, we are met with a 
distinction commonly taken as fundamental between the two 
main functions into which the administration of law is 
divided, according to popular conception and received legal 
theory, viz. (1) the enforcement of damages due to the 
wronged individual ; and (2) the infliction of pimishment 
in the name of the community. According to my view, this 
distinction — though very important — is not so fundamental 
as it is commonly conceived to be : because I hold that both 
in determining when damages are due, and when punish- 
ments should be inflicted, for past mischief, the prevention 
of future mischief ought generally to be a paramount con- 
sideration. In order to justify this view, it will be well to 
begin by considering the meaning and extent of the distinc- 
tion, as commonly conceived; and the diflferent kinds of wrongs, 
or the different characteristics of wrongs, to which damages 
and punishment are respectively thought to be appropriate. 

The popular view may be briefly expressed by saying 
that punishments are retributive^ and damages merely 

^ See p. 133. 

' I do not mean that the popular conception of punishment does not also 
include the prevention of crime by terror : but the notion of retribution is 
most prominent. 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS iii 

reparative. Punishments are thought to be the proper 
requital for acts that are not only harmful to others but 
immoral and blameworthy; whereas, in the case of such 
violations of rights as are not held morally blameworthy, — 
because they are either unintentional or may feirly be 
supposed to have been committed by persons who believed 
they had justice on their side, — all that is thought to be 
generally necessary is that the injury shall be repaired or 
compensated ; that the person injured shall be restored to 
the condition in which he stood before the injurious action, 
or placed in a condition equivalent in respect of advantages. 
This distinction between retribution and reparation is, I 
think, clearly found in the common moral consciousness of 
the most advanced modem societies 

It should, indeed, be noted that at an earlier stage 
of social and intellectual development this distinction 
is obscure, or but faintly perceptible ; the penal loss of an 
" eye for an eye," or of a " tooth for a tooth," was commonly 
regarded as a kind of reparation to the person originally 
maimed.^ And even at the present day in England, some 
writers, influenced by Bentham, speak of the "vindictive 
satisfaction" that punishment gives to the individual 
injured, as an important element of its utility. Thus 
Sir J. Fitzjames Stephen says that "the benefits which 
criminal law produces are twofold. In the first place, it 
prevents crime by terror ; in the second place, it regulates, 
sanctions, and provides a legitimate satisfaction for the 
passion of revenge ; the criminal law stands to the passion 
of revenge in much the same relation as marriage to the 
sexual appetite."^ I think, however, that this statement 
goes further in legitimating the passion of revenge than the 
common moral sense of the present age and country can 
follow. I admit that this impulse gives valuable aid to 

^ It may be noticed — as an interesting point in the history of moral 
thought and feeling — that in Aristotle's conception of "corrective justice " 
(Ethics f Book v.), the notions of retribution and reparation appear to be 
completely blended. 

' Oeneral View of the Criminal LatOf chap. iv. 



1 1 2 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the effective administration of criminal justice among 
human beings as actually constituted; and that if we 
could suppress the passion of revenge without effecting any 
other change in the moral nature of average men, we 
should do more harm than good. Nor, again, do I deny 
that the moral or quasi -moral demand for retribution 
on a wrongdoer, as felt not by the person primarily 
wronged but by other members of the community 
in which the wrong has been done, is a sentiment that 
may be traced back to the desire of personal revenge 
as one, at least, of the roots out of which it spring&^ 
But I hold that the two impulses have now become com- 
pletely distinct; though we now commonly think that 
morality requires that a crime should be punished, we yet 
think that the satisfaction which the person injured derives 
from this punishment has a certain taint of immorality. 
If it is asking too much of human nature to prescribe 
a rigid exclusion of such malevolent pleasure, at any rate 
we think that it ought not to be cherished and dwelt upon, 
and made a conscious object of pursuit. 

We may take it, then, that Eetribution on the wrongdoer, 
as demanded by the common sentiment of justice in civilised 
mankind, here and now, is altogether distinct from the Se- 
paration which the same sense of justice also recognises as 
due to the person wronged. But when the two notions are 
separated, it must be plain that the popular view which 
regards such retribution as an end in itself, independently 
of its useful consequences in preventing future mischief, is 
strictly incompatible with the fundamental principle of 
Utilitarianism, assumed throughout the present discussion. 
From a utilitarian point of view, the pain caused by punish- 

^ J. S. Mill says {Viiliiarianifm^ chap, v.) : '^The sentiment of justice 
appears to me to be the animal desire to repel or retaliate a hurt or damage 
to one's self, or to those with whom one sympathises, widened so as to 
include aU persons, by the human capacity of enlarged sympathy and the 
human conception of intelligent self-interest. From the latter elements 
the feeling derives its morality." Provided that this is taken as an account 
of the afUecederUs rather than the eUmenis of the sentiment in question, I 
am disposed to agree with it. 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 113 

ment to the person punished is of course to be regarded as 
an evil, only admissible in order to prevent worse eviL 

No doubt the impulse to inflict harm, in the name of 
justice, on persons who have intentionally done mischief, is 
a practically useful element of the general moral disappro- 
bation caused by such acts, and a most powerful auxiliary 
to the legal punishment by which government seeks to re- 
press crimes. As Sir J. Stephen forcibly says: "Some 
men, probably, abstain from murder because they fear that 
if they committed murder they would be hung. Hundreds 
of thousands abstain from it because they regard it with 
horror. One great reason why they regard it with horror 
is, that murderers are hung with the hearty approbation of 
all reasonable men. Men are so constituted that the energy 
of their moral sentiments is greatly increased by the fact 
that they are embodied in a concrete form. ... It is this 
secondary effect of criminal law which makes it important 
that law and morals should harmonise as far as possible, so 
that the one shall gratify the sentiments which the other 
excites." But while this harmony between the moral and 
the legal repression of wrongs is a most important advan- 
tage, which the legislature should always keep in view, it is 
none the less necessary to recognise that it cannot be com- 
pletely attained. Mischievous acts, requiring severe repres- 
sion on the part of government, are continually done, not 
merely from amiable motives but with excellent intentions. 
The sincerest religion, the most ardent patriotism, have 
occasionally prompted men to homicide of the most danger- 
ous kind ; and probably not a few well-intentioned persons 
have at various times thought with Grodwin,^ that "if I 
have had particular opportunity to observe any man's vices 
. . . there may be very sufl&cient grounds for my repre- 
senting him as a vicious man " in order to " warn those 
whom his errors might injure," even though " I may be 
wholly unable to demonstrate his vices ; " and have thus 
from mere virtuous indignation and philanthropy incurred 
the legal punishment of libel. In such cases, though there 

^ Political JtLsticCf Book vi. chap. vi. 

I 



1 14 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

may be a general sense that punishment is necessary, it is 
not demanded as a proper retribution on the ill-desert of 
the agent. Hence we cannot define the species of wrongs 
which ought to be repressed by punishment as wrongs 
inflicted with an immoral intention; since, though this 
characteristic is present in the great majority of acts that 
ought to be pimished, it is clearly not present in all. 

I conclude, then, that from a political point of view, 
it is evidently necessary to take as the primary end of 
punishment the prevention of mischief and not the retribu- 
tion of wickedness: and to decide on this principle any 
doubtful questions as to the allotment of punishments. 

§ 2. Let us now turn to consider cases where, in the 
common view, what is judicially enforced is compensation 
to the individual wronged, and not pimishment on the 
wrongdoer. Here, too, we shall find that, though repara- 
tion is undoubtedly a part of the aim of law, the prevention 
of future mischief is also an important consideration : — 
and, generally speaking, the most decisive consideration in 
determining doubtful points. 

Let us first observe that blameworthiness, in some degree, 
is normally characteristic of mischief for which reparation 
ought to be legally enforced as well as of that for which 
punishment is inflicted as punishment. This is not, per- 
haps, clear at first sight ; it may be thought that the need 
of reparation arises from the mere fact that mischief, such 
as law aims at preventing, has been inflicted by A on B, 
without any consideration of the blameworthiness of A : 
that if A has caused, even quite accidentally, mischief or 
loss which must ultimately fall on somebody, it is more 
reasonable that the burden of the loss should be borne by 
A, who did, in a physical sense, act, than by B, who is 
innocent of any action whatever. But reflection will, I 
think, show that, from a utilitarian point of view, it would 
be wrong to hold men responsible for all results to which 
they physically contributed, however impossible it may 
have been to foresee such results. It is fundamentally 
important for the general happiness of any society that its 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 115 

members should be acting strenuously and energetically in 
some way or other: and it would too seriously interfere 
with this to lay down the broad rule " that every man acts 
at his peril," and is responsible for any mischief that may 
result. I hold, therefore, that damages for unintentional 
mischief should only be legally enforced, as a general rule, 
when the man who has physically caused the mischief has 
not taken due and proper care : i.e. has not taken such care 
as would be taken by an ordinary person desirous of avoid- 
ing injury to others, as completely as this can be done 
without serious interference with his normal functions, — 
imless his normal industry is of a dangerous kind, 
in which case special care may reasonably be required. 
The line, of course, is a difl&cult one to draw exactly: 
it must to a great extent be left to be decided by 
common sense and experience applied to particular cir- 
cumstances. As wiU be seen from the language that I 
have just used, I by no means assume that in every case 
where a man is rightly held legally responsible for the 
consequences of his act, there must have been something 
morally blameworthy in the state of mind that preceded the 
act in question. As Mr. Holmes says : " The law considers 
what would be blameworthy in the average man, the man of 
ordinary intelligence and prudence, and determines liability 
by that : if a man is bom hasty and awkward ... his 
neighbours require him at his proper peril to come up to 
their standard."^ But it remains true that, so far as 
responsibility be thus determined, the object of the law 
in enforcing damages is not merely reparative, but partly 
also preventive ; it aims at maintaining a certain average 
standard of carefulness by providing that those who fall 
short of this standard shall act at their peril. 

In laying down as a general principle that reparation 
should only be due where there has been at least negligence, 
if not culpable intention, I do not mean to affirm that there 
may not be important exceptions. We cannot even say 
that every act known by the agent to be mischievous, and 

^ Holmes on the Common Law, chap. ii. 



Ii6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

for which reparation should be exacted, is an act from 
which the agent ought to have abstained ; since in excep- 
tional circumstances it may sometimes be right to choose 
such an act as the lesser of two evila Again, where 
protection from a particular kind of mischief is of great 
importance, and where it is specially diflScult to prove mis- 
chievous intention or neglect of others' rights on the part 
of persons who contribute in a secondary way to the mis- 
chief, it may be on the whole best to make the burden fall 
on these contributories, though innocent not only of 
harmful intention, but even of negligence. This is 
perhaps the case where damage has been innocently done 
to the property of another by a man who had good reason 
for regarding it as his own. Suppose («.^.) that a man 
has innocently purchased stolen goods, under circumstances 
which gave no occasion whatever for suspicion. It seems 
hard that he should have to compensate for any damage 
done to the goods : but considering the great importance of 
protecting property, the great difficulty of tracing it when 
stolen, the ease with which trade in stolen goods may be 
carried on undetected, it is perhaps needful, for adequate 
repression of this trade, and adequate determent to possible 
purchasers of other men's goods, to adopt the broad principle 
that no seller can give a better title than he has got : so that 
not only restoration of such goods, but also reparation for 
any damage done to them, will be due to the rightful owner 
from the most innocent and diligent purchaser. And other 
exceptions may have to be admitted on similar groimda^ 
Still, I conceive it will remain generally true that the 

^ It seems to me that the view of " employer's liability " taken in English 
Law is only defensible by reasoning similar to that suggested in the text. 
By English Law a ** master " is liable for torts committed by his " servant " 
if these torts are conmiitted while the servant is ''about his master's 
business " : the master cannot free himself from the liability by any proof 
that he has selected the servant with care, and enjoined on him care and 
circumspection in the matter in question. This, I think, is only to be 
justified on the supposition that a really satisfactory proof of adequate care 
on the master's part is too difficult to enforce, so that the only way of 
securing adequate care is to make the master liable in any case. Whether 
this is so or not, I do not feel able to judge. 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 117 

enforcement of damages no less than the infliction of 
pimishment (in the narrower sense) should be regarded as 
implying, in the broad sense above explained, some degree 
of culpability in the person on whom reparation is imposed 
How then shall we distinguish the kind of wrongs for 
which the enforcement of damages is the appropriate penalty, 
from the kind of wrongs for which punishment proper is 
required? An answer often given to this question is 
that damages are the appropriate remedy for private wrongs, 
or encroachments on the rights of individuals considered 
as such ; whereas pimishment is required to repress public 
wrongs, or offences against the commimity. This answer, 
no doubt, corresponds to the historical origin of the distinc- 
tion,^ but it is unsuitable to a fully-developed system of 
jurisprudence so far as it maintains a distinction in kind 
between the mischief of crimes and the mischief of civil 
injuries : we cannot really get beyond a distinction in degree. 
The graver mischiefs that we chiefly speak of as criminal are 
primarily inflicted on individuals, no less than the slighter 
injuries which only give a claim for damages : and what 
Bentham calls the " secondary evil " of alarm and danger, 
which unpunished crime tends to cause to the community 
at large, exists to some extent in the case of almost all 
violations of rights, — indeed it is less obvious and palpable 
in the case of many crimes than it is in the case of the un- 
intended mischiefs which a modern system of law would 
treat merely as civil injuries. If A has woimded my 
neighbour to-day by firing a pistol carelessly in his garden, 
he is not imlikely to wound me before long in the same 
way if he is not made to suffer for his carelessness : but if 

^ In an interesting chapter (x.) o{ Ancient Law, Maine explains the lateness 
of the development of a true criminal jurisprudence in Rome — in the sense 
in which ''criminal" implies the distinction of crimes from civil injuries — 
as due to " the very distinctness " with which the conception of a crime as 
a *' wrong done to the State ** was realised. He points out that the penal 
law which we find in early Roman jurisprudence ** is not the law of crimes ; 
it is the Law of Torts. The person injured proceeds against the ^Tongdoer 
by an ordinary civil action, and recovers compensation in the shape of 
money-damages if he succeeds." The same characteristic appears even more 
strongly in other primitive systems of law. 



ii8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

he has wounded him in a duel, my alarm is at any rate 
more indirect and remote, since he cannot fight a duel with 
me without my consent.^ 

On the whole, then, it seems to me that the distinction 
between wrongs that give occasion for damages only, and 
wrongs that give occasion for punishment proper, is a subor- 
dinate one, which experience alone can enable us to draw in 
the best way, in establishing an actual system of legal sane- 
tiona All governmental interference caused by proved 
violation of rights ought to aim, so far as possible, at re- 
pairing the past mischief as well as preventing future 
mischief of the same kind. In some cases the enforcement 
of adequate compensation — not only for the original wrong, 
but also for any trouble and expense entailed in the process 
of obtaining redress for it — is sufficiently onerous to the 
person who has violated another's right to render unneces- 
sary any fiurther, purely penal, intervention of government ; 
and so far as this is the case, it is advantageous in all ways 
to avoid inflicting punishment as such for offences that 
cannot excite the clear and decided moral disapprobation 
which is commonly reserved for intentional misdeeds. In 
the case, however, of mortal injuries, where reparation is 
impossible to the person primarily injured, and prevention 
specially important owing to the gravity of the mischief, 
there seem to be overwhelming reasons for treating even 
mere negligence as criminal. And, on the other hand, there 
are minor injuries which, even though intentional, may be 
adequately repressed by the enforcement of damages ; — as 
(e.^.) malicious slander is held to be in Englisli law. 

I think, therefore, that in a theoretical discussion of 
remedies for wrongs. Damages should be treated as one 
form of legal penalty, having, generally speaking, a pre- 
ventive as well as a reparative function. It should be 
assumed (1) that the law will secure adequate reparation 
to the person wronged, so far as this is possible; and (2) 

^ No doubt each case of duel makes it harder for others to abstain ; there- 
fore an unpunished duel does tend to cause Bomt alami to members of the 
community generally. 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 119 

that certain classes of wrongs — which experience alone can 
enable us to define — may be adequately repressed by the 
mere enforcement of damages : while in other cases, either 
from the gravity of the offence, or because, though socially 
dangerous, it causes no definite harm to assignable in- 
dividuals,^ or because nothing like adequate reparation is 
likely to be obtained,* punishment proper is the indispens- 
able means of determent. 

At the same time, I do not wish to underrate the 
practical importance of the distinction between pimishments 
and damages as appropriate respectively to crimes and civil 
injuries. A clear distinction between the procedures belong- 
ing to the two kinds of remedies respectively is a necessary 
element of a civilised system of law. For where it is an 
adequate means of preventing wrongs to fix the burden of 
reparation on the wrongdoer, there is obviously no absolute 
necessity for any intervention of government : the required 
reparation may as well be made privately between the 
parties, so that it may properly be left to the option of the 
individual wronged to invoke the aid of government if 
necessary. On the other hand, where punishment — as dis- 
tinct from reparation — is needed in the interest of the com- 
munity at large, it must be the business of government to 
secure that it shall be inflicted whenever it is deserved : 
to secure, therefore, that persons harmed by the crime shall 
come forward and give evidence, and shall not make peace 
with the criminal. And to attain this result, it is found 
more and more necessary, as civilisation advances, that 
government should make the prosecution of crimes its own 
business. Thus, though the ultimate end of both civil and 
criminal procedure is to a great extent the same — prevention 

^ It should be borne in mind that offences may be committed deserving 
severe punishment without any question of redress arising. Foiled attempts 
to commit grave crimes are examples of this class of offences : — t.g, forgery 
detected before it takes effect. 

' This liable to occur in the case of wrongs committed by the poor : it 
may be necessary to inflict punishment for them, because the poverty of the 
wrongdoer would render it unprofitable to bring an action against him for 
damages. 



I20 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of mischief — the regulations of the two systems are neces- 
sarily different ; and historically they have shown a marked 
tendency to diverge more and more. 

On this subject I shall have something more to say in 
the part of my treatise that deals with the structure of 
government.^ At present I shall confine myself to a brief 
discussion of the kinds and amounts of reparation that law- 
courts should enforce, and the kinds and degrees of punish- 
ment that they should inflict. 

§ 3. First, as regards reparation. In the case of 
injuries affecting property, restitution in kind, where 
possible, and the payment of an equivalent in money 
for the utilities of which the proprietor has been 
wholly or partially deprived, are the most obvious modes 
of compensation, and capable in most cases of being 
made adequate : nor does there seem to be any other avail- 
able mode of making reparation for physical injuries to 
the person, though the adequacy of a money payment is in 
this case much more doubtful. Where, however, it is the 
right to reputation that has been violated, the mischief done 
can be to a certain extent — though in many cases not com- 
pletely — repaired by a public contradiction of the defamatory 
statement that caused it : and where such a contradiction is 
volimtarily made by the defamer the Courts should recognise 
it as at least a part of the compensation that it is their 
business to enforce. But such a contradiction could not be 
made compulsory, and its refusal criminal, without danger 
of forcing the defamer to say what he did not believe to be 
true : nor is there any necessity for such compulsion, since, 
if the defamer refuses to retract his defamatory statement, 
the end in view can be sufficiently attained by the pub- 
lication of the Judge's decision that the statement was 
false. 

The most difficult case is that of injuries to reputation, 
which result not from false statements, but from insults 
which, according to the common sentiment of civilised 
Europe — or of the gentry in European countries — it is 

^ See chap. xxiv. § 6. 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 121 

discreditable to receive, or at least to endure peacefully. So 
long as this sentiment — a survival from more disorderly 
times — continues strong, it is probably impossible to find 
any mode of completely repairing the injury done to reputa- 
tion by such insults ; but perhaps the closest attainable 
approximation to reparation is to be got by inflicting a 
humiliating punishment. This suggestion is worked out in 
detail by Bentham ; and though several of the humiliations 
that he proposes are too grotesque to be adopted, the need 
that they are designed to meet is still a real one ; and in 
many cases it would, I think, be possible to find expedients 
for meeting it, which should not be grotesque or otherwise 
imdignified.^ 

For the injury done to a woman's husband, father, or 
other relatives by her seduction, I know of no appropriate 
reparation ; and, so far as it is desirable that this mischief 
should be legally repressed, I think it is a case for punish- 
ment rather than damages. 

Where the injury for which reparation is due has not 
been provoked or in any degree caused by culpable acts or 
omissions on the part of the person injured, the proper 
amount of pecimiary compensation is, in the abstract, not 
difficult to determine : it should be an equivalent not merely 
for the original injury, but for the sacrifices entailed by the 
process of obtaining reparation. When, on the other hand, 
the person injured is partly to blame, it is obviously reason- 
able that the compensation should be diminished by an 
amount proportioned to his share in causing the injury: 
though it may often be impossible to determine the diminu- 
tion otherwise than very roughly. 

I may observe that the adequacy of reparation is important 
not only to the individual wronged, but also to others: 
since, if reparation can be made adequate, the expectation 

* See Bentham's Principles 0/ Penal Law^ chap. xv. (Works, vol. i. p. 381). 
Among other too grotesque suggestions, I may notice that of "emblem- 
atical robes," or "masks," with **a magpie's or a parrot's head in cases of 
temerity " ! On the other hand I see no reason why certain outrageous 
insults should not entail " speech of humiliation prescribed to the offender," 
or even, if this did not suffice, a humiliating posture. 



122 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of obtaining it very much reduces the alarm caused by the 
offence. Hence the special importance of preventing by 
effective pimishment irreparable wronga 

§ 4. Let us now pass from tlie consideration of Damages 
to that of Punishment in the narrower sense. In selecting 
the kind of punishment, the first point to notice is, that 
though punishment mainly prevents wrong by deterring — 
and this is its sole preventive operation so far as it acts on 
others than the person punished — still, so far as the criminal 
is concerned, there are two other modes of prevention of 
which we must not lose sight : viz. Reformation and Dis- 
ablement It is therefore desirable, so far as possible, that 
the kind of punishment should be selected with a view to 
these important though subordinate ends. 

Reformation is especially to be aimed at in the case of 
juvenile offenders, disablement in the case of offences com- 
mitted by influential persons in transient crises of civil 
strife. For both these ends imprisonment is the obvious 
means ; for the former, imprisonment with labour, care being 
taken not to render the labour needlessly repulsive, and to 
allow industry to obtain its natural reward. 

It is a difficult matter to determine satisfactorily the 
right degree of punishment for any given offence. It is 
easy to say, witli Bentham, that it ought to be sufficient to 
deter, and not more than sufficient. But our general 
knowledge of the variations in human circumstances and 
impulses would suggest — what experience amply confirms 
— that no punishment whatever can be relied on to 
be adequately deterrent in all cases. Murder and man- 
slaughter, burglary and larceny, have continued to harass 
society through all changes in the allotment of punish- 
ment; and no change is likely to put an end to them. 
Now, impulsive crimes we cannot hope to prevent by 
any intensification of punishment imtil human nature is 
fundamentally altered : but crimes planned in cold blood 
are matters of calculation, and it does not seem impossible 
that it should be made unmistakably a man's interest, on a 
oool calculation of chances, not to commit a crime. Since, 



\ 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 123 

however, the attainment of this result depends not only on 
the amount of punishment, but also on the chances that 
the criminal (1) will be caught, and (2) will be condemned 
if caught, it may easily happen that in a community where 
the police is ill organised, and the judges liable to be 
corrupt or ineflScient, the required adjustment of interests 
cannot be effected : the imcertain chance of the maximum 
punishment which humanity admits may not be enough 
to outweigh the prospective profit of the crime. For the 
same reason, in societies where similar governmental defects 
exist in a less degree, an increase in the eSiciency of police 
and judicature will often enable intensity of punishment 
to be reduced without increasing crime. 

The diSiculty of adjusting amount of punishment to 
gravity of offence, in a manner adapted to meet all variations 
in human nature and its circumstances, affords a strong 
argument for increasing heavily the severity of punishment 
at each repetition of any kind of deliberate crime : ^ since 
the fact that a man, after suffering the punishment of an 
offence committed in cold blood, proceeds to commit another 
offence of the same kind, is tolerably conclusive evidence 
that in his particular case the pimishment already inflicted 
was not sufficiently deterrent. 

There are several other considerations that ought to be 
taken into account, in the selection and graduation of 
pimishments : of these the following appear to be the most 
important : — 

1. To realise the principle of justice that similar cases 
should be treated similarly, it is important that punishment 
should be equable ; i.e. that a punishment of a certain deno- 
mination — say imprisonment — should not mean different 
things in different case& This is an argiunent {e.g,) for 
central rather than local management of prisons : for watch- 
fulness as to effects on health, etc. 

It is to be observed, however, that this principle is 
almost impossible to realise in dealing with offenders drawn 

^ The force of this considoration may be neutralised in particular cases 
by special extenuating circumstances. 



124 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

from different classes in the community. We cannot, even by 
proportioning the sum imposed to the offender's income, so fer 
as we can ascertain it, prevent punishment by fine from being 
practically less severe to the rich than to the poor ; and it is 
still more clear that we cannot prevent imprisonment with 
labour from being more severe to the former. This being 
so, it seems, on the whole, best — where some inequality 
cannot be avoided — that the rich should suffer somewhat 
more than the poor ; as crime may be presumed to be 
generally more culpable in persons more highly educated, 
and shielded by their wealth from the severe temptations 
incident to poverty. 

2. Avoidance of excess in punishment is important, not 
only in order to inflict no more pain than is needed — which, 
of course, is to be aimed at from a utilitarian point of view 
— but even more in order that different degrees of punish- 
ment may all be adequately deterrent, where the criminal 
has choice of alternatives of crime, differing in degree of 
mischievousnesa It is of fundamental importance that a 
man should always have adequate motive to refrain from 
committing each successive part of any possible complex 
offence ; or a greater offence, instead of a lesser. Punish- 
ment, therefore, should be so chosen that clearly greater 
punishments may be allotted to more mischievous crimes. 

This is one argument for attaching capital punishment 
to murder alone: so that («.^.) the thief or burglar may 
have an adequate inducement not to commit murder even 
when it would give him an additional chance of getting off. 

3. From a utilitarian point of view, it is plain that, 
supposing the preventive effect of punishment undiminished, 
the less pain it actually gives to a criminal the better. 
Hence, it is an advantage that punishment should be, so far 
as possible, what Bentham calls " exemplary," i,e, greater in 
appearance than in reality, since it is chiefly appearance that 
deters. And, of course, punishments of the opposite kind, 
really worse than they seem, should be carefully avoided. 

But in seeking to make punishments " exemplary," care 
should be taken to prevent them from being offensive to 



VIII REMEDIES FOR WRONGS 125 

popular feeling, and so likely to arouse aversion to the 
administration of the law, and dangerous sympathy with 
the criminal pimished. Moreover, the infliction of even 
transient pain beyond a certain degree of severity ^ would 
be opposed to a sentiment of humanity, which it is not 
merely politically dangerous to offend, but important to the 
wellbeing of society to maintain and develop. 

4. Punishment should, other things being equal, be as 
little burdensome as possible to the community : t,g, if useful 
labour is adequately deterrent its utility is so much gain : 
and, similarly, if the penalty suffered by the wrongdoer is 
at the same time compensatory to persons wronged. Indeed, 
as we have seen, so far as compensation can be adequate, 
the enforcement of it may be sufficiently preventive of the 
offence. 

5. Finally, taking mistakes into account, it is well that 
punishment should be remissible if possible. This is, of 
course, an objection to capital punishment — though not, in 
my opinion, a decisive one ; also to the infliction of lesser 
bodily injuries of an irreparable kind, such as maiming. 

^ This is an " exemplary " punishment, because the effect on the imagina- 
tion is increased by the concentration of the pain. 



CHAPTER IX 

PREVENTION OF MISCHIEF AND PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 

§ 1. In the last chapter I was concerned with the distinction 
between Punishments and Damages, and the distinction — 
which is usually conceived to correspond to this — ^between 
public offences and private or civil injuries. According 
to me, neither distinction in a well-organised system of 
remedies for wrongs would — though important — liave quite 
the fundamental importance which it has in English law. 
For, from a utilitarian point of view, all punishment is 
preventive in its ultimate end, and not retributive ; though 
it is desirable that, so far as possible, intentional acts that call 
for punishment should be regarded with moral disapprobation 
and aversion. And again, the infliction of damages must be 
mainly determined by considerations of prevention and not of 
reparation alone ; since, generally speaking, damages should 
not be enforced for mischief done by A to B, imless the mis- 
chief could have been avoided by care which an average man 
can be made to take without excessive anxiety or disti-action 
from his ordinary avocations. 

It seems to me better to say (1) that reparation as well 
as prevention should be the general aim of governmental 
interference in the judicial way ; and (2) that in some cases 
the mere enforcement of reparation may be adequate for 
purposes of prevention. 

I pointed out, further, that prevention was not only 
though mainly attained by the deterrent effect of punish- 
ment. This is its sole preventive effect on others : but as 



CHAP. IX PREVENTION OF MISCHIEF 127 

regards the individual punished, prevention may also be 
attained by reformation and by disablement. 

I then went on to consider briefly some of the leading 
characteristics of well-chosen punishments. 

Punishments should be so chosen that a given denomina- 
tion of pimishment shall, as far as possible, not mean very 
different actual degrees of severity in different cases. It 
should, if possible, be severe enough for the chance of it to 
outweigh clearly, on a cool calculation, the advantage of the 
crime : capable of gradation, so that a criminal may always 
have adequate inducement to prefer the lesser offence to the 
greater : not severer in reality than in appearance, since it 
is appearance that deters : as little burdensome as possible 
to all but the criminal, and so far as may be remissible. 

In order to complete the theory of remedies for wrongs, 
we have now to consider other modes of preventing — and 
to a less extent of repairing — mischief caused to men by 
their fellows. We must first take note of one indirect 
method of preventing wrongs which is only an extension of 
the method discussed in the previous chapter : I mean that 
of deterring, by infliction of punishments or enforcement of 
damages, not only the actual violators of any rights but 
those who incite others to violate them. The general 
expediency of this is manifest ; though it is sometimes a 
matter of much delicacy to determine, in particular cases, 
what expression of opinion or sentiment may reasonably be 
held to constitute an incitement to law-breaking. So again, 
it is clearly in accordance with our principle, that govern- 
ment should intervene with physical force to protect private 
rights, in particular cases where the deterrent effect of 
punishment is evidently inadequate for their protection — 
i,e, where a manifest wrong is actually being committed, 
or where the intention of committing it is plainly shown. 
Wherever manifestly illegal annoyance is being caused or 
threatened to any person by the action or inaction of 
others, it seems undoubtedly the business of government 
to intervene to remove or prevent it, — except so far as 
the machinery required for such intervention would entail 



128 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

expense more burdensome to the community than the annoy- 
ance that would be prevented. 

This proviso, however, leads us to observe that the 
primitive method of self-defence and self-reparation must be 
allowed some place in the most completely civilised com- 
munity. The establishment of civilised order tends to 
reduce this within narrow limits: but as the eye of 
government cannot be all-seeing nor its hand everywhere 
active, any private individual should be allowed to defend 
with force himself and any neighbour who is forcibly 
attacked in person or property ; under the condition that 
the mischief inflicted on the aggressor is not clearly out of 
proportion to the aggression — t,g, I must not shoot a man for 
trespassing on my land. Similarly private persons should be 
allowed to abate any public nuisance that needs an immediate 
remedy — t.g. cut down a fence across a public road. But 
though, when a wrong is threatened or begun, the immediate 
use of force is often necessary to prevent or terminate it, 
there is not the same need for promptitude in punishment : 
hence any violence that is not needed for the repulsion of 
wrong, and therefore merely serves to gratify the resent- 
ment of the person assailed, should be prohibited as illegal, 
owing to the great public importance of preventing private 
fighting. But forcible reparation — as distinct from retalia- 
tion — should be allowed to a limited extent on tlie same 
grounds as self-defence : thus, the forcible recapture of 
property, that has been taken away without pretence of 
legal right, should be allowed where delay in recapture is 
likely to entail further injury. 

Further, we have seen that one end of punishment is 
to disable the criminal from further crime — lor example, by 
imprisonment. A similar restraint of personal liberty is 
obviously expedient in the case of persons who are merely 
suspected of crime, if the grounds of suspicion be adequate -} 
since otherwise a criminal aware that he was suspected 
might always evade punishment by absconding before the 

^ I shall notice in a later chapter the need of limiting this power by con- 
stitutional securities. 



IX PREVENTION OF MISCHIEF 129 

legal proof of his crime was complete. So, again, the 
mischief that might be done, to others as well as to them- 
selves, by persons bereft of reason, ought to be prevented 
by placing them under special watch and restraint, so soon 
as their irrationality is evident 

Again, in the case of mischief against which the persons 
liable to injury can, and probably will, protect themselves 
if duly warned, it will hardly be doubted that government 
may sometimes usefully intervene in the way of warning or 
diffusing information, — as when the police inform the public 
that there is a special danger of pickpocketa Such in- 
formation may be indirectly as well as directly given: 
thus, by instituting a certificate obtainable by professional 
men — physicians or teachers — whom it deems properly 
qualified, government indirectly warns the public against 
impostors who may attempt to practise these callings with- 
out the requisite qualifications. No one, again, will doubt 
that where mere warning is not likely to be sufl&cient, 
government may properly intervene to prevent certain 
kinds of mischievous acts or neglects, by keeping some 
watch on the processes in connection with which they are 
liable to be committed, so far as these processes are carried 
on in public ; — as (e.^.) by visiting shops and markets where 
there is reasonable groimd for suspecting the deception of 
purchasers by sellers. 

§ 2. A consideration of the last-mentioned case leads 
naturally to a further important step ; which, as we shall 
see, brings us up to the disputed margin of what I have 
called the "individualistic minimujn" of governmental 
interference. For the prevention of deception by sellers, 
in respect of the quantity of the wares purchased, is 
obviously much facilitated by the prescription of standard 
weights and measures : and similarly in many other cases 
the easiest and most effective way of preventing harm is to 
prescribe certain precaviions against it — i,e, to prohibit acts 
or omissions not directly or necessarily mischievous to 
others, but attended with a certain risk of mischief. Here, 
however, we have come to an extension of governmental 

K 



130 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

interference, in the way of regulation — involving a similar 
extension in the way of inspection^ — the legitimacy of 
which has been in some cases seriously disputed by in- 
dividualista Its aim, however, does not go beyond the 
protection of individuals from mischief caused by other 
individuals : and certain ancient kinds of it — of which the 
prescription of standard measures is a familiar example — 
have never, so far as I know, met with any practical opposi- 
tion: while, in modern times, a continually increasing 
amount of it is now judged necessary by our own and other 
civilised Governments. I may give as instances restrictions 
on the manufacture and carriage of explosive substances 
and rules against importing cattle from countries where 
disease is rifa* It is not certain that any given cargo of 
suspected cattle or carelessly carried explosives would do 
any harm : but most prudent persons see that the risk is 
too great to run. 

Now this kind of indirectly individualistic interference 
can hardly be argued to be generally inadmissible, on 
our utilitarian interpretation of the fundamental prin- 
ciple of Individualism. Sometimes, indeed, the burden 
thus imposed on private persons is so slight in comparison 
with the evils guarded against, that no one would hesitate 
to impose it, if experience shows it to be at all efficacious 
for the attainment of the end in view. This is the case {e„g^ 
when Government, besides diffusing information and warn- 
ing, imposes on others the duty of furnishing it, either to 
remove or reduce the risk of mischief through violence, neg- 
ligence, or fraud — as when it orders that poisons when sold 
should be designated as such, and that the name and address 
of persons to whom they are sold should be preserved ; or to 
facilitate the attainment of redress in case of wrong — as 
when it requires printers' and publishers' names to be 
afi&xed to publications. Another instance of the same kind 

^ So far as such regulations are applied to processes carried on otherwise 
than in public, it wiU be necessary, in order to secure their observance, 
that Government inspectors have the power of entering private grounds 
omd buildings. 

^ I give these as cletfly not what I go on to call " paternal.'* 



IX PREVENTION OF MISCHIEF 131 

is the compulsory registration of mortgages and bills of 
sale, regarded as a precaution against fraud. 

Where the restraints or burdens imposed by such inter- 
ference are more serious, the annoyance and cost entcdled 
by it, on the community or on individuals, must of course 
be carefully weighed against the evils which experience 
shows it to be capable of preventing : and under the head 
of cost must be included any economic loss caused by the 
enforced substitution of a more expensive for a cheaper 
process of attfdning any industrial end. But I do not 
think that any general rules can be laid down for deter- 
mining the limits of such interference : all we can say is 
that a milder degree of interference, if effective, is generally 
to be preferred. 

The possible gradations in intensity of interference will 
of course vary according to circumstances ; but I may give 
one or two illustrations of them.^ I may begin by referring 
to the much-discussed case of restrictions on freedom of 
speech or writing, so far as such restrictions are designed 
to protect the rights of private persons.^ There are obvious 
and great advantages to be gained by leaving men as much 
liberty as possible to argue that certain established rights^ 
or certain modes of exercising these rights, are injurious 
to the community and ought to be suppressed : since it is 
through judicious criticism of this kind that improvements 
in legislation and administration in law are chiefly to be 
expected, while in other cases — ^where a change in legal 
rights is inexpedient — such criticism may be useful in 
rousing public sentiment to supplement the inevitable 
deficiencies of law: and if judicious criticism is to be 
allowed and even encouraged, injudicious criticism must be 
tolerated to some extent, even though it has a certain 
tendency to cause violations of law. Hence, even when 
this dangerous tendency is so marked as to render some 
repression of free criticism less mischievous than complete 

^ Other kinds of gradation will be noticed later. See pp. 137, 138. 
^ Restrictions on freedom of discussion, imposed in the special interest of 
government, will be considered in a later chapter (xxvii.) 



132 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

toleration, it is generally expedient to confine this repression 
to the more inflammatory modes of publishing opinions 
hostile to established rights: for instance, to allow such 
opinions to be freely published in books, when they could 
not be tolerated in speeches or placarda^ Again, certain 
practices dangerous to others — such as the drinking of 
alcohol to the point of intoxication — may be tolerated 
in private but repressed if the drunkard appears in 
public Or, again, restrictions may be imposed not on 
the persons who do the acts liable to be followed by 
mischievous consequences, but on the traders who, for 
private gain, supply facilities for such acts, — as when the 
publican is forbidden to sell alcohol to a person who 
is clearly intoxicated, or is known by him to be a 
habitual drimkard. This last kind of interference is, 
indeed, no less intense than that for which it is a substi- 
tute ; but, owing to its limited range, it is on the whole 
less vexatioua 

§ 3. Here, however, it has to be observed that in dealing 
with these and similar concrete examples of what I have 
characterised as " indirectly individualistic interference," we 
see that it is very difficult to distinguish it in practice 
from the kind that I have called " paternal" Abstractly 
considered, the question (1) " How far Government may 
legitimately go in preventing acts or omissions that are not 
directly or necessarily harmful, on the ground that there 
is risk of their causing mischief indirectly to persons, other 
than the agent, who have not consented to run the risk," 
is quite distinct from the question (2) " How far Government 
ought to interfere to prevent mischief caused to an individual 
by himself or with his own consent." But in concrete cases 
the two questions are almost always mixed up, since, where 
a man's acts or neglects tend to harm himself so seriously as 
to suggest a need of Governmental interference to prevent 

^ ''An opinion that corn-dealers are starvers of the poor, or that private 
property is robbery . . . mayjustly incur punishment when delivered orally 
to an excited mob assembled before the house of a corn-dealer, or when 
handed about among the same mob in the form of a placard." — J. S. Mill, 
On Liberty , chap. iii. 



IX PREVENTION OF MISCHIEF 133 

the mischief, they usually tend also to harm others.^ An 
illustration of this may be found in the sanitary regulations 
enforced by our own legislation. When a man is forced 
to co-operate with his fellow-citizens in a common system 
of drainage and water-supply, when he is prevented from 
using a house unfit for hujnan habitation, or from over- 
crowding any part of a house, it may be said that coercion 
is applied to him in his own interest : and no doubt it is 
designed that he should derive benefit &om the coercion ; 
still its main justification lies in the need of protecting his 
children and neighbours who might suffer if his house 
became a focus of disease. Similarly, few individualists are 
BO extreme as to deny that the tendency of drunkenness 
to cause breaches of the peace is a legitimate ground for 
somt interference with the trade of selling alcohol: and 
the most thoroughgoing abolitionist usually urges restriction 
more as indirectly individualistic than as paternal — i.e. more 
on the ground of the proved tendency of alcoholic excess to 
make a man beat his wife and starve his children, than on 
the ground of its tendency to injure the drunkard himself. 
So again, where an individual would evidently cause 
danger to the physical wellbeing or the property of others 
by not taking precautions to protect his own person or 
property from certain external sources of mischief, — as in 
the case of protection of land from floods, or of men or use- 
ful animals from infectious diseases, — it is, I conceive, a 
simple application of the individualistic principle to make 
him responsible, after warning, for the injury that his 
neglect may cause to others : and if so, when this injury is 
likely to be, in kind or amoimt, such as he could not ade- 
quately compensate, it is an obvious and not unreasonable 
extension of the principle to compel him to co-operate with 
others in a general system of precautions. And though 
the benefit of such compulsion may be primarily received 

^ I do not here take into account the tendency of a man who harms himself 
to harm others by bad example. For interference to protect men fi?om the 
mischief of bad example is clearly *' paternal : " since if we assume them 
adequately capable of looking after their own interests, we must assume 
that bad example will be on the whole deterrent rather than attractive. 



134 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

by himself, still since the decisive ground for adopting it is 
the prevention of mischief to others, it is not properly to 
be regarded as " paternal " interference, — in the special 
sense in which I have adopted this term. Similar reasoning 
is applicable to the provision of means for reducing mischief 
caused by accident or neglect, when such mischief is liable 
to spread : as in the case of fires in towns.^ 

Other interferences that may seem primd fdcie 
" paternal " in their aims admit of being regarded, at least 
in part, as merely an extension of that protection against 
deception which the individualistic principle has always 
been held to cover. For instance, when our Government 
endeavours to prevent its subjects from employing im- 
properly qualified physicians, apothecaries, and pilots; or 
from buying meat known to be diseased ; or from taking 
part in dangerous industrial processes — as (e.g.) mining and 
navigation — without due precautions, it may be said that 
it aims merely at protecting its subjects from evils in- 
curred through ignorance of which other persons take 
advantage. And a similar view may also be taken of 
another important class of cases in which the mischief 
sought to be prevented is pecuniary loss. Thus, it may be 
said that the prohibition of " truck " (that is, of the pay- 
ment of wages otherwise than in money) is " indirectly 
individualistic '* and not " paternal " ; since its design is 
merely to secure to labourers the amount of real wages that 
is by contract fairly due to them, by preventing tlie 
diminution of such real wages through the supply of goods 
of inferior quality, at a price above their market value. 

The truth is — as the discussion of the conditions of 
valid contracts showed us — that it is a task of some delicacy 
to define the individualistic principle, in relation to deception, 
with the exactness required for practical application. When 
it is affirmed that an " individual should be left to take 

} Even 80 decided an advocate of Laisser Faire as M. Paul Leroy- 
Beaolien considers that the ** pompiers volontaires qui Ton voit encore a 
Londrea " perfonu a function that had better be organised by government. 
Hevuc des deux MondcSf 1888, iv. p. 931. 



IX PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 135 

care of his own interests," some proviso is always under- 
stood with regard to his protection against imposture : but 
the precise nature of the proviso is left somewhat obscure ; 
and it may be plausibly extended to prohibit any man from 
knowingly profiting by the ignorance of another. And if 
we go as far as this, it may be plausibly urged that it is 
desirable, when possible, to go further, and prevent A from 
profiting by the manifest ignorance of B, even when it is 
shared by A ; especially considering the great difl&culty of 
ascertaining whether or not an impostor is self-deceived. 
But when we have come to this point, the line between 
individualistic and paternal interference will have practically 
vanished. And even the rule that no one may knowingly 
profit by the ignorance of another, if consistently applied to 
commercial dealings, would carry us far beyond what any 
individualist has ventured practically to recommend ; and — 
if it could ever be effectually carried out — would seriously 
impair the stimulus to the acquisition of useful knowledge 
on which individualism relies. 

On the whole, therefore, I think that we must interpret 
the proviso above mentioned as merely prohibiting a man 
from profiting by ignorance or error that he has con- 
tributed, intentionally or negligently, to produce : and 
it is on this view that I should define the limits, in 
the cases above mentioned, of directly individualistic 
interference. To prevent the flesh of diseased animals 
from being disguised as the flesh of healthy animals; to 
prevent would-be surgeons or apothecaries from pretending 
to have obtained certificates of qualification which they have 
not really obtained ; to oblige employers who may have con- 
tracted to pay wages in goods to supply such goods in strict 
accordance with contract as regards quality and price ; — all 
this is clearly and directly individualistic : on the other 
hand, if Grovemment absolutely prohibits the purchase of 
food it deems imhealthy, the consultation of physicians it 
deems unqualified, the adoption of methods of payment it 
deems unfit, its action is certainly what I have called 
"paternal" But in many of these cases it is possible 



136 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

for Grovernment to do more than prevent deception, without 
incurring the chief objections to " paternal " intervention : 
it may take measures to remove the ignorance of consumers 
as to the dangerous qualities of commodities offered for 
purchase, — or the ignorance of labourers as to the dangerous 
nature of instruments which their employers require them 
to use, — without compelling any one to act on the informa- 
tion thus supplied. And such a procedure is, in my view, 
within the limits of the " indirectly individualistic" inter- 
vention of Government discussed in this chapter ; since its 
aim is to protect individuals from mischief caused by the 
action of others, the risk of which — as they are supposed 
not to know it — they cannot be said to have consented to 
run. We may assume that the great majority of persons 
do not wish to shoot with gun-barrels that are liable to 
burst, or to consume condiments rendered attractive by 
poisonous colouring matter : ^ and if the dangerous quality 
of these and other commodities can only be known by 
technical skill, the coercion involved in raising by taxation 
the required funds, to provide for the examination by 
experts of such commodities before they are sold, is but a 
slight price to pay for the consequent protection against 
mischief The consumer might still be left free to buy 
unsafe guns or poisonous pickles if he chose. Similarly, 
unseaworthy ships and unnecessarily dangerous machinery 
might be examined and reported on by governmental experts, 
without any positive prohibition of their use, in case 
persons were found to run the risk of using them in spite 
of full and clear warning. 

§ 4. In what I have said above I do not mean to imply 
that all governmental interference which is undeniably 
" paternal " ought therefore to be rejected without further 
inquiry. I consider that so uncompromising an adhesion 
to the principle " that men are the best guardians of their 
own welfare " is not rationally justified by the evidence on 
which the principle rests. I regard this principle as a 
rough induction from our ordinary experience of human 

1 See Jevons. The State in Relation to Labour, chap. ii. 



IX PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 137 

life ; as supported on an empirical basis sufficiently strong 
and wide to throw the onus probandi heavily on those who 
advocate any deviation from it, but in no way proved to be 
an even approximately universal truth. Hence, if strong 
empirical grounds are brought forward for admitting a 
particular practical exception to this principle — if, e.g., 
it is proved that men are l£u:gely liable to ruin themselves 
by gambling or opium-smoking, or knowingly to incur easily 
avoided dangers in industrial processes — it would, I think, 
be unreasonable to allow these practices to go on without 
interference, merely on account of the established general 
presumption in favour of laisser faire} The particular cases 
in which such "paternal" intervention is on the whole 
desirable must be determined by experience, and will 
naturally vary with times and circumstances. We may, 
however, lay down generally, that this kind of govern- 
mental action shall be reduced within the narrowest limits 
compatible with the attainment of the end in view : and 
that it should, generally speaking, take as far as possible 
some other form than that of directly commanding a man, 
under penalties, to do what he does not like — or not to do 
what he likes — for his own good. One indirect method of 
paternal interference I have already noticed in the case of 
drunkenness: it is possible, in this and similar cases, to reduce 
greatly the total amount of attempted coercion by pimishing 
the trader rather than the consumer. Thus we may punish the 
seller of lottery-tickets and not the purchaser: the keeper of a 
gaming-house and not the gambler. For further illustration, 
let us consider the different ways in which Grovernment may 
intervene to secure adequate qualifications in any class of 
professional men, e.g, physicians. Quackery is very mis- 
chievous ; but it would be too violent an encroachment on 
freedom to prohibit men from consulting a quack and taking 
his advice ; or even to prevent this indirectly, by punishing 
the quack as such ; since Government would thus present 

^ I use this current phrase to mean the rule of 'letting people manage 
their affairs in their own way, so long as they do not cause mischief to others 
without the consent of those others." 



138 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

itself to the quack's dupes in the odious position of standing 
between a sick man and the recovery of his health. But with- 
out any action of this irritating and strongly coercive kind, 
Grovemment may do much to reduce the mischief of quackery 
in the following ways : — 

(1) It may, as was before said, institute an authoritative 
certificate as a guarantee that the holder has gone through 
a certain course of training, and may require an uncertificated 
practitioner to abstain from concealing in any way the 
absence of the certificate ; (2) it may give damages, or even, 
in grave cases, enforce punishment, for grossly unskilful 
treatment by an uncertificated practitioner, when the results 
of such treatment have been clearly mischievous ; and finally 
(3) it may refuse to imcertificated practitioners the legal 
right of receiving fees from their patients. 

This last is an example of a kind of interfei-ence which 
it is important to distinguish and contemplate in a more 
general way ; since it is free from one class of objections 
commonly urged by advocates of laisser /aire against the 
extension of governmental interference. Such objections, 
as we saw, are not solely based on the supposition that the 
individual is the best guardian of his own interests ; it is 
also urged that the efficiency of Government is likely to be 
impaired by any considerable increase of its functions — that 
" the machine will break down through overwork," — or that 
the consequent increase of its power and patronage consti- 
tutes a political danger. And, again, the importance of 
minimising the direct annoyance caused by governmental 
coercion is urged, not only because such annoyance is pro 
tarUo a diminution of happiness, but even more, because the 
resulting discontent is politically dangerous. These objec- 
tions I do not propose to discuss in detail here : but it is 
obvious that they are all avoided when the influence of 
Government on private action — as in the case of the quack's 
fees — is exercised not by positive, but by negative inter- 
ference, i.e, by declining to interfere. Several examples of 
this may be foimd ; e.g. the right of self-defence and the 
recapture of property, and the important family rights of 



IX PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 139 

the husband and father, are mainly established by the with- 
drawal of the ordinary protection of the law from the 
persons against whose will these rights are or may be 
exercised. So again, we noticed in dealing with the 
conditions of valid contracts that there is a margin of 
conduct mischievous in its effects which it would do more 
harm than good to prevent by the more intense method of 
prohibition and punishment, but which it may nevertheless 
be expedient to prevent by declining to enforce contracts 
which facilitate it ^ : the most important instances of this 
are contracts of which the subject-matter involves sexual 
immorality. The invalidation of oppressive usurious con- 
tracts is a historic case of paternal interference falling under 
the same general head. 

Another important way in which Government may 
practically determine the relations of private citizens without 
coercion is by giving an authoritative interpretation to 
ordinary contracts, in points left ambiguous by the words or 
other signs actually used by the contracting parties. Thus, 
in an ordinary contract of sale in England, a purchaser's 
promise to pay twenty pounds is defined by Government to 
mean a promise to pay at least eighteen gold sovereigns, of 
full weight, together with either two sovereigns, or forty 
shillings ; ^ or else to pay Bank of England notes for which 
coin to the amoimts above mentioned may be obtained on 
demand. Bi-metallists urge that it would be desirable to 
change the definition and interpret the promise as an under- 
taking to pay either twenty gold sovereigns or silver coin 
in a certain fixed proportion, or notes of the Bank of 
England similarly redeemable in either metaL If this 
measure were adopted, no one would be compelled to sell or 
buy goods on these terms : any seller who chose might still 
insist on receiving gold ; still it is most probable that the 
effect of fixing this bi-metallic interpretation on all contracts, 

^ It is to be observed that this refusal to enforce contracts is open to some 
objection, as tending somewhat to weaken the very important moral habit 
of fulfilling promises. 

^ I omit, for simplicity, the alternative of paying twelvepence instead oi 
a shilling. 



140 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

in which sums of money were mentioned without an express 
limitation to gold, would be to bring both metals into 
approximately equal use as currency. 

This mode of interference is well adapted to the realisa- 
tion of the " paternal " principle in a mild degree : but it is 
probably more often used when the end in view is the 
interest, not of the individual interfered with, but of the 
community of which he is a member. 

§ 5. So far, in speaking of governmental coercion, 
exercised in the interest of the person coerced, as '' paternal/' 
I have had solely in view the coercion of sane adults. Of 
course no individualist objects to coercion exercised on 
children in their own interest: nor can it be seriously 
maintained that the interests of a child can safely be left 
altogether to its parents' care : still less, that they can be 
altogether left to the care of any guardian that its parents 
may designate. Hence some right (and duty) of governmental 
interference, to protect children from mischief caused actively 
or through neglect by their parents and guardians, must be 
admitted in the strictest individualistic scheme. Thus the 
limitations on the employment of children in factories and 
workshops, which have now been adopted by most civilised 
countries, are approved even by decided advocates of laisaer 
/aire : and interference with the labour of women during 
the period of childbearing is theoretically defensible on 
similar grounds, as an indirect protection of the physical 
wellbeing of children ; though it is beset with great practical 
difficulties. 

On the other hand, children can hardly be protected like 
adults against personal confinement or assault, as these are 
recognised as occasionally necessary means of educational 
disciplina And, on the individualistic principle, since the 
burden of rearing and training children should be, as far as 
possible, thrown on their parents, it seems desirable, so far 
as this burden is fairly taken up, that the parents' discretion 
in the training of the child should be left as unfettered as 
possible ; and that Government should only intervene in a 
purely coercive way when the child's interests are manifestly 



IX PATERNAL INTERFERENCE 141 

being sacrificed, either through the greed or passion of the 
parents, or through gross neglect or ignorance. How far, 
when the parents cannot afford to support or educate their 
children, they should, under any conditions, receive pecuniary 
aid from Government to enable them to discharge these 
duties is, for individualists, a difficult and doubtful question. 
On the one hand, when it is evident that children are, 
through their parents' poverty, growing up in such a way 
as to render them likely to be burdensome or dangerous to 
society, it seems primd facie a prudent insurance against 
this result for the community to assist in their support and 
education. On the other hand, similar arguments may be 
used to justify a governmental provision of sustenance for 
adults, in order that they may not be driven into criminal 
courses: and if either kind of governmental assistance is 
once admitted as justifiable in principle, it is not very easy 
to limit the burden that may be thrown on industrious and 
provident individuals by the improvidence of others. At 
any rate it seems clear that either question brings us to the 
debatable territory between Individualism and Socialism; 
which I propose to examine in the following chapter.^ 

For completeness, I may briefly note two cases of govern- 
mental interference, ordinarily recognised as necessary, that 
obviously do not fall within the application of the individual- 
istic principle ; the humane treatment of lunatics, and the 
prevention of cruelty to the inferior animals. In the latter 
case the coercion is no doubt applied to protect the animals 
in question &om pain inflicted by other creatures : still the 
protection does not in any degree aim at securing " freedom 
of action" to the animals protected, but simply at the 
prevention of unnecessary pain ; it is, if properly carried out, 

^ To the same ambi^^ous region belongs the discussion bf another kind 
of governmental interference, which may be justified as indirectly individual- 
istic : I mean the provision of machinery for bringing moral influence to bear 
upon members of the community. The efficacy of this in diminishing the 
danger of crime has been urged to justify the employment of public funds in 
endowing Christian churches in modern states, and it cannot be denied that 
there is some force in the argument : but the consideration of the proper 
relations of Church and State cannot be adequately conducted from this 
point of view alone. See chap. xiii. § 5, and chap, xzviii. 



142 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, ix 

a one-sided restraint of the freedom of action of men with a 
view to the greatest happiness of the aggregate of sentient 
beinga^ 

In conclusion, it may be well to remind the reader that 
the extent to which the kind of interference discussed in 
the present chapter should be carried in a modern state will 
partly depend upon a variety of considerations, the force of 
which cannot here be estimated. Thus, we have to con- 
sider the state of moral opinion in the community — since 
the repression of mischievous conduct by social disapproba- 
tion may render legislative repression unnecessary; the 
diffusion of knowledge ; the customs, industrial and social, 
actually prevalent; and the development of the habit of 
voluntary combination among the citizens. For example, 
where a mischievous or dangerous custom prevails, which it 
is difficult for an individual to avoid conforming to, there is 
primd facie special need for legislative interference : on the 
other hand, in proportion as the habit of combination is 
developed, this need is diminished. 

^ The protection of inferior races of men will be considered in a subsequent 
chapter (xviii.) 



CHAPTEE X 

SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 

§ 1. It is universally recognised that the present drift of 
opinion and practice is in the direction of increasing the 
range and volume of the interference of government in the 
affairs of individuals : and in current discussion the results 
of this tendency are not uncommonly lumped together 
under some such term as " State-Socialism " contrasted with 
" Individualism." It is, I think, important to remove 
the vagueness of thought that this simple antithesis 
is liable to involve, by distinguishing the very different 
issues that tend to be blended and confounded in this 
opposition of terms. 

This has, I hope, been partly effected by the discussion 
in the preceding chapter. For we have seen that an 
important part of the increasing interference of Government 
which alarms old-fashioned advocates of laisser faire is not 
really distinguishable in its principles and aims from the 
kind of governmental action which the most vigorous 
Individualism has always regarded as indispensabla That 
is, its aim is the protection of individuals from harm to 
person or estate caused, whether intentionally or carelessly, 
by the action of other men : it merely seeks to make this 
protection more effectual and complete. Take, for instance, 
the important department of sanitary interference: it is 
obvious that the mischief which one private person may 
cause to others by making his house or business a focus of 
disease is of a kind which all rational Individualists have 



144 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

always considered it within the province of Government 
to prevent. It may happen, in any particular case, that 
the remedy applied is ineffectual, or even if effectual, on 
the whole more burdensome than the evil which it is 
sought to remedy: but this is liable to happen in any 
human adaptation of means to ends, and does not affect the 
question of principle. And it is easy to see how new 
occasions for this kind of interference may continually 
arise: either because the mischief in question has been 
increased or newly introduced through the closer massing 
and more complicated relations of human beings which the 
development of industry and civilisation brings with it ; or 
because mischiefs of long standing have been unveiled by 
the increased insight of advancing science, or possible 
remedies hitherto imknown have been pointed out 

We have now to note further that the principle which 
limits governmental interference to the prevention of 
mutual interference among the governed, if maintained on 
utilitarian groimds, requires for its justification two distinct 
fundamental assumptions,— one of which belongs rather to 
psychology, while the other is purely sociological. It is to 
the first of these that chief attention has been paid ; and it 
is this which is mainly important when the discussion 
relates to 'paternal interference. When the question is 
whether Grovemment should coerce individuals in their 
own interest, it is argument enough on the negative side, 
if it be granted that, in the matter under discussion, men 
may be expected in the long run to discover and aim at 
their own interests better than Government will do this 
for them — from their better opportunities of learning what 
conduces to their own welfare, or from their keener and 
more sustained concern for the attainment of this ; while, 
further, this habit of self-help will give not only know- 
ledge, but also self-reliance, activity, enterprise. 

But, granting all this to be true, it by no means follows 
that an aggregate of persons, seeking each his private 
interest intelligently, with the least possible restraint, is 
therefore certain to realise the greatest attainable happiness 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 145 

for the aggregate. It is, indeed, obvious that if the mode of 
action on the part of any one such individual which is 
really most conducive to his own interest diverges from that 
which is most conducive to the interest of all, then the 
more completely he is left free to pursue the former end, 
and the more skill he shows in the pursuit, the more 
certain it is that he will not promote the latter in the 
highest attainable degree. Hence, to complete the theoretical 
argument for laisser /aire, we require, besides the psycho- 
logical proposition that every one can best take care of his 
own interest, to establish the sociological proposition that 
the common welfare is best attained by each pursuing ex- 
clusively his own welfare and that of his family^ in a 
thoroughly alert and intelligent manner. 

Now this latter proposition has been maintained, in a 
broad and general way, by the main tradition of what is 
called " orthodox political economy," since its emergence in 
France in the middle of the last century. The argument 
may be briefly stated thus : Consumers generally — i,e, the 
members of the community generally, in their character 
as consumers — seeking each his own interest intelligently, 
will cause an effectual demand for different kinds of pro- 
ducts and services, in proportion to their utility to society ; 
whHe producers generally, seeking each his own interest 
intelligently, will be led to supply this demand in the most 
economic way, each one training himself or being trained by 
his parents for the most useful — and therefore best rewarded 
— services for which he is adapted. Any excess of any 
class of products or services will be rapidly corrected by a 
fall in the price offered for them ; and similarly any defi- 
ciency will be rapidly made up by the stimulus of a rise. 
And the more keenly and persistently each individual — 
whether as consumer or producer — pursues his private in- 
terest, the more certain will be the natural punishment of 

^ So far as the interests of children are concerned, we require the farther 
assumption that they can be safely left to the care of parents until the 
children are able to provide for themselves : but for simplicity I omit this 
point here. 

L 



146 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

inertia or misdirected effort anywhere, and the more com- 
plete consequently will be the adaptation of social efforts to 
the satisfaction of social needs. 

Now no one who, under the guidance of Adam Smith 
and his successors, has reflected seriously on the economic 
side of social life can doubt that the motive of self-interest 
does work powerfully and continually in the manner above 
indicated ; and the difiiculty of finding any substitute for 
it, either as an impulsive or as a regulating force, constitutes 
the chief reason for rejecting all large schemes for recon- 
structing social order on some other than its present in- 
dividualistic basis. The socialistic interference for which, 
in the present chapter, I propose to offer a theoretical jus- 
tification is here only recommended as a supplementary 
and subordinate element in a system mainly individual- 
istic. At the same time, I think it important to show 
by general reasoning that — even as applied to a society 
of "economic men" — the sociological argimient above 
given is palpably inadequate to establish the practical 
conclusion based on it by the more extreme advocates of 
the " system of natural liberty." 

With a view to methodical clearness, it is convenient to 
begin by granting the assumption — tacitly made in the 
general economic argument that I have just given — that 
the higher market value of products and services consumed 
by the rich, as compared with those consumed by the poor, 
represents a correspondingly higher degree of utility to 
society. I shall presently point out how paradoxical this 
supposition is : but for formal clearness of discussion it is 
as well to begin by making it ; since even on this supposition 
it can, I think, be shown that there are several distinct 
cases in which, under a strictly individualistic system of 
governmental interference, the individual's interest has no 
tendency— or no suflSicient tendency — to prompt him to the 
course of action most conducive to the common interest. 

§ 2. In the first place, it should be observed that the 
argument above given, even if fully granted, would only 
justify appropriation to the labourer, and free exchange 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 147 

of the utilities produced by labour; it affords no direct 
justification for the appropriation of natural resources, which 
private property in material things inevitably involves. 
Hence, so far as this appropriation of natural resources 
restricts other men's opportunities of applying labour pro- 
ductively, the appropriation, as we have seen, is of doubt- 
ful legitimacy, from the point of view of the strictest 
individualism. It must, therefore, be regarded as theoretic- 
ally subject to limitation or regulation, in the interest of 
the whole aggregate of individuals concerned. How far this 
limitation and regulation should go must be determined by 
experience in different departments : but it may be laid 
down generally that it is the duty of Government as repre- 
senting the community to prevent the bounties of nature 
from being wasted by the unrestricted pursuit of private 
interest. Thus, for instance. Government may properly 
interfere to protect mines and fisheries from wasteful 
exhaustion, and save rare and useful species of plants from 
extermination; and, when necessary, may undertake or 
control the management of natural watercourses, with a 
view both to irrigation and to the supply of motive power. 
And I conceive that measures of a much more sweeping 
kind in the same direction — including even the complete 
abolition of private property in land — are theoretically 
defensible on the basis of individualism ; they have, indeed, 
received the support of thoroughgoing eulvocates of this 
doctrine.^ 

^ The abolition of priyste ownership of land is not only emphatically 
advocated in Mr. Herbert Spencer's early treatise on Social Staiica — which 
does not altogether represent his later views — it is also suggested as a 
probable result of industrial development in his later treatise on PolUieal 
Institutions, chap. zv. pp. 540, 541. 

I cannot regard as valid the historical reasoning which leads Mr. Spencer 
to conclude that private ownership of land, having been "established by 
force " and not by contract, is likely to disappear at a more advanced stage 
of civilisation. But I quite admit it to be possible that a modem com- 
munity, while maintaining generally the present merely individualistic 
character of its laws and institutions, may "resume the communal owner- 
ship " of land, giving due compensation to existing owners : though, for 
reasons which I have elsewhere given {Political Economy, Book iii. chap. vi. 
§ 5) I think that the economic disadvantages of such a change would out- 



148 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Secondly, individuals may not be able — at all, or with- 
out inconvenience practically deterrent — to remunerate 
themselves by the sale of the utilities which it is for the 
general interest that they should render to society. This 
may be either because the utility is from its nature in- 
capable of being appropriated, or because — though un- 
deniably important from the point of view of the community 
— ^its value to any individual is too uncertain and remote 
to render it worth purchasing on grounds of private interest. 
An example of the former is furnished by forests : since no 
private landowner who maintains a forest can, by free 
exchange exact any return for such benefit as he may 
confer on the conmiunity by its favourable influence on 
climate in moderating and equalising rainfedL The other 
case may be illustrated by scientific investigation generally ; 
since most of the advances made in scientific knowledge, 
even though they may be ultimately the source of important 
material benefits to man's estate, would hardly remunerate 
the investigator if treated as marketable commodities, and 
only communicated to private individuals who were willing 
to pay for them. 

Even where the inconvenience of selling a commodity 
would not be deterrent, the waste of time and labour that 
the process would involve may be so great as to render it 
on the whole a more profitable arrangement for the com- 
munity to provide the commodity out of public funds. For 
instance, no one doubts that it would be inexpedient to 
leave bridges in towns generally to be provided by private 
enterprise and paid by tolls. 

We have also to take account of waste of time and 
trouble in forming business connections, which seems an 
inevitable incident of a competitive organisation of business. 

weigh its advantages, at the present stage of social and political develop- 
ment. And I gather from chapters xi. and zii. and Appendix B of Mr. 
Spencer's book on Justice (also published as Part iv. of his Principles of 
Ethics) that this is now Mr. Spencer's view. 

To prevent any misunderstanding, I ought to state explicitly that both 
Mr. Spencer and I regard the proposal to confiscate the property of land- 
owners without compensation as unworthy of serious discussion. 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 149 

Definite items of this economic loss are expressed in the 
sums spent on advertisements, and in the promotion of 
joint-stock companies. But to these we have to 8uid the 
much larger though less definite waste of labour spent in 
rendering services of comparatively small utility, by traders 
who have not yet established a business connection, or who 
are slowly losing business through the pressure of competi- 
tion or of industrial change ; ^ and the similar waste in the 
case of professional services of all kinds. 

Again, there is an important class of cases in which the 
individuals have an adequate motive for rendering some 
service to society, but not for rendering as much service as 
it is in their power to render. These are cases in which 
competition is excluded by natural or artificial monopoly 
of the production or sale of a commodity. For the interest 
of the monopolist of any ware is liable to conflict very 
materially with the interest of the community ; since the 
demand for a monopolised commodity is often of such a 
nature that a greater total profit can be obtained from the 
sale of a smaller quantity, owing to the extent to which the 
price would fall if the supply were increased. The im^port^ 
ance of this case, it may be observed, tends to incretuse as 
the opportunities for monopoly grow with the growth of 
civilisation: partly from the increasing advantages of 
industry on a large scale, partly from the increasing ease 
with which combination among the members of any class 
of producers is brought about and maintained.^ 

^ It is to be added, that under competition this kind of waste may be 
more than transient : since if an uneconomic superfluity of traders has been 
once established in any department, competition may take effect in dividing 
business among them, so as to keep the price of the traders* services high 
while keeping his remuneration low. The remarkable success of artisans' 
co-operative stores renders it probable that there is much waste of this kind 
in the ordinary business of small retail traders. 

' It is noteworthy that economic arguments to prove the advantage of 
''free competition" commonly assume that the notion of free competition 
excludes monopoly resulting from combination : and yet the governmental 
interference needed to repress such combination is manifestly contrary to 
Individualism as a political principle, — so far at least as the combination is 
the result of perfectly uncoerced choice on the part of the persons com- 
bining. 



ISO ELEAfENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Combination resulting in monopoly may, as I have just 
shown, be a source of economic loss to the community. On 
the other hand, there are cases in which combined action or 
abstinence on the part of a whole class of producers is re- 
quired to realise a certain utility, either at all or in the 
most economical way : and in such cases the intervention of 
Grovernment, though not the only method of securing the 
result, is likely to be the most effective method. If, indeed, 
we could assume that all the persons concerned will act in 
the most intelligent way, the matter might be left to volun- 
tary association ; but in any community of human beings 
that we can hope to see, the most we can expect is that the 
great majority of any industrial class will be adequately 
enlightened, vigilant, and careful, in protecting their own 
interests: and where the efforts and sacrifices of a great 
majority might be rendered useless by the neglect of one or 
two individuals, it would be dangerous to trust to voluntary 
association. The protection of land below the sea -level 
against Hoods, or of useful animals and plants against 
infectious diseases, are cases of this kind which we have 
already noticed. 

And the ground for governmental interference is still 
stronger if the very fact of a combination among the great 
majority of an industrial class to attain a given result 
materially increases the inducement for individuals to stand 
aloof from the combination. Thus, if it were ever so clearly 
the interest of shopkeepers to close their shops on Sundays 
or other holidays, provided the closing were universal, it 
would still be very difficult to effect the result by purely 
voluntary combination ; since the closing of a great number 
of shops would obviously tend to throw custom into the 
hands of the few who kept their shops open. 

Even where the need of uniformity is not imperative, 
voluntary combination is likely to be found inadequate for 
the attainment of results of public importance, if the interest 
of any individual in such results is indirect and uncertain ; 
— as may easily be the case even though the public interest 
is plain and undeniable. 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 151 

Finally, there are certain kinds of utility which Govern- 
ment, in a well-ordered modem community, is peculiarly 
adapted to provide. Thus, being financially more stable 
than private individuals and companies, it can give com- 
pleter security to creditors ; and is thus specially adapted 
to undertake banking and insurance for the poor, and to 
bear the responsibilities of a paper currency for the com- 
munity generally. So again, it enjoys special facilities for 
collecting and diffusing useful statistical information, — a 
point of growing importance in modem communities. 

§ 3. I have said enough to show that, even in the more 
or Jess ideal society of intelligent persons which is contem- 
plated in the traditional argument for laisser faire, there is 
no reason to suppose that a purely individualistic organisa- 
tion of industry would be the most effective and economical. 
And the reasons above given largely explain and justify the 
extent to which in modem States the provision of utilities 
— other than security from wrong — is imdertaken byGrOvem- 
ment in the name of the community, or subjected to special 
governmental regulations, instead of being left to private 
enterprise ; on the ground that the interests of the whole 
conmiunity will be better promoted by this arrangement. 
Thus certain portions of the surface of the globe — the 
original raw material and instrument of industry — have 
always been held in conmion, as obviously more useful when 
open to common use and enjoyment, and \mder common 
management, so far as management is needed: and the 
labour required to keep them in good condition has been 
imposed or provided by Grovemment. Koads, and commons 
for recreation, come under this head : also seas and large 
rivers, in which navigation and fishery have been common 
to all, under governmental regulation ; also forests to a con- 
siderable extent. And it is to be noted that, in certain 
important respects, the need of systematic governmental 
intervention to modify man's physical environment tends 
to grow as the cultivated area of land extends with grow- 
ing civilisation: as in the case of interference with the 
natural flow of surfietce waters, with a view to better irriga- 



152 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

tion and drainage, and in that of the artificial maintenance 
of forests, especially needed on high tablelands and mountain 
slopes. 

Further, in modem civilised communities generally, the 
private ownership of land is held to be limited by a general 
right of the community to take compulsorily the land of 
any individual, when required for the most economic attain- 
ment of an important public utility, at the value that it 
would have had apart from this public need : ^ and in recent 
times this right has been exercised in very important cases, 
— the most important being the construction of the artificial 
roads and waterways which have transformed modem trade 
and industry. It is true that canals and railways have 
been largely constructed by private entei-prise; but they 
have usually needed for economical construction the inter- 
vention of Government to give the power of buying land 
compulsorily: and as this power has been granted on 
account of the public utility of the enterprise, the manage- 
ment of canals and railways — even where it has been left 
in the hands of private companies — has been placed under 
governmental regulation, and assumed a semi-public char- 
acter. That a certain amount of such regulation is legiti- 
mate and required in the interests of the community, is 
admitted even by leading advocates of laisser faire. 
Whether governments should actually imdertake the con- 
struction and management of railways is a more doubtful 
question, on which there has been much divergence in 
practice : still, important — though not decisive — arguments 
for this measure are furnished by (1) the value to a political 
community of facilities for mutual intercourse and rapid 
communication among its different elements ;^ and (2) the 
economic advantage of a coherent organisation of railway 
traffic, and the consequent tendency of railways to fall 
more and more under the conditions of partial monopoly, so 

^ See chap. xii. § 2. 

' It should be observed that so far as this value lies in the increased ease 
of maintaining order, it comes rather under the head of the "indirect 
individualistic " interference discussed in the preceding chapter. 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 153 

that many of the advantages of competition are lost to the 
public 

On similar grounds the business of conununication by 
letters and telegrams has been found suitable for Grovemment 
— chiefly through the economic gain that results from 
having the whole work done by a single organisation : «uid 
it is, in fact, undertaken by almost all modem governmenta 
So again, the ordinary advantages of competitive industry 
can hardly be realised in providing for the water-supply 
and — by modern methods — for the lighting of towns: 
accordingly, these businesses, in modern times, tend to 
assume a semi -public character, being either undertaken 
by municipal governments or subjected to special govern- 
mental regulation. Further, modern governments uni- 
versally monopolise coinage, and regulate in some degree 
the business of banking: — interventions chiefly justified 
by the great public importance of giving security and 
stability to the current medium of exchange. 

In a wide sense of the term, these and similar kinds of 
governmental interference may all be called " Socialistic " in 
principle ; since they tend to narrow the sphere of private 
property and private enterprise, by the retention of resources 
and functions in the hands — or under the regulation — of 
Grovemment as representing the community. Such inter- 
ference dififers very much in intensity in dififerent cases; 
according as Government (1) merely regulates, and perhaps 
subvents, or (2) itself undertakes a department of business, 
or (3) establishes a legal monopoly of the business in its 
own favour — as in the case of the post-office in England. 
But the term " Socialistic " may be fairly applied to this 
kind of intervention, whatever its degree of intensity, if it 
is used in simple opposition to " Individualistic." This 
meaning of the term, however, must be carefully dis- 
tinguished from another — and I think more common — 
meaning, in which " Socialism " is understood to imply 

^ For the purposes of the present discussion, it is not necessary to consider 
the distribution of functions between ctnlral and local governments ; which 
will be discussed in a later chapter. 



154 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

a design of altering the distribution of wealth, by bene- 
fiting the poor at the expense of the rich. For though 
such effects on distribution may in some cases result from the 
measures above mentioned, their primary aim is not to give 
advantage to one section of the community at the expense of 
another, but to secure benefits to the community as a whole 
which tend to be distributed among its members generally 
— though in a way difficult exactly to trace and apportion. 
§ 4. The same may be said of much of the public 
expenditure that most modem communities recognise as 
desirable for the promotion of education, general, technical, 
or professional So far as public funds spent on education 
tend to make labourers more efficient, though the labourers 
will be thereby enabled to earn more wages, the employers 
of labour and the consumers of its products will, generally 
speaking, share in the gain resulting from the increased 
efficiency; so that we may regard such expenditure as 
primarily designed to benefit the commimity as a whole by 
improving its production, though much of it has also an 
important tendency to mitigate the inequalities in the dis- 
tribution of wealth. It may perhaps be objected that if 
this expenditure were really profitable to the community, 
it would be remunerative to individuals to \mdertake it, and 
it might therefore be left to private enterprise. But this 
does not necessarily follow ; since the labourers in question 
or their parents may be imable to provide the requisite 
means, while the difficulty of making effectual contracts with 
the labourers or their parents, and the trouble and expense 
of enforcing such contracts, may suffice to render the pro- 
vision of such means an undesirable speculation for other 
private individuals. On similar grounds, the expenditure 
of public money in transferring human beings from over- 
populated to imderpopulated regions, within the territory 
of the same community, may be ultimately profitable to the 
community as a whole, from the increased efficiency of the 
labour thus transferred, although it would not present a 
profitable sphere for private enterprise.^ 

^ The conditions under which such expenditure is to be recommended 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 155 

The question of public provision for education is not, 
however, commonly viewed in relation to industrial eflBciency 
alona It is widely held to be in the interest of the 
community at large — and not merely of the poorer classes 
primarily benefited — that public funds should be employed 
in the moral and intellectual improvement of its members 
generally, by the maintenance of religious teaching and 
worship, and the promotion of scientific and literary culture, 
through the means not only of schools for the young, but 
also of museums, libraries, and imiversities for adults. So 
far as this view is sound, all such expenditure may be 
classed as Socialistic in the wider sense above explained. 

The propriety of governmental provision for, £tnd regula- 
tion of, moral and religious teaching will be more suitably 
discussed after we have considered the general relations of 
Law and Morality.^ The promotion of secular culture might 
doubtless to a great extent be adequately provided for by 
private enterprise, if the aim of benefiting the poorer classes, 
by bringihg about a more equal distribution of the capacities 
and opportunities of living cultivated lives, were left out of 
consideration. Still a considerable amount of public ex- 
penditure under this head may be justified, apart from any 
such distributioTuil aim. In the first place, as we have 
already observed, the social utility furnished by scientific 
discoveries is generally unsaleable, except in the cases in 
which it can be immediately turned to account in some 
technical invention : it is therefore reasonable that a certain 
number of persons who have proved themselves capable of 
advancing knowledge^ should receive salaries from public 
funds : and that public provision should be made for the 

and the distribution of the burden it imposes, will be discussed hereafter, 
when we come to treat of the expansion of States. See chap, xviii. § 4. 

^ See chap. xiii. § 4. 

^ I do not mean physical science alone : the general argument used would 
support the endowment of any branch of knowledge which may reasonably 
be expected to furnish ''fruit," beyond the mere gratification of refined 
curiosity. Whether the mutual relations of the different branches of know- 
ledge are such that none could be properly excluded from the benefit of this 
argument, is an interesting question which I have not space to discuss here. 



154 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

a design of altering the distribution of wealth, by bene- 
fiting the poor at the expense of the rich. For though 
such efifects on distribution may in some cases result from the 
measures above mentioned, their primary aim is not to give 
advantage to one section of the conmiunity at the expense of 
another, but to secure benefits to the commimity as a whole 
which tend to be distributed among its members generally 
— though in a way diflScult exactly to trace and apportion. 
§ 4. The same may be said of much of the public 
expenditure that most modem communities recognise as 
desirable for the promotion of education, general, technical, 
or professional So far as public funds spent on education 
tend to make labourers more efficient, though the labourers 
will be thereby enabled to earn more wages, the employers 
of labour and the consumers of its products will, generally 
speaking, share in the gain resulting from the increased 
efficiency; so that we may regard such expenditure as 
primarily designed to benefit the community as a whole by 
improving its production, though much of it has also an 
important tendency to mitigate the inequalities in the dis- 
tribution of wealtL It may perhaps be objected that if 
this expenditure were really profitable to the commimity, 
it would be remunerative to individuals to imdertake it, and 
it might therefore be left to private enterprise. But this 
does not necessarily follow ; since the labourers in question 
or their parents may be unable to provide the requisite 
means, while the difficulty of making effectual contracts with 
the labourers or their parents, and the trouble and expense 
of enforcing such contracts, may suffice to render the pro- 
vision of such means an undesirable speculation for other 
private individuals. On similar grounds, the expenditure 
of public money in transferring human beings from over- 
populated to underpopulated regions, within the territory 
of the same community, may be ultimately profitable to the 
community as a whole, from the increased efficiency of the 
labour thus transferred, although it would not present a 
profitable sphere for private enterprise.^ 

^ The conditions under which such expenditure is to be recommended 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 155 

The question of public provision for education is not, 
however, commonly viewed in relation to industrial eflBciency 
alona It is widely held to be in the interest of the 
community at large — and not merely of the poorer classes 
primarily benefited — that public funds should be employed 
in the moral and intellectual improvement of its members 
generally, by the maintenance of religious teaching and 
worship, and the promotion of scientific and literary culture, 
through the means not only of schools for the young, but 
also of museums, libraries, and universities for adulta So 
far as this view is sound, all such expenditure may be 
classed as Socialistic in the wider sense above explained. 

The propriety of governmental provision for, £tnd regula- 
tion of, moral and religious teaching will be more suitably 
discussed after we have considered the general relations of 
Law and Morality.^ The promotion of secular culture might 
doubtless to a great extent be adequately provided for by 
private enterprise, if the aim of benefiting the poorer classes, 
by bringihg about a more equal distribution of the capacities 
and opportunities of living cultivated lives, were left out of 
consideration. Still a considerable amount of public ex- 
penditure under this head may be justified, apart from any 
such distributioncU aim. In the first place, as we have 
already observed, the social utility furnished by scientific 
discoveries is generally unsaleable, except in the cases in 
which it can be immediately turned to account in some 
technical invention : it is therefore reasonable that a certain 
number of persons who have proved themselves capable of 
advancing knowledge* should receive salaries from public 
funds : and that public provision should be made for the 

and the distribution of the burden it imposes, will be discussed hereafter, 
when we come to treat of the expansion of States. See chap, xviii. § 4. 

^ See chap. xiii. § 4. 

^ I do not mean physical science alone : the general argument used would 
support the endowment of any branch of knowledge which may reasonably 
be expected to furnish "fruit/* beyond the mere gratification of refined 
curiosity. Whether the mutual relations of the different branches of know- 
ledge are such that none could be properly excluded from the benefit of this 
argument, is an interesting question which I have not space to discuss here. 



156 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

costly instruments required for the effective performance of 
scientific research : — such as libraries, museums, laboratories, 
observatories, and their equipment. Again, the expenditure 
of money on educational machinery, to bring opportunities 
of good scientific instruction within the reach of children 
of comparatively poor parents who show decided scientific 
ability, may be justified by the consideration of the increased 
chance thus obtained of scientific discoveries and technical 
inventions valuable to the commimity at large. Similarly, 
the provision for literary and artistic instruction given by 
pubUc maintenance of libraries and picture gaUeries, and 
endowment of teachers and students, may be expected to 
benefit the commimity at large by aiding the development 
of talents that might otherwise have been crushed beneath 
adverse circumstances. Moreover, though there is no such 
need of providing salaries for artists and men of letters 
generally, as we have seen in the case of savants, since the 
utility of artistic products can be appropriated and sold ; 
still, apart &om any special consideration for the poor, it 
would seem that the advantage to the community of the 
best obtainable appliances for artistic and literary instruc- 
tion and study has too indirect and remote a connection 
with the interests of individuals to be safely left altogether 
for private enterprisa Up to a certain point, then, in 
all these cases, the benefit of the community as a whole 
may be taken as the primary aim of the intervention of 
Grovemment. 

§ 5. Finally, I may remind the reader that — as we have 
had occasion to notice in earlier chapters — governmental 
intervention in the interest of the commimity, going beyond 
the mere protection of individuals from mischief, takes place 
to an important extent in different departments of civil 
law, as determined in modern states generally. Sometimes 
the occasion for intervention arises on points which do not 
strictly fall within the limits of the application of the 
individualistic principle, or cannot be clearly determined by 
it ; — as in the case of the regulation of land tenure, especi- 
ally in countries incompletely populated, and some of the 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 157 

limitations on free bequest. In other cases the interest of 
the community at large, as understood in all civilised 
countries, is held to override the conclusions to which a 
consistent individualism would lead. A case of this latter 
class, in the department of property, is found in the 
limitation in time of literary copyright, as compared with 
the perpetual protection given to the right of property in 
material things : since the only tenable grounds for treating 
the ideal products of intellectual labour differently &om the 
products of labour " embodied " in matter lie in the obvious 
increase of utility to the commimity that results from the 
termination of the literary producer's monopoly, together 
with the absence of any danger, in the case of valuable 
literary products, that their utility may be diminished 
through want of care, — as is largely the case with the 
material products of labour. But the most important 
interventions of this kind occur in the department of 
contract. Thus, in the whole law of bankruptcy in modem 
states, the fundamental individualistic rule of enforcing 
reparation for the breach of a contract freely entered into 
is manifestly overridden by considerations of general utility. 
Still more important are the restrictions on the freedom of 
connubial contracts, imposed by the marriage laws of modem 
communities generally ; and along with these I may class 
any legal restraints on the sexual intercourse of unmarried 
persons, and prohibitions of the sale of pictures, books, eta, 
provocative of sexual desire ; since all such interferences 
with freedom are, I conceive, ultimately justified by the 
paramount interest that the community has in providing 
for the proper rearing of children. In all these cases, and 
others that might be mentioned, the interest of the com- 
munity at large — as distinct from that of the individuals 
primarily concerned — supplies both the general justification 
for the legislative and administrative interference required, 
and the criterion by which any particular questions relating 
to such interference should be determined. 

§ 6. Let us now turn to consider how far the action of 
government should be directed to the end which would be 



1$$ ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

commonly called "socialistic" in a narrower sense than that 
in which I have so far used the term, — the diminution of 
the marked inequalities in income which form so striking a 
feature of modern civilised societies. Here, first, it should be 
observed that some effect of this kind tends to be produced 
by any successfid assumption of industrial fimctions by 
Grovemment : since the most marked inequalities of private 
wealth are due — directly or indirectly — to the unequal dis- 
tribution of capital (including land); and any successfid 
extension of the industrial functions of Grovemment tends 
to increase the stock of capital owned by the community, 
and reduce the field of employment for private capital. 
Accordingly, a main aim of current Socialism in its extremest 
form — ^we may distinguish it as Collectivism — is to substi- 
tute common for private ownership, and governmental for 
private management, of the instruments of production in all 
important departments of industry : so that the payment of 
interest on industrial capital may cease and " labour receive 
its full reward." Such a scheme has much attraction for 
thoughtful and sympathetic persons; not only from its 
tendency to equalise wealth, but also from the possibilities 
it holds out of saving the waste and avoiding the unmerited 
hardships incident to the present competitive organisation 
of business; and of substituting industrial peace, mutual 
service, and a general diffusion of public spirit, for the 
present conflict of classes and selfish struggles of individuals. 
In discussing this scheme from the point of view of 
general theory, it will be well not to complicate the issue by 
supposing the change to be introduced suddenly or with 
violence: we may suppose it to take place gradually, with 
due regard to the rights of existing proprietors of the instru- 
ments of production. As so considered, the question of its 
expediency primarily turns on a comparison of governmental 
management of business with private competitive manage- 
ment: and it is reasonable to suppose further that, 
before the final transition to Collectivism takes place, our 
experience of the qualifications of Government for carrying 
on different kinds of industry will have been materially 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 159 

increased by partial extensions of its sphere of action. It is, 
I think, quite conceivable that, through improvements in 
the organisation and working of governmental departments, 
aided by watchfid and intelligent public criticism — together 
with a rise in the general level of public spirit throughout 
society — the results of the comparison above mentioned will 
at some future time be more favourable to governmental 
management than they have hitherto been. At present, a 
wide experience would seem in most cases to support 
strongly the judgment of the overwhelming majority of 
political economists in favour of private competitive manage- 
ment of industry carried on under ordinary conditions : as 
securing an intensity of energy and vigilance, an eager 
inventiveness in turning new knowledge and new oppor- 
tunities to account, a freedom and flexibility in adapting 
industrial methods to new needs and conditions, a salutary 
continual expurgation of indolence and imthrift, which 
public management cannot be expected to rival in the 
present state of social morality, and for the loss of which it 
cannot compensate, except under specially favourable con- 
ditions We may therefore infer that — leaving out of 
account the disturbances of the transition — the realisation 
of the CoUectivist idea at the present time or in the 
proximate future would arrest industrial progress ; and that 
the comparative equality in incomes which it would bring 
about would be an equality in poverty: — even supposing 
population not to increase at a greater rate than at present, 
as it must be expected to do if work and adequate sustenance 
were secured to all members of the community, imless 
measures of a novel and startling kind were taken to 
prevent the increase. 

A full discussion, however, of Collectivism, including a 
critical exposition of the economic arguments urged in 
favour of it, would be out of place here: it falls more properly 
within the sphere of Political Economy. But there is an 
important part of the work actually undertaken by modem 
governments which must be admitted to be " socialistic " in 
the narrower sense of the word: that is, which has for its 



i6o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

main object — I will not say " the equalisation of wealth," as 
that would suggest an aim to which the means used are 
wholly disproportionate, but — the mitigation of the harshest 
inequalities in the present distribution of incomes. The 
most obvious examples of this are to be found in the large 
expenditure incurred in various forms for the relief of the 
indigent ; but I conceive that a part at least of the expendi- 
ture on education which modem states generally agree to 
regard as desirable has been undertaJ^en on this ground, 
and requires this for its justification. And there is a strong 
drift of opinion at the present time in favour of further 
legislation in this direction. I propose, therefore, — without 
considering in detail the adaptation of means to ends in 
particular measures of this kind, or the special dangers and 
drawbacks attending them — to point out certain general 
considerations which must to some extent govern our esti- 
mate of the expediency of all such scheme& 

In the first place, it seems to me indubitable that the 
attainment of greater equality in the distribution of the 
means and opportunities of enjoyment is in itself a desirable 
thing, if only it can be attained without any material sacri- 
fice of the advantages of freedom. I cannot accept the 
assumption — so far granted for the sake of simplifying the 
discussion — that the utility to the community of services 
rendered to the rich may be measured by their market 
value: I conceive, on the contrary, that the support of 
common sense may be claimed for Bentham's view, that 
any given quantum of wealth is generally likely to be 
less useful to its owner, the greater the total of private 
wealth of which it forms a part. It is an accepted economic 
principle — illustrated by the general effect of an increase 
of supply on the price of any article — that the utility of a 
given quantum of any particular commodity to its possessor 
tends to be diminished, in proportion as the total amount of 
the commodity in his possession is increased ; and Bentham's 
proposition is merely an extension of this principle to the 
aggregate of commodities which we call wealth. 

There are, no doubt, counterbalancing considerations 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE i6i 

which ought not to be overlooked Any great equalisation 
of wealth would probably diminish the accumulation of 
capital, on which the progress of industry depends; and 
would deteriorate the administration of the capital accumu- 
lated; since the most economic organisation of industry, 
under existing conditions, requires capital in large masses 
under single management, and the management of borrowed 
or joint-stock capital is likely to be, on the average, inferior 
to that of capital owned by the manager. Moreover, the 
efifective maintenance and progress of intellectual culture — 
which is a necessary condition of its efifective dififtision — 
seems to require the existence of a numerous group of 
persons enjoying complete leisure and the means of ample 
expenditure ; since the disinterested curiosity that is the 
mainspring of the advance of knowledge, and the refinement 
of taste that leads to the development of art, can hardly 
find free play and the fostering influence of sympathy except 
within such a group, although they may be foimd in a high 
degree in individuals outside it. 

Still, after allowing all weight to such arguments as 
these, I cannot doubt that at least a removal of the extreme 
inequalities, found in the present distribution of wealth 
and leisure, would be desirable, if it could be brought 
about without any material repression of the free develop- 
ment of individual energy and enterprise, which the 
individualistic system aims at securing. When from 
this point of view we examine the various legislative 
measures which have a "Socialistic" aspect — in the narrower 
sense of appearing to aim at a diminution of inequalities of 
wealth — we find that they diflfer very markedly in the 
manner and degree in which they come into conflict with 
the principle of Individualism. Some of these measures 
must be admitted to diminish the inducements to industry 
and thrift, without any counterbalancing tendency to stimu- 
late labour by enlarging its opportunities ; they simply and 
nakedly take the produce of those who have laboured 
successfully to supply the needs of those who have laboured 
unsuccessfully or not at all. I am afraid that the English 

M 



i62 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

system of poor relief — though it has many merits that 
ought not to be undervalued or lightly lost — must be 
admitted to have this fundamental defect. Others again 
involve restrictions on freedom that are frankly and uncom- 
promisingly anti-individualistic; to this class belongs the 
proposal to fix by law a maximum length of day's labour for 
adults — so far as this prevents any individual labourer from 
rendering the amount of service to society which he and his 
employer agree in thinking it their common interest that he 
shoidd render.^ But there are other measures designed for 
the benefit of the poor which do not come under either of 
these heads ; measures of which the primary aim is not to 
redistribute compidsorily the produce of labour, but to 
equalise the opportunities of obtaining wealth by productive 
labour, without any restriction on the freedom of adults. 
State aid to emigration is an example of this class, and a 
part at least of the expenditure on education must be held 
to belong to it. Now measures of this kind, however 
Socialistic, are not in their primary aim opposed to Indi- 
vidualism ; since we obviously increase instead of diminishing 
the stimulus to self-help and energetic enterprise by placing 
a man in a position to gain more than he could otherwise 
have done by the exercise of these qualities. In fact, in the 
general reasoning by which political economists have tried 
to prove that laisser /aire supplies the greatest possible 
stimulus to the development of useful qualities, equality 
of opportunity has often been tacitly assumed — or at least, 
the loss to the community arising from the restricted oppor- 
tunities of large masses has been tacitly overlooked. So far 
as the community, acting through its government, can 
equalise opportimities, without doing harm in any other way, 

^ Such a measure may be justified — on the principle applied in justifying 
a compulsory weekly holiday — if the excess of daily labour prevented is 
ii\jurious to the labourer's efficiency, so that the average effectiveness of a 
day*s labour might be expected not to be materially diminished by the 
restriction. But so far as the admitted effect of the measure is to diminish 
materially the amount of daily service rendered by the labourer to society, 
I think that no government ought to take the responsibility of causing the 
consequent loss of wealth to individuals and to the commimity as a whole. 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 163 

such interference actually gives greater scope for the admitted 
advantages of the individualistic system to be attained. 

" But/* it may be said, " this equalisation of opportimities 
— ^as e.^. by State aid to education or to emigration — in- 
evitably costs money and usually a good deal of money, 
which has to be raised by taxation ; and thus in its taxa- 
tional aspect it comes to be opposed to the individualistic 
principle, though it may not be so in its primary aim. A 
portion of A's income has to be taken to enable B to labour 
under better conditions, and in this way that absolute 
security to the fruits of the individual's labour, at which 
individualism aims, is inevitably impaired." 

This argument, however, ignores the fact — pointed out 
in a previous chapter ^ — that the institution of private pro- 
perty as actually existing goes beyond what the individual- 
istic theory justifies. Its general aim is to appropriate the 
results of labour to the labourer, but in realising' this aim 
it has inevitably appropriated natural resources to an extent 
which, in any fully peopled country, has entirely discarded 
Locke's condition of "leaving enough and as good for 
others." In any such country, therefore, the propertied classes 
are in the position of encroaching on the opportimities of 
the unpropertied in a manner which — however defensible as 
the only practicable method of securing the residts of labour 
— yet renders a demand for compensation justifiable from 
the most strictly individualistic point of view. It would 
seem that such compensation may fitly be given by well- 
directed outlay, tending either to increase the efficiency and 
mobility of labour, or to bring within the reach of all 
members of a civilised society some share of the culture 
which we agree in regarding as the most valuable result of 
civilisation: and in so far as this is done without such 
heavy taxation as materially diminishes the stimulus to 
industry and thrift of the persons taxed, this expenditure 
of public money, however justly it may be called Socialistic, 
appears to be none the less defensible as the best method of 
approximating to the ideal of Individualistic justice. 

^ See chap. v. § 2. 




i64 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 7. But such provision as has been found practicable for 
equalising opportunities of labour is not, in any modern 
state, sufficient to protect the whole population from the 
evils of extreme indigence. In most modern states an 
important percentage of the popidation are, at any given 
time, temporarily or permanently incapacitated from provid- 
ing themselves with the necessaries of life. In many cases 
no doubt this incapacity is due to some kind of marked ill 
desert — such as drunkenness, or loss of employment through 
neglect of duty — and in many other cases it might have 
been avoided by an exercise of prudence not undidy severe. 
But in an important minority of instances the affliction of 
indigence is due to misfortunes which the persons afflicted 
cannot reasonably be blamed for not foreseeing ; and even 
where this is not the case, probably few individualists are 
able to regard starvation as the appropriate penalty for im- 
providence, or even for worse faidta At the same time, the 
inexpediency of leaving the relief of indigence entirely to 
unsystematised private almsgiving — liable as that is to " do 
too much or too little," and to be largely imposed upon — 
is now generally recognised. It seems, therefore, that the 
problem must be taken in hand by Government in some 
manner and degree. On the other hand, the simple course 
of securing the indigent adequate relief from public funds 
— even if such relief is limited to the bare necessaries of life 
— involves the risk of a serious diminution of the induce- 
ments to industry and thrift in the case of persons struggling 
on the verge of indigence 

The grave difficulties of the problem thus presented to 
Government are recognised by all thoughtful persons, and it 
is not surprising that widely different methods should be 
proposed, and to a great extent adopted by different Govern- 
ments, in dealing with these difficulties. The plan involving 
the minimum of divergence from individualism is that in 
which Government maintains an agency for the systematic 
and careful relief of indigence, but requires the relief given 
to be provided mainly by voluntary contributions. This, 
speaking broadly, is the French system ; it has the advan- 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 165 

tage of avoiding, so far as it operates, the demoralisation 
and waste caused by mendicity and unregulated private 
almsgiving, without incurring the evils of forcing the in- 
dustrious and thrifty to contribute to the support of the 
idle and improvident. But its efi&ciency, depending as it 
does on the adequacy of the spontaneous gifts of individuals, 
is inevitably precarious; and, where imprisonment is an 
ordinary punishment for crime — as it is in modem states 
generally — this system, if exclusively adopted, would always 
be liable to the objection that the Government guarantees 
to criminals a provision for their physical needs which it 
refuses to non-criminals. This objection is avoided by the 
English plan; which secures adequate sustenance from 
public funds to all persons who are in complete destitution, 
while it aims at minimising the encouragement thus ofiTered 
to idleness and unthrift by attaching imattractive — though 
not physically painful — conditions to the public relief given 
to ordinary adult paupers. Practically, it succeeds better 
as regards industry than thrift. So far as able-bodied men 
are concerned, experience has shown that the required com- 
bination of unattractiveness with sufficiency of provision 
for physical needs is attainable by insisting that the 
recipient of relief shall submit to the constraints of a 
" workhouse." But the system has hitherto failed to bring 
about the general provision against old age, which — for the 
most part — ^might be made without difficulty even by 
unskilled labourers in the period of early manhood, if they 
were content to defer marriage for a moderate term of years. 
Further, it would be unpractically severe to insist on the 
condition of entering the workhouse in the temporary dis- 
ablement of breadwinners through sickness or accident; 
while to dispense with it even in these cases involves a 
serious discouragement to providenca These evils are 
avoided by the (Jerman method — so far as it can be applied 
—of compulsory insurance against sickness, accidental dis- 
ablement, chronic infirmity, and old aga This method, it 
may be observed, involves governmental interference, which 
is in one aspect greater than that entailed by the English 



i66 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

method, since the provision compnlsorily made extends to 
labourers generally, whereas the English system only pro- 
vides for the destitute : on the other hand, the method of 
compulsory insurance is, from another point of view, less 
anti-individualistic, so far as the burden of the provision is 
thrown on the persons who receive the benefit of it.^ 

Probably a carefid combination of the three methods that 
I have briefly distinguished — regidated private almsgiving, 
public relief, and compulsory insurance — would at present 
give us the practically best plan of dealing with the 
problem of pauperism. How the whole function of poor-relief 
should be distributed among the three methods is a question 
that arouses a steadily increasing interest at the present 
time ; but it is difficult to give to it a general theoretical 
answer of any value.* Here I will only say that the proper 
nature and limits of governmental action for the relief of 
indigence must largely depend upon (1) the actual extent 
and effectiveness of voluntary association among the citizens, 
and (2) on the amoimt of philanthropic effort and sacrifice 
habitually devoted by private persons to the supply of 
social needs, and the wisdom with which these efforts and 
sacrifices are directed. A similar observation may be made 
in reference to other departments of the interference of 
Government, which I have called "socialistic" — whether 
in the wider or the narrower sense of the term. Thus 
we actually find that the promotion of education and 
culture, and the cure of diseases, have been largely provided 
for in modem civilised communities — though to an extent 
varying very much from one state to another — by the dona- 
tions and bequests of individuals. So far as these needs 
can be adequately met in this way, there is an advantage in 
avoiding the necessity for additional taxation, which hardly 

^ This is only partially the case in the system actually adopted in 
Germany. It would be nearly attained if the plan of insurance against 
sickness and old age, which has for many years been ably and energetically 
advocated by Canon Blackley, were successfully carried into effect. 

" Perhaps in a few years* time important light will have been thrown on 
this question by the fuller experience which will then have been obtained 
of the working of the recent German legislation. 



X SOCIALISTIC INTERFERENCE 167 

needs demonstrating, but which will be brought prominently 
before the reader's mind in the course of the next chapter. 
And it ought here to be noted that if the State intervenes 
at all in any department that has been hitherto left to 
private beneficence, there is a serious danger of the latter 
withdrawing from it, unless the spheres of action appro- 
priate to the two agencies respectively are well and clearly 
defined ; since men who will spend money freely to provide 
for a social need which would otherwise remain unprovided 
for, will not be equally disposed to spend it to reduce the 
drain on the public treasury. 

Before concluding, I may again remind the reader that 
governmental axjtion has certain disadvantages of which the 
precise nature and importance will vary with variations in 
the structure of government, and in the relations established 
— whether by constitutional law or constitutional morality 
— between the governors and the governed. I mean such 
disadvantages as (1) the danger of overburdening the govern- 
mental machinery with work,^ (2) the danger of increasing 
the power capable of being used by governing persons op- 
pressively or corruptly, (3) the danger that the delicate 
economic functions of government will be hampered by the 
desire to gratify certain specially influential sections of the 
community : — for instance, when legislation is in the hands 
of a representative assembly, the more the functions of 
Gk)vemment are extended in a socialistic direction, the 
greater becomes the risk that contested elections will 
exhibit an immoral competition between candidates pro- 
mising to procure public money for the benefit of particular 
classes and districts. When, along with these dangers, we 
take into accoimt that the work of government must be 
done by persons who — even with the best arrangement for 
effective supervision and promotion of merit — can only have 
a part of the stimulus to energy and enterprise which the 

^ As I shall explain in chapter zix. the disadvantages of increasing 
the work of government may be in some cases avoided by placing public 
funds and functions in the hands of private corporations under govern- 
mental supervision. 



i68 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, x 

independent worker feels, it will be easily understood that 
we are not justified in concluding that governmental inter- 
ference is always expedient, even where laisser /aire leads 
to a manifestly unsatisfactory result ; its expediency has to 
be decided in any particular case by a careful estimate of 
advantages and drawbacks, requiring data obtained from 
special experienca 

Note. — It has seemed to me meet oonvenient to reserve the consideration 
of govemmenta] interference with foreign trade — of which the reader may 
naturally expect to find a discussion in the present chapter — until I come to 
treat of the '* Principles of External Policy " (chap, zviii.) 



CHAPTEE XI 

THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 

§ 1. A century ago, it appeared to a thoughtful writer ^ that 
the institution of Government — however indispensable under 
existing conditions — must inevitably die out before the 
advance of human reason ; and even now, when the pendulum 
of thought has swung in the opposite direction, the extreme 
fanatics among social reformers appear to be still divided — or 
hesitating — between " Anarchy and Panarchy." These wild 
imaginings do not concern us : but it is important to bear 
in mind that the cost in coercion, money, and services, that 
is generally required to keep up any part of the work of 
government, is in itself a sacrifice from a social point of view ; 
and that consequently, in determining the limits of govern- 
mental interference in any particular case, on the lines which 
our previous discussion has drawn, the consideration of this 
cost is never to be overlooked, and may be of decisive import- 
ance : — since here, as in private affairs, the question whether 
a certain utility should be sought in a certain way may 
depend on the price that has to be paid for it. At this 
point, therefore, it seems desirable that we should take a 
general view of (1) the restraints which it is needful to 
place on private individuals, in order to protect Grovernment 
against attack, and to render its discharge of its functions 
more efiicient,* and (2) the manner in which the personal 

* See Godwin's PolUieal Justice, Book V. chap. xxiv. 

^ The restraints to be placed on Government, to secure the protection of 
private individuals against governmental oppression or extortion wiU be more 
conveniently considered in the second part of the treatise. 



I70 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

services and the material commodities required for govern- 
mental work should be obtained. 

Under the first head we may begin by assuming that 
the life, health, reputation, etc., of persons exercising govern- 
mental functions will receive protection similar to that 
afforded to private individuals by such a system of law as 
has been sketched out in the preceding chapters : and we 
may make a similar assumption with regard to the land or 
other wealth which Grovernment manages as " public pro- 
perty," — either as being necessary to the performance of 
governmental functions, or most generally useful when 
held in public ownership. These points need no argument : 
and it is also obvious that any overt resistance to govern- 
mental officials in the discharge of their legitimate functions 
should be effectively repressed : — though, of course, when 
such an official has exceeded his lawful functions in apply- 
ing coercion to any private individual, reparation should 
be made to the latter for any injury he may have suffered 
from the unlawful aggression, and punishment should be 
inflicted on the aggressor if his excess has been wilful or 
grave. It is more doubtfid how far a private person is to 
be held justified in resisting what he believes to be unlaw- 
ful aggression on the part of a governmental official, just 
as he would resist similar aggression on the part of a 
private individual. It seems most simple and logical to lay 
down that an official acting illegally loses all advantage of 
his official character, so far as this action is concerned : still 
there are important grounds for limiting the right of self- 
defence more narrowly where the apparent aggressor is an 
officer of government. For a conflict of force between a 
private person and a governmental officer is more disturbing 
and dangerous to social order than a similar conflict between 
private persons ; again, in the former case there is a general 
presumption that the apparent aggressor is better acquainted 
with the limits of his legitimate functions than the private 
individual whose right he apparently invades : finally, re- 
paration is somewhat more secure ^ in the case of aggres- 

^ I assnme, of course, a state of society in which the relations of govern- 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 171 

sion by a governmental officer than it is in the case of 
private aggression, since the private aggressor may escape. 
On the whole, then, it would seem expedient that the legal 
right of self-defence against aggressions of governmental 
officials should, as far as possible, be limited to cases in 
which the illegitimacy of the official's attack is manifest and 
unmistakable, or the injury threatened irreparable. 

I have been speaking above of strictly legal rights of 
resistance, as conceivably exercised against subordinate 
officials. The consideration of the moral ^ right of private 
persons to resist oppressive action on the part of a supreme 
organ of government will come more properly at a later 
stage of the discussion; for which I also reserve the 
important question how far special restraints should be 
imposed on freedom of speech and freedom of association of 
private individuals in order more completely to guard against 
the danger of seditious resistance to the supreme govern- 
ment.^ 

Leaving the question of open resistance and incitement 
to resistance, it may be laid down further that any attempt 
to prevent or pervert the exercise of any governmental 
powers by bribing or in any way threatening the officials 
concerned should be severely repressed ; and, generally, any 
dangerous attempt to throw obstacles directly or indirectly 
in the way of the discharge of governmental fimctions 
should be prohibited imder penalties, unless for special 
reasons it should appear that such penal interference would 
be likely to be attended with evils outweighing its ad- 
vantages. The most difficult question under this latter 
head relates to the assistance that relatives and friends are 
prompted to render to criminals desirous of escaping justice. 
Such assistance should certainly be viewed generally as a 

ment and governed are so far well ordered that the supreme government may 
be trusted to repair wrongs committed by its subordinates. The constitutional 
means for securing this result vrill be considered in the latter part of this 
treatise. 

^ As we saw (chap, ii.), there can hardly be a strictly legal right of 
resisting a supreme legislative organ of government. 

' See chaps, zzvii. § 6, zxviii. § 2, and sxx. § 8. 



172 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

breach of social duty ; but to punish it with unrelenting 
rigour would bring the law into harsh — and somewhat de- 
moralising — collision with the affectionate feelings and 
habits of mutual service which powerfully move men to aid 
near kinsmen or intimate friends in distresa On the whole, 
it is probably best to reserve the punishment of "accessories 
after the fact " for the gravest class of crimes, and even in 
this case to exempt from punishment the mutual secret aid 
of husbands and wives, or children and parents. 

§ 2. Let us now proceed to a general survey of the means 
by which the personal services and material commodities 
required by government are to be provided. It must be 
admitted that, in some respects, this survey would come 
more appropriately after we have discussed the external 
relations of political communities, and the important govern- 
mental functions connected with them; — since, in most 
modem states, the larger share of the cost of government is 
caused by these functions. On the other hand, however 
largely the expenditure of government may be due to its 
external relations, the burden of providing the required 
supplies must fall almost entirely within the community : 
foreign tributes, whether exacted politically or — under ex- 
ceptional circimistances — obtained by taxing foreign trade, 
can rarely amount to more than a small fraction of such 
supplies.^ I propose, accordingly, to introduce the discussion 
of the resources of government here ; though in so doing I 
must take a more extended view of governmental work than 
that which has so far been brought before us. 

The commodities required by government may be 
divided into (1) Personal services, (2) Material products of 
labour, and (3) Natural resources, especially land and its 
contents. Of these the third class may have belonged to 
the commimity from the first, and never have been permitted 
to be appropriated by individuals : it is only with regard to 
the first two classes that the questions necessarily arise 

^ I do not of course mean that large revenues may not be raised by taxes 
on imports : but that it is only under exceptional circumstances that 
foreigners can be made to bear the burden of such taxes. 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 173 

whether they are to be obtained (a) voluntarily or com- 
pulsorily, (6) gratuitously or by purchase. For the higher 
parts of the work of government, if they do not involve 
continuous and fatiguing labour, the required services are 
likely to be obtainable without either compulsion or 
pecuniary emolument ; as the dignity and power attached 
to such work renders it sufficiently attractive to a sufficiently 
large class. Whether this arrangement is desirable depends 
chiefly on the further question whether it is expedient that 
the work should be wholly or mainly in the hands of persons 
of comparative wealth and leisure : — a question of which 
the consideration belongs rather to the second part of this 
work which treats of the structure of government. And 
similar considerations are important in the more numerous 
cctses in which either compulsion or payment is necessary to 
obtain the required services. Thus one of the reasons 
commonly alleged for making service on juries compulsory 
in England, is that the particular judicial functions allotted 
to the jury would be less satisfactorily performed if they 
were allowed to fall into the hands of a limited and quasi- 
professional class of persons. 

So again, it is urged in favour of compulsory military 
service, that it diminishes the constitutional dangers involved 
in the existence of a large standing army, since conscripts 
are less likely than professional soldiers to be seduced into 
subserving the ends of unconstitutional ambition. Still I 
conceive that where compulsory military service is rightly 
introduced, the decisive reason in its favour is the economic 
reason, that the army required is too large to be raised 
by voluntary enlistment except at a rate of payment which 
would involve a greater burden in the way of taxation 
than the burden of compulsory servica For where the 
nimiber of soldiers and sailors required for warlike pur- 
poses is not Isurge in proportion to the population, and can 
be obtained for moderate remimeration, voluntary enlist- 
ment has great advantages from a utilitarian point of view ; 
since it tends to select the persons most likely to be efficient 
soldiers and those to whom military functions are least 



174 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

distasteful ; both which advantages are lost by the adoption 
of the compulsory system. Accordingly, no one would pro- 
pose to apply this system to the police or civil service in 
any modem State. 

At the same time, where there is no regular compulsion 
to military service, the duty of aiding personally, if required, 
in the defence of the community against foreign enemies, 
ought to be recognised as incumbent upon citizens gener- 
ally: since no one can say how much of the available 
physical force of the community may be imperatively 
needed in a crisis of war, and it is desirable that whatever 
demands may be made upon it should be cheerfully and 
promptly met. Similarly, the aid of private persons — not 
in governmental employment — may be on exceptional 
occasions needed for the maintenance of order, and for the 
prevention, detection, and punishment of crime : accordingly, 
a general obligation to render such services, when required 
to do so by lawful authority, should be legally established : 
though the general economic advantages of "division of 
labour " render it expedient that these functions should be 
(as far as possible) left in the more expert hands of a 
carefully organised and disciplined body of governmental 
employees. 

Even where military service is compulsory, the support 
and equipment of all, except a comparatively small minority 
of well-to-do persons, must be defrayed from the funds of 
the community : and it is obvious that whatever services the 
public obtains voluntarily must receive adequate remunera- 
tion from the same funds — except in the case of the 
dignified and comparatively unfatiguing posts before men- 
tioned, or where the services are only occasional, and demand 
but a small expenditure of tima 

Similarly, the cost of the material products of human 
labour required for governmental use, whether purchased or 
manufactured in governmental establishments,^ must be 

* (JeneraUy speaking, it is best that Government should obtain by pur- 
chase the material products of labour that it requires, owing to the general 
superiority of private industry, under the condition of open competition. 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 17s 

borne by the public treasury: and where they are pur- 
chased it is generally expedient that they should be obtained 
by free exchange at their market- value : as any compulsory 
reduction of the price paid for them would either discourage 
their production or would be an inconvenient way of 
indirectly taxing the consumers of similar products. 

The case is otherwise when the commodity required is 
not due to human industry : — i.e. land or some part of the 
contents of land, in an unlaboured condition. Here, 
however, the practical question often is, not how the 
Grovernment is to be supplied with such commodities, but 
rather how far it is desirable that it should retain possession 
of them. For, as we saw, in newly occupied territory, all 
the land with its contents is rightly treated as originally 
the property of the community : and actually much of the 
land that now belongs to the public, in modem European 
communities, has never been strictly private property ; while 
other portions have been the private or semi-private property 
of royal families, and have thus gradually acquired the 
character of public property, as the monarchy changed from 
a feudal or semi-feudal to a modern institution. No doubt 
where there are valid reasons for retaining such land in 
public ownership — whether because it is required for the 
due performance of governmental functions, or because it is 
likely to be more useful under governmental management — 
there would also be strong reasons for acquiring it, if it 
were in private hands: only where it is already public 
property, the question whether it is to be obtained com- 
pulsorily or by voluntary exchange does not arise. Where, 
however, this question does arise, I hold it expedient in the 
special case of land that the community should have the 
right of compulsory purchase ; because there is nothing to 
be gained here — as there is in the case before discussed of 

But in the case of costly articles of which Govermnent is the only consumer 
— such as cannons and ironclads — the advantages of competition may be 
difficult to obtain : and there may be special preponderating reasons in 
favour of governmental manufacture, — as when the quality of the article is 
very important and at the same time difficult to test if obtained by purchase, 
or where systematic and costly experiments in production are required. 



176 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 



the products of labour — ^by allowing the owner of land to 
profit by the special need of the community.^ 

§ 3. The peculiar relation of the community to land, as 
contrasted with other species of wealth, appears again when 
we consider the sources from which the funds required for 
governmental purchases are to be obtained. For one such 
source, historically of much importance, is the rent of the 
land So far as this rent is a price paid for utilities that 
are not due to human labour, — or are an indirect result of 
labour spent for other objects, and incapable of being appro- 
priated by the persons whose labour has caused them,^ — 
the appropriation of such rent by government on behalf of 
the commimity is theoretically quite in harmony with in- 
dividualistic principles: but the difl&culty of securing for 
public uses this " imearned '' rent without at the same time 
confiscating the earnings of himian labour and enterprise is 
very great, and perhaps insuperabla And in any case, 
where land has become private property, the financial opera- 
tion required to transfer its unearned value to public owner- 
ship, with due compensation * for existing rights, could not 
be safely undertaken, unless the time at which the com- 
munity would enter upon the enjoyment of its ownership 
were postponed to a distant date : so that for this reason 
alone — apart from the difficulty before noticed — the plan of 
defraying any considerable part of governmental expenditure 
from the rent of land is not within the range of practical 
politics for modern States generally. 

We may therefore assume that by far the greater part 
of the funds required by Government must be raised, in the 
long run, by the contributions levied from private persons 
which we may broadly call taxes. But large supplies may 
be obtained temporarily, by Grovemment as by individuals, 
through loans : and, in fact, a considerable part of the taxes 

^ This question wiU be more discussed in the next chapter. 

* As, for instance, when the successful introduction of a new manufacture 
into a district causes an increase of population, and a consequent rise in the 
value of neighbouring land generally. 

' I have already said that the proposal to take it without compensation 
does not seem to me to deserve discussion. 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 177 

now levied in most of the leading European States is re- 
quired to pay interest on such loans. Speaking broadly, 
such borrowing is legitimate forgovernments under conditions 
similar to those under which it would be prudent for private 
persons : either (1) when the loan is employed productively, 
so that interest may be paid and a certain portion of the 
principal annually repaid out of the profit made by the use 
of it; or (2) where it is employed to meet an occasional 
necessity for enlarged consumption, which could not be met 
without painful sacrifices out of the income of a single year. 
Productive outlay, again, may be either financially profitable, 
when the loan is employed in some business carried on by 
Government, of which the profits go directly to the treasury ; 
or it may be only profitable socially by increasing private 
incomes : in the latter case it has to be considered whether 
the extra taxes which it will necessitate will not involve 
disadvantages outweighing the gain. At any rate the in- 
creased receipts accruing to the community in consequence 
of such outlay ought obviously to be at the very least suffi- 
cient to repay the loan with interest by the close of the 
period required to exhaust the productive effects of the outlay. 
A similar general principle is, I think, theoretically incon- 
trovertible in the — ^practically more important — case of 
unproductive borrowing to meet an occasional need of extra 
expenditure : the number of years over which the sacrifice 
imposed by the emergency may safely be extended ought to 
be limited by the condition of paying off the loan before a 
similar emergency may be expected to occur again. But in 
practice the application of this principle is very difficult : 
since the chief emergencies which necessitate such loans are 
foreign wars, and we have at present no means of forecasting 
scientifically the magnitude and frequency of a nation's 
future wars. In these circumstances, it seems most prudent 
to infer the probability of future wars from past— especially 
recent^-experience : and if so, the principle above laid down 
is certainly too much neglected by the nations of modern 
Europe : — a neglect which can only be partly excused by 
the probability that the future increase of national wealth 

N 



178 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and the tendency in the rate of interest to fall will reduce 
the burden of any national debt already contracted. 

To discuss more in detail the effects of loans, or the 
right mode of raising them, would be inappropriate in such 
a work as this. And it also seems to me best, in passing 
to consider the central question of this chapter — the ques- 
tion of taxation — to omit such topics as seem appropriate 
rather to treatises on political economy or on technical 
finance. Accordingly, I shall not discuss the applications 
of the elementary maxims that "every tax ought to be 
levied at the time or in the manner in which it is most 
likely to be convenient for the contributor to pay it," and 
that every tax ought to be so contrived as to inflict as little 
extra sacrifice as possible on the contributor, over and 
above the sacrifice of the money that it brings into the 
public treasury.^ I will only observe that in carrying out 
the latter maxim we have to consider not only the expense 
to Grovernment of collecting taxes, and the trouble and 
annoyance entailed by the process of collection, but also the 
economic loss to the community that may be caused by the 
effect of the tax in modifying the processes of industry and 
trade : indeed, it is to this latter kind of loss that special 
attention should be directed by theoretical writers, as it is 
more liable to be overlooked. But it belongs rather to tlie 
political economist to develop the importance of this con- 
sideration, and to apply it to particular cases : in a treatise 
on General Politics what most concerns us is to seek for a 
clear view of the equitable principles on which the burden 
of taxation should be distributed. 

§ 4. We may conveniently begin by trying to define a 
"tax." The widest notion attached to the word would 
seem to be " a compulsory payment to Government that is 
not penal " : only it must be observed that what we agree 
to call " taxes " on consumable commodities are for the most 

^ These are, substantially, the third aud fourth of Adam Suiitli's famous 
maxims : but the statement of the fourth has been modified in order that its 
scope may more legitimately include the " trouble, vexation, and opj)ro8siou " 
which Adam Smith docs actually make it include. 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 179 

part not absolutely CM^mpulsory, as any individual may escape 
them by abstaining from the consumption of the com- 
moditie& On the other hand, we certainly do not include 
under the term " tax " all payments made by those who 
purchase any commodity of which the sale is controlled by 
Government: for we do not ordinarily consider ourselves 
taxed by the charge for postage-stamps — except so far as it 
exceeds the market-price of the service of conveyance for 
which the charge is made ; though it is neither more nor 
less compulsory than the charge for a receipt-stamp, which 
is undoubtedly a tax. In short, a payment for a govern- 
mental service not priced above its market-value is not 
commonly reckoned a tax, if rendered to the payer by his 
own choice, even though (jovernment has a monopoly of 
such servicea And it is, I think, doubtful whether even a 
compulsory payment of this kind, for a specific service 
definitely appropriated to the payer — for instance, a com- 
pulsory rate for water supplied by the (jovemment, not 
exceeding the market-value of the supply, — would ordinarily 
be called a " tax." I think usage here becomes imcertain. 
But, in any case, whatever term we might use, I think that 
we should be broadly agreed as to the equitable principle 
for apportioning such payments for specific services capable 
of being definitely appropriated to the payers : it would be 
held that the payment ought to be proportioned to the 
amount of the service ^ rendered, as closely as is consistent 
with the most economic management of the business of 
rendering such servicea 

These considerations lead us to one interpretation of 
the accepted principle of "equality of taxation." It is 
obvious that the " equality " here spoken of is a proportional 
equality of some kind : — it is not meant that every one 
should pay the same sum ; — and since, in a well-governed 
community, all taxes are payments for services rendered by 

^ There would be less agreement as to whether '^ amount of service *' is to 
be measured by cozt or utility : and the difference between the two measure- 
ments still leaves a considerable margin of possible variation. See my 
Political Economy f Book III. chap. viii. § 4. 



i8o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Government to the governed, it seems in accordance with 
equity that the distribution of the payments should corre- 
spond as nearly as possible to the distribution of the 
servicea And I think that this principle should certainly 
be adopted, so far as there is a substantial and definitely 
ascertainable inequality in the benefits conferred by the 
action of Government on different sections of the com- 
munity : for instance, it should be applied in defraying the 
cost of roadmaking and other improvements, and generally, 
in determining the division between general and local taxa- 
tion. But I regard it as only applicable to a very slight 
extent, in the case of the most important, and actually most 
costly, fimctions of government : because the utilities pro- 
vided by these functions cannot be apportioned, with even 
approximate exactness, among the individual members of the 
community. And this is, I think, implicitly recognised in 
the common use of the term " tax " : since it is just in the 
cases where the individual's payment to Government fails to 
correspond to an individtudised governmental service, that 
the applicability of the term is most clear and unmistakabla 
Take, as a leading example, the case of defence against 
foreign foes : considering the general mildness — ^as regards 
individuals — of modern civilised warfare, it cannot be main- 
tained that the main object of warlike expenditure is the 
direct protection of the life and property of individuals: 
and though it is undeniable that different classes in the 
community are personally interested in very different degrees 
in the maintenance of national existence, or national honour, 
or prestige or power — or in the defence of particular 
territories or treaty-rights, — it would be idle to attempt 
to frame an estimate of these different degrees of in- 
terest which could be taken as a basis of distribution of 
taxation. 

So, Again, it is no doubt true that (e.g.) judges and 
policemen are continually engaged in rendering specific 
services to certain individuals : but since — as Bentham and 
Mill urge — " those who are under the necessity of going to 
law are those who benefit least, not most, by the law and 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT i8i 

its administration/' it would be manifestly unjust that the 
cost of the judicature and the police should fall exclusively 
on the persons who are compelled to demand their direct 
assistance. And it seems impossible to apportion with any 
exactness the benefits of " law and order " among the rest 
of the community, who are indirectly protected by judges 
and policemen. At the same time, I think that the 
principle of proportioning payment to services rendered 
may reasonably be applied, to some extent, in defraying the 
general cost of protecting property : — as («.^.) by making 
the payment of stamp duties on instruments and records of 
transfer a necessary condition of the admission of such 
documents as evidence in courts of justice. But stamp 
duties are a very rough mode of proportioning payment 
exacted to protection given : and at any rate as regards the 
greater part of the taxation of a community, we have to 
seek for some other principle. 

§ 5. The most obvious principle of equitable distribution 
of taxation — ^assuming that apportionment in the ratio of 
service rendered is excluded — seems to be that of simply 
equalising, as far as possible, the burden or sacrifice that 
taxation imposes on individuala Adam Smith's maxim 
that taxation should be proportioned to income or revenue 
is perhaps designed to realise this principle : but reflection 
will show that the realisation can only be very imperfect ; 
since the needs of different classes of contributors with equal 
incomes are very different, and the sacrifices imposed by con- 
tributions proportioned to income tend to differ accordingly. 
In the first place, needful expenditure on the instruments of 
a man's handicraft, trade, or profession, should obviously be 
subtracted from his income before it is estimated for the 
purposes of proportionally equal taxation : on the other hand, 
the line between this and expenditure for enjoyment is often 
obscure, especially in the case of professions — the library of 
a teacher or writer, the carriage of a physician, the travels 
of an artist, are partly sources of professional earnings, but 
partly also of enjoyment. More important still and more 
obvious is the greater burden imposed on fathers of families 



i82 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

as compared with bachelors by the same tax : and here we 
may also notice the greater proportional burden — incomes 
being the same — of the worker who has to save for children, 
or his own old age, as compared with the owner of capital. 
Most important of all is the severer burden that taxation 
proportioned to income throws on the poorer classes, so far 
as it tends to reduce their expenditure below the standard 
required for health or efficiency. Indeed, if equalisation of 
burden were the sole consideration, the equity of a graduated 
ratio of taxation, rapidly increasing as incomes rise, could 
hardly be denied : the serious objection to such a measure 
lies in the danger of economic loss to the whole community 
caused by checking accumulation or driving capital from the 
country. There is no similar danger in what has been called 
a " degressive " as distinct from a " progressive " taxation : 
that is, taxation graduated at the lower but not the upper 
end of the scale of incomes, so as to be roughly proportioned 
not to total income, but to income minvA necessary expendi- 
ture. And there is a strong argument for adopting this 
degressive graduation, in a community where indigence is 
relieved from public funds. For if Government risks some 
of the evils of communism in order to secure the poorest 
citizens from want of the necessaries of life, consistency 
requires that it should not endeavour to take by taxation 
from the poor who remain independent a part of what it 
would have to give them if they sought its aid : and if, on 
this ground, we exempt from taxation incomes below a 
certain minimimi, it would be unreasonable to tax those 
just above this minimum in proportion to income, — since 
persons who could only earn a little more than the mini- 
mum would thus be liable to lose the whole of what they 
earned. 

These considerations would lead us to treat as taxable 
only that portion of any individual's income that is not 
required to provide necessaries either for the personal con- 
sumption of himself and those dependent on him, or for the 
efficient performance of his work. But, owing both to 
the difficulty of defining necessaries and the complicated 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 183 

di£ferences in the needs of different persons,^ it would be 
practically impossible to carry out this principle with even 
approximate accuracy by any method of direct taxation.' 
Probably the best method of realising it is by taxing small 
incomes only indirectly, through taxes on consumable articles 
that are not necessaries; — ^a method which has the ad- 
vantage of enabling those persons whose needs are greatest 
to lighten their own burden by abstinence not dangerous to 
health ; though it must be admitted that it is also Uable 
to entail serious inequalities, from the variations in taste, 
constitution, and habits of different consimiers. Still 
this objection is less important, as we must in any case 
be content with a very rough approximation to equality 
of burden. 

In taxing commodities, it is generally expedient to select 
articles of which the consumption is not likely to be restricted 
to any great extent by the tax ; since all such restrictions 
tend to cause loss of utility to the public over and above 
the gain to the treasury. But some restriction is inevitable : 
hence the special advantage of taxing commodities like 
alcoholic liquors and tobacco, which tend to be largely con- 
sumed in excess of what is salutary. It is to be observed, 
however, that the normal expenditure on such commodities 
usually absorbs an increasing proportion of the consumer's 
income as we descend in the scale of wealth : to balance this, 

^ It would be seriously misleading to estimate the expenditure of the 
poorest class on the necessaries of life, and take this as a standard above 
which expenditure in any class was to be regarded as non-necessary ; since a 
larger part of the expenditure of the higher income-classes is expenditure 
which could not be pretermitted without economic detriment to society. 
For in the case of all skilled labour, from the highest to the lowest, pro- 
vision has to be made for the more or less prolonged education of the future 
labourers, and for their prolonged support while being educated : and the 
minimum of economically necessary consumption must be proportionately 
increased. Further, after education has been finished, a material part of 
the expenditure of the higher classes of workers, besides what is required 
for their physical support — e.g. on books, instniments, conveyances, etc, — 
is also either economically necessary or at least highly conducive to economic 
efficiency. 

' There are also technical objections to an income-tax extending to smaU 
incomes, owing to the comparative costliness of the process of levying it. 



1 84 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

therefore, we shall require further taxation of the middle 
and upper classes — either directly, by an income-tax in the 
narrower sense, or by taxation of the special luxuries of 
such classes. On the other hand, under a system which 
combines direct taxation with indirect taxation of luxuries 
largely consumed in excess, we cannot simply estimate the 
burdens imposed by taxation on difiPerent classes from the 
amounts which they respectively pay to the treasury. For 
firstly, direct taxation being inevitable, is a greater burden 
than an equal amount of taxation volimtarily incurred by 
purchasing commodities ; — though the amount of the extra 
burden cannot be definitely calculated. Secondly, we have 
to allow for the extra contribution levied by indirect taxes 
from those who consume in excess alcoholic liquors or 
similar dangerous luxuries : for the moderate drinkers in 
any class have obviously no claim to be regarded as over- 
taxed because their class includes a minority of drunkards 
who materially increase the total consumption of the class.^ 
Under these conditions, exact justice is not attainable in 
the distribution of the burden of taxation among different 
income-classes ; and probably the best thing to aim at is an 
approximate proportionment of the contributions of difTerent 
income-classes to their total incomes, all direct taxation 
of the poor, and all taxation of necessaries, being carefully 
excluded. 

So far I have assumed that the burden of taxes — whether 
direct or indirect — will be borne by the persons on whom 
Government designs to impose it ; and, speaking broadly, 1 
think this will be the case with the system of taxation so 
fetr suggested. I do not conceive that any considerable 
part of this taxation has any important tendency to be 
transferred from the persons on whom it is intended to be 
imposed to other classes in the community, whether it takes 
the form of an income-tax in the narrower sense, or that of 
taxes on commodities ; — so far as these latter are practically 

' To recognise the drunkards themselves as having such a claim would 
be obviously inconsistent with the principle on which these dangerous 
luxuries are selected for taxation. 



XI THE MAINTENANCE OF GOVERNMENT 185 

paid by the consumer, which may be taken to be in the 
main the case with taxes imposed for revenue only, when 
they have been some time established.^ A new tax on any 
article of luxury is doubtless liable to fall to some extent 
on those who supply the article ; which is a reason on the 
ground of equity for avoiding frequent changes in this 
department. 

The clearest case of transfer of burden is that of a special 
tax laid on land (or any other species of durable wealth). 
It would be clearly contrary to equity to impose such a tax, 
in a modem commimity — except as payment for special 
utilities furnished by Government to landowners, etc. ; but, 
supposing such a tax to have been imposed some time ago, 
then to whatever extent land has been sold since it was 
imposed, the injustice would not be repaired by taking it oflT 
now ; since, so far as the tax is taken into account by the 
purchaser, it practically remains a burden on the original 
owner even after the sale, and not on the purchaser.^ 
Hence such a tax, when of old standing, should be regarded 
as a portion of rent reserved by the community, and not 
taken into accoimt in distributing the burden of taxation. 

It seems also right to treat taxes on inheritance as quite 
sui generis ; since neither the economic nor the equitable 
considerations that ought ordinarily to be decisive in dis- 
tributing taxation are applicable to this case — at least in 
the ordinary manner and degree. In the first place. Govern- 
ment, by taking a portion of what would otherwise have 
come to a man by inheritance, in no way diminishes the 
motives that prompt him to produce and accumulate wealth 

^ A certain share of the burden of such taxes ¥dll be borne by the owners 
of land or other natural agents employed in the production of the com- 
modities taxed : and this should receive consideration in any fresh taxation 
of the kind. But this share will not generally be large or definitely ascertain- 
able in the case of taxes of old standing imposed for revenue only : and it 
need the less be taken into account in the case of such taxes for the reason 
given in the next paragraph. 

^ I do not take account of transfers by inheritance ; since, where children 
have inherited, it may reasonably be supposed that they would have got 
more if there had been no tax : so that they may fairly be regarded as stiU 
paying it. 



i86 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xi 

— if anything, it tends to increase these motives ; nor does 
it necessarily cause even any disappointment of expectations, 
except when the tax is first imposed. A heavy tax on in- 
heritances may indeed diminish the inducements of pro- 
spective testators to industry and thrift : but its bad effect 
in this way is not likely to be considerable, so long as such 
taxation is kept within the limits which the danger of 
evasion by gifts from the living to the living practically im- 
poses on the financier : and this latter danger will generally 
be much less where there are no children or other direct 
descendants to inherit. Hence it seems expedient, in the 
case of these taxes, to give up the ordinary aim at equality 
of incidence, so far as to tax more heavily wealth inherited 
by others than direct descendants. But if so, we can hardly 
include these taxes in our general distribution of the burden 
of taxation on the equitable principles above laid down : 
and, on the whole, it seems best to treat them as a special 
burden on the propertied classes — inheritances below a cer- 
tain value being exempted. Such an arrangement has the 
advantage of conceding something to the equitable claim 
for a graduated income-tax, without incurring any serioiis 
danger of checking accumulation. 



CHAPTEE XII 

GOVERNMENTAL ENCROACHMENTS AND COMPENSATION 

§ 1. We have now completed the survey, commenced in 
chap, iii., of the internal operations of government, and 
the principles on which these operations ought to be 
conducted. We first adopted the assumption, generally 
accepted in modern political thought, and realised in 
modem systems of law, that what the adult members of 
any State require from their Grovemment is mainly security 
from mischief and interference caused by other men, includ- 
ing breach of engagements freely contracted ; — security given 
primarUy by maintaining laws that prohibit aU such mis- 
chief or interference, and inflicting punishment or exacting 
damages for their violation. We then examined the different 
general considerations which appear to justify various kinds 
and degrees of further governmental interference with in- 
dustry, and with the action of private individuals generally ; 
sometimes to carry out more effectively the principle of 
protecting individuals from mischief caused by others; 
sometimes, though rarely, in the interest of the individuals 
interfered with ; sometimes, again, to secure for the com- 
munity — either by regulating or by undertaking industrial 
operations— <5ertain utilities which private competition does 
not tend to provide satisfactorily ; sometimes to enable the 
poorer members of the community to apply their labour 
more productively, thus compensating for the encroachment 
on equality of opportunity which the appropriation of 
natural agents necessarily involves ; sometimes, finally, to 



i88 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

save those defeated in the struggle for existence from the 
worst consequences of their defeat. The need of some kind 
of interference under all these heads is generally recognised 
in the practice of modem communities ; hut our discussion 
will have made it evident that very wide divergences are 
poBsihle as to the proper limits of such interference, even in 
well-ordered communities of civilised men, of which the 
governments are aiming in an intelligent and reasonable 
manner at the wellbeing of the community. 

These divergences are most manifest in the classes of 
governmental interference distinguished as " indirectly in> 
dividualistic," " paternal," and " socialistic " ; but they would 
still exist even if the operations of government were strictly 
confined to the " individualistic minimum." Thus, in trying 
to define the content of the right of property, from the point 
of view of the strictest individualism, we have had to re- 
cognise a considerable margin of doubt, — for instance, in 
the important cases of property in land, and property in 
the results of intellectual labour; and we have noted a 
similar doubtful margin, in considering the limits of con- 
tractual obligation. In the same way many doubtful points 
of importance occur — as the last chapter has shown — in 
determining the distribution of the burden of providing 
Grovernment with the resources necessary for the performance 
of its functions. Considering these actual doubts and dis- 
agreements, — and taking further into account the continual 
alterations in human relations and circumstances which may 
be expected to accompany the development of industry and 
of civilisation generally, — we must expect that important 
changes will occur from time to time in the legislative 
operations of Government, even in the most peaceful and 
well-ordered communities; and that such changes may 
materially affect the interests of individuals and frustrate 
expectations founded on the existing law. Further, even 
apart from any such general changes, the most effective 
attainment of the ends of Government in some particular 
case may require — or appear to requii^e — an encroachment 
on the rights normally secured to individuals. But by 



XII GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 189 

such encroachments on the legitimate expectations of in- 
dividuals, governments are obviously in danger of causing 
pain of disappointment, and more widely diffused evils of 
insecurity, similar to those that would be caused by the 
private invasion of legal rights which it is the primary 
concern of Government to prevent. Hence, if it be admitted 
that such encroachments are inevitable, it becomes important 
to consider how far their bad effects can be, and ought to 
be, neutralised or reduced, by compensation to the in- 
dividuals whom they tend to injura 

A systematic discussion of this question requires us to 
distinguish carefully the chief ways in which Government is 
liable to encroach on the interests of individuals. I shall 
first consider cases of encroachment on private property 
that may occur without any change in the general rules of 
governmental interference; as when a private owner is 
compulsorily deprived of some particular portion of wealth, 
on account of some special governmental need, or of its 
special fitness for governmental purposes, without any 
general change in the law relating to this kind of property. 
I shall then proceed to discuss the effects of those changes 
in the generid niles of governmental action which I have 
chiefly had in view in the preceding paragraph. Here it 
will be convenient to distinguish three cases: (1) changes 
in laws (exclusive of rules of taxation), which afifect detri- 
mentally the legally secured interests of individuals; (2) 
changes in taxation, either to obtain an increase of supply, 
or for more equitable distribution of the burden, or for 
some economic or technical advantage; (3) changes in some 
action of government in relation to industry, other than 
legal regulation or taxation. The chief example of this 
third case is the imdertaking by government of certain 
branches of industry, whether to supply governmental needs 
— as (e.^.) the need of military equipment or apparatus — or 
to furnish certain commodities to the public generally, as 
in the case of the Post-Office. 

§ 2. I begin with the case of particular encroachment, 
as that in which the claim to full compensation is most 



190 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

undoubted. It would be obviously unjust that any single 
individual should su£fer loss, merely because the State 
happens to want a piece of his land or other property ; 
and the injury to general security that such injustice would 
cause would far outweigh the pecuniary gain from it to the 
community. 

Indeed it is not clear, on strictly individualistic principles, 
that any forcible interference ought to be allowed in such 
cases as this. Why — it may be said — if an individuars 
property is wanted by the community of which he is a 
member, should not the price be determined by the " higgling 
of the market " ? In the first place, a Naboth might 
decline to give up his vineyard at any price : and then 
if the general welfare be accepted as our ultimate end, an 
urgent public need ought clearly to be regarded as a para- 
mount claim, overriding an absolute refusal to sell. Such 
a refusal, however, would be a rare case; ordinarily, the 
only danger would be that Naboth would try to make the 
community pay as much as possible for his vineyard. The 
practical question, therefore, in most cases is whether Grovem- 
ment should have the right to compel the sale of private 
property at the price it would fetch, apart from the special 
public need that occasions the compulsory purchase; or 
whether the owner should be allowed to charge an increased 
price for his property corresponding to this new demand for 
it, as he would in private bargaining. 

Now, it would be clearly inexpedient to lay down the 
general rule that private individuals are never to make 
extra profit out of the needs of the community. For the 
hope of such extra profit is the main stimulus to the com- 
petition on which the progress of industry depends ; hence 
the adoption of a rule prohibiting it would tend to paralyse 
the normal action of competition in the businesses that 
supply the needs of Government ; and the general result, in 
the long run, would be that Grovernment would be worse 
served at higher charges. But, as we have seen, when a 
business falls under the condition of monopoly, the good 
effects of competition tend to be lost. And sudden serious 



XII GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 191 

emergencies — such, for instance, as arise in war — may give 
the holders of particular commodities a temporary monopoly 
so effective as to enable them, if unrestrained, to raise their 
prices exorbitantly against the community, at a time when 
the financial exigencies of Government are likely to be great. 
Hence it may be expedient in such emergencies that Govern- 
ment should have the power of compulsorily purchasing at 
a fair price even the products of industry ; though such a 
power should be jealously limited and rarely used, owing to 
the danger above explained of paralysing competition. 

Where, however, what Government needs is land, there is 
no similar danger in compulsory purchase, since the special 
convenience of particular portions of land for particulsLr 
public uses is ordinarily of a kind that cannot be materi- 
ally increased by human labour or skill. Here, therefore, 
there seems to be no economic objection to the adoption of 
the principle that the individual should not be allowed to 
make a profit out of the special need of the community ; the 
general security of property seems to be suflftciently main- 
tained, if every landowner who is expropriated receives from 
Government in full what the value of his land would have 
amounted to, apart from the special need that is the occasion 
of the expropriation. And in applying this principle we 
must of course treat the rights of temporary occupiers 
similarly to those of owners, and include along with the land 
any buildings or other " inmiovable " products of labour that 
may be attached to the land. 

But further, if the landowner is not to gain by the 
special governmental need of his land, neither, on the other 
hand, out he to lose by it; hence it will not always be 
sufficient to give him as compensation the market price of his 
property : as it may be worth materially more to him than 
the price it would fetch in the market, either from its con- 
nection with the rest of his property or from the nature of 
the business in which it is employed. Thus, if a shopkeeper 
is expropriated, compensation is due to him for the "goodwill ' 
or business connection which he would lose by removal to 
another place. There is, however, a difficulty in applying 



192 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

this principle: for if, for purposes of compensation, we 
estimate the whole value of a thing to its expropriated 
owner, we shall in some cases have to include the purely 
subjective element of value called " pretium aflfectionis " — 
the value derived from attachment and association or peculiar 
taste ; on the other hand, if we include this element, it is 
difficult to put a limit to the claim for compensation. I 
conceive that this difficulty can only be dealt with in a rough 
way, by appljring an average outside standard: that is, 
some compensation should be given for the special subjective 
value of a thing to its expropriated owner, when it is of a 
kind likely to have this special value in the case of an 
average man, and to the extent that would be adequate in 
such an ordinary case.^ 

Hitherto I have spoken of purchase by government ; but 
the same principles of valuation should obviously be applied 
in the case of a private company formed to supply a public 
need, and obtaining on the ground of this public service 
the right of taking land at a fair price. 

Other questions arise in settling the details of any such 
compulsory purchase of land, of which the most important is 
this : Should the expropriator have the right to take more 
than is needed for his public object, supposing this additional 
portion has more value for the expropriator than it had — 
apart from the public need — for the expropriated owner ? 
It seems clear that, if it is for the public interest that the 
expropriation should take place at all, it should be as 
economical as possible consistently with justice to the 
expropriated : hence, if the expropriator is limited to what 
is strictly necessary for his public object, at least any certain 
and undoubted increment of value added by his work to 
neighbouring land may be fairly claimed as a set-off against 
the compensation that has to be paid for what is taken. 

^ It is to be observed that any such allowance of compensation in excess 
of selling value requires to be very carefully watched, as, owing to the diflS- 
culty of exactly estimating it, it involves a special danger that the public 
may be despoiled by private owners conspiring with officials to sell land (or 
other things) at an excessive price and share the plunder. 



xii GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 193 

A common example of this is the case of land taken for a 
road near a town; since the strips on either side of the 
road tend to be materially increased in their value for 
building purposes by the change. 

So far I have confined my attention to rights of property. 
But an analogous and equally valid claim of compensation 
arises in other cases in which an individual's legally secured 
expectations, having a definite value, are sacrificed to public 
convenience by the act of government. Thus, if a post in 
governmental service, which is definitely understood to be 
held on the tenure of " good behaviour," is abolished on the 
ground of economy, the holder has a right to be compen- 
sated to the full amount of his salary ; provided that he on 
his part is ready to give his services to government to the 
extent to which he would have been boimd to do so in the 
post abolished. On the other hand, if he is definitely imder- 
stood to hold his post during pleasure, he has no claim to 
compensation. 

§ 3. I now pass to the more difficult question of changes 
in general rules of law, which affect detrimentally the 
interests of individuals. 

And first, let us consider changes in respect to property : 
as being most cognate to the interferences just discussed. 
Suppose that instead of a particular thing in private owner- 
ship being compulsorily taken for a purpose of public utility, 
we have an abrogation or a new determination of the right 
of property, in respect of a certain class of things, which 
destroys or diminishes their utility to their previous owners, 
with a view to an advance in social wellbeing. There are 
many historical instances in which legal rights having a 
definite market value have been completely abrogated in 
comparatively recent times, the most important being the 
abolition of slavery in America and of serfdom in Bussia, 
and of manorial rights in other parts of Europe : and the 
question of compensation has been of great practical import- 
ance in all these instances. Approaching this question fix)m ■ 
the one just discussed, we can hardly doubt that compensa- 
tion should be given in this case also ; since the security 

o 



194 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

at which law aims is no less intensely, and of course far 
more extensively violated, if the legally secured interests 
of a particular class are sacrificed without compensation to 
the interests of the community, than it would be if an 
individual's interests were similarly invaded. 

This reasoning clearly applies to the abrogation not only 
of rights of property strictly so called, but of any rights 
legally secured that have a definite pecuniary value ; such 
as lucrative monopolies, secured to companies or individuals 
either by express grant of Government, — or by custom 
recognised as having legal validity, — and rights to appoint 
or to be appointed to lucrative posts. There is more 
doubt as to cases where the change consists merely in 
some restriction on the free use or exchange of things, or 
the exercise of any lucrative or marketable rights, that still 
remain secured to their previous owners : as when certain 
modes of treating animals are prohibited as cruel, or the use 
of the whip by overseers of slave labour before the complete 
abolition of slavery, or the payment of wages to workmen 
in commodities furnished at employers' shops, or the sale of 
advowsons except to certain persons. Any such restriction 
is likely to cause some economic loss to the person restrained ; 
but such loss will generally be diflScult to trace and define : 
and perhaps the members of a progressive community may 
be supposed to look for minor changes of this kind, and 
may within limits be fairly expected to take the bad with 
the good ; — as they are likely often to receive benefits from 
new laws for which they are not made to pay. Still, it seems 
clearly equitable that the compensation for governmental 
encroachment on the legally secured interests of individuals 
should extend to cases of restriction on the exercise of rights, 
as well as to cases of complete abrogation ; so far as (1) the 
rights in question were recognised as normally permanent, 
and (2) any part of the loss inflicted by the change is 
clearly and definitely ascertainable and considerable enough 
to constitute a substantial grievance. And at first sight it 
would seem that any such loss that is compensated at all 
should be fuUy compensated. 



XII GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 195 

There are, however, in many cases important considera- 
tions on the other side, tending to the reduction of the 
amount of compensation. The abrogation of the class 
of rights which we are considering is assumed to take 
place because the existence of these rights is opposed to 
public wellbeing. Now in such cases the degree of mis- 
chief that results from the mode of exercising such rights 
that is most profitable to their possessors may often be 
very materially reduced if the possessors of the rights 
will consent to forego a certain amount of profit. Thus, 
the most crying evils of predial slavery arose from the 
endeavour to make the utmost gain out of the slaves' 
labour: and, similarly, the evils attending the venality of 
ecclesiastical appointments are much reduced if the pur- 
chasers of such appointments are restrained by a sense of 
duty from appointing unfit friends or relatives — though of 
course this restraint may materially diminish the value of 
the right purchased. 

In any such case, as opinion becomes more and more 
unfavourable to the general existence of the rights in 
question, the moral condemnation of the persons who 
exercise them without restraint will tend to grow. 

Under these circumstances, there seems an obvious ad- 
vantage in adopting the principle that compensation will 
only correspond to what the pecuniary value of the rights 
in question would be if they were exercised in the more 
moral but less profitable way: for otherwise pecuniary 
interest would prompt selfish owners of the right, during 
the period in which public opinion is growing in the 
direction of the change, to exercise their rights to the 
utmost, in spite of the mischief, in order to establish a 
claim to larger compensation. Any such conflict between 
self-interest and current morality is clearly detrimental to 
the wellbeing of the society. 

Sometimes, however, no important line can be drawn 
between a harmful and comparatively harmless use of the 
rights in question : any use may be so decidedly mischievous 
as to be altogether condemned by the growing body of 



196 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

opinion which will ultimately sweep away the institution. 
In this case all the persons interfered with by the change 
will be in the position of having made money by practices 
which, though not strictly illegal, are yet condemned by a 
widespread — and ultimately prevalent — moral opinion, as 
opposed to the general welfara The slave-trade was in 
this position a century ago ; and up to a comparatively 
recent date the keeping of public gaming-houses, in several 
European States. 

' In such cases, when the moral condemnation is suffi- 
ciently widespread, it supplies a strong reason for limiting 
compensation to what is required to mitigate any severe 
hardship that a sudden change in the law might sometimes 
cause : since the resulting insecurity is even advantageous to 
society, so far as it diminishes the inducement to lucrative 
practices that are recognised as socially mischievous, though 
not legally prohibited. It may be urged, however, that 
there is a counterbalancing mischief in the more widespread 
though less intense insecurity that would be generally felt 
by persons engaged in industry, if any industrial class were 
liable to sufiTer an uncompensated loss of their legal rights, 
merely because a majority of their fellow-citizens had sud- 
denly become convinced that these rights were opposed to the 
public welfare. I admit some force in this argument ; but 
I cannot think that the danger it signalises is very material, 
in the case of such a change in moral opinion as I have 
above supposed. Such a change, if we may judge the future 
from the past, is likely to be of slow growth : so that any 
class affected by it will have a long period of warning before 
the moral change has its legal consequences.^ 

The reason above given for not allowing full compensa- 
tion for the gainful exercise of legal rights in a manner 
opposed to the interests of society, when such rights are 

^ In the present discussion I do not assume any particular structure of 
Qovemmont ; but it may be observed that under a settled popular Govern- 
ment the necessity of prolonged agitation to bring about a serious change in 
established legal rights will generally involve a long date of notice to the 
persons whose rights will be invaded by the change. 



XII GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 197 

altogether abrogated, applies still more strongly where such 
rights are only restricted, so as to cut off the mischievous 
part of their exercise, without interfering with the part that 
is socially advantageous. In this latter case, if the line 
between mischievous and salutary use can be drawn with 
clearness, I conceive that there will be no occasion for 
compensation, except when a sudden change would inflict 
great hardship on individuals. 

§ 4. Let us now pass to consider changes in taxation. 
Here the fundamental question is whether the design of the 
change is to get rid of the technical defects or indirect 
economic disadvantages of certain established taxes, or to 
alter the distribution of the burden of taxation in order to 
make it more equitable. In the former case equity requires 
the legislator to aim at compensating for any extra burden 
which the improvement in question will impose on particular 
classes by lightening in some other way the contributions of 
these classes to the public needs ; but the discussion in the 
last chapter will have shown that we cannot practically hope 
to attain more than a rough approximation to equity in the 
allotment of the burden of taxation. In the latter case 
there is primd fade no ground for compensation, so far 
as the change in question really carries out the design of 
the l^islature ; since it is obvious that if changes in taxa- 
tion are designedly of a distribviionod kind, — if the aim in 
making them is to carry out more exactly the principle of 
proportional equality in taxation, however this principle 
may be defined, — their aim would be defeated by giving 
full compensation to the persons who were losers by the 
change. For a similar reason, no general claim to com- 
pensation can be held to arise, in the case of changes in 
the incomes of different classes, caused by public expendi- 
ture undertaken with a view to equalisation of oppor- 
tunities ; for instance, if the increase of competition for the 
better paid positions in trade and industry, resulting from 
the extension of educational advantages to the poor, reduces 
the market value of educated labour. At the same time it 
is important, in organising public expenditure on education, 



198 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

to avoid the hardship as well as waste that may be caused 
by artificially increasing the supply of any particular class 
of skilled services, and thus preventing an adequate return 
for the labour and expense which the acquisition of the 
skill has involved. 

This leads us to consider generally the case of detriment 
caused to the economic interests of special classes of persons 
by some action of Government other than taxation or 
legislation that invades established rights. An important 
instance of this occurs when Government undertakes indus- 
tries in competition with the industries of private indi- 
viduals; or gives special facilities and encouragement for 
the undertaking of such industries. Here, I conceive, the 
only admissible claim to compensation must be rested on 
the Aegret of loss inflicted by such competition, .rather 
than on the mere fact that loss is suffered: since such 
loss is in Icvnd similar to that which, under the conditions 
of open competition, is continually inflicted on private 
individuals or companies by the success of rivals. Sup- 
pose, for instance, that a railway was made for which the 
land required was obtained by free purchase from the 
owners, without governmental interference : it is obvious 
that no one would think of expecting the railway company 
to compensate for the loss inflicted on a stage-coach com- 
pany. And if so, it does not seem that the stage-coach 
company can acquire any additional claim for compensation, 
because the land is compulsorily taken, or the railway 
made at the public expense. But, owing to the magnitude 
of the resources at the disposal of a government, it is no 
doubt a peculiarly formidable industrial rival ; care should 
therefore be taken that it does not use its giant's strength as 
a giant, so as to inflict on private industries loss much more 
severe and sudden than they would be exposed to in ordinary 
industrial competition. "Where action causing such sudden 
and severe loss cannot be deferred, it is reasonable that 
some compensation should be given to the persons damnified. 

The same general considerations appear to be applicable 
to the case of the withdrawal of advantages which have been 



xii GOVERNMENTAL COMPENSATION 199 

practically conferred on private traders by the action of 
Government, without being legally secured to the persons 
enjoying them.^ 

^ I may illustrate this case by an example of current interest in England, 
which at the same time presents a special complexity : viz. the question of 
compensation due to the owner of a public-house who is deprived of the 
right of selling alcoholic liquors. In discussing this question we have 
to distinguish between the extra element of value given by the limita- 
tion of competition that results from the licensing system and what 
would have been the value of the business if no such limitation had 
existed. Of course an exact separation between the two elements is practi- 
cally impossible ; but theoretically they stand in different relations to 
a claim for compensation. For the latter element I consider that compensa- 
tion is clearly due on the principle, and with the qualification, explained in 
the prece<ling section : since the view that alcohol-selling is to be treated 
as altogether mischievous — like slave- trading — appears to me fanatical. 
But the additional element of value due to the governmental limitation of 
competition stands on a different footing, if no guarantee of the permanence 
of this limitation was given by Government when the system was instituted. 
So far as this element is concerned, it does not seem that the traders affected 
by any change in the system have any claim to compensation for the 
pecuniary damage which the change may inflict on their property ; provided 
that the change is not made suddenly, but with the allowance of an adequate 
interval between the announcement of the change and the time of its taking 
effect 



CHAPTER XIII 

LAW AND MORALITY 

§ 1. In an earlier chapter I incidentally noticed the dis- 
tinction between Ideal Morality or the true moral code — 
by many conceived and spoken of as the " Law of God " — 
and Positive Morality, or the rules of duty supported by 
the sanctions of public opinion in any given age and 
country. It does not fall within the plan of this treatise 
to discuss the principles of the true moral code, — except so 
ffiu: as this relates to the conduct of Governments, or of 
private persons in their relations to Government. But the 
moral opinions and sentiments prevalent in any commxmity 
form so important a consideration in practically determining 
how its government ought to act, that it is desirable to 
survey briefly the general relations of Positive Morality to 
Positive Law in a modern State. 

I must begin by making more complete the general con- 
ception of " legal " in contrast to " moral " rules which was 
introduced in chap, ii I there, following Bentham and 
Austin, regarded as " legal " those rules of which the viola- 
tion is repressed, directly or indirectly, by the action of 
Government or its subordinates ; whereas the violation of a 
rule of positive morality is only pimished by general dis- 
approbation and its social consequences. This definition 
corresponds approximately to the usage of the term " law *' 
in a well-ordered society, and lays stress on a characteristic 
of fundamental importance. But this difference in the sanc- 
tions attached to legal and moral rules respectively is not 



CHAP. XIII LA W AND MORALITY 20i 

the only general and important distinction that a comparison 
of the two systems of rules shows ; there is a difierence of 
another kind in the comparative definiteness and systematic 
coherence of the two codes, to which I wish now to draw 
attention.^ 

Let us first observe that it would not be quite exact to 
define a law as a rule actually enforced by governmental 
penalties; since judges and magistrates are admittedly 
liable to err, and when they err, it would be correct to say 
that they have " mistaken the law," and applied a rule that 
is not really a part of the law of the land.^ What, then, 
precisely is the intellectual process by which a right judicial 
decision may be reached? The answers to this question 
are somewhat different in different countries and at different 
times. In such a community as we have throughout con- 
templated, I have assumed the existence of some established 
organ of legislation, some body or combination of bodies, 
whose general commands relative to the social conduct of 
members of the community will be unquestioningly applied 
^y judges and, generally speaking, obeyed by the bulk of 
private members of the community. As we saw, it does 
not follow that the rules which it is the practice of Courts 
to apply have been all derived from this source : but in 
some countries they have in the main been formally so 

^ The comparison thus drawn between'Positive Law and Positive Morality 
is of some importance, as we shall see, in respect of the practical relations 
between the two which it is the object of this chapter to discuss. Bat I 
have developed it at more length than I should otherwise have done in view 
of a subsequent discussion of lutemational Law and Morality in chap. zviL, 
for which the comparison here made appears to me an indispensable pre- 
liminary. 

' In England, indeed, a decision of the highest Court of Appeal can 
hardly be held to be inconsistent with law, since, by a professional custom 
that has now the force of law, all. other judges are bound to decide subse- 
quent cases in accordance with it ; if, therefore, it is inconsistent with law 
as it has been, the Court must be held to have practically made new law in 
pronouncing it But in countries other than England and her dependencies 
and the United States, judges are not so definitely bound to decide accord- 
ing to precedents ; so that the decision of one judge may be contradicted by 
the decision of another in a similar case, and then it will manifestly follow 
that one of the two decisions was not in accordance with law. 



202 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

derived ; that is, codes have been framed intended to cover 
the whole or chief part of the field with which judicial 
decisions have to deaL So far, then, as this is the case the 
judge's function is merely to interpret the code; if it is 
clear and complete, the process is easy and straightforward : 
but if any of the terms used in it are vague, he has to give 
them a precise meaning ; if they are distinctly ambiguous 
in ordinary use, he has to infer from the rest of the code 
which meanings are intended; if two rules in the same 
code are apparently inconsistent, he has to find out some 
means of reconciling them, or to decide which is to give 
way to the other. It will easily be understood that this 
function requires care and subtlety and trained skill, even 
in the simplest case of a code recently framed: but it 
becomes more complex and usually more difficult when 
some time has elapsed, in which the code has been im- 
portantly modified by fresh legislation ; since this not only 
increases the aggregate of rules that have to be interpreted, 
but also still more the danger of inconsistency in them, 
from the new matter introduced at different times by legis- 
latures differently composed. 

And the complexity is greater still in such a case as 
om* own, where, as we saw, a great part of the Law has had 
an origin independent of the action of the Legislature ; 
being composed partly of old customary rules gradually 
made more definite by judicial interpretation, partly of rules 
introduced by judges at an earlier stage of our history, from 
Soman law or other foreign sources, or from their own moral 
consciousnesa In this case Law presents itself as a system 
of rules, heterogeneous both in their intellectual origin and 
in the source of their obligation regarded from the judges' 
point of view, — some are binding because the Legislature 
has laid them down, others because previous judges have 
agreed in accepting them. But, whatever their origin, there 
are two conditions to which in their application as law they 
are universally subject : they must be interpreted so as to 
be mutually consistent, and cogent reasons for a decision in 
every case that presents itself must, if possible, be somehow 



XIII LA W AND MORALITY 203 

extracted from them. It is in the fulfilment of these con- 
ditions that judicial skill is shown, and in the endeavour to 
fulfil them under difficulties a certain amount of judicial 
law-making inevitably occurs from time to time ; for if two 
rules as previously defined are found to collide, or if there 
are two competing analogies equally applicable to a case 
that is not clearly included under any pre-existing rule, the 
judge is forced to give a fresh determination to the law that 
it is his aim merely to interpret. It should be observed, 
however, that the limited legislative power thus placed in 
the hands of a judge in a modern civilised community, is 
not placed there because he is selected or qualified for the 
purpose of exercising it; rather, we may say that he is 
selected and qualified for the purpose of keeping it as much 
as possible unexercised. His primary duty is to apply the 
law as it is, not to make it what he thinks it ought to be ; 
and the more conscientiously and skilfully he fulfils his 
primary duty, the more will his power of determining law 
be limited to cases that are really unprovided for or am- 
biguously provided for in the law as already determined. 
Sometimes, in such innovations the judge is doubtless in- 
fluenced by considerations of abstract equity or utility, but 
only within the strict limits above explained ; since, where 
the decision clearly most in harmony with the analogies of 
established law is plainly inexpedient, it would now be 
generally recognised as a case for the intervention of the 
Legislature. In any case, the result is that in one way or 
another, either by the authority of the judge or by that of 
the Legislature, divisions of opinion as to the right applica- 
tion of received legal rules — ^and also any marked diverg- 
ences between such rules and what is generally regarded as 
expedient — tend to be continually removed. And as the 
development of Law goes on, the function of the judge is 
confined within ever narrowing limits ; the main source of 
modifications in legal relations comes to be more and more 
exclusively the Legislature. 

§ 2. I have examined with some minuteness the process 
of development of law in a modern community, because it 



204 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

is due to the special characteristics of this process that the 
differences in such a community between Law and Positive 
Morality, when compared merely as intelligible systems of 
rules without regard to the motive for obeying them, are as 
striking and instructive as the differences in the sanctions 
attached to the two systems. We can see how law naturally 
tends to be greatly superior to Positive Morality in definite- 
ness and consistency ; since in the case of moral rules there 
is no judicial process by which doubts as to what the 
accepted rule is on any question can be authoritatively 
settled, and no legislative process by which any divergence 
from what, in the opinion of thoughtful persons, ought to be 
established morality, can be at once and decisively removed. 
And it may be observed that the differences between the 
two systems of rules, both in respect of sanction and in 
respect of systematic intelligibility, have tended to become 
more marked as modem civilisation has developed. In 
earlier stages of European civilisation, there has often been 
law in real operation, in the sense of a complicated system 
of precise rules applied to the guidance of men's conduct by 
experts whose authority is generally accepted, with little or 
no governmental force sustaining the acceptance of the 
rule&* Under these circumstances. Law approaches to Posi- 
tive Morality in respect of its sanction ; and, on the other 
side, in periods when casuistry has really flourished, — as in 
the period of the later Middle Ages, — Positive Morality has 
shown an approximation to Law in the elaborateness and 
precision of its rules. From the fourteenth century onward, 
the acumen and industry of ecclesiastical writers were largely 
occupied in working out in a quasi-legal manner a body of 
rules, to be applied in the confessional to the piuctical 

^ For iDStance, Maine, in his accoant of the ancient Irish Law developed 
by the Brchons {Early History of InstUtUions, chap, ii.), says that '*the 
process of the Irish Courts, even if it was compulsory, was at the utmost 
extremely weak ;" and *'that it is at least a tenable view that the institu- 
tions which stood in the place of Courts of Justice only exercised jurisdiction 
through the voluntary submission of intending litigants." Similarly — as I 
learn from Mr. Bryce — in Iceland in the latter part of the tenth and the 
oleventh centuries the so-called Courts of Law had no coercive force at all. 



XIII LAW AND MORALITY 205 

guidance of ordinary private members of the medieval 
community : while, before the Reformation, there was no 
disposition, at once strong, widespread, and unconcealed, to 
dispute the claim of these writers to authority in the matters 
with which they dealt. 

If we ask why this quasi-legal treatment of morality fell 
into the disrepute in which it now lies, there is a twofold 
answer to be given, — apart from the general indignation 
caused by Jesuitry, the effect of which taken alone would 
doubtless only have been transient Partly the belief came 
to be widely held that in matters of morality, speaking 
broadly, any one honest man is as much an expert as any 
other, and that it is his duty to exercise his own judgment 
and follow the light of his own conscience. Partly — so &r 
as some further enlightenment of a plain man's conscience 
was felt to be a desideratum— experience was thought to 
have shown the danger of trying to obtain this enlighten- 
ment from the industry and ingenuity of systematic moral- 
ists, exercised in formulating precisely the generally accepted 
rules : since the quasi-legal process of scrutinising closely 
the cases of difficulty and apparent conflict among such rules^ 
in order to draw the lines of duty clear, must tend to bring 
into demoralising prominence the uncertainty and disagree- 
ment among experts on moral questions : while the lack of 
an authority to decide controversies rendered it impossible 
to reduce the element of doubt and discussion in the manner 
in which it is continually reduced in the development of 
law. And thus, as I have said, the moral code of a modem 
country has come to be necessarily inferior as an intelligible 
system to its law, because in the case of the former every 
man is encouraged to think himself a judge, there is no 
final court of appeal, and no one can admit any external 
legislation. 

The consequence of this is, not only that we find, in the 
generally accepted moral code of a modem society, an amount 
of conflict, vagueness, and uncertainty, that could not for a 
moment be tolerated in modern law : but also that, when we 
examine closely the aggregate of opinions and sentiments, the 



206 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

expression of which in word or act constitutes the effective 
sanction of positive morality, we find, along with the 
generally accepted code, a number of special codes, more or 
less divergent from it on important points. What is called 
the code of honour — the rules of behaviour maintained by 
the C(yn&t7i8us of gentlemen in modern Europe — is a well- 
known instance of this: but the same phenomenon is 
exhibited in some degree by various other divisions of 
society, based upon different grounds, — t,g, by religious 
sects and parties, and the members of different trades and 
professions. And thus sometimes, owing to the predomin- 
ance of particular religious sects or industrial classes, or of 
particular schools of thought or drifts of opinion, in different 
localities, we find noteworthy local variations in the prevalent 
judgment as to what is mischievous or the reverse in conduct. 
§ 3. These differences become important when we proceed 
to consider the practical relations between the two systems 
of rules that we have been comparing. First, we have to 
recognise the possibility that Government, in legislating 
with a view to the general happiness of the governed, may 
come into conflict with the positive morality prevalent 
among them ; may be led to enforce rights popularly re- 
garded as wrongs, to compel men by legal penalties to do 
what they are commonly thought right in refusing to do, or 
to compel them to abstain from doing what is commonly 
thought innocent if not laudabla This is, indeed, less likely 
to happen in the case of legislators appointed by popular 
election, or even in the case of rulers, however appointed, 
whose education has tended to make them share the moral 
opinions and sentiments current in their community ; since 
they are likely to share, among other current opinions, the 
belief that what is commonly thought right is conducive to 
the general happiness. Still even in this case, owing to 
the divergences above noticed within the limits of the same 
community, such conflicts may occasionally arise : t.g, the 
majority of a modern legislature may think it expedient to 
close theatres or public-houses on Sunday, when public 
opinion holds it allowable and desirable to keep them open, 



xiii LA W AND MORALITY 207 

or to open museums and picture-galleries on the same day, 
when public opinion thinks it right to close them.^ Any 
serious conflict of this kind is mischievous in two ways: 
by rendering it difficult to enforce the law in the particular 
case mthout an unusual exercise of force and consequent 
intense and diffused annoyance, and by its tendency to 
weaken the habit of obedience to law and government in the 
citizens generally. We cannot, indeed, therefore lay down 
that such a conflict is always to be avoided : the question must 
be decided in each particular case by a comparative forecast 
of the mischiefs just mentioned, and the good to be expected 
from the proposed legislation. But we may say generally 
that government ought to take all possible care to mini- 
mise the evil of this conflict, supposing it to be in some degree 
inevitable ; thus, when any new governmental interference 
of a coercive kind is required to repress practices dangerous 
to social wellbeing, or otherwise to attain some important 
public end, it is expedient, if possible, that it should only 
take place after public attention has been strongly called to 
the need which the new regulations are designed to meet.^ 

Further, it is to be noted in that even legislative 
measures that have the approval of the majority may come 
into collision with the moral beliefs and sentiments of im- 
portant portions of the community : and the prospect even 
of this more limited conflict may be a weighty reason for 
deferring or modifying governmental interference that would 
be otherwise expedient. Even if the legislation in question is 
not exactly disapproved as immoral, it must always be a 
serious drawback to its expediency that it will have to 
contend vdth strong forces of desire, interest, and habit, with- 
out receiving effective support from Positive Morality. 

^ In the case of a commnnity governed by foreigners the danger of thiB 
kind of conflict is, of course, much greater. Thus in several important 
legislative measures our Indian Government has acted contrary to the pre- 
vsdent moral opinion of Hindoos : t,g. in prohibiting infanticide and the 
burning of widows, in allowing the remarriage of widows, and in maintaining 
the rights of inheritance of converts to Christianity. 

^ In a state under popular government, it is of course impossible that any 
decided conflict between law and the moral opinion of a majority of the 
electorate should be more than very temporary. 



2o8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Thus the actual condition of the positive morality of the 
community — including under the term all prevalent opinions 
as to the bad and good effects of actions — confines within 
rather narrow limits the power of an enlightened Govern- 
ment to act upon the community governed in conformity 
to the conclusions of the highest political wisdom of the 
time. On the other hand, it is no less important to note 
that the legislator has within limits a valuable power of 
modifying positive morality. Through the general habit of 
law-observance and the general recognition of the duty of 
obeying rules laid down by a legitimate authority — which 
we may expect to find in any well-ordered community — the 
legislator may obtain a general obedience to rules to which 
current morality is indifferent or even mildly averse ; and 
then by the reaction of habitual conduct on opinion, a moral 
aversion to the opposite conduct may gradually grow up. In 
other cases, where Government interferes to prevent mis- 
chievous acts which are already vaguely regarded with some 
degree of moral disapprobation, the legislator or judge may 
produce a more sudden and impressive effect by giving 
sharpness and decision to this disapprobation. Especially 
we may say that the judicial organ of government is within 
certain limits accepted as a moral expert ; if within these 
limits it classifies an act with crimes, public opinion is 
prepared so to regard it. 

§ 4. But Positive Morality, in a well-ordered State, does 
not only support the action of Government: it has, of 
course, the further important function of regulating conduct 
in matters beyond the range of governmental coercion. To 
consider in detail how this function ought to be performed 
would be to write a treatise on ethics : but we may briefly 
note certain parts of social conduct where for special reasons 
the influence of moi'al opinion is indispensable or preferable, 
as a means of producing the kind of effects at which Law 
aims. In this survey it is convenient to distinguish be- 
tween the penalties of Positive Morality and its rewards — 
between moral censure and moral approval or praise. It is 
to the operation of moral censure that our attention is 



XIII LAW AND MORALITY 209 

naturally directed in studying the analogy between Law 
and Morality, and I shall accordingly begin by considering 
this : but, as we shall presently see, the respective functions 
of censure and praise cannot be sharply separated. 

First, then, moral censure is the chief resource that 
remains available, when the means which the legislator 
employs fail to attain the end which he has in view, from 
accidental circimistances defeating their normal operation. 
For instance, granting that the conditions to which the 
legal validity of contracts is subjected are rightly imposed 
as generally suitable to the end in view, still particular 
cases may occur in which an engagement to do some lawful 
act was clearly made with full deliberation and without 
any coercion or misrepresentation or improper inducements, 
while at the same time the legal conditions have not been 
fulfilled. In such cases it is generally desirable that the 
violation of the engagement should be censured, though 
reparation cannot be legally exacted. So again, a testator 
may accidentally fail to make a valid will, though his 
intention may be expressed with sufficient clearness to 
make it the duty of his heir to conform to it if it is 
not in its nature improper : here, too, the moral opinion 
of persons acquainted with the circumstances may use- 
fully take the place of the legal coercion that cannot be 
applied. 

Secondly, there are cases in which the intervention of 
law is inapplicable as a remedy for undoubted mischief, 
owing to the general importance of leaving wide discretion 
to the private individuals who would have to be coerced. 
One chief case of this class is the treatment of children by 
parents : in order to maintain the parents' sense of respon- 
sibility on the one hand, and the child's habit of obedience 
and respect on the other, it does not seem generally ex- 
pedient that Government should interfere with the domestic 
rule of the parent, unless there is evidence of gross neglect 
or cruelty ; but there may easily be breaches of parental 
duty falling short of this, which may properly be visited 
with moral censure. 



aio ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

So again, we have before ^ seen that it is impossible to 
define the spheres of individual freedom for adults so that 
the observance of the limits may completely prevent all 
serious mutual annoyance ; and, in particular, we have noted 
that the power which an individualistic system must neces- 
sarily secure to sane adults generally, of freely entering into 
and terminating economic relations with other individuals, 
may be used to injure and coerce those others. In such 
cases public opinion may importantly supplement law in 
repressing malevolent or intimidative exercise of legal 
freedom, and reducing mutual annoyance to a minimum ; 
though it must be borne in mind that this very public 
opinion is itself a coercive force which, if misdirected, may 
do harm of this kind in the worst degree. 

Again, there must always be cases, especially in the 
department of contract, in which the enforcement of strict 
legal rights would — owing to exceptional circumstances 
which a legislator or judge cannot safely take into account 
— be manifestly harsh in its effects, and would show a 
repulsive want of normal human sympathy. 

Again, there are acts so highly detrimental to social well- 
being that it is desirable to supply a strong inducement to 
abstain from them, which are yet unsuitable objects of legal 
repression ; because the temptations to do them being strong 
and concealment easy, it is impossible to prevent them 
altogether, while at the same time if they are driven into 
the greatest possible secrecy their mischief is liable to take 
a much more aggravated form. The leading case of this 
kind is intercourse of the sexes outside the conjugal relation : 
it has always been recognised that it is the special function 
of Positive Morality to keep this within the narrowest 
possible bounds, by affixing a strong stigma of discredit to 
such intercourse : but it has also been almost universally 
held that it would be unwise to make it legally punishable. 

Finally, there is much mischief similar in kind to that 
which law aims at repressing, which it is expedient to leave 
to morality to deal with, merely because it is not sufficiently 

^ See chap. iv. § 4. 



XIII LA W AND MORALITY 21 1 

important in degree : such as insults and calumnies of minor 
gravity, deceptions and misrepresentations which have not 
caused any considerable amoimt of definite damage, though 
to leave them uncensured would tend to impair the pleasure 
and profit of social intercourse. 

Let us turn to consider the matters in which the opera- 
tion of morality by praise rather than censure is of special 
political importance. The chief case imder this head is the 
expenditure of wealth for public ends, or for the mitigation 
of the most painful inequalities resulting firom the present 
individualistic distribution of wealth. Expenditure of this 
kind, unless it shows marked unwisdom in the adaptation 
of means to ends, is almost universally praised; but 
abstinence from such expenditure is not commonly blamed 
in any particular casa Some censure, no doubt, is incurred 
by a rich man who spends his whole income in luxuries 
for himself and his family and in exchanging luxurious 
hospitalities with other rich men. But though he is cen- 
sured in a broad way for this course of life, the censure is 
vague and general, and does not attach itself to abstinence 
from any particular act of philanthropy. It is — rightly, as 
I think — held that the struggle to get rich is socially use- 
ful, so far as it impels the struggler to render services to 
society deserving of high remuneration ; and that any such 
restrictions on a rich man's freedom of expenditure, as would 
amount to graduated taxation enforced by moral censure, 
must tend to impau: the stimulus to this useful effort. 
Still, undoubtedly, a powerful pressure — though rather in 
the form of praise than of censure — is exercised by public 
opinion on rich men in the direction of eleemosynary 
and public-spirited expenditure, and is powerfully aided by 
all earnest teachers of the prevalent forms of religion ; and 
under the influence of this moral pressure the amount of 
wealth and labour voluntarily devoted to the relief of 
distress, and to the promotion of objects of public utility, is 
in any modem community so considerable, that it becomes 
an important factor in the practical determination of the 
scope of governmental interference for similar purposes. 



212 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Thus, for instance, political thinkers and statesmen, in 
advocating the English method of dealing with pauperism, 
have usually assumed not only 'that public poor-relief will 
be supplemented by private almsgiving, but that a funda- 
mentally important part of the work may be left to the 
latter. As we saw, the distinctive principle of the English 
system is that Government is not to discriminate between 
the deserving and the undeserving poor, but to secure to all 
who are destitute a minimum of subsistence under conditions 
deterrent but not painful: and this principle would be 
rejected as too harsh by many who now accept it, were it 
not for the assimiption that private almsgivers will be 
ready to undertake the task of discrimination which 
Government declines, and to accord more generous and 
tender treatment to those who have fallen into distress 
through undeserved calamities 

Similarly, as regards the building and maintenance of 
hospitals and asylums for persons physically and mentally 
afflicted, the provision for education in all grades, the pro- 
motion of culture bv means of museimis and libraries, the 
endowment of scientific research, and other ends of re- 
cognised public utility ; — the question what Grovemment 
should do cannot be answered unless we know what the 
liberality of private individuals may be expected to accom- 
plish if Government does not interfere. 

§ 5. Since, then, the force of opinion and sentiment in 
the community as to the social duties of individuals is so 
valuable to the government, both as support and as supple- 
ment, and so dangerous in antagonism, it remains to inquire 
how far it is a proper function of government to take 
measures to stimulate and regulate this force. 

The question, however, does not practically present itself 
in this simple form in the political societies of Europe and 
America ; since in these societies the systematic teaching of 
morality to adults — and, to a great extent, the moral educa- 
tion of the young — are, by a firmly established custom, left 
in the hands of one or more of the difierent Christian 
churches: so that the problem of governmental interfer- 



XIII LAW AND MORALITY 213 

ence for the moralisation of the citizens takes the form of a 
question as to the " relations of Church and State." Still, 
it seems desirable, in such a treatise as the present, to begin 
by considering the problem in a more general way. 

Let us suppose, then, that we are dealing with a civilised 
community in which there is either no religion having 
general acceptance or important influence, or else only 
religions that have no important connection with morality ; 
— I mean religions in which the objects of worship are 
mainly conceived to be propitiated otherwise than by the 
performance of social duty: — and let us ask whether govern- 
ment, under these circumstances, should undertake the 
business of teaching morality and stimulating moral senti- 
menta The answer to this question would seem to me to 
depend partly on the answer given to one of the most 
fimdamental questions of moral philosophy: viz. whether 
the performance of social duty can be proved scientifically 
— with as strong a " consensus of experts " as we find in 
established sciences generally — to be certainly or most 
probably the means best adapted to the attainment of the 
private happiness of the agent 

I. If we answer this question in the affirmative, it does 
not indeed follow that morality ought to be based on self- 
interest alone ; but it would clearly be an important gain 
to social wellbeing to correct the erroneous and short- 
sighted views of self-interest, representing it as divergent 
from duty, which certainly appear to be widely prevalent 
in the most advanced societies, at least among irreligious 
persons. Hence there are at any rate strong reasons for 
regarding it as the duty of government, in the case supposed, 
to aim at removing this widespread ignorance and error by 
providing teachers of morality : and such a provision might 
be fairly regarded as indirectly individualistic in its aim, 
since to diffuse the conviction that it is every one's interest 
to do what is right would obviously be a valuable protection 
against mutual wrong. It does not, however, follow that 
it would be expedient to have morality taught — to adults 
at least — by salaried servants of government For imless 



214 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

we assume the harmony between duty and self-interest to 
be demonstrable to an imtrained intellect, such teaching 
would only be efficacious if the teachers inspired confidence : 
and the analogy of the sanitary instruction imparted by the 
medical profession suggests that confidence, in the degree 
required, would be more readily given to moralists freely 
chosen by those whom they advised. Further, in any cases 
of doubt or dispute, in which it might seem to be the 
interest of governing persons that the governed should act 
in the manner recommended by the moralists, the latter 
would be liable to the suspicion that they were biassed by 
the prospect of advancement or fear of dismissal : so that 
they would give but a feeble support to Government — ^just, 
perhaps, when their support was most needed. On the 
other hand, if this danger were partially met by securing 
the teachers from dismissal, the service would be liable to 
be encimibered with unfit persons. 

II. But the objections against governmental provision of 
professional moralisers become much stronger, if we regard 
it as impossible to prove by ordinary mundane considera- 
tions that it is always the individuaFs interest in the present 
condition of human society to do his duty ; or if, granting 
the evident coincidence of self-interest and duty, it is still 
held that self-regard should not be the normal motive to 
moral action. For in either of these cases the only teaching 
likely to be effective is such as will powerfully affect the 
emotions of the taught, no less than their intellects; we 
should, therefore, generally speaking, need teachers who 
themselves felt, and were believed to feel, sincerely and 
intensely, the moral and social emotions that it was their 
business to stimulate ; and governmental appointment and 
payment would hardly seem to be an appropriate method of 
securing instructors of this type. If a spirit of devotion to 
a particular society or to humanity at large, and readiness 
to sacrifice self-interest to duty, are to be persuasively in- 
culcated on adults, the task should, generally speaking, 
be undertaken by persons who set an example of self- 
devotion and self-sacrifice; and therefore by volunteers. 



XIII LAW AND MORALITY 21$ 

rather than bj paid officers. The case would be somewhat 
different with the more malleable natures of children: 
it would still be clearly expedient that schoolmasters as 
well as parents should seriously endeavour to promote the 
growth of moral habits and sentiments in the youthful 
minds committed to their charga But it seems very 
doubtful how far, in the circimistances supposed, this growth 
would be most effectively promoted by formal instruction ; 
and not rather partly by steady enforcement of received 
rules, with such incidental explanations of their rationale 
as can be effectively given, — as polite manners are now 
ordinarily taught ; and partly by stimulating social senti- 
ments through a well-selected study of literature and history, 
as patriotism and public spirit are now mainly promoted. 

Let us now turn from the purely hypothetical problem 
that we have been discussing, to consider the form which 
the question of governmental interference to promote 
morality actually takes in modem European communities. 
For ordinary members of such communities, the connection 
of any individual's interest with his duty is established by 
the traditional Christian teaching as to the moral govern- 
ment of the world, and the survival of the individual after 
his corporeal death. Accordingly, this traditional teaching 
— though it by no means relies solely on appeals to self- 
interest — still always includes in its store of arguments 
appeals of this kind, having irresistible cogency for all 
hearers who believe the fundamental Christian doctrinea 
So far as the rules of duty thus taught are those commonly 
accepted by thoughtful persons, the value of the aid given 
to the work of government by this supply of extra-mundane 
motives to the performance of social duty can hardly be 
doubted. But the expediency of governmental action to 
secure this aid is importcmtly affected by the fact that the 
teachers who give it are actually organised in independent 
associations called churches, whose lines of division differ 
from — and to an important extent cut across — the lines of 
division of political societies ; and which for the most part 
would resist strongly any attempt to bring them directly 



2i6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xiii 

and completely under the control of the secular government. 
The practical question therefore is, whether government 
should leave these churches unfettered — treating them like 
any other voluntary associations based on &ee contract — 
or should endeavour to obtain a peulial control over them 
in return for endowments or other advantages. I do not 
propose in this treatise to enter upon the historical or the 
theological aspects of this controverted question : but it is 
easy to show that the settlement of it is likely to be at 
once difficult and of great importance to political well- 
being. For, so far as the priest or religious teacher seeks 
not me«l7 to provide a harmonious and satisfying expres- 
aion for religious emotion, but also to regulate the behaviour 
of man to his fellows in domestic and civil relations, — using 
as motives the hope of reward and fear of punishment from 
an invisible source, — his function obviously tends to become 
quasi-governmental; accordingly, where religious belief is 
strong, the power given to the priesthood by its control 
of these extra-mimdane motives renders it not only a 
valuable auxiliary to the ordinary or secular government 
in the business of maintaining the general performance of 
civic duty, but also a most formidable rival, in case of any 
conflict between the priesthood and the organs of secular 
government. A similar rivalry and conflict is of course 
possible between a non- religious association among the 
members of any political community and the government 
of that community: and history affords some striking 
examples of such rivalry, though none comparable in extent 
and importance to the conflict for power between " Church 
and State " in Western Europe. I have accordingly thought 
it best to consider the question of governmental intervention 
in religious matters in a special chapter on the Belation of 
the State to Voluntary Associations,^ which will be more 
appropriately introduced after we have examined the organisa- 
tion of secular government. 

^ Chap, xxviii. 



CHAPTER XIV 

THE AREA OF GOVERNMENT STATES AND DISTRICTS 

§ 1. In the preceding chapters — with the partial exception of 
Chapter xi — I have discussed the functions of Government, 
without regard to the limitations of its area. I have spoken 
from time to time of "the community" whose members 
habitually obey the government, and in whose interests 
government is assumed to exercise its functions ; but I have 
not recognised any definite limits to the commimity: so 
far as the main discussion has gone, the community might 
be coextensive with the human race. The time has now 
come to direct attention to the limits of the area of govern- 
ment. As actually existing, they are of two kinds: (1) 
each independent political society comprises only a portion 
of civilised humanity, so that a fundamentally important 
department of the work of its government consists in the 
management of its relations to societies and individuals 
lying beyond its pale : and (2) in every independent political 
society the functions of government are to an important 
extent exercised by individuals or bodies whose powers 
extend over a narrower area than the whole society — " local 
governments," as they are called. Accordingly, I propose 
in the present chapter to consider briefly how these two 
kinds of limits — the boundaries of extemcd separation, 
and the boundaries of interned subdivision — are to be 
determined. 

When, however, we raise the question of what ought to be, 
in regard to external boundaries, we at once bring into view 



2i8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

two different stages of divergence between accepted political 
ideals and actual political facta Our highest political ideal 
admits of no boundaries that would bar the prevention of 
high-handed injustice throughout the range of human 
society : and from the point of view of this highest ideal it 
might be fairly urged that we ought no more to recognise 
wars among nations as normal than we recognise wager 
of battle as a remedy for private wrongs : and that if so, 
we ought not to recognise as normal the existence of a 
number of completely independent political commimities, 
living in close juxtaposition ; since we must expect that 
grave and irreconcilable disputes among such commimities 
will be settled, as they always have been settled, by wars. 
Certainly the effective substitution of any kind of judicial 
process for wars among civilised states would seem to in- 
volve the ultimate subjection of the relations of such states 
to some kind and degree of common government, able 
to bring overwhelming force to overbear the resistance of 
any recalcitrant state ; since judicial decisions which cannot 
be enforced, cannot be expected to prevent wars. And 
perhaps some federation of European or West-European^ 
States, with a common government sufficiently strong to 
prevent fighting among these states, is not beyond the 
limits of sober conjecture as to the probable future course 
of political development. From the earliest dawn of 
history in Europe, down to the present day, the tendency 
to form continually larger political societies — apart from 
the effects of mere conquest — seems to accompany the growth 
of civilisation. The traditions of Rome and Athens make 
it clear that these famous city-states were formed by the 
cohesion of parts that had previously regarded each other 
as foreigners and occasional enemies : and a similar tendency 
to combine in continually larger aggregates is seen in the 
early history of the Teutonic tribes. We see the same 
phenomenon in the formation of the Leagues that are 
prominent in the later period of the independence of Hellas : 

^ I use this term to include all the European countries — except Turkey 
— lying westward of Russia. 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT— STATES AND DISTRICTS 219 

we can discern it — though in a less simple form — ^in the 
development of European nations during the Middle Ages : 
as exhibited in the \mion of Italy and of Germany it is 
the most striking feature of recent European history ; and 
North America shows us an impressive example of a political 
society maintaining internal peace over a region larger than 
Western Europe.^ 

Usually no doubt this aggregation of civilised mankind 
into larger unions, so far as it has been voluntary, has been 
mainly due to the pressure of external dangers from enemies 
common to the smaller uniting bodies; and no foreign 
perils, sufficiently formidable to produce this effect, are at 
present threatening the group of "West -European nations. 
But if the boundaries of existing civilised states undergo 
no material change, the relative strength of the United 
States, as compared with any one of the West-European 
States, will before the end of the next century so decidedly 
preponderate, that the most powerful of the latter will 
keenly feel its inferiority in any conflict with the former.* 
And even apart &om this motive to imion, it seems not 
impossible that the economic burdens entailed by war, the 
preponderantly industrial character of modem political 
societies, the increasing facilities and habits of communica- 
tion among Europeans and the consequently intensified 
consciousness of their common civilisation, may, before many 
generations have passed, bring about an extensive federation 
of civilised states strong enough to put down wars among 
its members. But, in any case, this ideal is at present 
beyond the range of practical politics. There is not at 
present, and there is no immediate prospect of developing, 

^ I do not overlook the centrifugal forces that have ako been at work 
throughout European history : especially, in recent times, those due to the 
claims of nationalities, and the tendency of colonies when full grown to 
separate from the mother-country. Still it does not seem rash to forecast as 
probable, on the basis of our knowledge of past history, that the forces 
tending to the formation of continually larger political unions will on the 
whole prevail. 

' Bussia is likely to have a similar preponderance, in some respects more 
alarming, though less in degree. 



220 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

any consciousness of common nationality among Europeans 
or West-Europeans as such : and the practically dominant 
political ideal of the present age does not include an exten- 
sion of government beyond the limits of the nation. As in 
Greek history the practically dominant ideal is a society of 
City-states, independent, though observing in their mutual 
relations some kind of common law, so, in the period to 
which we belong, it is a society of Nation-states under 
" International Law." ^ 

§ 2. To get a clearer view of this ideal, let us examine 
more closely the conceptions of " State " and " Nation " as 
currently used. 

I must begin by distinguishing between (1) the nar- 
rower use of the word " State " to denote the commimity 
considered exclusively in its corporate capacity, as the sub- 
ject of public as distinct from private rights and obliga- 
tions; and (2) its wider use to denote the community 
however considered. In previous chapters we have been 
led to conceive the community as capable of holding pro- 
perty and incurring debts in its corporate capacity : and, 
in speaking of these as the property and debts " of the 
State,'' we intend to distinguish them from the aggregate 
of the properties and the debts of the members of the 
community. This distinction, we may observe, is recognised 
by foreigners as well as nativea Thus, if Greece were to 
go bankrupt the wealthy Greeks in England would not be 
held liable for any part of the sums that their State owes 
to Englishmen ; and, according to the usage of war, an 
invader of England would freely take the public property 
of the English State, but he would not seize the property 
of individual Englishmen beyond exacting certain limited 
" contributions." A similar distinction is implied when we 
speak of philanthropic duties as incumbent on " society " but 
not on " the State." At other times, however, we apply the 
term rather to the " body politic " considered as an aggregate 

^ The appropriateness of the term "law," as applied to the rules of 
International conduct commonly so-called, vrill be considered in a subsequent 
chapter (xvii. ) 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT—STATES AND DISTRICTS 221 

of individuals : thus we might speak of England as a rich 
State, having in view the wealth possessed by the aggregate 
of Englishmen. It would be inconvenient to be obliged to 
avoid altogether either use of the term ; but I shall try to 
prevent the ambiguity from causing any confusion. 

In the present chapter I shall take the wider significa- 
tion. I shall mean by a State what I have also called a 
political society or community ; i,e. a body of human beings 
deriving its corporate unity from the fact that its members 
acknowledge permanent obedience to the same government, 
which represents the society in any transactions that it 
may carry on as a body with other political societies. 
And I shall assume this government to be independent, in 
the sense that it is not in habitual obedience to any foreign 
individual or body or to the government of a larger whole.^ 
It would, however, be contrary to usage to apply the term 
" State " to all human societies living imder independent 
governments — ^including {e.g.) nomad tribes: — ^it must be 
added therefore that the term implies a certain degree of 
civilised order. The exact degree of civilisation implied, 
according to usage, is hardly clear : but we may lay down 
(1) that in a community that is called a State there is 
imderstood to be an effective consciousness of the distinction 
before explained, between the rights and obligations of the 
commimity in its corporate capacity and the rights and 
obligations of the individuals composing it ; and (2) that 
the commimity so designated is imderstood to be in settled 
occupation of a certain territory. It seems essential to the 
modern conception of a State that its government should 
exercise supreme dominion over a particular portion of the 
earth's surface: and if we once admit that the range of 
governmental control is to be limited, the advantage of 
determining its limits by territorial boimdaries is obvious : 

^ It is to be obseryed that the assumption of complete independence is not 
always implied in the cnrrent usage of the term ** State." Thus, the several 
members of the North American Union are called States, though not 
independent in their external relations, and not even completely independent 
in their internal legislation and administration. But it seems to me most 
convenient here to exclude this latter use. 



222 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

since the government's task of protecting its subjects from 
wrong would manifestly become tenfold more diflBcult if 
they were liable to be brought into contact, to an indefinite 
extent, with persons who might legitimately refuse all 
obedience to their government. Accordingly, in modem 
times, it is generally recognised as a fundamental right of a 
civilised state that its government should have unquestioned 
power of determining and enforcing law within the limits 
of the territory that is recognised as belonging to it. It is 
only in the case of weak and imperfectly ordered com- 
mimities that serious limitations of this power are demanded 
by the civilised communities who have dealings with them:^ 
and it is perhaps doubtful whether, even in such cases, more 
good than harm results from granting the demand. 

Indeed, in modern political thought the connection 
between a political society and its territory is so close that 
the two notions almost blend, and the same words are used 
indifferently to express either : thus we sometimes mean by 
a " State " the territory of a political community, and we 
sometimes mean by a " Country " the political community 
inhabiting it. We speak of crossing the boimdaries of a 
"state," and we say that a "coimtry" has made up its 
mind.^ 

So far I have considered the \mity of a State as depend- 
ing solely on the fact that its members obey a common 
government. And I do not think that any other bond 
is essentially implied in the definition of a State. But 
we recognise that a politiccd society is in an imsatisfactory 
and comparative unstable condition when its members have 
no consciousness of any bond of unity among them except 
their obedience to the same government. Such a society is 
lacking in the cohesive force required to resist the dis- 
organising shocks and jars which foreign wars and domestic 
discontents are likely to cause from time to time. Accord- 

^ Thus Europeans are not justiciable by native courts in the Turkish 
dominions. 

^ In ancient Greek thought a corresponding fusion took place between the 
notions of "City " and " State," represented by the one word PolU, 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT— STATES AND DISTRICTS 223 

inglj, we recognise it as desirable that the members of a 
State should be imited by the further bonds vaguely implied 
in the term Nation. I think, however, that attempts 
to give definiteness to the implications of this latter term 
are liable to obscure its real meaning: since I can find 
no particular bond of \mion among those that chiefly 
contribute to the internal cohesion of a strongly-united 
society — belief in a conmion origin, possession of a common 
language and literature, pride in common historic traditions, 
commimity of social customs, commimity of religion, — which 
is really essential to our conception of a Nation-State. The 
common idea of a nation no doubt contains the survival of 
the familiar conception of kinship as the normal bond for 
holding men together in a political society : accordingly in 
popular talk it is often assumed that the members of a 
Nation are descended from the same stock. But this 
assumption in modern civilised countries is in palpable 
conflict with facts : some of the leading modern nations — 
so called — are notoriously of very mixed race, and it does 
not appear that the knowledge of this mixture has any 
material effect in diminishing the consciousness of common 
nationality. Again, the memories of a common politiccd 
history, and especially of common struggles against foreign 
foes, have a tendency to cause the community of patriotic 
sentiment which the term ''nation" implies: still, the present 
imperfect cohesion of the Austro-Hungarian State shows 
that this cause 'cannot be counted upon to produce the 
required efTect. In the case just mentioned differences of 
language seem to have operated importantly against co- 
hesion: and indeed in most recent movements for the 
formation of states upon a truly " national " basis — whether 
by aggregation or division — community of language seems 
to have been widely taken as a criterion of nationality : 
still, it seems clear from the cases of Switzerland on the 
one hand and Ireland on the other, that conmiunity of 
language and commimity of national sentiment are not 
necessarily connected. Again, at certain stages in the 
history of civilisation, religious belief has been a powerful,^ 



224 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

nation -making force» and powerful also to disintegrate 
nations: but these stages seem to be now past in the 
development of the leading West-European and American 
Statea I think, therefore, that what is really essential to 
the modem conception of a State which is cdso a Nation 
is merely that the persons composing it should have, 
generally speaking, a consciousness of belonging to one 
another, of being members of one body, over and above 
what they derive from the mere fact of being imder one 
government; so that, if their government were destroyed 
by war or revolution, they would still tend to hold firmly 
together. When they have this consciousness we regard 
them as forming a " nation," whatever else they may lack : 
thus we should speak without hesitation of the Swiss nation, 
because we attribute to the Swiss this community of 
patriotic sentiment, in spite of differences of language and 
religion ; but we could not properly speak of the " Austrian 
nation," whatever stability we may attribute to the Austrian 
—or rather Austro-Hungarian — State : because we do not 
conceive the members of this State as united into one whole 
by any such eB'prit de corps. 

The difference between " State " and " Nation " may be 
illustrated further by the modern term " nationality," used 
in a concrete sense,^ to denote a group of human beings. 
For by " a nationality " we usually mean a body of human 
beings imited by the kind of sentiment of unity or fellow- 
citizenship that is required to constitute a nation, but not 
possessing in common an independent government which 
they alone permanently obey : being either divided among 
several governments, or united under one government along 
with persons of a different nationality. Under either of these 
conditions, such a " nationality," in modern Europe, usually 
desires — and if occasion offers, strives — to become a nation ; 
but not always, as the persons composing it may think 
themselves unable to maintain their independence alone — as 
in the case (e.g.) with the Magyars in the Austro-Hungarian 
State. Still, even in such cases as this latter, the persons 

^ The word is also used abstractly to mean *' membership of a nation." 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT—STATES AND DISTRICTS 225 

belonging to the nationality are conscious of a certain 
artificiality in the composition of the larger political whole 
of which the nationality forms a part. 

§ 3. According, then, to what I have called the " practical 
ideal " of modem Europe, it is held to be desirable that a 
State should be coextensive with a single nation, in the 
sense above explained. It does not follow that, when this 
is not the case, any portion of a State may claim the right 
to recede and form a separate political community, or join 
an existing foreign State. How far, and \mder what con- 
ditions, this claim is to be admitted is a disputed question ; 
to which we shall have occasion to return after discussing 
the structure of government and its constitutional relations 
to the governed.^ But a provisional answer to this question 
seems to be here required, before we pass to consider the 
normal external relations of States. 

We may begin by observing that though the right of 
expatriation is not formally conceded by modem govern- 
ments generally to their subjects,^ there seems to be no 
practical disagreement as to the expediency of allowing dis- 
contented members of a State to sever themselves from it, if 
at the same time they permanently quit its territory ; — at 
any rate, if their departure does not involve the violation of 
any special or temporary obligations to the State or to 
individuals. Suppose, for instance, that any number of 
CoUectivists wished to leave any West-European State, in 
order to try the experiment of Collectivism on hitherto im- 
occupied lands in Africa, I conceive that no serious opposi- 
tion would be made to their collective expatriation ; except 
that in a State that had established compulsory military 
service, their departure might have to be deferred until their 
respective terms of service had been completed. Speaking 
broadly, then, we may say that the practically serious issue 
as to the " Bight of Disruption " relates not to the mere 

^ See chap. zzxi. § 8. 

^ In 1868, an Act was passed in the United States affirming that "the 
right of expatriation is a natural and inherent right of all people ; " but I do 
not think that any European Government has ever expressly admitted this 
or any equivalent proposition. 

Q 



226 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

secession of a group of the members of a State, but to their 
secession with a portion of the State's territory. On the 
other side, few would contend that any landowner should 
have a right to secede with his land from the State to 
which he belongs : or that any number of such landowners, 
scattered through the territory of a State, but not forming 
with other would-be seceders a local majority in any 
considerable district, should have a right to secede and 
form a new political community, exercising dominion 
over this aggregate of fragmentary lands. Any such claim 
is excluded from serious discussion by the palpable and 
extreme inconvenience that its realisation would obviously 
causa 

The main issue, therefore, as to the Bight of Disruption 
may be thus defined: If in any continuous part of the 
territory of a State, suflSciently large to form the territory 
of a new independent State, or capable of being conveniently 
united to an existing State, there is a decided local majority 
in favour of separation, has this majority a legitimate claim 
to secede, carrying with them the portion of territory over 
which their secessionist majority extends ? It seems clear 
that a claim of this brecuith would not be generally 
admitted, merely on the ground that the interests of the 
seceders would be promoted or their sentiments of nation- 
ality gratified by the change : that some serious oppression 
or misgovemment of the seceders by the rest of the com- 
munity, — i.e. some imjust sacrifice or grossly incompetent 
management of their interests, or some persistent and harsh 
opposition to their legitimate desires, — would be usually 
held necessary to justify the claim. If no adequate justifica- 
tion of this kind appeared, the forcible suppression of any 
such attempt at disruption would be approved by the 
majority of thoughtful persona 

In examining the groimds of this view, we may put 
aside as antiquated the survivals of the mediaeval conceptions 
of government, which, imtil recent times, caused certain royal 
families to be widely regarded as having quasi-private rights 
of ownership over certain territories and indefeasible claims 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT—STATES AND DISTRICTS 227 

to the allegiance of their inhabitants. Notions and senti- 
ments of this kind have not ceased to have some force ; but 
their influence is comparatively feeble and on the whole 
steadily diminishing: and in a general discussion of the 
question they may be disregarded. I shall cdso defer for 
the present the question of the right to repudiate the results 
of unjust conquest, which will come \mder our consideration 
in the course of the two following chapters. 

Putting aside the rights and wrongs of conquest, I con- 
ceive that both the strength of the resistance that would 
be made to disruptive movements by a modem State, — 
of which the American Civil War (1861-5) gave a strik- 
ing example, — and the general approval that would be 
given to such resistance, depend largely on the degree of 
disturbance that the disruption would cause in the foreign 
relations of the disrupted State; either through the in- 
creased danger of war from the addition of the seceding com- 
munity to the number of possible foes, or from the mere 
loss of strength and prestige. Thus the intensity of the 
aversion felt by the Northern States of the American union 
to the secession of the Southern States seems to have been 
mainly due to the fear of future hostilities between North 
and South, complicated by the intervention of European 
powers : and it is difficult to deny that the present hopeful 
prospect — which secession would have destroyed — of 
maintaining internal peace over the whole vast tract of 
territory held by the United States, was worth a considerable 
sacrifice of lives and wealth. 

In most cases, a further strong argument against disrup- 
tion would arise from the inevitable incompleteness of the 
local separation between the seceders and the rest of the 
community : the territory which secession would break off 
would usually contain a minority of inhabitants loyal to the 
old government, who would be likely to suffer seriously 
from the change whether they remained within the disrupted 
district or migrated from it. Hence a tranquil acceptance 
of the disruption could not fail to have partially the 
character of a weak and base abandonment of friends. The 



228 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

loss of Schleswig-Holstein would have been less strongly 
resisted by Denmark in 1864, had there been no considerable 
number of loyal Danes in North Schleswig ; on the other 
hand, if the Danes in North Schleswig had been sharply 
and clearly separated from the Germans, we may presume 
that less resistance would have been made on the (rerman 
side to a separation of Schleswig into a Danish and a 
German part, and a union of the former with Denmark. 

Other minor disadvantages of disruption would vary in 
nature and extent in different cases. The loss of the dis- 
rupted district might be specially serious, from its contain- 
ing mines or other natural resources, in which the rest of 
the State's territory was deficient. Again, the burden of a 
national debt might be seriously increased by the diminu- 
tion of the wealth and population consequent on the dis- 
ruption : and though the payment of a proportionate share 
of the debt might of course be demanded from the seceders, 
it might be difficult and costly to enforce the demand: 
indeed the desire of avoiding this share of the burden of 
debt might conceivably have been an illegitimate motive to 
secession. 

But over and above these calculations of expediency, 
justifying resistance to disruption, we must recognise as a 
powerful motive the dislike of the community from which 
secession is proposed to lose territory that has once belonged 
to it, and to which it has a claim recognised by foreigners. 
This sentiment — ^so far as it goes beyond a rational aversion 
to lose a source of wealth and of strength in international 
conflicts — seems an outgrowth of patriotism analogous to 
the strong feelings of attachment to land or other property 
which long and undisturbed private ownership tends to 
produce in individuals and families. According to the 
fundamental principle adopted in the present work, this 
territorial sentiment should doubtless be overridden, when it 
prompts to conduct clearly opposed to the common interests 
of the persons affected by it. But this is equally true of 
the feelings of mistrust or dislike of persons of different 
speech, customs, or religion, which operate in favour of dis- 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT— STATES AND DISTRICTS 239 

ruption:^ both kinds of sentiment have, however, to be taken 
into account in any practical consideration of a political 
movement tending to disruption; and the former must be 
recognised as an important force, operating in favour of 
existing divisions Such feelings are intensified by the 
close connection established in current thought between 
political societies and their territories : in consequence of 
which the characteristics of the territory inhabited by the 
nation commonly occupy a prominent place in appeals to 
national sentiment. Our imagination seems to require this 
embodiment to constitute an adequate object of patriotic 
devotion ; so that in thinking of the " sea-girt isle " of 
Britain, or " la belle France," we do not ordinarily separate 
the community from the land, but blend the two into one 
notion.^ 

§ 4. As I have already explained, I think it premature 
here to attempt a final solution of the problem presented 
by the conflict of sentiments and interests which I have 
indicated in the preceding section : my present aim is merely 
to justify a provisional acceptance of the assumption that a 
modern State is normally a determinate and stable group 
of human beings, whose government has a practically undis- 

^ I may notice here — what I shall have occasion to consider more folly 
hereafter — the distinctly lower degree of aversion with which disruption is 
nsuaUy regarded if the territories which it is proposed to separate politically 
are physically divided by a considerable interval. This is partly because the 
State formed by the union of these divided territories is prima facie less suit- 
able for common governmenti from the greater difficulty of communication 
among its parts and of defence against external foes : but the effect of 
imagination in causing the union in this case to seem less " natural '* must 
not be overlooked. 

' To this close connection of the conception of a modem nation with that 
of its territory we may partly attribute the idea that a nation has a right to 
certain ** natural boundaries," — which has had an important influence on the 
political movements of the present century. Such a right is manifestly 
inadmissible, when urged as a reason for altering existing boundaries, in 
defiance of the sentiments of the population inhabiting the limitary district 
which it is proposed to transfer. But where this consideration is ambiguous 
and balanced, there are strong grounds of general expediency to be urged in 
favour of the claim in question : since a State that has natural boundaries — 
seas, rivers, or mountain ranges — is thereby strengthened for defence in war, but 
not equally for attack : and this is a condition that tends in favour of peace. 



230 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

puted right of regulating the legal relations of human 
beings over a determinate portion of the earth's surface. 
This assumption granted, we have now to consider how new 
membership of such a society is to be acquired ? To attach 
it to mere local habitation within the territory of the State 
is obviously inexpedient : if a foreigner landing in England 
or France at once became an Englishman or a Frenchman, 
the inevitable result would be either to dissipate the senti- 
ment of nationality which we have recognised the importance 
of maintaining, or to hamper intolerably the intercourse be- 
tween nations. Hence, in all modern States, the distinction 
between members, and aliens residing within the territory, is 
maintained ; and it is agreed that application of the law of 
a State to resident or travelling aliens should be limited to 
those matters in which the admission of diversity of laws 
would be dangerous or seriously inconvenient to its members. 
How, then, is membership of a political society to be 
determined, if mere local habitation is not sufficient to 
determine it? There are two obvious alternatives, (1) 
Birth, and (2) Consent : and the first subdivides again into 
two, according as "birth" is understood to mean either 
" birth from parents who are members " or " birth within 
the territory." The decision in favour of any one of the 
three principles is, however, of minor importance : because 
ordinarily all these characteristics are foimd in combina- 
tion. Ever since political societies have existed, the quality 
of membership has been handed down from parents to 
children, along with the common language, customs, and 
traditions that constitute the normal bonds of national unity : 
thus in any modern country the great majority of the inhabit- 
ants — born from native parents and on the soil — have been 
regarded as inchoate members from their birth, and as they 
have grown up have assumed the rights and obligations of 
full membership, without any formal £U3t of consent. With 
regard, then, to this great majority, it would be superfluous 
and disturbing to admit any doubt as to their membership, 
so long as they remain within the territorial limits of the 
state ; the only question practically important — apart from 



XIV AldEA OF GOVERNMENT—STATES AND DISTRICTS 231 

revolutionary changes, tending to the formation of new 
States — is whether they should be free to leave the com- 
munity. On this point, as I have already said, the principle 
of Consent has so far prevailed that freedom of emigration is 
now practically imiversal in modem civilised communities : 
and it seems clear that any substantial and permanent 
restrictions on such freedom would be out of harmony with 
the ruling political ideas of these communitiea National 
sentiment, indeed, would condemn any one who left his 
*' country " in a crisis in which she had need of his devotion : 
but it is clear that, in ordinary times, a State framed on a 
mainly individualistic basis, and therefore not imdertaking to 
secure its members subsistence — at least beyond a minimum 
given under deterrent conditions — could not consistently 
keep them from seeking their livelihood elsewhere. We may 
lay down, then, that expatriation is to be free, and renuncia- 
tion of citizenship, — with certain restrictions to prevent 
the evasion of special or temporary obligations — but on 
condition of leaving the country. So far as I know, it has 
never been even proposed that individual members of a 
State should be allowed to renoimce citizenship while 
remaining within its territorial limits ; but in most countries 
it is possible for a citizen to expatriate himseK, acquire a 
new nationality, and then return to live in his native land 
as a resident alien. It is, however, clearly inexpedient for 
a State that this course should be extensively adopted, in 
order to escape the burdens of citizenship ; and, if it were 
extensively adopted, some measures would doubtless be taken 
to redress the balance between the burdens and privileges 
of citizenship, and to make the position of a resident alien 
clearly less desirable than that of citizen. 

We are thus led to consider the conditions under which 
aliens generally should be admitted to (1) residence and (2) 
citizenship : but the former question cannot well be separated 
from the discussion of the external relations of States, to 
which I shall proceed in the next chapter.^ Here, then, I 

^ The question of restraints on immigration will be discussed in chap, 
xviii. § 8. 



232 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

shall only point out that the residence of a large number of 
persons permanently excluded from citizenship within the 
territory of any community involves an obvious danger of 
weakening the internal coherence of the community. 
Accordingly, if a State permits the free inmiigration of 
foreigners, it seems expedient that admission to citizenship 
should be generally open to those resident aliens: — pro- 
vided they have, by sufficiently long, orderly, and un- 
blemished residence within its territory, both shown a 
settled preference for the social order that it maintains, and 
acquired a sufficient acquaintance with its laws and political 
habits to render it fairly probable that they will adequately 
perform the duties of citizenship. 

It remains to settle the minor point, whether parentage 
or soil is to decide citizenship, in the case of children bom 
in the territory of a state other than that of which their 
parents are member& This question also belongs to the 
discussion of the external relations of States, so far as it is 
a matter on which agreement is desirable between the two 
States whose members and territories are respectively con- 
cerned. Considering it here from the point of view of the 
State in whose territory the birth takes place, we may lay 
down that — as it is obviously undesirable, other things being 
equal, that either State should have unwilling members — the 
children of resident aliens shoidd be allowed to choose their 
nationality when they come to years of discretion ; so long 
at least as there is no need of discouraging the residence of 
aliens on account of their numbers. For the sake of 
domestic harmony it seems best that the nationality of a 
married woman should be merged in that of her husband ; 
so that divided parentage will only occur in the case of 
illegitimate children, and it is comparatively unimportant 
how its effect on nationality is decided. 

§ 5. I now pass to the second of the two fundamental 
questions annoimced at the outset of this chapter: viz.. 
How far, within the limits of the modem coimtry — assum- 
ing these determined in the manner which we have just 
been examining — governmental functions should be exer- 



XIV AREA OF GOVERNMENT—STATES AND DISTRICTS 233 

cised over more restricted areas than that of the whole 
country ? 

So far as this question relates to the organisation of local 
governments, and the distribution of functions between local 
and central organs, its consideration more properly belongs 
to the second part of the treatise. What I propose here 
briefly to consider is not the organisation of government, 
but how far it is desirable that the effects produced by 
governmental action shoidd vary from district to district, 
within the limits of the same State; — apart from any 
constitutional considerations that may render it expedient 
to maintain local independence. We might put the question 
thus : — Assuming any part of the human race, inhabiting 
any tolerably extensive portion of the earth's surface, to be 
under one wise government however organised; how far 
would the laws, and the general rules of governmental 
action within the limits laid down by law, be the same for 
all ? This is obviously desirable so &r as human beings 
and their circumstances are similar; but we know from 
experience of very important differences in men's physical, 
moral, and intellectual characteristics — especiaUy when we 
compare men at different stages of civilisation — which may 
rationally determine a judicious government to act differently 
in their regard. The consideration, however, of such differ- 
ences as these, and of the variations in the functions and 
structure of government that may fitly correspond to them, 
lies for the most part beyond the scope of the present work ; 
since our attention is here primarily directed to the political 
relations generally suitable to the members of modem 
civilised communities. Now in such communities the poli- 
tically important differences that we find in groups of 
individuals inhabiting different local divisions are, in most 
cases, connected with differences, historically caused, in the 
structure of their societies : — different parts of a now united 
society have been previously under different governments, 
more or less independent ; so that, when the question we 
are now considering is practically raised with respect to 
them, they not only have actually systems of law more 



234 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

or less divergent, but also their habits, customs, senti- 
ments, expectations, are more or less firmly adjusted 
to these different systems. We cannot lay down any 
precise rules for determining when and how far such 
local divergences in law should be maintained, and when 
they should be obliterated : but the following appear 
to be the chief general considerations for deciding such 
questions : — 

First, on the side of conservation we have (1) the 
general probability that a system of law which is the result 
of a gradual process of social development will have been 
adapted to the average needs, dispositions, and habits of the 
members of the society in which it is found ; (2) the wide- 
spread friction caused by new laws jarring with old customs 
and habits ; and (3) the more serious hardship in particular 
cases due to the disappointment of expectations naturally 
generated by the older condition of law and custom. On 
the other hand, the introduction of imiformity — apart from 
its economic advantages in simplifying the work of adminis- 
tration — tends to prevent the trouble and occasional dis- 
appointment that are liable to arise from transactions 
between inhabitants of different districts having different 
laws : and it is to be observed that the inconveniences thus 
prevented are of a kind that tend normally to increase as 
time goes on, with the increasing mutual communication 
and interfusion of the different portions of the community. 
The resulting mischief is likely to be much more serious 
in some departments of law than in other& Thus it is 
likely to be comparatively trifling in the case of the laws 
relating to the tenure of land : in which, at the same time, 
the considerations in favour of maintaining local divergences 
are likely to be specially strong. On the other hand, varia- 
tion will probably be specially detrimental in the case of 
commercial law, from the tendency of commercial relations 
to extend beyond the limits of a single district : and also 
in the law relating to domestic conditions, since the institu- 
tion of the family is normally protected — as we have before 
observed — by strong moral sentiments, which are liable to 



XIV A/^EA OF GOVERNMENT— STATES AND DISTRICTS 235 

be at once offended and weakened bj the collisions between 
discordant rulea^ 

Let us now turn to consider briefly the variations in 
law and in other forms of governmental action, which 
may be rationally groimded on differences not in the nature 
of men or the structure of societies, but in their physical 
environment. Some departments of law scarcely admit of 
variation on this ground ; thus (e.^.) the regulation of the 
family and the conditions under which it is expedient to 
enforce contract are not likely to vary with variations in 
the physical circumstances of different societies: and the 
protection of person and reputation from injury intentionally 
inflicted will be equally required everywhera There are 
more likely to be important differences required in the 
governmental interference which I have distinguished as 
" indirectly individualistic"; especially owing to the peculiar 
dangers of mutual mischief which arise imder urban as con- 
trasted with rural conditions, from the closer packing of 
human beings. Thus sanitary regulations are likely to be 
different in town and coimtry respectively: it has even 
been said that " each town has its own drainage problem." 
Similarly, the protection against the introduction of diseases 
from abroad will require regulations on the borders of a 
coimtry which will not be necessary in inland districts. 
Again, we have seen that the general principle of securing 
to each individual the fullest possible opportunity to employ 

^ As an American writer says, speaking from experience: — "Diversity 
of commercial roles in the several States impedes and annoys business, for 
American business pays little heed to State lines. Conflicting laws of 
marriage and divorce unsettle family relations, and undermine the moral 
basis of society. ... It is possible that a man married in Kew York, 
divorced and re-married in Indiana, shaU be the lawful husband of one 
woman in Indiana, and shall be regarded by the law of Kew York as the 
husband of another. By the law of Indiana his status is completely 
regular ; by the law of Kew York he is a bigamist. He may have a second 
family of children who, by the law of Indiana, are legitimate, but by the law 
of Kew York are bastards." (Prof. Munroe Smith, on "State Statute, and 
Ck>mmon Law *' in the Political Science Quarterly for March 1888.) It is in 
the part of the marriage-law that relates to the conditions of divorce, and of 
the re-marriage of divorced persons, that variation is specially mischievous. 



336 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap, xiv 

his labour and undisturbed enjoyment of its results, has to 
be carried out differently in relation to different kinds of 
natural utilities : for instance, special regulations are likely 
to be necessary for mines, for fisheries, for forests; and 
these, by the nature of the case, are likely to be applicable 
to certain districts in the country and not to others. For 
similar reasons special kinds of the interference that we 
have called — ^in a wide sense — socialistic, may be only 
required in special localities : as {t,g^ for the draining of a 
marshy district, or for the irrigation of one deficient in 
water, or for the protection of low-lying lands against 
floods, or for the more elaborate provision of water for 
household use, which urban conditions render desirable. 

In these various ways an important amount of differen- 
tiation in the work of government comes to be recognised 
as needful To what extent the structure of government 
should be modified to meet this need is an important ques- 
tion which we shall consider in a later chapter (xxv.) 



CHAPTEE XV 

PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 

§ 1. I NOW pass to consider that part of the work of 
Gk)vemment which is primarily external ; ^ — that is, which 
has for its end the maintenance of proper relations between 
the community governed and other communities and indi- 
viduals outside it. 

Assuming the existence of a group of independent States, 
approximately on the same level of civilisation, among whom 
a large part of the surface of the globe is divided up — the 
rest being either sea or in the possession of uncivilised or 
more imperfectly civilised peoples, — what general rules can 
be laid down for the conduct of the governments of such 
States in their dealings with foreigners ? 

Here, firstly, any one who begins to reflect on the 
accepted premises of political reasonings in such matters 
finds on the one hand a distinction between Bules of 

^ As we have already seen (chap, xi.), the existence of these external 
relations, in anything like their present form, must have very important 
effects on the internal relations of the community. Even in ordinary times, 
in most European States, the taxation required for the purpose of protecting 
the community and its interests against the attacks of external enemies 
exceeds that required for all its internal functions taken together ; while in 
critical emergencies of war a govemment is commonly held to have a right 
to demand from the governed far more severe sacrifices, and even the most 
perilous personal services. Further, an important part of the duty of any 
government towards foreigners is to exercise adequate care in preventing its 
own subjects— or other persons under its control — from doing mischief to its 
neighbours. In short, the functions of government that are primarily 
external have in various important ways an internal aspect, which can 
never be altogether excluded — as the discussion that follows will show. 



238 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

International Law and Maxims of Foreign Policy ; and on 
the other hand he finds, almost equally current, a criticism 
of this distinction, on the ground that no code of rules 
applied to the action of independent states can properly 
be called " law." And certainly such rules lack the charac- 
teristics that we have noted as belonging to the law that 
regidates the internal relations of Statea A group of 
independent States has no supreme judicature, by which 
any controversy as to the precise rules of international con- 
duct actually established can be decisively settled: no 
common legislature, whose determinations in respect of new 
rules are habitually obeyed by the majority of such States : 
and no central executive able to crush any recalcitrant 
nation with irresistible forca Under these circumstances 
it may reasonably be questioned how far the distinction 
between " legal " and *' moral " rules and sanctions — which 
is of so great and pervading importance in the regulation of 
dvil relations within a community — can be consistently or 
usefully applied to international relationa This question, 
however, it seems best to defer until we have reached a 
fuller view of the system of rules of international conduct 
for which it is desirable to obtain — and not imreasonable to 
hope — general acceptance, and of the sanctions applicable in 
support of such rulea In the meantime, the fundamental 
distinction which I shall take will be between (1) Eules or 
Principles of International Duty, and (2) Maxims of 
National Policy within the limits defined by duty. In 
discussing the former I shall avoid applying the term 
" legal " at all to the mutual claims of States ; but it will 
be sometimes necessary to distinguish " strict " duties, the 
violations of which are to be regarded as wrongs justifying 
war in the last resort if reparation is obstinately refused, 
from merely unkind or unfriendly acts or omissions, which 
are to be regarded as only justifying retaliatory unfriendli- 
ness and general disapprobation, but not breaches of inter- 
national peace. 

The relation between rules of international duty — 
whether " legal " or only " moral " — and maxims of policy 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 239 

will correspond broadly to the relation between rules of 
duty and maxims of prudence, as applied in practical 
reasonings on matters of private conduct : and accordingly 
the rules of international duty will be imderstood to be 
determined with a view to the common interests of the 
whole group of States; whereas in framing maxims of 
policy we shall primarily consider the interests of a single 
State, supposed to be pursuing its own ends within the 
limits fixed by international duty. It will therefore be 
obviously proper to investigate first the principles of duty, 
reserving the maxims of policy for subsequent discussion.^ 

But before we proceed to the first investigation, it will 
be well to face a fundamental difficidty, that may naturally 
suggest itself as we pass from the discussion of the principles 
of internal legislation and administration, which has so fSeu: 
occupied our main attention. So far as this discussion 
went, the mode in which practical application was to be 
given to the conclusions of theory was obvious and urmiis- 
takable. Whatever principles of internal legislation have 
been determined after full consideration to be best ought 
to be applied by the legislature of each State ; — of course 
with due regard to its particular circumstances and condi- 
tions, to the evils of great and sudden change, and to the 
limits — of varying elasticity — fixed by the opinions, customs, 
and traditions of the society. There is, in a well-ordered 
society, a habit of unhesitating obedience to law, on which 
the legislators may generally rely, so long as they are 
careful not to transgress the limits just indicated But 
when we turn to principles of international conduct, we 
find the case different. Even if all States were agreed on 
the rides which it is the common interest of all to have 
generally observed, this would not necessarily ^ make it the 

^ See chap, xviii. 

' I do not of course mean to imply that it can never be the duty of a 
nation to carry out, even at some sacrifice, a higher morality than its 
neighbours : only that this duty must be taken to be relative to and 
dependent on the degree of risk involved, 'and the degree of probability that 
the example set will contribute to bring about a better state of things. I 
may observe that the same principle is applicable to private morality also. 



240 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

clear duty of any one nation to observe them, when the 
primary effect of such observance would entail a material 
sacrifice of national interests, unless there is a reasonable 
prospect that the rules in question will be observed by 
other States in similar circumstancea And the difficulty 
of relying on this reciprocity, in a grave conflict of interests 
and passions, is so manifest that it led Hobbes to enunciate 
the famous paradox that in the relations of independent 
nations (or individuals) "right and wrong, justice and 
injustice have no place." It is true that this paradox — 
in the extreme form in which Hobbes stated it — is con- 
tradicted by experience. There art accepted rules of inter- 
national duty, and the pursuit of national self-interest is 
restrained by them, — imperfectly, no doubt, but still to an 
important extent. Still, it may be urged that though 
independent nations and their governments are actually 
restrained by international usages and precedents, it does 
not follow that they will be affected by a theorist's exposi- 
tion of principles : this, at any rate, it may be thought, 
must be a mere demonstration in the air, without any 
practical effect. 

The answer is twofold. In the first place, usages and 
precedents are often doubtful and ambiguous: and when 
this is the case, reference is naturally and inevitably made 
to the principles supposed to imderlie the accepted rules : 
and it is the special business of the theorist to state these 
principles with clearness and precision. Secondly, whether 
International Law is more similar to law proper or to 
positive morality, there can be no doubt that it undergoes 
change in details from time to time : ^ and these changes 

though to a much more limited extent. As Mr. Spencer says {Principles of 
EthicSf Part I., chap. xv. p. 106): '* ideal conduct is not possible for the 
ideal man in the midst of men otherwise constituted. . . Among x)eople 
who are treacherous and utterly without scruple, entire truthfulness and 
openness must bring ruin ... a mode of action entirely alien to the pre- 
vailing modes of action cannot be successfully persisted in — ^must eventuate 
in death of self, or posterity, or both." 

^ The precise manner in which these changes are brought about will be 
considered hereafter (see chap. xvii. § 4). 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 241 

are likely to be more beneficial in their effects, the more 
the rational principles on which thej ought to be based 
can be made clear and obtain general acceptanca 

Nor does it seem difficidt to determine the required 
rational basis: since the two lines of reasoning which 
naturally suggest themselves for determining it, in accord- 
ance with the plan so far pursued, will lead to the same 
general residt. 

In the first place, the natural aims and purposes of 
independent groups of men, in relation to their physical 
environment and to each other, and their possible mutual 
conflicts, have obviously a broad and general similarity to 
those of individual human being& The analogy does not, 
indeed, hold altogether : the unity of the most orderly and 
harmonious political commimity is never so complete as the 
unity of an individual man: and, in fact, as we shall 
presently see, the incompleteness of the unity of States is a 
main source of the special problems presented by inter- 
national relationa Still, the analogy is sufficiently strong 
to render it reasonable to consider how far the accepted 
principles of civil order within a normal modem community 
are applicable to a society of independent State& 

Now it will be at once evident that the absence of a 
supreme supervising government excludes the application of 
"paternal" interference, except of a kind that woidd be 
unhesitatingly rejected in the civil relations of sane adidts. 
No one would propose that a single private individual, or 
voluntary combination of private individuals, should be 
empowered — except under the strictest governmental super- 
vision — to interfere with another sane adult for that other's 
good; the danger of such control being exercised in the 
interest of the protecting individual or group would be 
thought to outweigh any possible advantage to the person 
controlled. And a similar danger renders this kind of 
quasi-paternal control generally inexpedient in the case of 
States, at least if they are at all equal in grade of civilisa- 
tion, and sufficiently coherent internally to be regarded as 
united wholes. It may, indeed, be sometimes advantageous 

R 



242 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

for a weak State to be placed under the protection of a 
group of its neighbours, through whose mutual jealousies it 
may thus secure greater practical freedom from interference 
than if it were left in nominally complete independence : 
but this is hardly analogous to what we have called 
"paternal" interferenca Again, a semi -civilised State 
may sometimes gain more than it loses by being brought 
into a condition of semi-dependence on a more civilised 
neighbour; but in the historical instances in which this 
relation has been established it has usually been by a self- 
interested encroachment of the protecting State, acquiesced 
in, rather than approved by, other nations ; and the general 
conditions of its legitimacy can hardly be distinguished from 
the conditions of legitimate conquest. 

Socialistic interference, again, seems almost out of the 
question in international relations, for the simple reason that 
so long as the concert of nations is ineffectual to prevent 
any one nation from doing mischief to another — and the 
continual frequency of wars shows that it is ineffectual — 
it would be futile to try to use it for the harder task of 
compelling mutual positive services. States have, indeed, 
combined in various ways — for instance, by international 
postal arrangements — for the promotion of their common 
interests ; and it is eminently desirable that they should so 
combine. But, at least among States on an equality and 
sharing the same civilisation, common action of this kind 
has always been effected by voluntary combination ; and I 
conceive that this must continue to be the case until the 
reign of peace among independent nations is finally estab- 
lished. 

We are left, therefore, with the principle of mutual non- 
interference — interpreted as including fulfilment of contracts 
and reparation for wrong done — as the principle exclu- 
sively applicable to the obligatory relations of civilised 
States. And historically this has been in the main the 
excepted principle of what has been known in modern times 
as International Law — so far as it has been conceived to 
be determined on rational grounds, and not by mere usage 



\ 



\ 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 243 

or convention. When the real, though imperfect regulative 
influence that had previously been exercised over Western 
Europe by the unity of Christendom had finally collapsed 
in the religious wars of the sixteenth century, the need of 
establishing, on independent principles, a system of rules 
for the conduct of nations was strongly felt ; and the void 
was supplied by the conception of the Law of Nature, which 
had been gradually formed in the development of mediaeval 
thought, partly by tradition from Cicero through Augustine, 
and partly from the revived study of Eoman Jurisprudence. 
According to this conception individuals — or at least heads 
of families — had lived before the formation of political 
societies, and would always live, apart from positive law, 
in a "natural" society, imder a system of rights and 
obligations based mainly on the principle of mutual non- 
interference, as above defined. It seemed clear that nations 
having no common government must be members of such 
a " natural " society ; and, accordingly, the jurists of \ the 
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, especially Grotius, tried 
to systematise and complete on the basis of this Law of 
Nature the body of rules governing international relations 
that had gradually come to be accepted. The system thus 
framed commended itself to thoughtful persons generally 
in the 17th and succeeding centuries; — indeed, Maine 
speaks of the " rapid, complete, and imiversal success " of 
Grotius's treatise Dt Jure Belli et Pacis, as a " great marvel" 
And though the actual conduct of European States in 
these centuries has often deviated very widely from the 
recognised ideal of international duty, still the influence of 
this ideal hsLS been sufi&cient to make it practically useful to 
work out in detail the application of the principle of mutual 
non-interference to international relations. Indeed, if this 
principle were discarded, it would be hard to find any other 
to which appeal could be made, on any question of inter- 
national duty not decisively determined by precedents. 

Before entering on this task it seems desirable to define 
more closely the sphere of application of the rules that 
we are about to lay down. I have already said that their 



244 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

observance cannot be regarded as strictly binding on States 
except in their dealings with other communities from 
whom reciprocal observance may reasonably be expected. 
But, in applying this maxim, a distinction has to be drawn 
between the general principles of abstinence from aggression 
and observance of compact, — applicable, as we have just 
seen, to the relations of individuals no less than to those 
of communities — and the detailed rules of international 
conduct, inevitably in some degree arbitrary, which have 
been accepted as the best attainable expression of these 
principles by the civilised States of Europe, and those of 
European origin in America. It would be unreasonable 
to expect exact observance of these particular rules — or of 
any other particular rules which this group of States may 
hereafter accept — from even civilised States outside the 
circle of European civilisation, imless such States have in 
some unmistakable manner sought and obtained admission 
into the European state-system. But the general principles 
on which these rules are avowedly based, are of much wider 
application. There seems to be no class of societies — 
civilised, semi-civilised, or savage — in dealing with which 
a civilised State can be exempted from the obligation to 
observe these principles, unless it has adequate grounds for 
expecting that they will be violated on the other side : 
though the precise forms of behaviour in which the general 
intention of avoiding injury to other communities will be 
most fitly expressed, will of course vary with the customs of 
these communities. In dealing, however, with uncivilised or 
semi-civilised conmiimities difficult questions arise as to the 
interpretation of the duty of abstinence from aggression, and 
the manner in which it is to be reconciled with the legitimate 
claim of civilised communities to expand into unoccupied terri- 
tory, and their alleged right— or even duty — of spreading 
their higher tjrpe of social existence. The consideration of 
these difficulties I reserve for a subsequent chapter (xviii.): 
in the present and the following chapter our attention will 
be mainly confined to the rules of mutual duty which it 
is desirable to maintain among civilised States. 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 245 

It appears from what has been said that the main heads 
of international duty will coincide broadly with what we 
have taken to be the main heads of civil jurisprudence. 
We shall regard it as the primary duty of a State to abstain 
from injuring any other State or its members (1) directly, 
or (2) by interference with rights of property, or (3) by 
non-performance of contract ; and these three rules of duty, 
viewed in another aspect, will constitute the primary inter- 
national rights. But under all these heads important 
differences are to be noted, in the application of these prin- 
ciples to the relations of Statea These differences arise 
chiefly from the following causes: (1) the incomplete 
definiteness of States as compared with individuals; (2) 
their incomplete coherence, — especially the complication 
introduced by the difference and possible conflict between 
the actions of a government and those of the individuals 
who owe it obedience ; (3) the difference between govern- 
mental control of portions of the earth's surface and private 
ownership of land ; (4) the impossibility of applying simply, 
in international relations, the principle that coercion invali- 
dates a contract. The last-mentioned difference is connected 
with (5) the inevitable enlargement of the Right of Self- 
defence, in the case of independent nations, to a Bight of 
War. For, carrying the analogy with civil rights further, 
we see that if a primary international right is infringed, 
the wronged State must be held to have a secondary right 
to reparation ; and, if reparation is refused, or if the outrage 
is gross and deliberate, the exercise of force must be held 
to be legitimate for obtaining redress, and adequate security 
against repetition of the outrage. But in the absence of a 
common government of nations such exercise of force 
ordinarily leads to war : and we thus have to consider the 
bindingness of agreements imposed by the victor in a war 
on the vanquished, and also to consider how far and in what 
way the mutual relations of belligerents and neutrals can 
be regulated so as to minimise the mischiefs of war. 

I proceed to examine more closely each of these differ- 
ences and its effects — confining myself, for the present, as 



246 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

far as possible to the consideration of peaceful relations, and 
leaving the regulation of war to the following chapter. 

§ 2. There are two ways in which the lines of separation 
between States lack perfect definiteness ; firstly, there is no 
clear and universally accepted determination of the criteria 
of membership of a State; and secondly, each State has 
aliens residing in its territory and thus partially subject to 
its laws, and also has some of its own members in a similar 
relation to other States. As regards the first point, there 
is of course no doubt that persons born within the territory 
of a State of parents belonging to it — or unknown parents 
— themselves belong to that State, unless their connection 
with it has been severed by some act done by it or them, 
designed to have this effect. But, owing to the extensive 
interfusion of modem nations, there is a not inconsiderable 
margin of doubtful cases, as to which different nations take 
divergent views, and are liable to come into conflict. For 
instance, European nations disagree somewhat as to the 
national character properly belonging to children born out 
of their parents' country. The older view — to which Eng- 
land still adheres in principle — made the plaice of birth 
decisive ; the newer rule, which since the Code Napoleon 
has tended to prevail, makes the child follow the nationality 
of its parents. It seems desirable ^ that liberty of choice 
should be generally allowed in such cases ; but it is, I con- 
ceive, in accordance with the principle of mutual non-inter- 
ference that each State should have an imquestioned right 
of determining the relation to itself of children born within 
its territory ; all that can be demanded is that due warning 
should be given to other nations of the laws laid down by it 
on this subject. 

A more important difficulty is presented by the question 
whether the members of a community generally should have 
unlimited liberty of severing their connection with it by 

^ If it were found that this liberty gave too Diuch encouragement to aliens, 
it would seem to me better to counteract it by disabilities of some other kind, 
rather than force on the children of resident aliens a nationality to which they 
were averse. 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 247 

expatriation. In practice, as I have before said, free 
emigration is now generally conceded by European States ; 
but a universal and unlimited right of expatriation is not 
yet generally admitted ; and it is easy to see that where 
imiversal military service is compulsory it may be necessary 
to prohibit temporary emigration, lest it should take place 
widely with the view of evading military service. It would 
probably be inexpedient, even in this case, to take any 
measures to prevent such emigration, beyond the announce- 
ment of a penalty to be inflicted if the evasive emigrant 
returns ; but however this may be, I do not think that any 
measures taken to prevent expatriation can, on the principle 
of mutual non-interference, be regarded as an ofiTence by 
any other State, except so far as the persons whose expatria- 
tion is prevented are already claimed as subjects by that 
other State. On the other hand, it cannot be regarded as 
an interference that a foreign State should admit such an 
evasive emigrant to membership ; but it seems clear that 
it cannot, consistently with our principle, claim to protect 
him, if he returns to his native land, from the penalty in- 
curred by unlawful emigration. 

In any case, we have to recognise that ordinary inter- 
course brings political societies into a condition of partial 
interfusion, to which the ordinary intercourse of indi- 
vidual himian beings offers no parallel; in consequence 
of which each modem State contains a nimiber of aliens 
residing temporarily or permanently within it. But on 
the principle that limits strict duty to non-interference, 
it must be competent for a State to prohibit this inter- 
fusion totally or partially : and if (as is the common view) 
we regard its rights over its territory as only limited by 
the duty of avoiding mischief to other States — according 
to the analogy of private rights of property — it must be 
competent for it to exclude inhabitants of other States 
altogether from its territory, without violation of duty. I 
conceive that this exclusive territorial dominion must be 
generally admitted — with a certain reservation in the case 
of States that claim the ownership of large tracts of im- 



24S ELEMESTS OF POUTICS ckap. 

oocapied land — owing to the inconTeniences and dan^rs of 
conflict that must generallv attend anv liivision or limita- 
tion of dominion : and. if so. a State must obvionslv have 
the right to admit aliens on its own terms, impoeing any 
conditions on entrance or any tolls on transit, and subject- 
ing them to any legal restrictions or disabilities that it 
may deem expedient. It ought not. indeed, having once 
admitted them, to apply to them suddenly, and without 
warning, a harsh differential treatment ; but as it may 
lesitimatelv exclude them altozether, it most have a ri^rht 
to treat them in any way it thinks tit. after due warning 
given and due time allowed for withdrawal And if it 
may deal thus with aliens, it must clearly have similar 
rights in respect of its own alienated meml^er?. I^^ubtless 
such exclusive or differential treatment — unless ju?tined as 
a necessary p'recaution against mischief to the State adopt- 
ing it — is oppi'.eed to international morality as wantonly 
unfriendly, and would justify retaliatory exclusion, or other 
unfriendlv acts, thoui^h not war. But it can hardlv be 
regarded as even unfriendly for a government to apply to 
aliens within its territorv the laws and administrative 
measures that it applies to its own subjects, even if they do 
not accord with the alien's view of justice. Thus a French- 
man, hoMing land in Ireland, could not reas«>nably complain 
of bein^ juiiiciallv forced to urive his tenants " lair " rents, 
though he might reasonably complain if such a measure 
were applie*i only to lands held by Frenchmen. If. however, 
the laws of one nation A are desiiniedlv made, or de- 
signedly administered, s«j as to cause special l.«ss or annoy- 
ance to the members of another nation E residinir in the 
territory of A, B has dearly a gn^und of compbint. and a 
cLiim to reparation if the unequal treatment is applied 
without warning. And even if such special l.^ss or annoy- 
ance resulted without design, complaint would not be 
unreasonable : but if such complaint had no eflect, it would 
not be in accordance with the principle of non-interference 
for B to take ulterior hostile measures bevond breiikinir off 
communication with A; and probably it would not be 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 249 

expedient to do more than warn its subjects against 
travelling or residing in A. 

§ 3. On the other hand, a State that has admitted aliens 
is bound not only to abstain from injuring them through the 
operations of its government/ but also to take due care to 
prevent its members &om injuring them, so long as they are 
within its territory ; and, where prevention has failed, to 
inflict punishment and provide reparation for any wrongs 
that they may have suffered. And, similarly, it is at cdl 
times the duty of a State to take reasonable care to prevent 
the inception within its territory of acts injurious to other 
States or their members intended to take effect outside its 
territory. Nor can the extent of this obligation, I conceive, 
depend on the internal constitution or condition of any 
coimtry, at least so far as the duty of reparation goes. 
It may be admitted that a State is not " bound to alter the 
form of polity under which it chooses to live, in order to give 
the highest possible protection to the interests of foreign 
States ; " ^ but if it prefers a polity that renders it more 
dangerous to others, it must take the risk of having to 
give more compensation for damage done to their interests. 
Other nations, on the principle of mutual non-interference, 
have no right to interfere with its constitution and laws, so 
long as its foreign obligations are tolerably fulfilled ; but, 
correspondingly, it has no right to make them an excuse for 
non-fulfilment. 

A precise general definition of "reasonable care" can 
hardly be given ; but it may be laid down that " somewhat 
more forethought in prevention of noxious acts is due during 
war " or internal disturbance in neighbouring coimtries, than 
in time of peace. 

This duty of control, of course, extends to the case of the 

^ If such ii^ory has been inflicted through the agency of governmental 
ofScials, their act should, of course, be disowned and compensation given ; 
and, if the offence be grave, the official should be punished. 

' This quotation, and others in the present chapter, are from Mr. W. £. 
Hall's Intematumal Lam, I may here take the opportunity of acknowledging 
my extensive obligation to this work, in composing the present and the 
following chapters. 



2SO ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

aliens to whom a State gives hospitality. It must take 
reasonable care to prevent them from doing mischief to its 
neighbours. This duty becomes important through the 
natural tendency of the law-breakers of any community 
to fly to neighbouring countries to escape punishment. 
Generally speaking, such law-breakers are likely to be mis- 
chievous where they take refuge, and it is the common 
interest of both the States concerned that they should be 
handed over for trial and punishment in the country whose 
laws they have broken. But there is likely to be some 
margin of disagreement between two States as to the kinds 
of acts that deserve punishment; and we cannot say 
broadly that eveiy State is bound to accept any other 
State's definition of crime, and hand over for punishment 
persons whom it believes to be innocent. Its clear duty 
is only not to facilitate in any way the performance of 
future acts that it admits to be mischievous. It is, indeed, 
conceivable that the mischief caused to a State by its neigh- 
bour's encouragement to law-breakers may be sufficiently 
grave to justify complaint, or even, in the last resort, forcible 
suppression : but such serious results are hardly likely to 
follow from any disagreement as to the definition of ordinary 
crime, if the neighbour is a civilised State in which order is 
tolerably maintained. 

The chief practical difficulty arises in the case of what 
are called " political " offenders — that is, persons who have 
violated the laws of their country by acts designed to effect 
a change in its constitution. According to the principle of 
non-interference no State should do anything calculated to 
prevent (or cause) internal changes in another : and it would 
seem that the surrender of political offenders is an interfer- 
ence of this kind on behalf of the existing government. 
It is, indeed, imdeniable that such attempts, when made 
without adequate cause or reasonable prospect of success, 
may be mischievous in the highest degree : but a State 
cannot generally be expected to undertake the responsibility 
of deciding how far any particular attempt at a revolution 
in a foreign State was justifiable. On the other hand, by 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 251 

affording a refuge to escaped rebels after an unsuccessful 
attempt at revolution, it undoubtedly renders revolutionary 
enterprises somewhat less perilous to those who engage in 
them, and so far may be said to interfere on the side of 
revolution. In this difficulty, the best compromise would 
seem to be, that a foreign State should not surrender 
fugitives whose alleged crime does not involve any wrong 
to private individuals, or any damage to the community, 
other than what necessarily attends interference with 
governmental fimctions; and that it should not even be 
boimd to surrender them, even if they are accused of acts 
involving such wrong or damage, provided these acts were 
merely normal incidents in an attempt at revolution : but 
that, if it does not surrender them, it should be bound to 
take special care that they do not use its territory as a 
basis for carrying on serious hostilities against their govern- 
ment, — by placing them if necessary under special control 
or supervision, and expelling them if there is adequate 
evidence that they have thus abused its hospitality.^ Should 
it refuse to take either of these latter courses when occasion 
arises, it must be held responsible for any mischiefs that 
the fugitives may succeed in inflicting on their own State. 

The right of each State to exclude foreigners must 
extend, in strictness, even to ambassadors or other agents 
of communication between States ; a refusal to receive them 
cannot be held to justify war. But it is obviously most 
expedient, with a view to the maintenance of friendly rela- 
tions between States, that such agents should not only be 
admitted, but received with special marks of courtesy ; and 
even that special immimities from the jurisdiction pf the 
foreign country in which they temporarily reside should be 
granted them — ^partly from considerations of courtesy, partly 
to secure the independence of action which the functions of 
these officials require. 

^ I conceive, however, that it cannot be required" to interfere in this way 
with the fugitives, to prevent acts which it would not regard as criminal if it 
were itself the object of them ; for instance, a State which allows the bitterest 
attacks on its own government to be freely published cannot be expected to 
check similar free criticism on foreign governments. 



253 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 4. The distinction between offences against government 
and offences against individuals assumes special import- 
ance, and raises some special difficulties, when we pass to 
consider the international right of a community to its land. 
The modem nation, as we have seen, is inseparably connected 
with its territory — the very idea of a modem State involves 
the notion of dominion exercised over a certain portion of 
the earth's surfa^. Such dominion is of course distinguish- 
able from private ownership so far as this extends ; but it is 
80 far analogous to private ownership &om an international 
point of view, that it is commonly assumed to imply a right 
of exclusive use for members of the State exercising the 
dominion, even as regards portions of land which are kept 
common in use and management. But it must be observed 
that governmental ovmership or dominion may reasonably 
be extended over parts of the earth's surface where there 
would be no reason for allowing the right of exclusive 
use: since the rationale of the two rights is essentially 
different, from the point of view of himianity at large. 
The main justification for the appropriation of land to the 
exclusive use, either of individuals or of groups of human 
beings, is that its full advantages as an instrument of pro- 
duction cannot otherwise be utilised ; the main justification 
for the appropriation of territory to governments is that 
the prevention of mutual mischief among the human beings 
using it cannot otherwise be adequately secured. Thus, 
when piracy was a common danger of grave importance in 
the later mediaeval and early modern period of European 
history, any State that kept the peace of the neighbouring 
seas by putting down pirates, rendered an important service 
to traders generally ; in return for which it might reasonably 
claim to exercise governmental control over these seas, and 
to levy tolls and dues to recompense it for the trouble and 
cost to which it was put. But the claim that some States 
put forward to close the seas so controlled by them against 
foreigners could not thus be justified: against this claim 
the argument of Grotius, that " the sea is large enough to 
suffice for all peoples for every use, either of drawing water. 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 253 

fishing, or navigation," was doubtless valid during this 
period.^ 

At present — ^piracy being reduced to a remote and occa- 
sional danger — the marine dominion of States is restricted 
by a rule generally accepted throughout the European group 
of States, to a narrow belt of water along the coast of a State's 
territory ; and this is only allowed to be appropriated subject 
to a general right of peaceful navigation ; * whil6 beyond this 
limit the sea is now held to be common to all nations for all 
purposea The breadth of the recognised belt of " territorial 
waters " is usually stated to be a marine league, with a some- 
what larger allowance in the case of gulfs and bays enclosed 
by the land of one State : ^ it appears to have been originally 
determined by the supposed range of artillery. The exact 
limit must be always somewhat arbitrarily fixed : but the 
chief general groimds on which it should be determined 
may be stated to be (1) the need of as much control over 
the sea as is required for the security of the lives and 
property of the inhabitants of the land ; (2) the desirability 
that the government of each country should have the power 
of regulating the fisheries on its coast, to prevent wasteful 
exhaustion of the supply.* 

The extent of the land belonging to different States is, of 
course, determined mainly by historical causes, with which 
we are not here concerned. New territory of any import- 
ance^ can only be acquired either (1) from other States 

^ Dt Jure Belli et Pacis^ II. chap. IL § 3. This argument is certainly 
no longer valid, in respect of aU kinds of fisheries. 

^ It is widely held that this common right of peaceful navigation ought to 
extend to all navigable rivers ; but the usage of nations does not yet impose 
the opening of such rivers, as a strict international duty, on the nations that 
own the banks. 

' The definition of the generaUy received breadth is vague in this latter 
case, and seems to depend somewhat on the proportion of length to breadth. 
Perhaps ''straits " should be put on the same footing as '' gulfs and bays." 

^ This latter principle might be fairly used to justify an extension of 
marine dominion beyond the limits now commonly recognised ; and probably 
such an extension will be generally allowed as the need of restricting the 
fireedom of fishing grows more urgent. 

' I pass over, as insignificant, changes in water boundaries arising from 
fluvial deposits or similar causes. 



254 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

through cession, or conquest ripened by prescription, in 
either case usually in consequence of war ; or (2) through 
the extension of dominion over land hitherto unoccupied by 
any civilised Stata Of both modes of acquisition I shall 
have more to say in subsequent chapters (xvi. and xviii) ; 
but as regards the latter, I may here notice certain questions 
which arise, somewhat similar to those dealt with in chapter 
iv., where the acquisition of private rights of landownership 
was discussed. 

In the first place, granting the accepted view that no 
State infringes the rights of others by taking exclusive 
possession of unoccupied land, it is difl&cult to lay down 
precisely wherein "taking possession" should be held to 
consist, or how much land should be held to be brought 
under dominion by any given act of occupation. On both 
these points it has been the practice of the West European 
nations — in the great process of expansion, by which more 
than a third of the land-surface of the globe has been 
brought imder the sway of their civilisation — to make 
claims startlingly wide ; and even, though to a lesser extent, 
to admit similar claims on the part of others. Thus " it 
has been common to endeavour to obtain an exclusive right 
to territory by acts which indicate intention and show 
momentary possession, but which do not amoimt to con- 
tinual enjoyment or control ; and it has become the practice 
in making settlements upon continents or large islands to 
regard vast tracts of country in which no act of ownership 
has been done as attendant upon the appropriated land." 
For instance, " it has been maintained that the whole of a 
large river basin is so attendant upon the land in the 
inmiediate neighbourhood of its outlet that property in it is 
acquired by merely holding a fort or settlement at the 
mouth of a river." Such claims as these cannot but appear 
extravagant when judged by the principle that we are now 
applying. It would seem that the strict right of a State 
to exclude other States from land can only be maintained 
by its exercising a tolerably effective and continuous govern- 
mental control over the territory in question; though it would 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 255 

be, generally speaking, unfriendly on the part of any State 
to occupy, in the neighbourhood of the settlements of another, 
land over which these settlements may be naturally expected 
to expand within a comparatively short time, or land speci- 
ally important for the security of such settlements. Usage, 
no doubt, has allowed as legitimate much wider claims than 
our principle would admit ; but I conceive that usage in 
this respect is likely to grow stricter as the world grows 
fuller. 

But secondly, I do not think that the right of any 
particular commimity to the exclusive enjoyment of the 
utilities derived from any portion of the earth's surface can 
be admitted without limit or qualification, any more than 
the absolute exclusive right of a private landowner can be 
admitted. The rigour of this right has hitherto been 
mitigated, in modem States generally, by the practical 
allowance of free immigration ; but if this should ever be 
sweepingly barred, I conceive that the right of exclusion 
would be seriously questioned in the case of States with large 
tracts of waste land suitable for cultivation ; and that some 
compromise would be found necessary between the pre- 
scriptive rights of the particular State and the general 
claims of humanity. On the one hand, no well-ordered 
commimity could reasonably be required to receive alien 
elements without limit or selection ; on the other hand, an 
absolute claim to exclude alien settlers adequately civilised, 
orderly, and self-dependent, from a territory greatly imder- 
peopled, cannot be justified on the principle of mutual 
non-interference. On similar grounds I should hold that 
dominion over the sea ought not to be used for the purpose 
of excluding aliens from fishing in the seas controlled, 
provided they submit to the regulations necessary to pre- 
vent exhaustion of the fisheries, and pay an equitable share 
of the cost of such regulations. 

Finally, it must be observed that in discussions among 
civilised States as to the occupation of new territory, the 
claims of the uncivilised tribes to the lands in some sort 
occupied by them have been usually ignored. Such claims, 



\ 

t 
256 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap./ 

however, cannot be left out of account in any statements 
of the general principles of international duty. It doeB 
not indeed seem to me that the moral right of savages tci 
their hunting-grounds can be allowed, in the interest of 
the human race, to override the claim of civilised races to 
expand : on the other hand, I regard it as the plain duty of 
the latter to make every effort to secure to the savages as 
full compensation as possible for the utilities of which they 
are deprived, and to extend to them such share of the ad- 
vantages of civilisation as they are capable of receiving. To 
what extent, and by what means, this result can be brought 
about, I shall hereafter consider.^ 

The preceding discussion has led us to take note of the 
large portion of the earth's surface that lies outside the 
territory of any State ; the most important i)art of this is 
the open sea, which forms the common highway for the 
ships of all nations. To prevent confusion and friction it 
is expedient that members of any State should, as far as 
possible, continue to be governed by the law of their own 
community, when they are in this region of no-government. 
Hence (1) the civil relations of members of the same State 
should continue to be governed by their own law ; and (2) 
in any voluntary transactions between members of different 
commimities, the obligations incurred by each should be 
the obligations that his own law would have imposed on 
him, unless it can be shown that he intended to incur further 
obligations; and (3) each government, in fulfilling its general 
duty of protecting its subjects from mischief outside the 
limits of civilised States, should show as much regard as 
possible for the governmental rights of other powers, by 
allowing, as a general rule, that vn^ongs inflicted by foreigners 
be redressed and punished by the courts of the latter — pro- 
vided that tolerable redress can thus be attained. 

There is, however, an important exception to the rule 
last stated. The crew of any vessel ordinarily forms an 
organised body imder a (subordinate) government, to which 
it is expedient to grant extensive powers, in view of the 

^ See chap, xviii. § 8. 



I 

^xv PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 257 

possible absence, for considerable periods, of ordinary govern- 
mental control, and the special dangers of conflict and dis- 
cordant action : and, for the maintenance of order, these 
powers should extend to the repression of wrongs committed 
or threatened by any person on board the vessel, to what- 
ever State he may belong. 

§ 5. Let US pass to consider the obligations arising out 
of the contracts of a State with foreign States or individuals. 
As regards the latter there is not much to be said ; when 
an individual incurs damage through violation of contract 
by a State, he has, generally speaking, a clear right to adequate 
compensation — similar to what he would have if a fellow- 
citizen had broken faith with him — which it is the strict 
duty of the offending State to satisfy ; provided always the 
contract has not been vitiated by fraud. How far it is 
expedient that his claim should be enforced, if necessary, by 
violence on the part of the commimity of which he is a 
member, must depend on circumstances. It is noteworthy, 
however, that failure to pay debts to private persons on the 
part of a State is not usually treated as an international 
offence, probably on account of the laxity of bankruptcy 
law in modern States generally ; though it might reasonably 
be so treated in particular cases, if the failure could not be 
justified by the financial necessities of the defaulting State. 

It is more important to note the different conditions 
imder which contracts have to be held valid between 
State and State, as compared with contracts between citizens. 
In either case it is manifest that a contract cannot be bind- 
ing which has been obtained by fraud ; and personal vio- 
lence exercised on a government or its agents, to obtain their 
consent by terror, must be held to invalidate an international 
compact as it would a compact between individuals. But 
violence exercised on a State by war cannot be held to have 
this effect ; since war, as we have seen, is, in the last resort, 
the only normal means to which a State can have recourse 
to obtain reparation for wrong and adequate security against 
its repetition. Hence the fulfilment of onerous conditions 
enforced by a victor who had just cause for war, so far as 

s 



2S8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

they are not manifestly in excess of due reparation or the 
requirements of future security, must be held to be as clearly 
binding as any other international duty. The case is no 
doubt theoretically diflferent ^ where the conqueror was in the 
wrong ; and even where he is in the right, if the terms oflFered 
by him to the vanquished are immoderate in their rigour. 
But even here expediency forbids us to lay down broadly 
that a treaty made under imjust coercion is simply invalid ; 
since the universal adoption of this principle would greatly 
aggravate the evils of imjust victory: it would be the 
interest of the conqueror to crush his enemy completely and 
relentlessly, as he would no longer be able to trust his en- 
gagements. In this difficulty international morality seems 
practically to be forced to a rough compromise, which will 
be considered in the next chapter, after we have discussed 
generally the regtdation of war and its effects. 

§ 6. So far we have had in view States supposed to 
possess substantial internal cohesion. We have now to 
consider a new class of questions which arise from the fact 
that this internal cohesion is liable to be broken, so that 
States imdergo a process of internal disorder caused by the 
insurrection of a part of the commimity. This process may 
aim either (1) at revolution, substituting a new government 
for the old over the whole commimity ; or (2) at the dis- 
ruption of a part of the commimity from the rest, with a 
corresponding portion of territory; and in either case it 
may be more or less slow and prolonged, and may end 
either in failure or success. 

What then is the duty of other States in relation to 
these processes? On the principle of the mutual non- 
interference of States, which we have hitherto been apply- 
ing, the process of revolution is an internal affair with 
which foreign governments are not concerned ;— except 
transiently, if the conflict between the party of order and 
the revolutionists is sufficiently obstinate and prolonged to 

^ It must be admitted that this distinction can hardly be expected to have 
any important practical application until international morality is materially 
improved. 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 259 

assume the dimensions of civil war, so that other States, in 
order to carry out the rule of non-interference, are forced 
to take up towards both contending parties the attitude of 
neutrals towards belligerents. This latter point of inter- 
national duty will be more conveniently considered in the 
next chapter. In any case, when the process of revolution 
is over, the international rights and obligations of the State 
that has passed through it will revive unchanged, whether 
that State be under its old government or imder a new one. 
The case is different with disruption. If this process be 
successfully carried through, it will be the duty of other 
States who wish to adopt an attitude of perfect neutrality, 
to recognise at a certain point of time that a new political 
commimity has come into existence, to which they must 
accord the ordinary rights of an independent State, while 
claiming from its government the fulfilment of customary 
international obligations. And it may often be a delicate 
matter to determine the exact point of time at which this 
recognition is to take place; since to accord it too soon 
would be showing undue partiality to the disruptionists, 
while to delay too long would be an offence to the new-born 
State. If the government of the old State itself recognises 
the independence of its revolted province, as soon as its 
struggle to retain it is substantially over, the difi&culty will 
be removed ; but if it clings to the claim of supremacy after 
it has ceased to make serious efforts to realise it, its ob- 
stinacy cannot justify other States in postponing recognition. 
They must judge for themselves when the substantial 
struggle is over, and must recognise the government of the 
insurgents as having succeeded, generally ^ speaking, to the 
international rights and obligations of the previous govern- 
ment, in respect of the persons and territory that are it 
facto under its control at the time of its recognition. Some 
difficulty, however, may arise as to the division of obliga- 
tions — especially debts. It is clear that the government of 

^ I say ''generally," because sometimes special rights may have been 
granted, or obligations imposed, in view of considerations which disruption 
has annihilated. 



26o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the new State mufit be held responsible for all such debts of 
the old State as were specially connected with the disrupted 
province — having been either contracted for local purposes 
or secured on local revenues. On the other hand, it seems 
clearly just, under ordinary circumstances,^ that the general 
debt of the old State, so far as this debt was incurred while 
it included the disrupted province, should be divided 
equitably between the two independent States that have 
resulted from the process of disruption. But it would seem 
that the division ought to be made by treaty between the 
disrupted communities ; and that if no such treaty is made, 
the community that claims to represent the previously 
existing State must be held responsible for the whole debt, 
as for any other obligations arising out of contract, where 
the possession of a certain territory was not an express or 
implied condition of the contract. Only, if no one of the 
disrupted fragments claimed a continuity of existence with 
the previous State, would a division of the obligations of the 
previous State among the fragments have to be undertaken 
by foreigners to protect their own interests ; but this case 
is likely to be rare. 

Hitherto I have assumed that the duties of foreign States 
are to be determined on the principle of non-intervention. 
But the analogy between States and individuals, on which 
we have been working throughout, fails in a marked 
manner when a State is torn by violent civil dissensions : 
foreign States — if they would not have their conduct 
regulated by empty fictions — must recognise that in this 
case the quasi-personal imity which international morality 
attributes to States has vanished; and that they have 
practically to deal with two bodies instead of one, each 
accusing the other of violations of right grave enough to 
justify a resort to force. The principles on which violent 
insurrection and violent repression of insurrection are 
respectively to be justified have already been partially coii- 

^ This qualification is intended to exclude such cases as that of (1) a 
colony which had never shared the burden of the mother country's debt ; 
or (2) a province which had been conquered and never really submitted. 



XV PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL DUTY 261 

sidered, and will be further discussed in the concluding 
chapter of the treatise : but — assuming that there are some 
cases in which the insurgents would have right on their 
side and others in which they would be in the wrong — we 
may here note certain general considerations bearing on the 
expediency of foreign intervention on either side in such 
cases. 

An attempt to change violently the government of a 
country may arise in two ways; either from a dispute 
between two of the recognised organs of government, in 
which neither will give way, or from an insurrection of 
the governed generally — or a portion of them — against 
the government as a whole. In the former case the con- 
flicting organs, in endeavouring to enforce their respective 
claims by arms, are appealing to the people governed to 
decide the point at issue : and the people to whom appeal 
is thus made, if sufficiently coherent to deserve the name of 
a nation, must generally be far better qualified to decide it 
than foreigners can be ; so that the intervention of the latter 
is likely to be simply mischievous. The mere fact that the 
claims of one of the contending organs are traditionally 
established, while those of the other are revolutionary, does 
not materially affect the case ; for the change may still be 
opportune and desirable, — the ripe fruit of time, though 
needing to be violently plucked. There is further a serious 
danger that if intervention be tolerated, the intervening 
State or States will take advantage of their neighbour's 
weakness to secure some imjust gain at its expense ; and 
that this ill-gotten gain will carry with it the seeds of 
future bitterness and strife. Such intervention, therefore 
should generally be viewed with reprobation. 

There are, however, special grounds on which, even in 
this case, intervention may be justified: — thus, e.^., the 
revolutionary party may adopt an aggressive attitude to- 
wards foreigners, by acting avowedly on principles which 
they not only profess to be applicable to other States, but 
actually threaten to aid in applying elsewhere if they suc- 
ceed at homa Only, to give the required justification, the 



a62 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xv 

aggressiveness ought to be definite and unmistakable ; other- 
wise the foreign intervention will be justly open to the 
charge of causing the evil that it is designed to avert. 

The case of an insurrection by the governed against the 
government as a whole differs from that just discussed, 
chiefly because it is more likely to occur in what has been 
called an " inorganic " ^ State ; — Lt, one in which the rule is 
that of an alien element supported by an army divorced in 
feeling from the rest of the population. The commimity 
thus artificially held together lacks the kind of cohesion 
that constitutes a nation ; and this is also likely to be the 
case where the aim of insurgents is what I have called 
" disruption," — i.e. to secede from the State to which they 
belong with a portion of its territory. In either of these 
cases the intervention of a foreign State on the side of the 
insurgents is not equally open to the objection of interfer- 
ing with an appeal to the nation, as the proper final arbiter 
of internal disputes : and if it appears that the contending 
parties are deeply and irreconcilably divided in national 
sentiment, such intervention seems admissible, under such 
conditions as would render it expedient in wars between 
independent States : i,c, if it seems likely to be eflTective to 
secure peace and tends to prevent injustice. The observance 
of these conditions, however, is likely to confine such inter- 
vention within narrow limits ; in view of the danger that — 
being designed, or believed to be designed, to further the 
aggrandisement of the intervening State or States — it may 
arouse the jealousy of others, and cause an extended war. 

^ See Seele's Iitirodwiion to Political Science^ Lee. iii. pp. 73-75. 



CHAPTEE XVI 

THE REGULATION OF WAR 

§ 1. As has already been pointed out, any serious and un- 
provoked violation of strict international duty gives the 
State whose rights are violated a claim to reparation ; and 
if reparation be obstinately refused, the offended State must 
be held to have a right to obtain it by force, with the aid 
of any other States that can be persuaded to join it. This 
exercise of force need not necessarily amount to war; for 
instance, if the property belonging to a State or any of its 
members has been imjustly seized by another State, repara- 
tion may. be obtained by " reprisals," — i.e, by seizing the 
property of the offending State or its members, provided the 
public faith of the retaliating State is not pledged to its 
protection.^ It is possible that this exercise of force, if 
carefully limited to the exaction of redress, may be followed 
by negotiation and amicable settlement ; but it is too prob- 
able that it will lead to the general rupture of peaceful 
relations — that substitution of physical conflict for verbal 
discussion, which we call war. 

The refusal of reparation cannot be regarded as obstinate, 
if the inculpated State is willing to accept the decision of 
an arbitrator on the claims urged against it. And I think 
it very important that all who desire peace and justice 
should urge the adoption of this method of settling disputes, 

^ This proviso is inserted to exclude repudiation of debts due to subjects 
of the offending State : a procedure, however, from which modern States 
will usually be restrained by the fear of losing their credit. 



264 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

wherever there are not strong reasons for regarding it as 
impracticable; since an extension of arbitration seems the 
most hopeful means of reducing the danger of war among 
civilised States. At the same time, it is no less important 
to consider carefully the inevitable limitations of the sphere 
of practicable arbitration. 

1. The violation of right may be a continuing evil, which 
requires immediate abatement as well as reparation ; and 
the violence required for this abatement is likely to lead to 
further violence on the other side ; so that the conflicting 
States may be drawn into the condition of war by a series 
of steps too rapid to allow of the delay necessary for arbi- 
tration, and involving so many fresh groxmds of complaint, 
that the decision of the original dispute may easily sink 
into unimportance. 

2. The interests at stake may be so serious that a State, 
believing itself able to obtain redress by its own strong 
hand, cannot reasonably be expected to nm any serious risk 
of a wrong decision on the part of the arbitrator. And 
such a risk is likely to occur when the dispute is one that 
involves a disagreement on principles of international duty, 
widely extended among civilised States ; since in such case 
it will be difficult to find an impartial and trustworthy 
arbiter. Thus, during the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, 
it would have been difficult to find such an arbiter in Europe 
in any quarrel between a Catholic and a Protestant State ; 
and in the nineteenth century, it would be difficult to find 
such an arbiter, in any quarrel caused by the claims of a 
nationality struggling for independence. 

3. The weight of the consideration last mentioned is 
increased when we take into account the inevitable vagueness 
and uncertainty in which many important points in the 
determination of international duty are involved. This will 
appear from the present and preceding chapters, so far as the 
theoretical determination on principles is concerned ; while 
in the next chapter it will be shown that further difficulties 
arise when we try to settle the limits of strict — or " legal " — 
international duty by reference to established usage. In con- 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 265 

sequence of these uncertainties and difficulties, even where 
there is no definite conflict of principles, the ties of interest 
and alliance that bind nations together may render it difficult 
to find an arbiter whose absence of bias can be trusted 
when the question to be decided is of great importance.^ 

A portion of the obstacles to arbitration just stated would 
certainly be diminished, if civilised nations could be induced 
to agree on the appointment of a standing Court of Inter- 
national Arbitration, to which questions might be referred 
for decision by the consent of disputant States.^ Still the 
danger of bias would not be removed ; and it would still be 
very doubtful whether, in disputes in which serious national 
interests were at stake, the government of a powerful State 
would feel justified in incurring the danger, — even supposing 
it to be sincerely desirous of subordinating national interests 
to international justice. In such cases peace might often 
be more likely to be preserved by conciliatory efforts to find 
through direct negotiation a tolerable compromise between 
the conflicting interests of the disputants, than by insisting 
on arbitration.^ 

Historically, the two causes of bias that I have dis- 
tinguished have often operated together. The most serious 
wars of the European group of States have been the combined 
results of conflicting fimdamental principles, religious or 
political, and conflicting national or governmental interests 
of great — real or supposed — importance : and where such 
conflicts arise, arbitration is rarely likely to be an acceptable 
means of preserving peace ; since the conflict of principles 
makes it difficult to find an arbiter in whose decision both 
sides can sincerely acquiesce as just, while the magnitude of 

^ Some further discussion of the problem presented by a conflict between 
the claim of national interests regarded as imperative and established rules 
of international duty will be found in the following chapter, xvii. § 2. 

' As proposed by Maine in his (|)osthumously published) lectures on 
International Law, Lee. xii. 

^ I have not noticed difficulties of detail in the way of arbitration, — such 
as the difficulty of attaining agreement as to the scope of an arbitrator's 
inquiry, and the facts he is to take as accepted by both disputants. Diffi- 
culties of this kind are not unfrequently found to mar an otherwise fair 
prospect of settlement by arbitration. 



266 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the interests at stake makes acquiescence in an unjust decision 
appear a supine and cowardly abandonment of patriotic duty. 

4. We must also take note of the cases where open and 
avowed invasions of international rights are resorted to as 
a measure of self-protection on the part of the invading 
State, without any hostile intent, — as in the famous seizure 
by England of the Danish fleet in 1807. Such measures 
may be justified as necessary to the self-preservation of the 
State that resorts to them ; but it can hardly be expected 
that the State that suffers from them will patiently submit 
to them, if it has any reasonable prospect of success in war. 

Supposing war inevitable, we have to consider what rules 
can be laid down for the conduct of the States engaged in 
it, or of other States. 

In the first place, we cannot lay down, on the principle 
of mutual non-interference, that it is the strict duty of 
any State, other than those between whom the quarrel has 
broken out, to take part in the war. If, however, there is 
general agreement as to the right and wrong of a quarrel, 
I think that it is, generally speaking, both the duty and 
the interest of neighbouring States to take the risk of 
threatening intervention to prevent manifest aggression, if 
there is a fair prospect of forming a league of States for 
the purpose of such intervention, so strong as to render 
resistance on the part of the aggressor improbable. I think 
that the formation of such leagues is the most hopeful 
mode of preparing the way for a permanent federation of 
civilised States, strong enough to prevent wars among its 
members. If, however, there is no general agreement as to 
the side on which justice lies, or if, for some other cause, 
it is impossible to form a league of decisive strength on 
behalf of what is recognised as justice, it will be generally 
both the duty and the interest of the neighbouring States 
to adopt the attitude of strict neutrality, in order to avoid 
useless and dangerous extension of the evils of war. 

Accordingly, in formulating the rides which civilised 
opinion should attempt to impose on combatants, we must 
abstract from all consideration of the justice of the war ; 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 267 

we must treat both combatants on the assumption that each 
believes himself in the right, and that his object in fighting 
is to obtain due redress for wrong, and adequate security 
against its repetition : since, whether this be so or not in any 
particular case, it would usually be idle to try to subject an 
imjust combatant as such to any special restrictions or dis- 
abilities in the conduct of his war. For, even supposing 
that there is a decided preponderance of opinion in the rest 
of the civilised world in favour of one of the combatants ; 
still the subjection of the other combatant to special dis- 
abilities could only be usefully enforced by a concert of 
nations which, if it can be made eflTective for this purpose, 
could probably be made eflTective for the prevention of the 
war altogether, and had much better be so employed. 

§ 2. Let us consider, then, how the duties of a belligerent, 
fighting in the name of justice, and under the restraints of 
morality, are to be determined, — first, as regards his enemies, 
and, secondly, in relation to neutral States. 

To begin with the mutual duties of belligerents. The 
general principle of such duties seems not difficult to state. 
It is clear that the aim of a moral combatant must be to 
disable his opponent, and force him to submission, but not 
to do him (1) any mischief which does not tend materially 
to this end, nor (2) any mischief of which the conducive- 
ness to the end is slight in comparison with the amount of 
the mischie£ Unfortunately, this second limitation is in- 
evitably so vague as to leave room for great differences of 
opinion as to its proper application; and, moreover, its 
application must continually vary with variations in the 
arts of war, and in the circumstances and prevailing senti- 
ments of civilised men. Fortimately, on the other hand, 
the restraints that at any time ought clearly to be imposed 
on a belligerent, in the application of this principle, are 
usually sustained by strong sanctions, at least when the 
area of the war is restricted ; ^ from the danger that the 

^ An important incidental evil of a widely-extended war is, that the 
restraining force of public opinion on the belligerents is inevitably much 
reduced by it. 



268 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

belligerent who violates them runs of rousing public indig- 
nation against himself in neutral commimities, as well as 
hardening the resistance of his enemy. 

For the sake of illustration I proceed to sketch in out- 
line the particular restraints to which a belligerent may 
now reasonably be expected to conform, in his treatment of 
his enemy, according to the general principles above laid 
down ; drawing attention to any difficulties and to points 
in which opinion has recently changed or is changing. 

To begin with the instruments and methods of war. A 
belligerent may be expected to abstain from using weapons 
that inflict decidedly more suflFering than others, without 
crippling the enemy at all in proportion,^ and from devasta- 
tion that does not importantly facilitate military operations. 
And though, generally speaking, he must be allowed to 
deceive the enemy in any way he can, he may be restrained 
from using as means of deceit the flags of truce, and other 
symbols that are needed for carrying on the necessary 
intercourse of enemies. 

Again, he may be expected to abstain from recruiting 
his army compulsorily out of the population of an invaded 
coimtry ; since the modern sense of nationality would not 
only excite a strong reprobation for such conduct, but would 
also make the forced recruits a bad element of the army. 
On both these points there has been a considerable change of 
opinion since the now prohibited practice was largely carried 
on by the Prussians in Saxony in 1 75 6 ; owing to the general 
growth of national sentiment that has taken place in the 
interval A more important rule is that which — we may 
confidently hope — will in future restrain civilised belli- 
gerents from inflicting personal injury on non-combatants, 

^ In the Declaration of St. Petersburg, in 1868, the European Powers laid 
down that it would be "contrary to the laws of humanity to employ arms 
which render death inevitable." I do not understand on what principle 
this is laid down, since death is the most effectual kind of disablement ; and 
if the process that made it inevitable also made dying more rapid, without 
making it more painful, the sufferings of a battlefield would be materially 
diminished. And international morality has never prohibited such whole- 
sale destruction as is caused {e,g,) by mines in sieges. 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 269 

SO far as they submit ; and even from imprisoning them, 
unless they are of special political importance — as sovereigns 
and diplomatic agents, — or professionally employed in render- 
ing services to combatants — as commissariat employes, 
messengers, etc. The efiect of scaring the enemy into sub- 
mission by harsh treatment of non-combatants is on the 
whole too uncertain and remote to outweigh (1) the danger 
of rousing the sympathetic indignation of neutrals, together 
with (2) the serious inconveniences to which an invading 
army is exposed in the midst of a population embittered by 
private injuries. Similarly, an invader may be restrained 
from interfering with the laws and customs and social life 
of any portion of the hostile country that he may tempor- 
arily occupy, so long as it submits : though it is difl&cult to 
put limits to the severity which he may legitimately use 
to crush resistance to his authority on the part of non- 
combatants. 

Similarly, belligerents may be expected to abstain from 
inflicting personal injuries on combatants Tiors de combat : 
unless exceptionally by way of punishment for violating the 
usages of war.^ 

On the other hand, in order that combatants and non- 
combatants may claim their respective privileges, the adver- 
sary has a manifest right to demand that a clear line shall be 
drawn between the two; so that no individual may avail him- 
self of the advantages of both characters at once. The diffi- 
culty here arises solely or mainly in the case of resistance to an 
invading army : it would be out of the question to lay down 
that citizens hitherto imwarlike may not rush to arms to 
defend their country in its extremity ; but the invader may 
fairly claim that if they thus join the ranks of combatants, 
it shall be in some manner both orderly and unmistakable : 
— that is, under some responsible authority who can keep 
their hostile acts within the usages of war, and with some 

^ The slaughter of prisoners has also been justified as a measure of self- 
protection : but I conceive that it would now only be tolerated — however 
extreme the emergency — if the prisoners refused to give their parole not to 
serve during the remainder of the war, or if experience showed that their 
word could not be trusted. 



270 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

distinctive marks, not easily removable, of their newly 
assumed profession. 

For similar reasons merchant vessels should not be 
allowed to assume a warlike character unless attacked. It 
does not indeed follow that we ought to disallow "privateers" 
— i.e, ships sailing under a commission of war, but fitted 
out by private persons for private gain, to be made by 
preying on the enemy's commerce : but, experience having 
shown the difficulty of maintaining proper control over 
such armaments, it has been agreed by most civilised States ^ 
to abolish privateering. 

In the treatment of combatants who have been taken 
prisoners, our general principle will require the captor to 
re&ain from any rigour not necessary for safe detention 
while the war lasts, and to provide adequate food and 
clothing for the enemies kept in custody : and if, to recoup 
the expenses thus incurred, he must be allowed to make his 
captives work, it will prevent him imposing on them any 
work of a needlessly degrading or repulsive kind. A more 
onerous demand on the victor is that of succouring and 
tending the sick and woimded left behind by a flying 
enemy ; but the common sentiment of the civilised world 
would now impose this as an imperative duty, which must 
be performed even at considerable inconvenience : and the 
same sentiment is probably now strong enough to secure 
neutrality not only for surgeons and medical attendants 
while employed in medical functions, but also for hospitals, 
ambulances, and hospital ships, with their surgical and 
medical stores. 

To sum up ; so far as personal injuries are concerned, 
there is, I think, no material difficulty in limiting the 
mischief caused by war to something like the minimum 
necessary to achieve the ends of war. 

§ 3. Restraint is more difficult as regards seizure of 
property. The heavy pecuniary burdens that the conditions 

^ A declaration to this effect, adopted at the Congress of Paris in 1856, 
has since been signed by aU civilised States, except Spain, Mexico, and the 
United States. 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 271 

of modem warfare impose on a belligerent render most 
kinds of wealth — public or private — undeniably useful to 
him: property has no inconvenient patriotic sentiments 
that will be violated if it is made to serve the needs of the 
enemy, and common humanity is not oflTended by spoliation 
if mild and regular, as it is by the harsh treatment of 
innocent persons. 

Still, certain limitations may be established : An invader 
must be allowed to seize the movable public property of 
the invaded country, and freely to use immovables for his 
own purposes : but he may be restrained from appropriating 
such things as archives or State papers, which are specially 
important to the country in which they are found, but not 
available for warlike uses on either side. Probably, too, 
the appropriation of collections of pictures or books may 
be prevented in future civilised warfare ; since they could 
only be made available for warlike purposes by being sold 
and so most probably dispersed : and the loss thus entailed, 
not only to the spoliated country but to mankind at large, 
would generally be quite disproportionate to the belligerent's 
gain. On somewhat similar grounds a temporary conqueror 
may be restrained from diverting public revenues set per- 
manently apart for such social purposes as healing, educa- 
tion, art, and science, — for which the government of the 
invaded country is practically only a trustee. 

The most serious diflSculty arises when we attempt, on 
our general principle, to fix the limit of an invader's right 
to take private property. The indiscriminate pillage that 
was considered legitimate until the eighteenth century, has 
gradually died out, "partly from an increase of humane 
feeling, partly from the selfish advantage of belligerents, 
who saw that the efficiency of their soldiers was diminished 
by the looseness of discipline inseparable from marauding 
habits, and their military operations embarrassed in countries 
of which the resources were destroyed"^ ; — in fact "the suflFer- 
ing attending it was out of all proportion to the advantages 

^ The passages quoted in this — as in the preceding — chapter are from 
Mr. W. £. Hall's treatise on hdtrnaAwMil Law, 



272 ELEAfENTS OF POLITICS chap. 



gained by the belligerent employing it." But this would 
not be true of the orderly and regulated levying of supplies 
from private persons through "contributions" of money 
beyond ordinary taxes, and " requisitions " of special com- 
modities needed by the army, — food and fodder, horses, 
waggons, boats, and certain kinds of labour. Such " requisi- 
tions " diflTer from regulated pillage mainly in the receipts 
which it is customary to give for them, which fiEWiilitate the 
recovery of compensation from their own government by the 
private persons. If such receipts are given, both " contribu- 
tions " and " requisitions " may be regarded as payments ou 
account,compulsorily made by private members of the invaded 
community, of a portion of the pecuniary compensation for 
the mischief of the war which the invader holds himself 
justified in asking from the community as a whola So 
regarded, these contributions in money and kind conduce to 
the invader's main end in three ways: (1) they give him 
supplies of which he stands in need; (2) they diminish the 
power of his non-combative enemies to assist in the war 
against him in the one way in which, as non-combatants, 
they naturally would assist — by furnishing the " sinews of 
war " ; — and (3) at the same time, if imposed over a con- 
siderable district, they apply a strong pressure tending to 
indispose the enemy to continue hostilities : while yet, 
unless the contributions are excessive in amount, so great 
as to cause severe distress, the pressure can hardly be called 
cruel 

I therefore think that, on our general principles, the 
belligerent cannot reasonably be restrained from enforcing 
such contributions ; and in fact they were enforced, with 
the full severity that can be regarded as admissible, by the 
invaders in the last European war. 

If, then, an invader who gets a portion of his enemy's 
territory under his control may exact contributions from 
his enemy in money and kind, it woidd surely be unreason- 
able to require a maritime power to abstain altogether from 
attacking the private property of enemies at sea : though 
it may reasonably be required to abstain from such attacks 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 273 

where they would inflict hardships out of proportion to 
their utility to the belligerent. The seizure of coast fish- 
ing-boats is a case of this latter kind, except where such 
boats are specially useful for military purposes. 

§ 4. Let us pass to consider the rules by which the 
relations of belligerents to neutrals are to be regulated. 
The main difficulty here arises from the necessity of apply- 
ing together two principles, each of which seems clearly 
acceptable if considered by itself, but which, when applied, 
come inevitably into a conflict that can only be settled by 
a more or less arbitrary compromise. It is clearly the 
duty of a belligerent to avoid injuring communities that 
are not at enmity with him, and their members ; and it is 
clearly the duty of a neutral neither to assist nor to hamper 
either belligerent in his warlike operations. And some 
deductions from either principle are obvious and uncon- 
tradicted. Thus, on the one hand, it is plainly the duty of 
a belligerent not to send his forces into the territory of a 
neutral government without the consent of the latter, — 
however convenient he may find this for the purposes of 
his military operations, — and not to interfere with any 
members of neutral States whom he finds outside their 
countries, unless they are aiding his enemy. And, on the 
other hand, it is the duty of a neutral State to prohibit its 
subjects from engaging personally in the service of either 
belligerent, and to take measures to prevent their doing 
this to any material extent ; ^ and also to be impartial in 
either closing or opening its territory to both belligerents 
equally. 

But in realising this impartiality difficulties arise : since 
regulations that are formally impartial, and are applied 
with strict equality to both sides, may practically give a 
decided advantage to one of the two belligerents, owing to 
his situation and circumstances. This being so, the safer 

^ Though the progress of modern civilisation has continually sharpened 
this duty, it ought, I conceive, to he made formally more'strict than it is now. 
Any memher of a neutral State engaging in the service of either belligerent 
ought ipso fojcto to lose his nationality ; and only be allowed to recover it 
when the war is over by going through a process of re-nationalisation. 

T 



274 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

course for the neutral is to refuse to both belligerents any 
use of his territory that may facilitate warlike operations ; 
and this is what existing opinion would regard as his duty, 
so far as the admission of organised forces into his territory 
is concerned.^ But this rule can hardly be extended to the 
exclusion of ships of war from the territorial waters of a 
friendly State : since such ships may be in pressing need of 
provisions or coal, which they cannot otherwise obtain, and 
which, therefore, it would be inhumane not to allow them 
to purchase. On the other hand, it is obvious that, if the 
privilege of purchasing such supplies in neutral ports were 
granted without limit, the neutral territory might practi- 
cally furnish the belligerent with a base of operations, 
enabling him to carry on naval war from which he would 
otherwise have been precluded. The neutral, therefore, has 
the delicate task of limiting the hospitality it extends to 
ships of war to the minimum that humanity — considering 
the inevitable conditions of navigation — may seem to 
require. Similarly, common humanity requires that a 
neutral State should extend hospitality to a beaten army 
flying towards its frontier ; but it must not allow them to 
start from its country to resume hostilities : it would seem 
to be the neutral's duty to disarm and " intern " them, un- 
less they accept the position of prisoners of war released 
on parole. 

More serious difficulties arise out of the relations of 
trade which bind together modern States in time of peace 
to a continually increasing extent. For, on the one hand, 
any trade, even in things remote from warlike use, may 
actually contribute importantly to enable a belligerent to 
carry on his war : on the other hand, it would be a palpably 

^ It wiU generally bo the neutral's interest for a dilTerent reason to adopt 
the altematiTo of impartial closing, rather than impartial opening, so far as 
armies are concerned ; i,t, because the latter alternative is more likely to 
bring it into collision with one or other of the belligerents. And though 
" during the eighteenth century it was an undisputed doctrine that a neutral 
State might grant a passage through its territory to a belligerent army," 
the most recent authors express a contrary opinion, and '' no direct attempt 
has been made since 1815 to take advantage of the asserted right." 



XVI THE REGULA TION OF WAR 275 

exorbitant pretension in a belligerent to require all neutral 
States to put an end to their trade with his enemy. Only 
a Napoleon, at the giddy height of his predominance, could 
make such a claim ; ^ and it is not likely to be repeated. 
Some compromise, then, is needed between the claim of the 
neutral to be undisturbed in his trade, and the claim of the 
belligerent that his enemy shall not be aided. 

The best compromise seems to be that no private trade 
— except to some extent trade in the actual mxmitions of 
war — should be regarded as an offence on the part of the 
neutral State of which the trader is a member ; but that 
the belligerent should have a right to check such trade, 
and confiscate the wares, in all cases in which they are 
calculated to be of special utility to his enemy — ix. either 
(1) when the commodities are of a kind adapted for military 
use by the enemy, or (2) when the belligerent's own military 
operations are effectively directed to the cutting off of all 
supplies from some part of the enemy's territory. In the 
former case the belligerent would be allowed to confiscate 
the commodities as " contraband of war " ; in the latter he 
would confiscate them on the ground of an attempt to break 
through a " blockade." The precise degree of adaptation to 
military use required to justify the treating of wares as 
contraband, and the precise conditions under which a blockade 
is to be considered, must be determined on the basis of ex- 
perience by usage, or arrived at by agreement among the 
leading States.^ 

I have said that no trade should be regarded as an 

^ I refer to the famous " Berlin Decree " (1806), by which all nations were 
prohibited from all commerce or communication with the British Islands. 
But the retaliatory Orders in Council of the English Government (1807), 
proclaiming a blockade of France and the States under her sway, were 
scarcely less monstrous, except that they were retaliatory. 

^ Thus, it has to be determined whether horses are contraband, or ship 
timber, and other materials of naval construction, or coal sent directly for 
the use of war-ships, or provisions and clothing sent for the use of soldiers. 
So again, though it is clear that a naval blockade must be maintained by 
forces at least sufficient to render egress or ingress dangerous to the ship 
attempting it, some further definition is needed as to the extent to which 
the danger should go. 



276 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

offence on the part of a State, " except to some extent trade 
in the actual munitions of war." There is one special case 
in which it certainly seems best, in the interests of peace, 
that this trade should be definitely prohibited ; i,e, where 
the process of exporting munitions is easily perverted into 
the distinct violation of neutrality before noticed, which 
consists in allowing the neutral country to be used as a 
basis for military operation& The most important example 
of this is the trade in armed ships ; since an armed ship 
sent forth as an article of export is so easily changed into 
a ship adequately equipped and manned for war, that a 
State which allows such export at the risk of the private 
exporter — like other contraband trade — will find it hard 
practically to prevent its country from being made the 
source of a hostile expedition. 

In the above discussion I have said nothing of the 
formalities that should accompany the commencement of a 
war, — a point to which international jurists have given 
serious attention. I conceive that they have usually some- 
what exaggerated its importance. It is no doubt desirable 
that any hostile act commencing a war should be preceded 
by a formal notice, and accompanied by a formal justification 
of the resort to violence ; but it is more important that 
war should be really resorted to only when redress for 
wrong has been refused ; and the process of asking for 
redress will involve a practical warning that war is im- 
pending in case of refusal 

§ 5. It is a question of some interest how far such 
regulations as I have sketched out are applicable to civil 
war. Let us consider first the relation between the belli- 
gerents — though it is not strictly an " external " relation. 
It is clear that the reasons above given for limiting the 
mischief of war in various ways, so far as it falls on com- 
batants, apply equally where the war is between two parts 
of the same community, except in the one case of the 
treatment of prisoners. In this case the rule that restricts 
a belligerent's right over his captives, to that of detention 
for the purpose of disablement during the war, comes into 



XVI THE REGULA TION OF WAR 277 

conflict with the right of a government to treat rebels as 
criminals. It is admitted by all reasonable persons that it 
is the imperative duty of every government to punish 
wrongful violence directed against itself like other wrongful 
violence — and even with peculiar severity, on account of 
the widespread evils resulting &om anarchy : and so long 
as other States are not prepared to intervene in a hostile 
way, they must allow a government contending against an 
insurrection to assume the right to treat the insurgents as 
criminals. I conceive, however, that the mere extent and 
strength of an insurrection may be reasonable grounds for 
condemning the exercise of this right ; partly because they 
afiPord a presumption that the insurgents have grievances 
justifying a forcible attempt at redress ; partly because of 
the danger of provoking reprisals, and of causing intense 
and widespread bitterness that would long outlive the 
war. 

No general rule, however, can be laid down for deter- 
mining exactly when a government is wrong in refusing to 
insurgents, if captured, the full rights of prisoners of war. 
It is somewhat easier to define the point at which they are 
entitled to the privileges of belligerents at the hands of 
neutrals ; since in this latter case the question is simply 
one of military fact, and as such it is not unlikely to be 
implicitly decided by the established government of the 
divided community, before neutrals have occasion to consider 
it. For if this government claims the right to take any 
war-measure injuriously affecting the interests of neutrals — 
such as blockading ports or capturing contraband of war — 
it cannot reasonably complain that the insurgents, whom it 
has thus by implication declared to be belligerents, should 
be recognised as such by other States. It is, indeed, possible 
that the government, to avoid this implication, may try to 
throw what is substantially a war-measure into a non-warlike 
form ; for instance, instead of proclaiming the blockade of 
certain ports, it may simply declare them closed against 
trade. Such a measure would, on the principle applied in 
the preceding chapter, be within the strict international 



278 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

right of the government adopting it in time of peace 
though it would be unfriendly unless justified by grave 
emergency ; but if it were adopted in time of civil war, it 
would force neutrals to examine whether the ports in ques- 
tion were de facto under the control of the government 
claiming to close them ; and if they were actually in the 
hands of the insurgents, the measure would justify neutrals 
in recognising the latter as belligerents, no less than if it 
had been openly a proclamation of blockade. 

§ 6. In considering such rules of international duty, 
applicable to the conditions of war, as seem capable of 
being effectively maintained by the consensus of civilised 
conmiunities, I have — as was before explained — left out of 
consideration the justice of the war on either side. But 
can we do this completely when we pass to consider the 
validity of the results of victory in war ? Can we regard 
as finally and permanently binding an arrangement to 
which a community is forced to agree by the pressure of 
superior force exercised throughout in an imjust cause ? I 
do not think that an affirmative answer to this question 
would be supported by general moral opinion ; nor do I 
think that it would conduce to the general happiness of 
civilised mankind that such a rule should be so supported : 
the prospect it would hold out of securely enjoying the 
gains of a skilfully timed act of unscrupulous brigandage 
would be too strong a temptation for statesmen and Statea 
On the other hand, — as was before said, — to treat unjust 
force as altogether invalidating obligations deliberately 
assumed by States under its pressure would obviously tend 
to aggravate the evils of unjust victory; as the unjust 
victor, being unable to rely on the promises of the van- 
quished community, would feel driven by self-interest to 
crush it utterly. 

Between these dangers we have to take refuge in a 
somewhat rough compromise, allowing a certain jural force 
to treaty obligations imposed by unjust victors, but not the 
same as if they were free from the taint of injustice : and 
this view must be extended to conditions imposed by just 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 279 



victory, when they are clearly in excess of what is required 
for due redress and reasonable security for the future. I 
do not affirm that the compromise here suggested is the 
best attainable ; but I think that it should not be hastily 
rejected because it is unsatisfactory : as my position is that 
the conditions of the problem inevitably exclude a satis- 
factory solution — just because war is an essentially un- 
satisfactory means of preventing or remedying international 
wrongs.^ 

In order to formulate more precisely the suggested com- 
promise, it is convenient to distinguish two main species of 
victor's conditions: (1) cessions^ of territory that — though 
usually defined and formally admitted in a treaty — may 
sometimes be realised without any express contract at all, 
simply by the tacit recognition of the changes of dominion 
brought about by military force; and (2) contracts in 
the narrower sense — i.«. engagements on the part of the 
vanquished community, to be fulfilled at some future tima 
Where victory in war has led to a transfer of territory, 
the question of fidelity to engagements seems to be only of 
secondary importance : the most important question relates 
to the moral or jural situation that results from complete 
— though possibly tacit — acquiescence in the loss of 
territory. In short, we here come upon the question of 
the "Eight of Conquest" reserved in a previous chapter 
(xiv.) In considering this question, a broad distinction has 
to be drawn between territory whose inhabitants really 
formed one nation with the community from which the 
treaty has cut them off, and territory that was merely under 
the dominion of the vanquished State, but not inhabited by 
persons having any strong preference for the government 
that they obeyed. In the former case the cession involves 
the dismemberment of the vanquished nation, unless the 

^ I may perhaps add that a contemplation of the insoluble difficulties of 
the problem from a jural point of view has a useful effect in impressing on 
the mind the essential barbarism of war, — however ordered and regulated. 

' Such cessions are, of course, '* contracts " in the wider sense in which 
the term includes transfers of property between individuals ; but not in the 
narrower and more usual sense. 



28o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

whole portion of it occupying the ceded territory is willing 
to submit to the sacrifice of quitting its native soiL The 
imposition of these alternatives seems an excessive punish- 
ment, — except for very outrageous or frequently repeated 
international crimes ; accordingly, I conceive that a nation 
subjected to such a punishment would ordinarily incur no 
moral condemnation for an attempt to recover its ceded 
territory, in spite of any treaty of cession, so soon as any 
change in the political situation gave a reasonable prospect 
of success in such an attempt. And this, of course, would 
be still more clearly the case, if the war that led to the 
conquest had been generally recognised as a war of imjust 
aggression. It will therefore be in general harmony with 
current moral opinion to lay down that a formal cession of 
territory imposed by wrongful force ought not to be taken 
to bind the vanquished to more than a complete temporary 
suspension of hostilities, terminable at any time by the 
vrronged State, imder the same conditions under which the 
rebellion of an admittedly oppressed section of a State 
would be generally judged to be legitimata For we must, 
at the same time, distinctly recognise that by this temporary 
submission of the vanquished — whether express or tacit — 
a new political order is initiated, which, though originally 
without a moral basis, may in time acquire such a basis, 
from a change in the sentiments of the inhabitants of the 
territory transferred : since it is always possible that through 
the eflfect of time and habit and mild government, — and 
perhaps the voluntary exile of those who feel the old 
patriotism most keenly, — the majority of the transferred 
population may cease to desire re-union to the State from 
which they were torn away. Wlien this change has taken 
place, the moral effect of the unjust transfer must be 
regarded as obliterated: so that any attempt to recover 
the transferred territory becomes itself an aggression : — 
though, of course, there may be a long period diuing which 
the preponderant sentiment of the transferred population is 
doubtful, and the right and wrong of a war for the recoveiy of 
the lost territory is correspondingly obscure. 



XVI THE REGULA TION OF WAR 281 

So far we have been considering the case of a partial 
transfer of territory, which still leaves the State from which 
it has been transferred in complete political independence. 
But it seems clear that the case of a complete forcible 
absorption of an independent civilised nation/ or its re- 
duction to a dependent condition, is to be dealt with on 
the same principle. We may lay down that such conquest 
can only be justified by extreme international misconduct, 
or very prolonged and dangerous internal disorder and 
anarchy in the State whose independent existence is thus 
destroyed; at any rate, if it is not indisputably and 
markedly less civilised than the States absorbing it. Hence, 
we should not ordinarily condemn rebellion — supposing a 
reasonable prospect of success — on the part of any such 
conquered nation, whatever formal submission it had made 
to its conquerors, so long as the old national sentiment 
remained predominant: but in proportion as the old 
patriotism had diminished in intensity or range of difiTusion, 
the disturbance of the established order would seem to lose 
its justification. 

It is on these piinciples, I conceive, that an attempt to 
restore Poland, or to recover Alsace and Lorraine for France, 
would now be judged in the court of public opinion. 

The case is different if the inhabitants of the territory 
ceded were at the time of the transfer not really united in 
national sentiment to the rest of the State from which 
they are transferred. Even if such cession had been caused 
by war recognised as clearly unjust, I do not think that the 
vanquished State would be held justified in recommencing 
the war merely in order to recover its dominion over an 
alien people whose territory it had formally ceded. I con- 
ceive, indeed, that the common opinion of civilised mankind 
rightly approves or tolerates this kind of alien rule when 
it is thought to have the good effect of extending what is 
believed to be a higher civilisation among the people ruled ; 

^ I imply, by using the term ** nation," that the State thus destroyed is 
not merely what has before been called ** inorganic." Cf. ardt^ chap. xiv. 
§4. 



282 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

but the disadvantage to the latter of a violent change in 
its rulers is so great and manifest, that even if a change of 
rule has been brought about unjustly — ^as between the dis- 
possessed and the dispossessing governments — it would be 
generally better that the result should remain undistui-bed, 
so long as the new rule was not materially inferior to 
the old. On the other hand, if the dominion transferred 
by war is dominion over an unwilling people equal in 
civilisation to the foreigners who rule it, I do not think 
that either the right of the older government to recover its 
alien subjects, or the right of the victor to keep them, 
ought to have, or would have, any important support in 
the common moral sentiment of the civilised world ; only 
the State that is at any particular time the aggressor 
should incur disapproval as a disturber of international 
peace. 

I turn now to the case of international contracts in the 
narrower sense, imposed as a result of war. Here we have 
especially to deal with tributes, and with engagements 
diminishing the independence or restricting the military 
force : such as engagement not to fortify certain towns, or 
not to keep soldiers or ships of war beyond a certain fixed 
number or in certain placea I conceive that any contract 
of this kind that seriously impaired the strength or well- 
being of the State forced to make it ought not to be held 
to be permanently binding, unless the war that led to the 
dictation of the contract was regarded as manifestly just 
on the victor's side and the contract itself necessary to his 
security : though it would be held to be strictly binding 
for a tima The limit of the duration of its practical 
validity cannot, of course, be definitely fixed ; but it would 
seem to depend not so much on the mere lapse of time as 
on the amount of political change that has intervened ; and 
also partly on the recognised oppressiveness of the condition 
that it is desired to repudiate. As I have said, I am well 
aware that this is an imsatisfactory answer to the perplex- 
ing question that we are considering ; but I do not see 
that any more satisfactory solution of it is available, so 



XVI THE REGULATION OF WAR 283 

long as the method of settling international disputes by 
war has to be retained. 

I have now to observe that the difl&culties with which 
I have been dealing would be met by many writers on 
" International Law," by introducing the distinction between 
" law " and " morality." Legally, it would be said, every 
contract for perpetuity must be held to be permanently 
binding, unless it pledges to illegal or immoral conduct, or 
unless " anything which formed an implied condition of its 
obligatory force is materially changed " ^ — as, for instance, 
if the other party violates stipulations of the treaty or 
other rights of the State in question — ^but it would be 
vaguely admitted that a nation would sometimes be morally 
excused for a breach of its legal obligations. I do not 
reject this distinction: but its admission requires us to 
consider carefully the precise meaning and value of this 
antithesis of " legal " and " moral " in international relations 
— a fundamental question which it has seemed best to 
reserve for a separate chapter. 

1 Hall, p. 821. 



CHAPTER XVII 

INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 

§ 1. In the two preceding chapters I have been mainly 
engaged in working out in a summary form the chief sub- 
ordinate rules in which the general principle of mutual 
non-interference may most fitly be realised, in its applica- 
tion to the existing circumstances of civilised States. In 
80 doing, I have found it convenient to refer largely to the 
received rules and customary practices of States in their 
external relations, as the best way of giving definiteness to 
general maxims which a merely abstract consideration of 
the subject inevitably leaves somewhat vague. 

In the function of the expositor of international law as 
commonly recognised, the relation of the two parts of the 
procedure just described — deduction from principles and 
ascertainment of accepted rules and usages — is inverted. 
The expositor of international law is primarily concerned 
with ascertainment of the rules of international behaviour, 
that can fairly be said to be received or " established " — or, 
at least, of such of these rules as can claim to be " laws." 
He has only to refer to principles when he finds doubt and 
disagreement as to what rule actually is established, or 
when a novel case has to be discussed to which the 
established rules are not clearly applicable. 

The importance of both elements of this work — the 
ascertainment of usage by reference either to the practice of 
nations or to clauses in treaties and admissions in argument, 
and the correction of usage by reference to principles — 



CHAP. XVII INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 285 

seems to me imdeniable ; I cannot doubt that, without it, 
the moral opinion and sentiment of civilised mankind, and 
their consciousness of their common interest in the main- 
tenance of international peace and order, would be even less 
effective than they now are in checking reckless encroach- 
ments and violent retaliations, and promoting a peaceful 
solution of minor collisions of interest among States. But 
— ^as was before said — it may be reasonably doubted whether 
any system of rules thus worked out is properly to be 
called " law " : and, in fact, the propriety of this appellation 
has been emphatically denied in England by Austin and 
his followers, who consider that it ought rather to be 
called "positive international morality." The suggested 
term can easily be shown to be unsuitable: but I think 
that it is instructive to discuss the grounds on which its 
adoption is urged. For we shall find that the system of 
rules commonly called " international law," while it differs 
importantly both from the positive law of a modem State 
and from its positive morality, may be usefully compared 
to both, being more like the former in some points and the 
latter in others : and that we tend to gain a clearer con- 
ception of it by observing the points of likeness and 
difference in either comparison. 

In making these observations it will be convenient to 
recall the relations between Law and Positive Morality as 
examined in Chapter xiii. I there pointed out the import- 
ance of comparing these two systems of rules, both (1) in 
respect of the motives by which conformity to them is 
sought to be secured, and also (2) in respect of their pre- 
cision and systematic coherence. Let us take the former 
point of comparison first, and ask how far the sanctions of 
so-called International Law — the penalties attached to its 
violation — resemble the sanctions of the positive law estab- 
lished within a State, and how far they resemble the sanctions 
of positive morality. We can see at a glance that they 
resemble both legal and moral sanctions in important ways : 
the former in their possible intensity, the physical violence 
that they may include ; and the latter in the indefiniteness 



286 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of their source and the uncertainty of their infliction. It is 
doubtful what States will express disapproval of any breach 
of a recognised international rule, and whether any State 
will inflict any further penalty beyond expression of dis- 
approval : but if any State does pass from words to deeds, it 
is likely to proceed to that extreme of physical violence 
which we call war. 

In considering war, however, as the ultimate sanction 
of international rules, we are met by the distinction noticed 
in Chapter xv. between rules of strict international duty, 
to the performance of which a State may rightly be com- 
pelled by force, and rules of international courtesy or comity, 
the breach of which justifies — generally speaking — amoral 
disapprobation and complaint, but does not justify the use 
of violence. This distinction corresponds broadly to the 
distinction between legal and merely moral obligations in 
the sphere of civil conduct: and I conceive that it is 
generally accepted in practical as well as theoretical dis- 
cussion of international relations. For instance, to take a 
case of current interest,^ I suppose that most American 
politicians hold that Canada ought not to hamper — as she 
has hampered — the free use of her fisheries by citizens of 
the United States: but I suppose most of them would 
admit that, according to the received rules of international 
law, she ought not to be compelled by threat of force to 
discontinue her restrictions; — or, to express it in the 
received phraseology, that her behaviour, though unfriendly, 
is not " illegal," and that the only " legal " mode of com- 
pelling her to alter it is by retaliatory acts of a similar 
kind — unfriendly, but not violations of strict right. 

§ 2. This application of the distinction of " legal " and 
" moral " to international duties is, I think, convenient ; and 
its convenience seems a sufficient reason for retaining the old 
term " international law," with proper explanations. At the 
same time, if we retain it we can hardly find the decisive 
criterion for applying the distinction in the difierence of the 
sanctions effectively attached to the two kinds of rules 

1 In 1891. 



XVII INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 287 

respectively ; since we must admit that civilised States have 
often made, and more often threatened, war to compel other 
States to acts or abstinences which have not been imposed 
on the latter by the generally accepted rules of international 
law : and in many cases it cannot be said that the coercion 
that they have exercised in such cases has met with 
general disapproval. For instance, it seems to have been 
generally held in the last century in Europe that a State 
may reasonably and properly go to war merely to prevent a 
formidable aggrandisement of a neighbour and maintain the 
" balance of power " ; but it has never been a recognised rule 
of international law that a State may not grow so strong 
as to alarm its neighbours. So again, in more recent times 
wars to liberate " oppressed nationalities," or to promote the 
union into one State of divided groups of persons having a 
common nationality, have been widely approved ; though it 
has certainly never been held to be a rule of strict inter- 
national duty that a government should grant independence to 
any portion of its subjects who dislike its rule, if they belong 
to a different nationality from the rest. In short, if we con- 
sider the practice of modern States, we have to recognise 
that, besides the violent coercion exercised by States on each 
other in consequence of alleged violations of international 
law, coercion no less violent has been commonly exercised 
without such justification, yet not generally disapproved ; 
and therefore that we cannot effectively distinguish the rules 
of international behaviour that are to be called laws by the 
sanction actually attached to them. If we keep close to 
actual facts, we can only define international law as a system 
of rules to which it is generally held that States, imder 
ordinary circumstances, not only ought to conform, but may 
legitimately be compelled to conform ; and which will 
accordingly be applied, in deciding disputes between States, 
by duly qualified arbitrators : ^ while we, at the same time, 
admit that circumstances are liable to arise imder which a 
State will incur no general disapprobation for overriding 

^ That is, unless the States that refer the dispute to arhitration expressly 
agree upon any other rules. 



288 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

these rules, on the ground either of some imperative national 
interest or some alleged higher principle of international 
morality. 

That this is an unsatisfactory state of things is clear : 
and so long as it continues we cannot but expect — as was 
before said — that the most important issues between States 
will not be settled by arbitration. It may perhaps be said 
that at least in the case of a conflict between the supposed 
interest of any particular State and the received rules of 
international duty, the opinion of impartial persons ought 
to be clearly declared against the State in question. And 
this seems to me imdeniable when the conflict is clear : t.€. 
when it is clearly for the interest of the community of 
nations that a recognised rule should be observed, while it 
is for the apparent or immediate interest of a particular 
State to transgress it. But even in the private relations of 
individuals in a modern civilised State cases occasionally 
occur in which an individual is widely held excused for 
breaking a rule which it is yet thought desirable to 
maintain as law: and we must expect similar cases of 
approved or excused illegality to be more frequent in inter- 
national relations, owing to the comparative fewness of the 
members of the society of civilised States, and the far greater 
importance of any one State relatively to the whole society. 
More conunonly, too, there would not in such a case be an 
undeniable conflict of national interest with a clear rule 
of international duty ; the promptings of the discordant 
interests of States would be combined with divergent 
views of imperfectly defined rights. Sucli a combination 
is necessarily favoured by the inevitably less perfect 
definition of international — as compared with ordinary 
civil — rights: owing partly to the absence of a common 
government in the society of nations, partly to the im- 
perfect internal cohesion of many States, and partly to 
the great dififerences in the degree of civilisation attained 
by different hiunan communities. For instance, the first of 
these causes renders necessary and legitimate an extension 
of the right of self-defence which it is difficult precisely to 



XVII INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 289 

limit. War must be admitted to be justified not only by 
actual aggression, real or alleged, but also by unmistakable 
manifestations of an aggressive design : — a nation unmis- 
takably threatened can hardly be condemned for striking 
the first blow, if by so doing it gains an important 
advantage in self-defence. But this enlarged right of self- 
protection is easily extended to justify anticipation of a 
blow that is merely feared, not really threatened : and thus 
by gradual transitions we are led to a more or less plausible 
apology for hostile interference merely to prevent a formid- 
able increase of strength on the part of a neighbour. I 
think that moral opinion should set itself steadily against 
this latter extension of the right of self-protection : still, it 
is obviously difficult to define exatctly the degree of danger 
that would justify hostile action. 

§ 3. In other cases it is not so much the claim of 
national interest admitted as semi-legitimate, but rather the 
development of international morality, which comes into 
conflict with recognised international law. Thus {e^g^ the 
restriction of the right of conquest, which in the last 
chapter I took to be commonly accepted, is due to the 
increased recognition which the rights of nationalities have 
received in recent times ; — a recognition that in other ways 
inconveniently clashes with the established political order 
of modern Europe. In considering this interference of 
gradually changing international morality with the estab- 
lished rules of strict international duty, we are led naturally 
to the second part of the comparison proposed at the outset 
of this chapter : — that is, to the question whether the system 
of rules commonly recognised as International Law resembles 
Positive Law — within a State — or Positive Morality most, 
in respect of the elaborated precision, systematic coherence, 
and clear acceptance of its rules. 

For it follows inevitably from the absence of any recog- 
nised regular organ with authority to settle disputed points, 
that in international relations the important distinction 
between laws actually established and laws that a statesman 
or jurist may think ought to be established is not clear and 

U 



290 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

unmistakable, nor the transition from the latter to the 
former abrupt and definite, — as it is in the main in the 
sphere of civil law in a modern State. In any survey of 
social relations within any community, we are pretty sure 
to find a certain number of duties which it is recognised 
that men are not legally bound to fulfil, though there is a 
strong opinion that the legal obligation ought to be imposed. 
However much I may think that a man ought to be punished 
for mischief he has caused, and however decidedly public 
opinion may be on my side, still if he has not committed 
any act that has already been determined to be a crime 
either by precedent or by statute, the judge if really an 
expert will not condemn him to punishment : and if I try 
to supplement this defect in the legal system by private 
violence, the judge will condemn me. This distinction was 
not apprehended with perfect clearness, so long as the notion 
of a Law of Nature, having a validity prior to and 
independent of positive law, had a leading place among 
jural conceptions : but since it has come to be recognised 
that the proper source of new law is a special legislative 
organ distinct from the judicature, it is clearly seen that 
there are two distinct species or grades of " what ought to 
be," in respect of legal coercion : — there are rules which the 
judge actually ought to enforce by punishing the violation, 
and there are other rules which (in a sense) it ought to be 
his duty to enforce, but is not. 

In the case, however, of positive morality a similar dis- 
tinction obviously cannot be applied without qualification : 
since moral rules that men generally think ought to be 
accepted as actually binding must, vpso facto be accepted : 
it is this general thought which constitutes their acceptance. 
Further, though careful reflection will enable a man to 
distinguish between the generally accepted moral rules of 
his own age and country and the rules that the reflective 
individual thinks ought to be accepted, still the distinction 
is obscure and vague to most minds as regards their own 
morality here and now, — though sufficiently clear as regards 
morality in past ages or in China. If a " plain honest man " 



XVII INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 291 

feels himself disposed to condemn any conduct, he is apt to 
think that all plain honest men must equally condemn it, if 
the circumstances of the case were clearly brought before 
them ; hence it is his habit to express his personal condemna- 
tion in the name of common sense : he does not habitually 
recognise as possible a definite divergence between his own 
view of what ought to be and the positive morality of his age 
and country, unless such possibility has been brought home 
to him by some exceptionally sharp collision between the 
two. Moreover, it often happens that when such a con- 
flict of opinions is disclosed on a moral question, there is 
really some doubt as to what rule is generally accepted, or 
whether any can be said to be so : for a dissident individual 
rarely stands alone, nor is it easy to say what majority 
constitutes general acceptance, or whether there is such 
a majority in any particular case of controversy. Again, in 
judging of any moral claim made by an individual or a 
class upon other individuals or classes, the divergence 
between the customary actions of men and their customary 
judgments of the actions of others introduces a further 
doubt as to the standard that ought to be applied : and the 
previous conduct of the particular claimant becomes an 
important consideration ; since a man would not ordinarily 
be held justified in claiming from another a service that he 
had himself refused in a similar case. 

In all these respects much of what is commonly expounded 
as International Law — seems certainly to bear a closer 
resemblance to the moral than to the legal system of rules 
governing civil relationa Even in the processes of thought of 
many international jurists the distinction between what is 
and what ought to be an established rule seems to be obscure 
and imperfect. Both in theoretical discussions on inter- 
national duty, and in the practical debates on such questions 
between States, there appears a strong indisposition to 
recognise that a rule which seems to the disputant right is 
not {in accepted rula Hence it is a common experience 
that treaties which profess to be merely declaratory of 
international law as it is, palpably go beyond a mere state- 



292 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

ment of the rules hitherto accepted; under the form of 
mere exposition they really aim at innovation : and the 
procedure is partly justified, because, owing to the absence 
of any regular legislative authority, the transitions by 
which prevalent opinions as to what international law ought 
to be pass into recognised rules of international law as it 
is, cannot, generally speaJcing, be made perfectly clear and 
definite. Changes must from time to time take place in 
the generally accepted views as to the strict international 
duties and rights of States : and when any such change is 
taking place, it must be expected that there will be diflfer- 
ences of opinion both as to what constitutes general accept- 
ance, and whether this exists in 6iny particular case : and 
that these differences will be expressed in assertions by each 
disputant that the established rule is what he thinks it 
ought to be. 

§ 4. There are, however, considerations on the other 
side, leading us to assign to international law, in respect of 
the normal process of changing it, an intermediate position 
between ordinary law and ordinary morality, as they exist in 
a modern State. Changes in ordinary law are, as we have 
seen, mainly introduced in modern States by the express 
resolutions of supreme legislative assemblies or coimcils, 
acting collectively after deliberative debate. Changes in 
Positive Morality, on the other hand, can only be brought 
about gradually by the unconcerted agreement of a number 
of individuals, judging of others and acting towards them as 
individuals, in the exercise of their legal freedom of choice 
in social relationa Now in the case of international law, 
though there is no regular organ of legislative innovation, 
the concerted action of States, in the way of treaties 
and conventions, plays an important part in the intro- 
duction of changes, to which there is no counterpart 
in the development of positive momlity. This is due 
chiefly to the limited nimiber of the States among whom 
the system of rules and usages that constitute modern 
international law is actually established : they are so few in 
all that the agreement of even a small group of them to 



XVII INTERNA TIONAL LA W AND MORALITY 293 

adopt a new rule may be an important — in many cases even 
a decisive — step towards the general acceptance of this 
rnla 

The degree of influence which such a treaty or conven- 
tion will have will no doubt be very different in different 
cases. It will depend partly on the more or less aggressive 
character of the agreement : Lt. it will be the most intense if 
the concerting States agree not merely to adopt a new rule 
as governing their own mutual relations, but also to treat 
the non-observance of this rule by any other State as a 
breach of international duty : since, in this latter case, they 
attach a sanction to the rule which tends to make it prac- 
tically obligatory on others than the contracting parties. 
The concerting States are not indeed likely to go as far as 
this in enforcing an avowed innovation in usage, unless the 
combination feels itself to have overwhelming force: but 
even if the new rule is understood to be only applicable to 
States who voluntarily accept it, still, the adhesion of a 
powerful group of States may partly express, partly cause, a 
consensus of opinion to which even nations who do not share 
it may find it convenient to yield. In this way the innova- 
tion may gradually come to be incorporated in the generally 
accepted system of rules. 

Further, the concerted action of which I have been 
speaking is not the only method by which the rules of inter- 
national law have been modified; it is undeniable that 
international law, like civil law, has been gradually made 
more definite and coherent by a series of arguments of the 
ordinary legal kind, terminated in some cases by judicial or 
quasi -judicial decisions; and it is conceivable that this 
process might be continued imtil international law should 
reach something like the systematic precision which parts 
of our own common law have attained through judicial 
interpretation alone. It would seem, however, that this 
process has been applied — and can be expected to be 
applied — to international law only to a very limited extent, 
and in relation to certain classes of questiona It has 
been most operative in that part of the rules governing 



294 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the relations of belligerents and neutrals which apply 
primarily to the conduct and treatment of individual 
members of neutral States; especially the rules relating 
to blockade and contraband of war, which are applied 
by the prize-courts of each belligerent State to determine 
the legitimacy of captures of the ships or other property 
of neutrals. The force that causes the decision of such a 
court to take effect is no doubt primarily the organised 
physical force of the belligerent State to which the Court 
belongs : but if we consider the intellectual process by which 
the decision is arrived at, it is plain that the rules applied are 
not conceived as laws formed by each nation for itself : they 
are conceived as rules whose validity depends on their 
general acceptance by civilised nations, and in the reasoning 
by which doubtful points in their definition are determined 
precedents, drawn from the practice of other nations, are 
allowed due weight. No doubt tlie prize-courts of each 
belligerent have a certain tendency to define and interpret 
the international rules in question in the interest of their 
own country ; but this tendency has been kept in check, 
partly by tlie judicial habits of mind of the persons with 
whom the decision has rested, partly by the unimportance 
to the belligerent community of the gain to be made by 
encroaching on a neutral's rights, as compared with the 
danger of provoking the neutral's hostility in the crisis 
of war. 

So again, when questions arise as to alleged wrongs re- 
ceived by individuals from foreign States, even when they 
are argued between diplomatists and not before judges, the 
discTission is still quasi-legal in method, and the decision is 
usually assumed to be arrived at by reference to international 
precedents and principles having international acceptance. 
And the same may be said of other disputes between States 
on points of minor importance : e,g. as to the national 
character of particular persons ; as to the treatment of aliens 
by the State in which they are residing — whether this is 
complained of as too unfavourable, or, in the case of political 
fugitives, as too favourable; — as to the rights and duties 



XVII INTERNATIONAL LAW AND MORALITY 295 

of ships in territorial waters ; the privileges of ambassadors ; 
and similar matters. Finally, in the case of all questions 
submitted to arbitration, the point at issue is practically 
determined by experts selected for their competence as 
lawyers, who are supposed to employ — and usually do em- 
ploy — the same careful and impartial comparison of rules 
and precedents as is proper in determining a point of civil 
law. In these various ways a body of definite rules of 
international conduct has gradually been formed, which 
certainly bears, regarded as an intelligible system, a closer 
resemblance to the positive law than it does to the positive 
morality of a modem State. 

It does not however appear that, on the most important 
questions that lead to disputes between States, the currently 
accepted principles for judging of international rights and 
wrongs have as yet been brought to legal precision and 
systematic coherence, in the manner above described: and 
it seems to me too sanguine to hope that they ever will be 
so brought, so long as States retain their independence, 
unless the moral and intellectual nature of the average 
human beings composing these States undergoes a radical 
change. Consider, for example, either the limits of the 
right of national self-defence against anticipated danger, 
noticed in a previous section ; or the legitimacy of inter- 
vention, whether in the interest of the intervening State, 
or of the State interfered with ; or the extent of the right 
of conquest, or of the right of renewing war to obliterate 
the effects of conquest ; — it is difficult to conceive how 6iny 
of the current doubts and disagreements on these funda- 
mental points could be cleared up by any improved 
definitions of such rules as judges and arbitrators could 
apply. And I conceive that it will be found very difficult 
to regulate satisfectorily, in this quasi-legal way, the process 
of expansion into territory not yet occupied by civilised 
nations, of which I am to speak in the next chapter. The 
decision on such points as these must — for a long time to 
come at any rate — be left to international morality, in the 
sense in which it is distinguished from law : and this may 



296 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xvxi 

be given as a final reason for not sharing the hopes of 
certain optimists who look forward to getting rid of wars 
between States by increasing the use of arbitration. But 
though arbitration cannot bring in the reign of universal 
peace, it may, I conceive, diminish the occasions of war to 
an extent that should not be despised ; and whatever can 
be done to increase the confidence of civilised States in 
this method of settling minor disputes, is, in my view, a 
valuable contribution to the welfare of civilised humanity. 
And it is chiefly for this practical purpose that I am 
anxious to retain the distinction between "international 
law " and " international morality " ; using the former term 
to denote a system of rules, which experts called on to 
arbitrate between nations should apply impartially to such 
cases as may be brought before them, employing a method 
as analogous as possible to that of ordinary law-courts. I 
conceive that the discussion of jurists, if duly aided by 
conventions among States, may succeed in rendering this 
system somewhat more precise and consistent, and that 
their efiforts ought to be directed to this end: although, 
after all, the rules thus formulated can only have a limited 
range and efficacy in governing the relations of States: 
and the difficult task of judging of the deepest issues on 
which the conflicts of nations have hitherto turned must 
always be left to the vaguer find more disputed set of 
principles that we must regard as belonging to international 
morality. 



CHAPTER XVIII 

PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 

§ 1. In the three preceding chapters we have been con- 
sidering the rules of international duty that should be 
maintained, by common opinion — and as far as possible 
applied in arbitration between States — in the interest of 
humanity at large. We have seen reason to adopt, at any 
rate as regards the relations of civilised find well-ordered 
States, a system analogous to what, in dealing with civil 
relations, is called Individualism, of which the fundamental 
rules prescribe avoidance of injury to person and property 
and enforcement of contracts ; and we have examined the 
modifications of these rules, rendered necesstury by the 
essential dififerences between States and individuals, — 
especially by the enlargement of the right and duty of 
self- protection, consequent on the want of a common govern- 
ment in the society of States. In the present chapter I 
propose to contemplate international matters from a some- 
what different point of view, and to consider the principles 
and aims by which the action of a civilised government 
should be determined in dealing with the external relations 
of its State. 

Here, first, a fundamental question has to be faced, as 
regards the general relation of national interest to inter- 
national duty. It is sometimes frankly affirmed, and more 
often implied, in discussions on the principles of foreign 
policy, that a State is not properly subject — as an individual 
is commonly held to be — to any restraint of duty limiting 



298 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the pursuit of its own interest: that its own interest is, 
necessarily and properly, its paramount end; and that 
when we aflarm that it is bound to conform to any rules 
of international duty we can only mean, or ought only to 
mean, that such conformity will — on the whole and in the 
long run if not immediately — be conducive to its national 
interesta In my view all such statements are essentially 
immoral. For a State, as for an individual, the ultimate 
end and standard of right conduct is the happiness of all 
who are affected by its actions. It is of course true, for 
an individual no less than for a State — as the leading 
utilitarian moralists have repeatedly and emphatically 
aflBrmed — that the general happiness is usually best pro- 
moted by a concentration of effort on more limited ends. 
As Austin puts it — '* The principle of general utility im- 
periously demands that [every individual person] commonly 
shall attend to his own rather than to the interests of 
others: that he shall not habitually neglect that which 
he knows accurately in order that he may habitually pursue 
that which he knows imperfectly." But — as the same 
writer is careful to add — "the principle of utility does 
demand of us that we shall never pursue our own peculiar 
good by means which are inconsistent with the general 
good": accordingly, in the exceptional cases in which the 
interest of the part conflicts with the interest of the whole, 
the interest of the part — be it individual or State — must 
necessarily gave way. On this point of principle no com- 
promise is possible, no hesitation admissible, no appeal to 
experience relevant : the principle does not profess to pre- 
scribe what states and individuals have done, but to prescribe 
what they ought to do. At the same time, I think it 
important not to exaggerate the divergence between the 
private interest of any particular State and the general 
interest of the community of nations. I conceive that it 
will be usually the interest of any particular State to con- 
form to what we have laid down as the rules of international 
duty, so long as it has a reasonable expectation of similar 
conformity on the part of its neighbours ; — at any rate in 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 299 

dealing with civilised, coherent, and well-ordered States, in 
whose case conquest could not be justified in the interest 
of the conquered State as a means of getting rid of the evils 
of disorder ; or in the interest of humanity at large as a 
means of substituting a higher civilisation for a lower. 
And so far as the past conduct of any foreign State shows 
that reciprocal fulfilment of international duty cannot 
reasonably be expected from it, any State that may have 
to deal with it must, I conceive, be allowed in the interests 
of humanity, the extension of the right of self-protection 
which its own interests would prompt it to claim. From 
any point of view, it must be held right for a State to 
anticipate an attack which it has reasonable groimds for 
regarding as imminent, to meet wiles with wiles, as well as 
force with force, and in extreme cases to stamp out incur- 
able international brigandage even by the severe measure 
of annihilating the independent existence of the offending 
State. 

Again, it seems to be plain that, in its own interest, no 
less than in that of himianity at large, a State should incur 
some risk of sacrifice in order to avoid war, by accepting 
arbitration on all points of minor importance, or negotiation 
if an impartial arbiter cannot be found ; and that it should 
make it a point of international policy to aim at improving 
the machinery of arbitration. 

It is a different question whether it is the right policy 
to run the risk of war in order to prevent high-handed 
aggression by another State against a third. As we have 
seen, this cannot be imposed as a strict duty, on the view 
of international duty that I have adopted: and for any 
State to embark in a career of international knight-errantry, 
and send its armies about to take part in remote quarrels 
with which it had no special concern, would be hardly more 
conducive to the interests of the civilised world than it 
would be to those of the supposed quixotic community. 
Still, where the assailant is clearly in the wrong, it would 
seem to be the ultimate interest, on the whole, as well as 
the duty, of any powerful neighbouring State — even if its 



yn ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

own more obvious interests are not directly threatened — to 
iiianifest a general readiness to co-operate in forcible sup- 
pression of the wrong. Indeed, unless we suppose that the 
men) exercise of superior force is kept under some check by 
the fear of the intervention of other States against palpable 
iiyuHtice, war l)etween States decidedly unequal in strength 
will hardly retain its moral character at all : to treat it, 
even ho far as I have done, as a sanction against the breach 
of international duty would be solenm trifling. And I 
think that co-operation to prevent wanton breaches of 
international i)eace is the best mode of preparing the way 
for tlie ultimate federation of civilised States, to which I 
look forward But in the present stage of civilisation, it 
would, I think, 1x) a mistake to try to prevent wars alto- 
gether in tliis way. Wo may hope to put down by it 
palpable and Iiigh-handed aggression; but it is not applicable 
whore there is a conflict of reasonable claims, too vague 
and doubtful to bo clearly settled by general consent, and 
at the same time too serious to be submitted to eurbitration. 
We may illustrate this by the present relations of France 
and (Wmany. Lot it be granted ^ that the war of 1870-71 
was Hulwtantially an aggression on the part of the French, 
prompted by a quite inadmissible claim of France to prevent, 
or obtain U>rritorial compensation for, the alteration of the 
l>alanu> of iH)wer causoii by the unification of Germany : 
and that (lornuuiy, therefore, having repelled the aggression, 
had a right to Uiko sul)sttmtial guarantees against its 
n>iH*tition at the oxiM>n8e of France. It will still be widely 
hold that the diamemWrment actually inflicted was a 
puuishmout in which no civilised nation can be expected to 
iUHiuie^t\ so long as the portion torn away retains a pre- 
)H>nderant desire for i^miion. Accordingly, if at the present 
time Kmnoo t<x>k an opportunity for going to war with 
Gt^rmany for the recoverv of Alsace and Lorraine, the 
SYni[^thio« of im(vir(i«U |vrsons would largely incline in 

* Thi* i* the view tliAt I mrself toAf : but it is not umTvrsally »dimrt€ti. 
Mfed I h*^ e no Wm to dmd« tJt auAaIhi a disputed quetstiim of historicjJ 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 301 

favour of France : at the same time, the claim of Germany 
to retain the provinces would seem at least so far defensible 
that it could not be regarded as a clear duty of neighbouring 
States to interfere on either side. 

However this important question of policy is to be 
determined, it will be admitted that, on one groimd or 
another, war must be regarded as a constant danger, the 
preparation for which constitutes the most important part 
of those internal functions of government which, as was 
before noticed, are indissolubly connected with its external 
functions. But as to the extent and manner of such pre- 
paration I conceive that it is impossible to lay down any 
useful general rules : the policy of each State must be so 
largely determined by relations to its neighbours, which 
vary from State to State, and may be fundamentally chemged 
from time to time. Thus, the policy of a relatively small 
State will reasonably differ from that of a relatively large 
one ; the policy of an island from that of a country with 
continental neighbours ; and so forth. 

So again, no general rules can be laid down as regards 
alliances, beyond the statement before given of the strong 
grounds for supporting purely defensive leagues as the best 
substitute and preparation for a federation able to maintain 
peace among civilised States. 

§ 2. So far I have been considering what should be done 
by a particular State for the maintenance of the system of 
restraints imposed on civilised States generally by the rules 
of international duty ; I now pass to consider the relations 
that any State should aim at establishing with alien com- 
munities and territories, within the limits fixed by strict 
international obligations. Here the most important ques- 
tions are (I.) how far the government of a State should allow 
{a) free trade — that is, trade only hampered by taxes imposed 
for the purpose of raising revenue — between its subjects 
and foreigners ; and (6) free immigration of aliens into its 
territory: and (II.) how far it should aim at expansion 
of territory, and absorption of the foreign communities 
inhabiting the territories annexed. 



302 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

I. A full discussion of the burning question of Free 
Trade I consider more suitable to a treatise on political 
economy. Here I will only say that the economic argument 
for Free Trade — which is a simple application of the general 
argument for laisser /aire, given in a previous chapter (x.) — 
is now generally admitted as decisive, when the matter is 
considered from what I may call a cosmopolitan point of 
view, i.e, in relation to the interests of the aggregate of the 
States trading. This admission is most strikingly manifest 
in the countries in which the faith in the benefits of pro- 
tection to native industry is most strongly held ; since we 
do not find that in any of these countries protection to 
local industries from the competition of fellow-countrymen 
is seriously advocated as a measure conducive to the 
economic interests of the whole nation. For instance, in 
the United States, which imposes high protective duties on 
foreign imports, no political party — so far as I know — has 
ever proposed to interfere with the present unrestricted 
freedom of internal trade. 

The question, however, is altered if we restrict our 
regard to the sectional interest of the group of persons 
inhabiting a particular portion of the whole region over 
which trade is carried on, supposing them to constitute an 
independent community. In the first place — as J. S. Mill 
has argued^ — it may in certain cases be economically 
gainful to a country to impose protective duties " tempor- 
arily, in hopes of neutralising a foreign industry, in itself 
perfectly suitable to the circimistances of the country." 
Doubtless such a duty — if it is both needed and effective — 
imposes a tax on the consimiers of the native product pro- 
tected ; but it is possible that the cost thus incurred may 
be compensated to the community through the ultimate 

^ Political Economy, chap. x. § 1. Theoretically, we have to recognise 
that this argument may hold good from a cosmopolitan as well as from a 
national point of view ; but the cases in which protection would be ex- 
pedient on this ground from a cosmopolitan point of view — supposing that 
it could be confined to such cases — are at any rate much rarer than those in 
which it would be expedient from a national point of view, on the same 
supposition. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 303 

economic advantage of producing at home a commodity 
previously imported ; although the initial outlay that would 
be required to establish the industry without protection 
could not be expected to be ultimately remunerative to any 
private capitalist who undertook it. For the difficulties of 
introducing an industry may be such that, when once over- 
come by the original introducers, they would no longer 
exist foB others in at all an equal degree ; so that, as soon 
as the new industry begins to be profitable, competition is 
likely to bring down prices so much, that though remimera- 
tive to the later competitors, they would not compensate 
the introducers of the industry for their initial outlay. 

Secondly, for somewhat different reasons, it may possibly 
be sometimes expedient on the whole to resist by import 
duties an industrial change which unrestricted free trade 
would cause ; because it is a matter of common experience — 
no less than a conclusion of general economic reasoning — 
that industrial improvements within a country may involve, 
as their natural consequence, a transfer of population and 
wealth from one part of the country to another. Suppose, 
for instance, that an improvement takes place in a certain 
manufacture in a district (A) — favoured by the special 
physical conditions of the district — which enables the 
manufacturers to cheapen their products so far that the 
manufacturers of similar wares in another district (B) 
cannot carry on their industry remuneratively. The 
natural result will be that the manufacture in question 
will gradually be abandoned in B; and probably some of 
the persons who would otherwise have been employed in it 
will migrate out of B, either to supply the growing demand 
for labour in A, or to seek some other employment which 
the improvement in question will indirectly provide; the 
remaining inhabitants of A will get the products in question 
cheaper, and thus the improvement will benefit all con- 
cerned. Let us now suppose that districts A and B are in 
different States, when the manufacturers of the former 
obtain this decisive victory in industrial competition. 
Then, if the products of A are freely admitted into B, 



304 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

either the transfer of population will still take place as 
above described, in which case the State containing A will 
gain in population and wealth at the expense of the State 
containing B ; or, if it does not take place, owing to the 
dislike of the inhabitants of B to expatriation, it is conceiv- 
able that the disturbance to industry caused by the change, 
and the difficulty of finding profitable employment for the 
persons engaged in the extinguished industry, maybe evils 
outweighing the gain to B from the change. 

This last result, however, is very unlikely to occur in a 
large coimtry, with a variety of employments and labour 
tolerably mobile: it is far more likely that the persons 
thrown out of employment can be, without much difficulty, 
employed somehow within the community in a manner 
more useful socially than if they were artificially protected 
in their old manufacture. And, as regards the case first 
mentioned — of temporary protection of naturally suitable 
industries — it would seem that the task of confining such 
protection within the limits within which it would be really 
advantageous to the community is too difficult and delicate 
to be successfully performed by actual governmenta Such 
protection as actually applied is likely both to be too pro- 
longed, and also to be used to foster weak industries that 
have no chance of living without artificial support; in 
short, any gain that may be derived from it in particular 
instances is likely to be outweighed by the indirect bad 
consequences of deviating from the broad and simple rule of 
free trade, and encouraging employers and labourers to look 
to State help instead of self-help in any difficulty caused by 
changes in industry and trade. 

On the whole, therefore, I hold that — apart from the 
military considerations of which I shall presently speak — 
the commercial policy of modern States should keep aloof 
from all attempts to protect native industry, even if each 
State has regard exclusively to its own economic interests ; 
not because it is impossible that such protection, if judi- 
ciously introduced and limited, might not be occasionally 
advantageous to the protecting country, but beca-use a really 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 305 

judicious protection of native industry implies a wisdom 
and strength on the part of government which we cannot 
practically expect to obtain. 

It does not follow that a rigid adhesion to the rule of 
imposing import duties ^or revenue only is always expedient 
in the case of a country surrounded — as England is now 
— by neighbours more or less protectionist. Eetaliatory 
import duties are essentially different from protective duties 
in their primary aim and justification : although they may 
often have protective effects, — as, indeed, may be the case 
with duties imposed for revenue only. Such retatliatory 
duties, indeed, are not generally justifiable — as is often 
confusedly thought — on the ground that the "one-sided 
free trade " which will take place if they are not imposed 
will be in itself disadvantageous. The mere fact that one 
country (A) endeavours to exclude the imports of another 
coimtry (B) by protective duties does not make it directly 
the interest of B to prevent its members from importing 
the products of A ; since it gives us no reason for thinking 
that such importation will be carried on unless it is, 
under existing circumstances, the most economic mode 
of supplying the needs of the inhabitants of B, and unless 
the products imported can be paid directly or indirectly by 
the products of the importing country. The only valid 
argument for meeting the foreigner's protective duties by 
retaliatory duties on his products is that such retaliation 
may put the free trade country in a more favourable 
position for getting rid of the foreign protective duties by 
means of commercial treaties. How far this is a sufficient 
reason for imposing import duties for other than revenue 
purposes is not, I think, a question to which a general 
theoretical answer is possibla 

So far I have taken only economic considerations into 
account, but these alone cannot be absolutely decisive in a 
political discussion of the question. We have to ask further 
whether the mutual dependence of nations, which tends to 
result from unrestricted free trade, is advantageous or the 
reverse. From a cosmopolitan point of view, the answer to 

X 



3o6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

this question seems to me altogether fiayoiirable to free trade. 
What has been contemptuously called the " bagman's millen- 
nium" of Cobden — the ideal of universal peace brought 
about by imiversal free trade — rests, I conceive, on a 
thoroughly rational basis. We may distinguish two ways 
in which free trade conduces to peace: (1) by interweaving 
the interests of industrial classes in different societies in so 
intimate and complex a way as to cause a strong aversion 
to the widespread disorganisation of industry that must 
result from war; and (2) by removing one special motive 
for war, which must be expected to influence the nations of 
Western Europe, even more strongly in the future than in 
the past, if they cling to their protective systems — the 
desire of obtaining access to new markets for their products 
and new supplies of the materials of manufacturing industry. 
Supposing general freedom of trade and immigration, there 
seems to be no reason why the process of national expansion 
— of which I shall presently speak — should not go on peace- 
fully, without exciting national rivalries so keen and bitter 
as to cause war ; since the colonies and conquests of any one 
nation would afford open markets — and partially^ open 
fields of employment — to all other nations. 

On the other hand, assimiing that war is to come, it 
must be admitted to be a disadvantage to a State to be 
dependent on other States for the necessaries of existence or 
warfare ; and that unrestricted free trade may conceivably 
place it in this state of dependence. Whether it would be 
wise to interfere with the natural course of trade in order to 
prevent this dependence must depend partly on the danger 
of war, partly on the probability that even in case of war a 
sufficient amount of trade might be kept open to supply 
the most imperative needs of the people or the army. 

Hitherto I have spoken only of import duties, which 
are practicaUy the most important restrictions on inter- 
national trade that a modern State is likely to be urged to 

^ I say " partially," because the utmost freedom of immigration would 
still leave foreigners at a certain disadvantage in competing for employment 
in colonies with immigrants from the mother country. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 307 

impose. Turning to export duties, it is easy to show that 
it may be economically advantageous to a particular coimtry 
to impose them, if this country controls the whole, or the 
chief, supply of a particular commodity for which there is 
a keen foreign demand. But monopoUes of this kind are 
rare and precarious : and an export duty has a dangerous 
tendency to stimulate efforts to find substitutes for the 
wares artificially raised in price by it ; and consequently to 
end by inflicting commercial loss on the country imposing 
it. If, however, the commodity thus monopolised is useful 
for warlike purposes, the export duty may have a special 
expediency as tending to increase the relative military 
strength of the State. 

§ 3. The question of free immigration has occupied a 
much smaller place in modern political discussion than the 
question of free trade: still, freedom of immigration is a 
recognised feature of the ideal which orthodox political 
economists have commonly formed of international relationa 
And it seems to be often implicitly assumed in the economic 
argimients for free trade ; since, as I have pointed out, in 
order that the advantages of complete freedom of exchange 
among nations may be fully realised, it is necessary that 
labour should move with perfect ease from coimtry to 
country to meet the changes that are continually likely to 
occur in the industrial demand for it. On the other hand, 
we have seen^ that the system of international rights, 
framed in the earlier period of modem European history on 
the principle of mutual non-interference, allows each State 
complete freedom in determining the positive relations into 
which it will enter with States and individuals outside it ; 
and though theoretically I cannot concede to a State possess- 
ing large tracts of unoccupied land an absolute right of 
excluding alien elements, I have not proposed any limitation 
of this right in the case of civilised countries generally. 
The truth is, that when we consider how far the exercise of 
this right of exclusion is conducive to the real interest of 
the State exercising it, or of humanity at large, we come 

^ Chap. XT» 



3o8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

upon the most striking phase of the general conflict between 
the cosmopolitan and the national ideals of political organisa- 
tion, which has more than once attracted our notice. Ac- 
cording to the national ideal, the right and duty of each 
government is to promote the interests of a determinate 
group of human beings, boimd together by the tie of a 
common nationality — with due regard to the rules restrain- 
ing it from attacking or encroaching on other States — and 
to consider the expediency of admitting foreigners and their 
products solely from this point of view. According to the 
cosmopolitan ideal, its business is to maintain order over the 
particular territory that historical causes have appropriated 
to it, but not in any way to determine who is to inhabit 
this territory, or to restrict the enjoyment of its natural 
advantages to any particidar portion of the human race. 

The latter is perhaps the ideal of the future ; but it 
allows too little for the national and patriotic sentiments 
which have in any case to be reckoned with as an actuaUy 
powerfid political force, and which appear to be at present 
indispensable to social wellbeing. We cannot yet hope to 
substitute for these sentiments, in sufficient diffusion and 
intensity, the wider sentiment connected with the conception 
of our common humanity; so that the casual aggregates 
that might result from perfectly unrestrained immigration 
woidd lack internal cohesion. Again, the governmental 
function of promoting moral and intellectual culture might 
be rendered hopelessly difficult by the continual inflowing 
streams of alien immigrants, with diverse moral habits and 
religious traditions. Similarly, the efficient working of the 
political institutions of different States presupposes certain 
characteristics in the himian beings to whom they are 
applied ; and a large intermixture of inmiigrants brought 
up under dijBFerent institutions might inevitably introduce 
corruption and disorder into a previously well-ordered 
State. 

I think, therefore, that it would not be really in the 
interest of humanity at large, to impose upon civilised 
States generally, as an absolute international duty, the free 



xviii PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 309 

admission of immigrants ; and that it would be a proper 
policy for any such State to place restrictions on immigra- 
tion, if ever it should threaten to take such dimensions as 
to interfere materially with the internal cohesion of a nation, 
or with the efforts of its government to maintain an 
adequately high quality of civilised life among the members 
of the community generally. Apart from these mischievous 
consequences, the free admission of aliens will generally be 
advantageous to the country admitting them; partly for 
reasons similar to those that render free trade generally 
expedient, as the recipient State is thus enabled to share 
the advantage of the special fEu^ulties and empirical arts in 
which other countries excel; partly as tending to the 
diffusion of mutual knowledge and sympathy among nations. 
Further, as I shall presently point out, over a large part of 
the earth's surface the union of diverse races imder a 
common government seems to be an almost indispensable 
condition of economic progress and the spread of civilisation ; 
in spite of the political and social difficulties and draw- 
backs that this combination entails. 

II. § 4. Among civilised States a continual interchange 
of population goes on to a slight extent, which will be called 
immigration or emigration according to the point of view 
from which it is regarded. As between old fully-peopled 
States like those of Western Europe and civilised States like 
the American, with a large amount of unoccupied land, the 
transfer of population tends to be more extensive and one- 
sided; the old States — even when they are growing in 
numbers and wealth — send to the newer countries a con- 
siderable excess of both over what they receive. When, 
however, emigration takes place from civilised States into 
regions uninhabited by savage tribes — whose political organ- 
isation would hardly be held to justify the name of " States " 
— it is in modem times normally combined with extension 
of the territory of the State from which it takes place, and 
may be regarded as a process of Expansion of the community 
as a whole. Whether, and in what manner, it is desirable 
that this expansion should take place is the last of the chief 



310 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

questions of external policy which I reserved for the present 
chapter. 

First, it is to be observed that the extension of the 
territory of States through conquest is almost always accom- 
panied by some immigration of the old members of the 
State into the new territory. But where the territory was 
already fully peopled by human beings the immigration is 
not likely to be considerable, unless the war has been 
unusually destructive, since there would be no room for the 
immigrants without such a violent invasion of the private 
rights of the old inhabitants as would be generally con- 
demned and would excite strong resistance and general 
odium. Hence the enlargement of a State through conquest 
of this kind is hardly to be called expansion ; and the larger 
whole that results from it is not, for some time at least, 
organicy being composed of parts not united by a common 
national sentiment. Where the conquerors and conquered 
are approximately equal in civilisation this result is likely 
to continue for an indefinite period ; and, as the government 
of the conquerors is not likely to confer benefits on the 
conquered sufficient to compensate for the drawbacks of 
alien rule, such conquest seems to be, under ordinary circimi- 
stances, rightly disapproved by the morality of modern 
civilised nations. 

The case is diSerent when the conquered, though not 
uncivilised, are markedly inferior in civilisation to the con- 
querors. Here, if the war that led to the conquest can be 
justified by obstinate violation of international duty on the 
part of the conquered, the result would generally be regarded 
with toleration by impartial persons; and even, perhaps, 
with approval, if the government of the conquerors was 
shown by experience to be not designedly oppressive or 
unjust ; since the benefits of completer internal peace and 
order, improved industry, enlarged opportunities of learning 
a better religion and a truer science, would be taken — and, 
on the whole, I think, rightly taken — to compensate for the 
probable sacrifice of the interests of the conquered to those 
of the conquerors, whenever the two came into collision. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 311 

Whether such conquest is in the interest of the conquer- 
ing nation — apart from the need of repressing and punishing 
a turbulent neighbour, which has often been the preponderant 
motive to wars that have terminated in conquests — is a 
question to which it is difficult to give a general answer. 
Both the disadvantages and the advantages vary much in 
different cases. The disadvantages are (1) the bloodshed 
and cost of the fighting necessary to win and keep the 
conquest ; (2) the increased difficulty of self-defence due to 
the diminished cohesion of the enlarged State ; and (3) the 
stronger temptation that dominion based on conquest ofiTers 
to' the aggression of powerful neighboura The chief material 
advantages aimed at in conquest are (1) the increase of 
strength for war, — due mainly to the mere increase in size 
and total resources, enabling the State to maintain larger 
armaments — and (2) increase of wealth for the conquering 
community. The former advantage may easily be more 
than outweighed by increased difficulty of defence if the 
conquest is distant or otherwise inconveniently situated, — 
t.g, England is rather weakened than strengthened for 
formidable conflicts by her possession of India. The pro- 
spect, again, of increase of wealth varies very much in 
different cases. In modem times such gain is rarely 
even expected in the form of tribute to the public 
treasury; since it is recognised that such taxation as is 
possible without oppression is rarely likely to do more 
than meet the expense involved in the acquisition, reten- 
tion, and defence — as well as the internal government — of 
the conquered country. Still substantial gains are likely to 
a,ccrue to the conquering community regarded as an aggre- 
gate of individuals ; through the enlarged opportunities for 
the private employment of capital, the salaries earned in 
governmental service, and especially, in the case of a com- 
mercial community, through the extended markets opened 
to trade. The importance of this last consideration is 
obviously much increased by the general adoption of the 
protectionist policy which at present finds favour with the 
majority of civilised States ; but it woidd not be without 



312 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

importance even under a system of universal free trade ; 
since the superior civilisation that the conquerors are sup- 
posed to introduce will tend to spread to some extent their 
special tastes in consumption, and a consequent preference 
for the products of the dominant community. 

Besides these material advantages, there are sentimental 
satisfactions, derived from justifiable conquests, which must 
be taken into account, though they are very difficult to 
weigh against the material sacrifices and risks. Such are 
the justifiable pride which the cultivated members of a 
civilised community feel in the beneficent exercise of 
dominion, and in the performance by their nation of the 
noble task of spreading the highest kind of civilisation ; 
and a more intense though less elevated satisfaction — 
inseparable from patriotic sentiment — in the spread of the 
special type of civilisation distinctive of their nation, com- 
municated through its language and literature, and through 
the tendency to imitate its manners and customs which 
its prolonged rule, especially if on the whole beneficent, 
is likely to cause in a continuaUy increasing degree. 

This latter result might be called a process of spiritual 
expansion, as distinct from the physical expansion which 
takes place when the conquered region is so thinly popu- 
lated as to aSbrd room for a considerable immigration of the 
conquerors. 

§ 5. In the conquest of countries fully inhabited by a 
people on a par with their conquerors in civilisation, the 
aim of physical expansion can — for a modern State — hardly 
come in : and it cannot usually be more than a subordinate 
aim, even where the conquered are decidedly inferior in 
civilisation, if they have arrived at the state of settled 
agricultural occupation of the land that they inhabit. Still, 
if the conquered, though semi-civilised, are at a decidedly 
lower stage of economic development, and if their climate is 
not unsuited to the conquering race, the immigration of the 
latter may reach substantial proportions ; so that the con- 
quered coimtry acquires in some degree the character of a 
colony. Thus in Algeria, during some sixty years of French 



xviii PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 313 

rule, room has been found for nearly half a million Euro- 
peans, although at the time of the French conquest the land 
was already held in agricultural occupation by an Arab 
population; and a judicious writer^ allows himself to 
imagine that in 1930 the European element in "French 
Africa " may amount to two millions, with an Arab element 
of six or seven millions largely " francis^s." If this forecast 
should bb fulfilled, probably no one would refuse to Algeria 
the name of a colony. 

More commonly,however, we denote by the term "colonisa- 
tion " the occupation by a civilised community of regions 
thinly inhabited by uncivilised tribes ; in which, accordingly, 
even supposing the " aborigines " to be treated with equity 
and consideration, there is room for a new population of 
immigrants far exceeding the old in nimiber& The rational 
motives to colonisation, in this narrower sense, are partly 
the same as those that prompt to the conquest of semi- 
civilised countriea There is the desire of the more profitable 
employment for capital, afforded in a special degree by the 
undeveloped resources of regions new to civilised men, and 
more safe — or generally believed to be more safe — in a 
colony than in a foreign coimtry ; again, a colony tends, even 
more decidedly than a conquest, to be a source of wealth to 
a commercial country, from the extension that it afiTords to 
trade ; since capital taken to a new coimtry, if it is not 
employed in producing commodities peculiar to this new 
region, or for the production of which it has special advan- 
tages, is naturally applied to the production of food and raw 
materials, to be exchanged for the manufectured products of 
the old country.* But a further most important motive to 
colonisation is supplied by the desire — whether of the 
labourers themselves or of statesmen on their behalf — ^to 
find a more remimerative field of employment for the 

^ Leroy Beaulieu, De Uk CoUmiscUion ehez lc$ peuples moeUmes, 3rd 
edition, p. 337. 

^ It should be observed, however, that, to secure this advantage, the 
fiscal policy of the colony must be kept under the control of the mother 
country, in order that the former may not exclude the products of the latter 
by import duties designed to protect its own industries. 



314 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

surplus labour of the mother country. This motive, how- 
ever, would hardly by itself lead any European nation to 
attempt the founding of a new colony, so long as the 
American States allow free immigration and have large 
tracts of unoccupied land available for settlers; in the 
present condition, therefore, of the modem world, this motive 
only prompts to colonisation as distinct from emigration 
when combined with patriotic desires for national growth 
and expansion, extension of national wealth and prestige, 
and even power in international struggles, — though it must 
be very doubtful how far this latter end is likely to be 
promoted by the founding of coloniea It is obvious that 
such patriotic sentiments must be offended when emigrants 
are absorbed in an alien State.^ 

§ 6. We have, therefore, in a theoretical discussion, to 
distinguish clearly and treat separately the questions of (1) 
emigration, and (2) colonisation: though practically the two 
questions are often mixed up in the discussion of the large 
schemes of state -directed colonisation which have been 
recently urged on the attention of statesmen in more than 
one European country. 

^ It is difScult to estimate the force of the desire for national expansion, 
— including the desire of cultivated minds to spread the special type of 
civilisation which they eiyoy — as distinguished from the more primitive 
impulse to the amelioration of the emigrants' condition. The latter must be 
taken to be the stronger : still it is doubtless a source of real dissatisfaction 
to cultivated Germans that they continually see their emigrants absorbed by 
the United States, and have to face the prospect of the posterity of millions of 
Teutons inheriting with the English language the traditions of English instead 
of German thought and sentiment. 

Tlie position of Great Britain in relation to the United States is very 
peculiar ; since, on the one hand, whether we consider Great Britain's industrial 
and commercial pre-eminence or her empire, one of the chief dangers that 
threatens her is from the rivalry and aggression of the United States ; on the 
other hand, if we derive any satisfaction from the expansion of the English 
race, and of the English ty^)e of civilisation as communicated through its 
language, literature, and law, the prosperous growth of the community in- 
habiting the United States must be regarded as the most important means to 
this end — and perhaps more im|X)rtant than if the colony had remained in 
political connexion with England. If any existing language should ever 
become the one common language of civilised man it will probably be English : 
and the chief cause of this result, if it should be brought about, will probably 
be the growth and commercial pre-eminence of the United States. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 315 

In considering how far any scheme of emigration should 
be adopted, we must avoid the error into which untrained 
minds are liable to fall, of assuming that anj increase in 
the number taken from a country by emigration woidd 
involve a corresponding diminution in its future popula- 
tion. On the contrary, general reasoning and experience 
combine to show that emigration has a stimulating effect on 
population in a country that has long been settled: and 
that, accordingly, every increase in the nimiber of emigrants 
tends to cause a certain subsequent increase, which would not 
otherwise have taken place, in the population of the country 
from which they emigrate. It is, indeed, an error on the 
opposite side to suppose that this increase will always be 
sufficient to compensate for the diminution caused by 
emigration, so that even the largest normal stream of 
emigration may be regarded as having finally no effect on 
the amount of the population of the coimtry from which it 
flows : but experience seems to show that this error diverges 
less widely from truth than the former. 

The truth, however, lies between these two opposite viewa 
On the one hand, in a country such as the United States now 
is, with a supply of unoccupied land forming a continuous 
territory with the older settlements, the population in the old 
settlements is not likely to acquire the density that it has 
in a coimtry like Great Britain: on the other hand, if 
the cost of the voyage to America or Australia were 
freely defrayed by the English Government, there can 
be no doubt that the aggregate of persons of English 
birth inhabiting the two countries taken together would 
increase at a materially greater rata Under ordinary 
circumstances, therefore, we must regard any systematic 
provision for emigration as partly tending to produce 
the increment of population for which it furnishes an 
outlet. Accordingly, State aid to emigration cannot be 
safely recommended as a relief for distress in "congested 
districts" — in which the population is too large for the 
field of employment within the district — except imder the 
condition either (1) that the causes of the congestion are 



3i6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

clearly temporary, or (2) thatother measures be simultaneously 
taken to prevent their future operation. And in considering 
the wider question how fer it is expedient for government 
to undertake any regular and permanent provision for emi- 
gration, we have first to determine how far the increase of 
population that it will under ordinary circumstances inevitably 
cause — in the mother country and the colony taken together 
— is in itself desirable. 

In the earlier chapters of this work no mention was made 
of increase of population as a subordinate end at which a 
statesman should aim, with a view to the promotion of the 
general happinesa Such increase used to be so regarded in 
pre-Malthusian days ; but it would now be generally agreed 
that — emigration apart — a government that took measures 
for the direct purpose of adding to the population of a 
country as fully peopled as England or France, would be 
assuming too great and dangerous a responsibility ; owing 
to the danger that the increase of numbers would be 
accompanied by a lowering of the average quality of life 
in the increased population.^ Indeed, since Malthus, an 
important group of thinkers have urged that measures 
should rather be taken tending to restrict the growth of the 
population: and it seems not improbable that at some 
future time the governments of civilised countries will 
have to face this problem, imless measures of this kind are 
spontaneously adopted by the governed. But in the present 
condition of the world any such measures would seem to be 
objectionable so far as they tend to check the expansion of 
civilised humanity; — assuming^ that the increase of the 
amount of human life in the world, under its present 

^ It may be added, a govemment that took measures for adding to the 
population would find it hard to resist the demand that it should find work 
and wages, without the deterrent conditions of our present poor-relief, for 
the beings whose existence it thus indirectly caused. 

' A full examination of the pessimistic contention, by which this assump- 
tion is denied, would be here out of place. Its seems sufficient, for purposes 
of political reasoning, to appeal to common experience, which shows that 
only under very exceptional circumstances do human beings in any economic 
condition feel a desire to extinguish either their own lives or the lives of 
those whom they love. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 317 

conditions of existence in civilised countries, is a good and 
not an evil ; except so far as increase of numbers tends to 
be accompanied by increase of disease, or even of physical 
discomfort not involving disease.^ If this assumption be 
granted, we may clearly regard as a benefit to humanity the 
stimulus to population which organised emigration and 
colonisation would tend to give — accompanied as it would 
be with a tendency to improve the average condition of the 
human beings in the colony and mother country taken 
together. 

I do not, however, think that any of the West European 
States, loaded as they are with military expenditure, and the 
payment of interest on debts incurred through war, can be 
expected to imdertake any considerable regular outlay for 
the promotion of emigration, imless this outlay brings in 
some substantial return to the State that undertakes it, other- 
wise than by relieving the pressure on population. And where 
the emigrants become members of another State, no adequate 
return to the State sending them out can generally be 
expected, imless the government of the region of immigration 
will guarantee the repayment of the outlay. Some advantage, 
indeed, is likely to result in the way of extended trade, since 
the emigrants will be more likely than foreigners to have 
tastes which the producers of their original country will be 
specially qualified to supply ; but this advantage will be too 
uncertain and precarious to justify expenditure for which it 
is the main return. Under these circumstances I conceive 
that the intervention of the government of the region of 
emigration should ordinarily be limited to the collection and 
diffusion of information, the prevention of deception by emi- 
gration agents, the regulation of the service of emigrant ships, 
and other comparatively inexpensive measures ; — designed to 
secure as far as possible that emigrants shall go to the most 
suitable places, with full knowl^ge of the inconveniences 
and risks involved in the process of transfer, and that this 

^ I do not think that the mere decrease of physical strength such as tends 
to result from the increase of the manufacturing or trading element in a 
population necessarily involves a decrease of happiness. 



3i8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

process shall not take place under conditions unnecessarily 
dangerous to their physical wellbeing. 

§ 7. The case is materiaUy different when the question 
is of promoting emigration to territory — whether newly 
acquired or not — under the control of the government. 
In this case we must estimate more highly the advantage 
of extension of trade, and also of enlarged opportunities 
for the employment of private capital; there is also, 
as we saw, the sentimental satisfaction of the desire 
of national expansion; there is in some cases a gain of 
increased strength to the State, — though this, of course, 
depends on the situation of the territory colonised: and 
finally, there is some prospect of recovering — even for 
the public treasury — a portion of the expense of subventing 
emigration, from the value of the land and its contents in 
the newly settled region. This last element is of varying 
importance; but it might conceivably be so considerable 
as both to defray the extra expense thrown upon Grovem- 
ment by the process of colonisation — ^including the cost 
of facilitating access to the land by roads, harbours, etc., 
as well as the cost of surveying it for sale or lease, — and 
also to contribute a part of the cost of transporting emi- 
grants. Experience, however, seems to show that, generally 
speaking, taking into axjcount the risk of conflict with 
aborigines and of collisions with other civilised states, the 
cost of foimding a colony will outweigh any returns obtain- 
able to the public treasury of the mother country ; ^ and that 
the extra cost cannot be thrown on the colonists, since, so 
long as the colony is weak, it is too poor to bear it, while, 
when it has grown richer, it will also have grown stronger, 
and will refuse to pay. Still, for the reasons before given, 
even where colonisation is a bad investment from the point 
of view of public finance, it may still be remimerative in one 
way or another to the community as a whole. 

^ Merivale {Colonisation and Colonies, sec. ix.) says that, **if history be 
consulted, it wiU be found that in modern times no experiment in colonisation 
has ever succeeded in the way and at the rate which its projectors have 
expected." 



xvm PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 319 

111 the present state of the world, the founding of a new 
colony, adapted to the reception of European immigrants 
on a large scale, is not a very probable event.^ But the 
business of promoting the settlement of unoccupied land 
remains of some practical importance, though such land 
as is still available and suitable lies chiefly within the 
territories already under civilised government I propose, 
therefore, briefly to consider the chief special functions 
that will devolve on Grovemment in connection with this 
business; viz. (1) the disposal of the land available for 
settlement, (2) the encouragement (if required) of inmiigra- 
tion, and (3) the management of the relations between the 
settlers and the aborigines The two former functions, as 
we have already noticed, are closely connected, since it is 
the land available for settlement that will normally supply 
the chief resources for encouraging immigration. There are 
two essentially distinct modes of employing it in this way, 
each of which admits of several minor modifications ; (a) it 
may be granted to settlers, under conditions formed to secure 
its cultivation, either without payment or for a payment 
below its market value ; or (6) it may be sold or let at the 
market rate, and the proceeds used to defray the whole or a 
part of the cost of conveying suitable emigranta Whether 
either of these methods should be adopted, and if so which 
method, will depend on several considerations ; such as the 
distance of the region of immigration from the native home 
of the settlers whom it is designed to attract, the quality 
and extent of its natural resources, the amount of labour 
and capital required to turn them to most profitable account, 
and last, but not least, the probability of obtaining an ade- 
quate supply of immigrants without special encouragement. 
L Where the emigration into imoccupied districts is 
mainly continental — as in the United States — so that the 
new settlements are continuously connected by older ones 
with fully peopled territory, the method of directly con- 

^ Merivale, in 1870, went so far as to say {Fortnightly Review for February 
1870, p. 155) '* emigration exists and multiplies: colonisation is dead and 
buried." 



320 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

tributing a part of the cost of transporting emigrants is 
obviously less needed, and would be difficult to apply in a 
regidar way. In this case, if the returns from the land 
when sold or leased at the rate financially most profitable 
should be more than sufficient to pay the cost of accurate 
surveying and roadmaking, and any special expenses entailed 
by the relations with the aborigines, it would seem better 
to employ them in aiding the construction of railways or 
other elaborate instruments of communication, or else as 
a substitute for taxation. And this may also be best even 
where the region of immigration is separated by a long sea 
voyage from the region of emigration, if a sufficient supply 
of emigrants can be obtained without the special attraction 
of an artificially reduced cost of transport or settlement 

ii If such special attraction is thought to be required 
to quicken and amplify the stream of immigration, we have 
to consider whether this will be best given by cheapening 
transport or cheapening land. The former method may 
be the more efTectual, if the region to be colonised is one 
which offers valuable special fiEicilities for producing wares 
for the world's markets, so as to promise a remunerative 
return to capital employed on a large scale if only it can 
obtain an adequate supply of labour. For in this case it 
may be possible to find purchasers or tenants for the land 
at a comparatively high price, provided that a considerable 
portion of the fimds thus obtained be spent in transporting 
suitable labourers: and the high price, while it affords a 
fund for defraying or reducing the cost of immigration, will 
at the same time prevent the rapid acquisition of land by the 
labourers, so as to keep their services available for capitalist 
employera^ 

iiL On the other hand, where the land offers no special 
facilities for production for the outside market, the prosperous 
development of its resources seems to depend on attracting 

^ Merivale considers tliat the successful application of this method is 
exemplified by the history of the Australian colonies during the generation 
succeeding the '* Australian Land Sales Act" (1842), that introduced the 
system of sale by auction at an upset price of £1 per acre. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 321 

settlers who will cultivate the land largely with a view to 
subsistence for themselves and their families ; in this case 
the most suitable encouragement to immigration seems to be 
to give the land to such settlers at a low or merely nominal 
price, under proper conditions of residence and cultivation. 
If this does not suffice to attract colonists who can pay their 
own expenses, the further step may be taken of giving cheap 
or gratuitous transport to carefully selected immigrants, and 
charging the land granted to them with the debt incurred. 
It would be too sanguine to expect that the whole of the cost 
incurred can be thus recovered ; since a certain percentage of 
failures among the settlers can hardly be prevented by the 
most careful selection: still with good management there 
seems no reason why the amount recovered should not be so 
considerable as to render it worth while to incur the inevit- 
able loss, in the interests of national expansion. 

§ 8. It remains to speak of the management of the 
relations between civilised settlers and the uncivilised tribes 
inhabiting the district into which immigration takes place — 
commonly called the " aborigines." It is not without hesi- 
tation that I venture to touch this question, as I can only 
treat it in a very brief and general way ; while any student 
of the history of European colonisation must be profoundly 
impressed with its difficulty. What a well-informed writer,^ 
by no means unduly sentimental, calls the " wretched details 
of the ferocity and treachery which have marked the conduct 
of civilised men in their relations with savages " form one of 
the most painful chapters in modern history ; all the more 
painful from the frequent evidence it gives of benevolent 
intentions, and even beneficent efforts, on the part of the 
rulers of the superior race. At present in England there 
is a general agreement that the wellbeing of the uncivilised 
first-comers, found in regions colonised by civilised men, 
should be earnestly and systematically kept in view by 
the governors of these latter ; and that the " aborigines " 
should be adequately compensated for any loss that they 
may suffer from the absorption of their territory — and ulti- 

^ Merivale, Colonisation. Lcc. xviii. 

Y 



322 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

mately of themselves — ^by the expanding civilised societies. 
It is therefore permissible to hope that in the future some 
closer approach may be made to the realisation of this ideal 
than has been made in the past. 

The question assumes different forms in what may be 
distinguished as (1) colonies of settlement where the manual 
labour can be and will be supplied by the civilised race ; 
and (2) colonies — only called so in a looser sense^ — ^in which 
it can only supply capital and superior kinds of labour.^ 
In the first case the main difficulties of the problem are 
likely to be transient ; the incoming tide of civilised immi- 
gration will graduaUy modify or submerge the barbarism of 
the aborigines; so that idtimately the question, how to 
deal with such of them as may survive without becoming 
really fit for civilised work, will sink into a part of the 
general question of dealing with the incapable and recal- 
citrant elements found in all civilised communities. But 
in its early stages the collision of races is likely to be more 
intense in colonies of this class ; since the process of settle- 
ment inevitably involves more disturbance of the economic 
conditions of the life of the aborigines. 

On the other hand, in colonies where the superior race 
does not supply the manual labour, the difficidties of govern- 
ing a community composed of elements very diverse in 
intellectual and moral characteristics must be expected to 
last indefinitely longer ; but there is no stage at which the 
conflict of interests need be quite so acute as in the former 
case. 

Of the two cases just distinguished the former has been 
most important in our past history ; but its importance is 
rapidly diminishing, and in most of the territories open to 
the future expansion of civilised European States, manual 
labour is likely to be mainly performed by non-European 

^ I do not mean that a sharp line can be drawn between the two kinds of 
colonies. For instance, in our own empire, the South AMcan colonies form, 
from this point of view, a series of links intermediate between Australia and 
New Zealand which are clearly colonies of settlement, and the West Indian 
islands which are clearly not. 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 323 

race& I do not propose here to discuss in detail the method 
of dealing with either of the cases above distinguished ; but 
only to indicate briefly the nature of the problems that arise 
and the principles priind facie applicable to them, in accord- 
ance with the general view of politics taken in the present 
treatise. And, in doing this, I shall not attempt to dis- 
tinguish between the international duty and the interest of 
the civilised nation aiming at expansion. I believe that 
here, as elsewhere, duty and interest are mostly coincident, 
but I could not undertake to prove that this is so in all 
cases. In what follows, therefore, I must be understood to 
have in view, as the idtimate end, the aggregate happiness 
of all the human beings concerned, civilised and uncivilised 
— native or imported. It does not seem possible — even if 
it were desirable — to check the expansion of civilised 
Europe: consequently, the problem of regulating and 
governing composite social aggregates, with a civilised 
minority superimposed on a semi-civilised majority, must 
be regarded as one of the most important proposed for 
European statesmanship in the proximate future.^ 

1. The first point demanding attention is the general 
claim of a civilised State to supreme control — whether as 
" Sovereign " or " Protector " — over territory inhabited by 
uncivilised tribes. This claim has to be considered in two 
aspects (1) as excluding the claims of other civilised States 
to expand into the same territory; and (2) as asserting 
rights of interference with the previous inhabitants of the 
territory. The conditions of its validity from the former 
point of view belong to an earlier part of the discussion : ^ 
here we are only concerned with the claim so far as it 
affects the aborigines. It would be going too far to say 
that no exercise of power over these latter is justifiable, 
unless the general consent of the persons subjected to it 
may be presumed from agreements foimally made by their 
chiefs or on some other adequate ground. But we may say 

^ On the structure of government in colonies of this kind I shall have 
something to say in a subsequent chapter (xxyi.) 
' See chap. xv. § 4. 



324 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

that no serious interference of the civilised government 
with the aborigines should take place without such evidence 
of consent, except under circumstances which afford a special 
justification for it ; — as {t.g^ when the civilised State has 
been victorious in a war provoked by the aggression of the 
inferior race, or when the interference is necessary for the 
security of its own subjects in the exercise of rights that 
they may &irly claim, or to protect the natives from the 
evils of intercourse with the most lawless and degraded 
elements of civilised society. Further, the claim of sover- 
eignty should not be understood to carry with it any 
obligation to interfere with the laws and customs of the 
aborigines, even when opposed to civilised morality. Such 
interference should be regulated by an unprejudiced regard 
for the social wellbeing of the tribes subjected to it ; which 
might be seriously impaired by the sudden abolition even 
of pernicious customa 

2. In regulating the relations between aborigines and 
settlers, the care of Grovernment will be specially needed to 
prevent the interests of the former from being damaged 
through the occupation of land by the latter. We may lay 
down that the aborigines should never be deprived of any 
definite rights of property without full compensation ; and 
that, so far as possible, such rights should be only ceded 
volimtarily. I cannot, indeed, hold that compulsory transfer 
is in principle inadmissible ; since I cannot regard savages 
as having an absolute right to keep their hunting-grounds 
from agricultural use, any more than an agricultural occu- 
pant in a civilised State has a right to prevent a railway 
from being made through his grounds. Still, compulsory 
deprivation should be avoided as far as possible, even where 
it may seem abstractly justifiable, on account of the violent 
resentment that it is likely to cause. Further, the civilised 
government should supervise carefully the sale of lands by 
natives to private settlers ; it may even be expedient, in 
the earlier stages of colonisation, that Government alone 
should have the right of purchasing such lands ; in order 
that undue advantage may not be taken of the ignorance of 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY 325 

the aborigines, and that difficulties arising from complicated 
and vaguely defined rights of joint-ownership may be pro- 
perly dealt with. Further, even where the aborigines have 
not been accustomed to claim or recognise any definite rights 
of property in the lands occupied by the settlers, I conceive 
that adequate compensation for the loss of the utilities in 
the way of hunting, fishing, eta, which they have been 
accustomed to derive from such lands, is none the less due 
to them.^ 

3. Further restrictions on the freedom of intercourse 
and exchange between aborigines and settlers may be 
temporarily necessary ; the extent of which experience only 
can determine, as the need for them will vary with the 
degree of intellectual and social development reached by 
the inferior race. Familiar instances of such restriction are 
the prohibition of the sale of intoxicating liquors, and the 
prohibition of the sale of firearms: but in some cases a 
more complete separation of races, and a more thorough 
tutelage of the inferior race, would seem to be temporarily 
desirable. It is, indeed, hardly likely that this kind of 
artificial isolation can ever be more than partially success- 
ful. I think, therefore, that such measures should generally 
be regarded as essentially transitional, and only adopted — 
if at all — in order better to prepare the aborigines for com- 
plete social amalgamation with the colonising race.^ 

4. In any case the protection of the lives and property 
of the settlers will require effective prosecution and exem- 

^ The necessity of making snch compensation may be partly avoided by 
the reservation of certain i)ortions of territory as hunting-grounds for the 
natives ; but as the game in such reserves tends to be diminished by the 
progress of settlement around, and as the demand of the settlers for the 
reserved land will become increasingly intense, this can only be regarded as 
a temporary expedient. Nor is it desirable that it should be permanent in 
the interests of the natives ; but rather that they should be gradually edu- 
cated to the habits of steady labour which civilised industry requires. 

' Of course if it should become clear that the social amalgamation of two 
races would be debasing to the superior race, or otherwise demonstrably 
opposed to the interests of humanity at large, every effort ought to be made 
to carry into effect some drastic and permanent measures of separation. But 
I do not think that any proof has yet been brought adequate to support such 
a conclusion. 




326 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

plary punishment of crimes against them : at the same time, 
it will be the imperative duty of Grovernment to keep such 
pimishment within the limits of strict justice. The difficult 
task of fulfilling this double obligation is likely to be better 
performed if those charged with it are not hampered by 
pedantic adhesion to the forms of civilised judicial pro- 
cedure : what is important is that substantial justice should 
be done in such a manner as to impress the intellect of the 
aborigines with the relation between offence and punish- 
ment. 

5. I have spoken of industrial education as an indis- 
pensable part of the compensation due from the civilised 
intruders. But their educational task should not be limited 
to this : it should include all kinds of instruction required 
to fit the inferior race to share the life of civilised mankind. 
In particular, though the religion of the settlers should not 
be compulsorily imposed on the natives, every encourage- 
ment should be given to the efforts of missionaries to teach 
it. Experience seems to show that the potency of such 
teaching as an instrument of civilisation varies very much 
in different cases, but few will doubt the desirability of 
allowing full scope to its application. 

6. One of the most indisputable services that — as we 
may hope — the expansion of civilised States is destined to 
confer on uncivilised humanity is the abolition of the evils 
of enslavement, and of the wars and raids that have enslave- 
ment for their object ; and, ultimately, of the condition of 
slavery. But it may often be expedient that this latter 
result should be only gradually attained : while, on the other 
hand, even where the status of slavery is formally excluded 
by law, special restrictions on freedom of contract between 
natives and settlers are likely to be required in the case of 
contracts of service ; since, if such contracts are left un- 
restricted, there is some risk that the inferior race may be 
brought too completely into the power of private employers. 
This point is of course peculiarly important in the case of 
colonies in which the superior race cannot or will not 
undertake the main part of the manual work required : in 



XVIII PRINCIPLES OF EXTERNAL POLICY iri 

this case the demand of the capitalist employer for a steady 
supply of reliable labour led modern civilisation in its 
earlier stage back to the institution of slavery in an ex- 
treme form : and prompts even now to longing aspirations 
after some system of compulsory labour, which shall have 
the economic advantages of slavery without its evils. But 
I know no ground for thinking that such a system can be 
devised : and should accordingly deprecate any attempt to 
approximate to it. I do not therefore infer — as some have 
inferred — that contracts of long duration ought to be pro- 
hibited altogether ; but only that they ought to be carefully 
supervised and closely watched. The need for this vigilance 
arises equally — it may be even greater — when the labourers 
in question are not natives, but aliens belonging to a lower 
grade of civilisation; at the same time there are strong 
economic reasons for introducing labour from abroad in 
colonies of this class, where the natives are either not 
sufficiently numerous or wanting in industrial capacity. 



PART II 

THE STRUCTURE OF GOVERNMENT AND ITS 
RELATIONS TO THE GOVERNED 



CHAPTER XIX 

METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 

§ 1. In the preceding chapters we have been occupied in 
surveying the work of government from the point of view of 
the governed : that is, we have concentrated attention on 
the effects that Grovernment ought to aim at producing in the 
condition and mutual relations of the private members of 
the community governed, and in their relations to indi- 
viduals and communities outsida In the chapters that 
follow we shall be engaged in considering how Grovemment 
should be constituted for the proper performance of the 
functions which our discussion up to this point has marked 
out for it ; how the necessary organs of government shoidd 
be appointed ; what should be their mutual relations ; and 
how lar their powers should be constitutionally limited by 
the rights of the governed. The present chapter forms the 
transition or connecting link between the two discussions. 
I propose here to make a brief survey of the whole work 
marked out for government, with the special object of deter- 
mining in a general way the kind of methods and instruments 
that will be required for its satisfactory accomplishment 

In this chapter I shall assume, for simplicity, that we 
are concerned with what may be called " unitary " ^ States : 
— that is, with States in which the ordinary exercise of the 
highest powers of Grovernment belongs to a central organ or 
organs, exercising control over all the members of the State ; 

^ I use this tenn to contrast them with Federal and other composite States, 
the peculiarities of which will form the subject of a special chapter (xzvi.). 



332 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

while only matters of secondary importance are handed over 
to the independent management of local governing bodiea 
I shall also assume the unity of government in a different 
sense; i.e. I shall assume that, however the functions of 
govermnent may be divided among different persons and 
bodies, there is no idtimate conflict among these organs ; so 
that, though there may be differences of view among them 
leading to debate and mutual criticism, still their final 
decisions, demanding the obedience of the rest of the com- 
munity, are as harmonious and consistent as if they emanated 
from one rational will In subsequent chapters, examining 
more closely the constitution and relations of different organs 
of government, we shall have to take note of the possibilities 
of conflict among them, and consider expedients for avoiding 
or terminating it : but for the present I shall simply assume 
it to be avoided, and shall speak of "Government" as 
possessing unity of action, however its powers may be 
distributed. 

For clearness of view let us first limit our attention to 
what I have called the "individualistic minimum" of govern- 
mental business — what other writers have distinguished as 
the " necess£iry " from the " optional " functions of govern- 
ment. In this view, the main internal work of government 
will consist in maintaining general security from coercion 
and intimidation, from intentional and culpably careless 
injury to person, reputation, or property, and from loss 
caused by failure to perform contracts — according to the 
definition of these rights before given ; and in securing due 
provision for children, the burden of their support and 
education being thrown on their parenta It will further 
have to protect the interests of the community generally, 
and of individual members of it so far as may be necessary, 
against the attacks or encroachments of foreigners — at the 
same time compelling its own subjects to abstain from 
violating the rights of the latter. Finally, it will be its 
duty to make such provision as may be required for its 
own maintenance, and its own defence against internal as 
well as external foes. We have then to consider what 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 333 

governmental machinery will be necessary or expedient for 
the performance of these functions. 

Let US take the internal work first. Here the point of 
primary importance is to give adequate inducements to all 
persons to perform their fundamental duties and refrain 
from infringing the fundamental rights of others. This 
end, as we before saw, may be partly attained by enforcing, 
at the request of the person whose right has been infringed, 
redress or compensation from the person who has infringed 
it ; but in the case of grave transgressions of duty it will 
also be necessary to inflict on the violators some further 
punishment — beyond the penalty involved in the enforce- 
ment of compensation ; moreover, there are certain kinds of 
mischievous conduct which, as they do not give occasion 
for compensation, can only be repressed by punishment. 
Accordingly, whenever a sufficiently serious transgression 
of duty appears, or is alleged, to have occurred, it will be 
the business of Government, firstly, to decide, after an im- 
partial examination of the facts, whether or not the trans- 
gression has actually taken place ; and secondly, whenever 
such transgression is proved, to take such steps as may be 
necessary for compelling adequate redress or compensation, 
and inflicting adequate punishment. It is evident that 
these two businesses require to a great extent^ different 
intellectual feculties and habits for their efficient conduct : 
the former needs a thorough and exact knowledge of the 
rules of civic duty that Government has to enforce, and 
impartiality and expertness in applying them to particular 
cases : the latter demands skill in organising and combin- 
ing the labour of a number of subordinates — policemen, 
prison officials, etc. — with appropriate materials and instru- 
ments, for the attainment of particular definitely prescribed 
residts. We have therefore primd facie reason to allot 
these functions to separately constituted organs,* which — 

^ I am only here concerned with broad distinctionB. I shall afterwards 
show that the functions of the judiciary and the executive are necessarily in 
some degree similar, and that the division of work between the two organs 
is in some respects doubtful and varying. 

' Further reasons for this separation will be given in the seqneL 




334 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

in accordance with usage — I will call respectively the 
Jvdiciary or Judicial organ, and the Executive, It is the 
latter that will actually have to bring such force as may be 
required to overbear any resistance that may be offered by 
recalcitrant transgressors: it must therefore provide, or- 
ganise, and train this force, so as to apply it when needed 
in the most effective and economical way, and with the 
minimum of social disturbance. Further, the organised 
physical force of the community will also be required — 
and ordinarily to a much greater extent — for the purpose 
of defending the interests of the State against foreign 
aggression : and it is obviously desirable, to prevent danger- 
ous conflicts of authority, that its ultimate control should 
be in one hand. Thus there is a strong primd facie reason 
for making identical the organ that deals with the foreign 
relations of the State with what we have called the 
Executive, so far as the supreme direction of both functions 
is concerned. I shall, accordingly, assume provisionally 
that this is the case, and that it is the business of the 
Executive to receive foreign ambassadors, and to watch 
over the interests of the State and its members abroad, 
through the agency of ambassadors and consuls,^ and 
through correspondence with foreign governments; and 
also to organise and equip armies and fleets for foreign 
warfare, and direct their action when war has broken out. 

Turning again to internal affairs, we may note that, 
even if the functions of government are confined within the 

^ Consuls in modem States are officials resident in foreign countries, 
appointed to watch over the interests of the subjects of the State appointing 
them. They are allowed by the State in which they reside to exercise quasi- 
governmental functions of a subordinate kind, for the benefits of subjects of 
the State which they represent : — such as administration of the property of 
such persons dying in the country where they reside, arbitration in disputes 
voluntarily brought before them by such persons, authentication of births 
and deaths, etc. They have also to inform the government appointing 
them of any injustice done to its subjects. This latter function is obviously 
of greater importance in the case of imperfectly civilised countries : and in 
such countries the powers of consuls are sometimes extended to include 
criminal jurisdiction over the subjects of the country which they represent, 
and civil jurisdiction in cases to which such subjects are parties. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 335 

narrowest limits, it must be the further business of the 
Executive to arrest persons suspected, on adequate grounds, 
of crime and keep them in confinement up to the time of 
trial if the crime be grave. Moreover, it is obviously 
desirable that Government should stop offences, if possible, 
before they are completed, prevent them if the intention to 
commit them is manifest, and remove continuing sources of 
injuiy and clearly illegal annoyance. Policemen, accord- 
iiigly* will be required for these purposes, no less than for 
bringing criminals to punishment. 

Again, we have before seen (chap, xi.) that, for the ade- 
quate performance of all the various functions above de- 
scribed, kinds and amounts of labour are required which 
cannot be expected to be obtained gratuitously, and cannot 
well be imposed, as unremunerated duties, upon any class 
of citizens in a modem State: and that, accordingly, in 
order to provide the required remuneration and the various 
instruments and materials needed for governmental pur- 
poses, Grovernment must have the power of levying taxes 
on the income or property of the governed. We must 
therefore add to the Grovemment a financial department, to 
superintend the collection of these taxes, and their distribu- 
tion for the different purposes of governmental expenditura 
Tax-collectors, paymasters, accountants, comptrollers, and 
auditors, will be the subordinate officials in this depart- 
ment; and their operations will be directed by superior 
officials, whose business will form another department of 
what I have called Executive functions. Further, it seems 
clear that the proportion of the national income required 
for governmental expenditure cannot be fixed once for all, 
owing to the great variations that occur— chiefly through 
foreign wars, and dangers of wars — in the needs of Grovern- 
ment. " The public," as Hobbes says, " cannot be dieted " ; 
so that private members of the community must submit to 
the degree of insecurity involved in an indefinite right of 
Grovemment to take their property. It seems therefore 
important, in order to minimise this insecurity and render 
the exercise of this power of taxation as little formidable 



336 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS CHAP. 

as possible, that the taxes to be levied should not be deter- 
mined by the ofBicials who will have to spend the proceeds, 
or other ofBicials under their influence: it is important 
that the " budget " of the State should receive the assent 
of a separate and independent body, specially qualified to 
watch, in the interest of the taxpayers, the collection and 
expenditure of the taxes, and to prevent as far as possible 
any oppressiveness in the former or excess in the latter. 
It is, accordingly, an accepted principle in the construction 
of a modem government, that the ultimate control of 
governmental finance should be in the hands of such a 
body.^ 

§ 2. So far I have said nothing of a Legislative organ, 
having the function of laying down the general rules of 
civic duty which the Judiciary has to apply to particular 
cases. But if the State requires laws, it seems an obvious 
inference that it needs a special organ for the supremely 
important work of laying down the laws required ; and, as 
in fact such an organ exists in all modem States, I have 
not hesitated to assume its existence in previous chaptera 
Still, the obvious inference from law to a legislature is not 
quite so indisputable as it seems, if we suppose the action 
of government to be strictly confined to the " individualistic 
minimum." As has been before observed, a great part of 
the rules enforced by Grovemment in our own society have 
not had their origin in express legislation ; they have been 
gradually brought to the degree of precision and elaborate- 
ness which they have now attained, by a series of judicial 
decisions which ostensibly declared and applied rules or 
principles of right handed down from time immemorial 
And it might be held that this judicial quasi-legislation 
is, even in a highly civilised society, the best machinery for 
introducing such improvements as may be required in the 
definition of these traditional rules. 

The issue thus raised will be most conveniently discussed 

^ That this "money-granting" body should be elected by the citizens at 
large is also a principle generally accepted in modem States : but it seems 
better to reserve it for subsequent discussion. See chap. xx. § 1. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 337 

by distinguishing two questions ; (1) whether it is expedient 
that legal duties should be capable of being known as 
exactly as possible by the persons who have to fulfil them ; 
and (2) whether legislative enactments or judicial decisions ^ 
afford the best means of attaining this end. In examining 
the first question — since there are some who are hardly 
able to conceive it answered otherwise than affirmatively, — 
it will be well to put the case as plausibly as we can on the 
opposite side. We may do this by laying stress on the 
analogy between law and morality. What is called the 
" moral code " is very unprecisely apprehended by ordinary 
persons : and it is not imcommonly held that attempts to 
formulate it precisely are mistaken, and liable to do harm 
rather than good by encouraging persons to conform to the 
letter of the rules laid down, while really disloyal to the 
underlying principles Every one, it is often said, knows 
broadly what he ought to do ; in diflScult cases he had 
better trust to instinct ; if he goes wrong and deserves 
condemnation, his ill desert will be easily apprehended 
— at any rate after the event — by an experienced and 
impartial spectator. It seems quite possible to treat the 
legal code similarly ; indeed, it might be fairly urged that 
the legally obligatory part of our moral duty is generally 
the easiest to know. Every plain man is perfectly aware 
that he ought not to slay, or wantonly beat, or insult and 
defame his fellow-citizens, that he ought not to steal, cheat, 
break his promises, neglect his children, etc. : if he commits 
any of these ofiences he will almost always be conscious that 
he has done wrong ; and if he should lack this conscious- 
ness, his judge at any rate will have no difficulty in coming 
to a decision which will be generally approved- Grant that 
there are cases " on the line," which even an expert would 
have some difiiculty in deciding, and in which, therefore, a 
plain man cannot be expected to know his strictly legal 

^ It sliould be observed that it is not necessary that the intellectual part 
of the process of judicial development of law should be even mainly per- 
formed by the judges : it may be mainly due to the action of teachers and 
writers having no official position. 

Z 



338 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

duty ; 8tm, it may be urged, this ignorance has its advan- 
tages, as a plain man should keep aloof from this ambiguous 
margin ; if you tell him the precise limits of his legal obli- 
gations, you hold out to him a dangerous temptation to go 
as close as possible to the limit, when interest or passion 
urge him in the direction opposed to duty. 

These arguments seem to me not devoid of force. In- 
deed, it is because they contain an important element of 
truth that the legal maxim, " ignorance of the law excuseth 
none," is not in practice so oppressive as it at first sight 
appeara The ordinary citizen of a modern State certainly 
does not know the law of his State ; but, if he acts on his 
common-sense view of social duty, the cases in which he is 
in danger of coming into collision with this law are com- 
paratively few. And it is a matter of common experience 
that the more precise knowledge of particular rules of law, 
which a minority of persons attain by special study, is some- 
times used for the purpose of evading social duties and 
taking an imfair advantage of the ignorance of other& 

But such force as the arguments above given may be 
allowed to possess, seems to be decidedly outweighed by the 
consideration of the insecurity, inconsistency, and inequality 
that tend to result from imperfect definition of legal 
duties. 

In considering the first evil — insecurity — we see that 
the analogy just suggested, between doubtful or marginal 
cases in morality and similar cases in law, is not a close one. 
When confronted with a problem of moral casuistry, where 
there is a primd facie conflict of duties, a man who means 
well may usually hope, even if he is severely condemned 
by some moral persons, to be acquitted or even praised by 
others. But in the case of legal penalties there can be no 
such mixture and balance ; they must be either inflicted or 
not inflicted; and though punishment proper might sometimes 
be remitted or reduced where the absence of criminal intent 
was clear, such remission could not be counted on ; since 
very mischievous acts, needing severe repression, may be 
done by thoroughly well-intentioned persons : and in any 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 339 

case damages due to private individuals wronged could not 
be remitted. And to the suggestion that the danger of 
having to suffer punishment or pay damages might be 
avoided by keeping well within the limits that separate 
allowed from forbidden conduct, it may be fairly replied 
that the most innocent persons are continually liable to be 
brought near these limits in certain directions by their social 
functions and relations. For example, an honest newspaper 
editor cannot be sure of giving the law of libel a " wide 
berth," a schoolmaster requires to know exactly what punish- 
ments he may inflict, a tradesman how far he is responsible 
for the quality of his goods, any owner of property how far 
he may use violence to ward off encroachments on his rights. 
Especially in the case of rights of property, the precisest 
possible definition is often needed to prevent litigation and 
ill-feeling even among persons sincerely anxious to act 
rightly ; since it is often the imperative duty of such per- 
sons to enforce their pecuniary rights to the full, for the 
sake of others whose interests they have in charge. 

Then we have to take into account the further evils that 
would result from inconsistency in the application of legal 
rules. The decisions of judges would inevitably differ widely 
— assuming that no one was bound by precedents — and the 
general respect for law would suifer in proportion : especi«dly 
as the consequent inequality in the treatment of similar 
cases could not but be felt as injustice. For, however men 
may disagree in the application of the idea of justice, there 
is one point on which they agree — that similar cases should 
be treated similarly. 

I conclude, then, that the utmost attainable definiteness 
in legal rules is on the whole to be regarded as a gain, sub- 
ject to the condition, — which has been assumed throughout 
the preceding argument for definition, — that the defined law 
is capable of being known by the persons whose rights and 
duties it determines. For to lay down laws with extreme 
precision, but in such a manner as to render them practi- 
cally unknowable by the persons who have to obey them, 
would obviously fail to give the desired security : hence 



340 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

effective publication of a new statute is always held to be 
essential to good government. 

It may be replied, however, that this " cognoscibility," 
— to use Bentham's term — of law, is an unattainable ideal : 
since an ordinary member of a modem State could not 
possibly know the elaborate system of legal rules that has 
been gradually worked out to meet the requirements of the 
complex society to which he belongs, even if they were 
expressed and arranged in the clearest possible manner, and 
purged from all historical survivals and useless technicalities. 
This is certainly true, but no such extensive knowledge is 
practically needed by an ordinary citizen : it is only a 
minute fraction of the legal code of his country, varying 
according to the nature of his calling and his social position, 
that it would practically profit an ordinary citizen to know 
for the ordinary business of his life ; while for rare and 
important transactions it is no great burden that he should 
have to take legal advice. It seems, therefore, expedient to 
facilitate the acquirement by an ordinary citizen of such 
knowledge of the laws of his State as practically concerns 
him ; while, in order that the work of giving legal ad\'ice 
and the administration of justice may be as economically 
and effectively performed as possible, and that changes in 
law may not be made ignorantly and unskilfully, it seems 
no less expedient to render a knowledge of law easily attain- 
able by legal advisers, pleaders, judges, and legislators. 

§ 3. Assimiing then that we are to aim at making laws 
as definite and as cognoscible as possible, let us consider 
how far this result may be better attained by express legis- 
lation, or by continuing the process of development through 
judicial decisions, which has had so large a share in deter- 
mining legal rules in earlier times. In the first place, it is 
clear that, so far as definite and palpable changes in law are 
demanded, in consequence either of changes in social con- 
ditions or of increased insight into social needs, it becomes 
more and more necessary, as the development of law goes 
on, to obtain these by express legislation ; since, as we saw,^ 

^ Chap. xiii. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 341 

the process of judicial law-making tends to be confined 
within continually narrowing limits in virtue of the very 
principle that has rendered it possible — the principle that 
decided cases are binding judicial precedenta 

Here it may perhaps be said that such changes in law 
as may be needed at the present stage of social development 
can hardly relate to what I have called the individualistic 
minimum ; that the fundamental rights of personal security, 
property, contract, etc., must have been long since determined 
in any civilised State ; and that so far as exacter definition 
may be required on doubtful points — as, e.^., whether it is 
murder to kill and eat a comrade on the high seas to avoid 
starvation — this definition is still best given by the judgea 
And no doubt modem legislation is not mainly concerned 
with the substantive law governing these fundamental rela- 
tions of individuals, but either with the orgfuiisation of the 
governmental machinery for securing them, or with interfer- 
ence that goes beyond the individualistic minimum. Still 
there are questions of real, though minor importance, even 
within the individualistic minimum, with which legislation 
here and now has to deal : and it may be worth while to 
give a few examples of these from recent English legislation. 

To begin with personal security — ^the general principle 
is clear, that a man should be protected from injury 
wilfully or carelessly caused by other men : but in apply- 
ing the principle, new precautions are continually needed 
against new dangers, which changes in social relations 
or industrial conditions have rendered more formidable: 
and it is a complicated and delicate matter to devise just 
the right precautions, owing to the general risk that, in pro- 
tecting the security of one individual, we may too much 
hamper the freedom of others to perform useful social work. 
Thus, e.^., to ward oflF perils from explosive substances it was 
till lately thought sufficient to regulate their manufacture 
and carriage, and their use imder special circumstances, as in 
mines : but some years ago, when the conjunction of revolu- 
tionaries and dynamite intensified this peril in England, the 
governmental protection was increased, partly by severer 



342 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

penalties on proved co-operaticm in criminal use of explosives, 
but partly also by throwing on the possessor of the danger- 
ous substance under suspicious circumstances the burden of 
proving that he had it for a lawful object. 

So, again, it requires much care to secure the reputation 
of individuals from improper attacks without interfering with 
the useful function of newspapers in spreading information 
and criticism: and thus it was found that a more exact 
determination of the law of newspaper libel was needed 
some years ago: by which newspapers were made free of 
any responsibility for reporting speeches at public meetings, 
provided they inserted any contradictions or corrections sent 
them by the speakera 

To turn to property : the main utilitarian principle on 
which the institution of private property rests is the expedi- 
ency of encouraging productive labour (and due care for 
what has been produced) by securing the product to the 
labourer : but in the case of intellectual products, such as 
industrial inventions, it is impossible to do this without 
some risk of interfering with the inventive enterprise of 
other men ; and it needs a very careful regulation of the 
conditions under which inventions are protected by patent, 
in order to give adequate encouragement to the inventor 
protected, while hampering other inventors as little as pos- 
sible. Hence it is not surprising that changes in our Patent 
Law should have been recently required, and that wider 
changes should still be urged. And the same remark applies 
to other immaterial products of labour which cannot be 
appropriated as material things are. 

As regards contract: I have already noticed the important 
limitation of contractual obligations imposed by the law of 
Bankruptcy, according to which debts of money cease to be 
legally due from persons who have at some previous time 
proved their inability to pay and given up their property for 
division among their creditors. This limitation of the effects 
of breach of contract is on the whole expedient, in order to 
restore to insolvent persons adequate inducements to useful 
industry : but it involves great risk of encouraging reckless 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 343 

and improper dealing with borrowed resources; and the 
problem of reducing this risk to a minimum has been found 
very diificult. The British Parliament has legislated on the 
subject repeatedly and recently, but it cannot be confidently 
afi&rmed that fresh legislation will not soon be needed. 

§ 4. We may, therefore, conclude that a Legislative organ 
is continually needed, in a modern State, to secure the best 
possible definition even of the individualistic minimum of 
legal duty.^ 

The need, however, of a continually active legislature 
becomes more palpable and obvious when we admit the 
necessity of governmental interference (with sane adults) 
of the kind that I have called " indirectly individualistic " 

^ Here I ought not to pass over altogether an important question — which, 
however, lies somewjiat outside the subject discussed in this chapter, viz., 
whether, with a view to the utmost attainable "cognoscibility," legislation in 
a modern State should not merely supplement deficiencies in the judicial 
development of law, but should aim at covering the whole field, by codifying 
the results of this development. On this question it befits a layman to 
speak with brevity and reserve : but it seems undeniable that judge -made 
law must ceteris j)ar%bus bo less cognoscible than statue law ; since the 
binding rules involved in judicial decisions, so long as they are not authori- 
tatively extracted in a general form, have to be studied and reasoned about 
as ** embedded in matter," enveloped in the circumstances of the particular 
case ; and this must render it more difficult to know and apply them. It 
may be said that the codified law will inevitably have ambiguities and 
inadequacies which will set the process of judicial interpretation and exten- 
sion at work again, so that the obstacles to knowledge which codification 
aims at removing will reappear : but they can hardly reappear to an equal 
extent ; and there seems no reason why they should not be from time to 
time removed by amending statutes. 

On the other hand, it is said that '* to reduce unwritten law to statute is 
to discard one of the greatest blessings that we have for ages eigoyed, in 
rules capable of flexible interpretation." This was said by Mr. Justice 
Talfourd in 1853. I do not know how far leading English and American 
jurists at the present day — who seem to be more impressed by the extreme 
minuteness of the rules that have been worked out by a series of judicial 
interpretations — would be generally disposed to lay so much stress on the 
'* flexibility " of our law. But it must be admitted that, supposing equal 
minuteness in the rules applied, there must be less flexibility in their 
application when the judge is bound by express general statements of the 
law, than when he is only bound by the general rules implied in judicial 
decisions on particular cases : but it would seem that this additional 
flexibility must be gained at the expense of definiteness as well as cognosci- 
bility — unless we suppose the written rules to be badly expressed. 



344 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and " paternal " : — such as the prohibition of insanitary- 
dwellings and food, and generally the enforcement of pre- 
cautions against disease, the restriction of the sale of 
intoxicants, the repression of gambling, the regulation of 
such dangerous industries as mining and navigation, or the 
manufacture of explosive substances; and when we take 
into account the State's duty to care for the interests of 
others than sane adults — especially to supervise the rearing 
and training of children and protect them from parental 
neglect and from any oppressive and injurious treatment. 
And the need will be further increased if we include various 
kinds of interference, which I before classified as "Socialistic," 
in a wide sense of the term ; Le, if Government is to regu- 
late the use of natural resources — rivers, forests, mines, sea- 
fisheries — and to make special laws for the tenure of land ; 
to undertake a large share of the business of conveyance 
and communication; to monopolise coining and regulate the 
issue of bank-notea A fresh quantum of legislation will be 
required if we admit interference with the special aim of 
benefiting the poor, as by compulsory and partially gratuitous 
education, poor -relief from public funds, compulsory and 
state-aided insurance against sickness and old age. As we 
have before remarked, an important amount of interference 
under these various heads is actually undertaken by all 
modern States, and the tendency at present is to extend it: 
and it is obvious that so far as these measures involve 
encroachments on freedom, legislation of a complicated and 
delicate kind will be required, to render the action of govern- 
ment in these various ways at once as useful and as little 
mischievous as possible. 

It is further evident that in order to carry out eflFectively 
the various kinds of governmental interference which I have 
classified as " indirectly individualistic," " paternal," and 
" socialistic," the Executive will have to be made consider- 
ably more extensive and complex. For instance, the regu- 
lation of dangerous industries involves a need of new 
fimctionaries of various kinds, to inspect the places in 
which the industries are carried on, to give licences which 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 345 

may be withdrawn if conditions are broken, to test and 
certify the training of certain classes of skilled labourers; 
while, so far as Grovernment does not merely regulate, but 
actually takes certain departments of industry into its own 
management, the work of the Executive may be further 
enlarged and varied almost indefinitely. If governmental 
interference in England were strictly limited to the indivi- 
dualistic minimum, we should only require for executive 
work^leaving the external relations of the State out of 
account — something like the Home Office, together with 
certain local authorities, to manage the machinery for pre- 
vention and punishment of crime, and the Treasury to 
manage the finances. It is because our State undertakes 
so much further interference of the various kinds exem- 
plified in the preceding paragraph that the functions of such 
additional departments as to our Education Committee, 
Local Government Board, Board of Trade, and Post Office, 
are needed. 

Here, however, it should be observed that the social 
needs, which give occasion for governmental work going 
beyond the individualistic minimum, are partly supplied 
in England and other modern states, by private enterprise 
and voluntary associations, or by philanthropic eflForts 
and funds given or bequeathed by private persons to 
public purposes. One consequence of this is that the inter- 
vention of Grovernment in the arrangements for supplying 
these needs does not necessarily involve the action of 
tlie ordinary executive organ, or involves it only in a minor 
degree. It may, in some cases, be expediently carried into 
effect by legislation giving certain coercive powers to volun- 
tary associations, commercial or uncommercial ; — usually 
under the condition of conforming to special regulations 
laid down by the legislature. Thus, — to take an instance 
of a commercial association, — an English railway company, 
on account of the social importance of its work, is granted 
a special power of compulsorily purchasing the land that 
it requires, and in return for this privilege is required to 
conform to regulations laid down by the legislature in 



346 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

respect of the rates that it charges for the conveyance of 
goods and passengers. At the same time it has the power 
of making, with the approval of the Board of Trade, " bye- 
laws" for the regulation of its trafiic, and attaching penalties 
which law-courts will enforce to the breach of them. The 
institutions, again, to which, in England, the exclusion of 
unfit persons from the medical and legal professions respect- 
ively is entrusted, come under the same general head.^ 
Institutions of this kind, which we may call " semi-public," 
afford a useful machinery for supplying certain social wants 
better than the unaided and imregulated action of private 
persons would supply them, without unduly increasing the 
responsibilities or the powers of Grovernment. 

The semi-public character of such institutions has vari- 
ous forms and degrees. Sometimes, as we have just seen, it 
involves a share of the coercive function which is the 
peculiar attribute of Government; sometimes it is given by 
special privileges of a non-coercive kind. Thus the Bank 
of England is enabled to perform the public function of 
providing an important part of the medium of exchange in 
England, through its special privilege of issuing notes that 
may be legally rendered in payment of all debts of money 
(above £5), provided that such notes are expressed to 
be payable to bearer on demand, and are actually paid by 
the bank in legal coin whenever demand is made. Some- 
times, again, the intervention of the State takes the form of 
pecimiary assistance from public funds, given under certain 
conditions : thus many of the universities of Great Britain 
are to this extent under governmental control, though the 
executive scarcely interferes in their administration.^ 

^ These are, in the case of medicine, the colleges of physicians and 
surgeons in England, Scotland, and Ireland, certain universities, and the 
General Medical Council elected by these bodies : in the case of the legal 
profession, the Inns of Court (for barristers) and the Incor|>orated Law 
Society (for solicitors). It should, however, be said that the functions of 
the Inns of Court have never been made the subject of legislation. 

* It is to bo noted that sometimes the funds by which an institution is 
supported are private in their origin and only public in their destination, 
being derived from the donations or bequests of individuals. In this last 
case the interference of government should not ordinarily go beyond the 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 347 

It is to be observed that diiferences similar to those 
just noted are found in the executive business performed 
by governmental ofBicials. The most important part of 
this business consists in interference of a coercive kind with 
the freedom of individuals, eg. in preventing and punishing 
crime and levying taxes. But there are other parts of 
governmental work, especially of the kinds that I have 
classed as socialistic, which are usually not coercive, except 
in the indirect way of requiring funds that have to be raised 
by taxation ; and sometimes not even to this extent, since 
such work may be carried on remuneratively, just like 
a private commercial enterprise. Thus, for instance, the 
business of various kinds carried on by the Post OflSce 
in England yields a large annual surplus to the State ; and 
though the main part of this business — the transmission of 
letters and telegrams — is protected by a monopoly, and so 
far involves coercive interference with the ordinary rights 
of individuals, this is not the case with the conveyance of 
parcels, nor with the insurance and savings bank business 
performed by the same department. In these latter cases, 
then, the coercive element of governmental interference is 
altogether wanting ; the businesses are regarded as govern- 
mental, because they are supported by public credit, and 
carried on by oflScials appointed by government, but these 
officials in dealing with other members of the community 
have only the same rights as the ordinary law secures to 
private persona 

§ 5. The distinction between coercive and non-coercive 
functions shoiUd be carefully kept in view when we turn to 
consider the question, of fundamental importance in govern- 
mental construction, as to the relation of the executive to 
the legislature. So far as the functions of the executive are 
internal and coercive, it has been assumed throughout that 
they will normally be limited by law ; i,e. I have assumed 

supervision necessary to prevent such funds from being misapplied, with 
occasional revision and modification of the rules under which they are 
applied, when circumstances have rendered their original application no 
longer expedient. 



348 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

that, whenever the executive may invade by physical acts, 
or restrict by commands, the ordinary private rights of 
citizens, it will do this strictly in accordance with laws that 
withdraw or limit these rights, in the special case of the 
persons concerned, either by way of penalty or for some 
special end of public utility. This condition is generally 
necessary to realise the security that the laws are designed 
to give to private persons. For the power of interference 
with ordinary private rights, which for the mere defence of 
these rights it is needful to vest in the executive, involves, 
— to use Bentham's phrase — a formidable "sacrifice of 
security to security " ; and, in order to minimise the sacri- 
fice, it is important to place the exercise of this power under 
close and carefully planned legal restrictions, — of which 
the well-known limitations on the power of arresting on 
suspicion of crime, and detaining in prison before trial, and 
on forcible entry into private houses, are familiar examples. 
We may assume, then, that normally ^ the coercion of the 
executive will be exercised under the restraint of laws 
defining carefully the limits of its interference with the 
ordinary rights of members of the commimity. And if 
this restraint is to be thoroughly effective, the executive 
that is not to break these laws must not alone have the 
power to make them: the supreme authority to modify 
these laws must be vested in a legislative organ, wholly 
or to an important extent distinct from the executive. But 
it may perhaps be questioned whether the executive should 
be any further subjected to rules laid down by a legislature 
distinct from it. We can conceive the legislative and 
executive organs to work eflFectively in complete mutual 
independence as regards appointment, organisation, and 
methods of procedure ; the former determining the rules 



^ As I afterwards admit, it seems necessary that the executive should 
have a power in exceptional emergencies of infringing the ordinary rights of 
private citizens in ways not capable of being specifically defined beforehand ; 
but I hold that some conb»itutional security ought to be provided to ensure 
that this governmental illegality is confined to the rare cases in which ex- 
ceptional circumstances justify it. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 349 

that the citizens generally should obey, and the maximum 
and minimum penalties they should suffer for disobedience ; 
the latter determining at its own discretion — within the 
limits fixed by the legally secured rights of private citizens 
— the instruments and methods for repressing disobedience, 
enforcing punishment and reparation, and otherwise attain- 
ing the ends of government. 

The case, however, is diiferent when we consider the 
relation of the executive to the organ which we have seen 
to be required for the ultimate control over governmental 
financa The coercive work of the executive cannot be 
made self-supporting; hence the need of obtaining funds 
for its support will tend to bring it within the control of 
the money-granting organ, whose duty it will be to examine 
carefully any costly changes that may be proposed in the 
organisation of the executive, and to use its power of the 
purse to secure economy as well as eflSciency in its con- 
struction and operations. This is equally true of the 
usually larger expenditure caused by the need of providing 
for resistance to foreign aggression. If the heads of the 
executive were at liberty to organise the army and navy 
and civil service as expensively as they thought fit — the 
money-granting organ being boimd to find funds for the 
expenditure thus entailed — the financial control of this 
organ would become insignificant, and the protection from 
over-taxation that it is designed to secure to private citizens 
would be almost illusory. 

And this financial reason for establishing control over 
the executive applies also to its non-coercive work. The need 
of such control is obvious, so far as this work is financially 
onerous to the State. It is not quite so clear in the case of 
any branch of governmental industry which yields a profit : 
still it seems on the whole desirable, with a view to the 
careful adjustment of the supply of public funds to the 
needs of national expenditure, that the control of the 
money - granting organ should extend over the whole of 
governmental finance; especially since any non- coercive 
branch of governmental industry, even though it may 



350 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

be actually yielding a profit, will usually entail a certain 
liability on the general public exchequer. 

Now, in modern States generally, the legislature is 
identical — in the main, if not altogether^ — with what I 
have called the " money-granting " organ. And there are 
obvious reasons why this identification is desirable, since 
many important kinds of governmental interference require 
both legislation and expenditure of public money ; and in 
such cases the division of responsibility, which would result 
if legislation and money-granting were allotted to separate 
bodies, would not conduce to the desirable combination 
of eflBciency and economy. Indeed, the body that had 
the ultimate control over finance could hardly be pre- 
vented fipom acquiring an indirect but important control 
over all legislation involving fresh expenditure. I shall 
accordingly assume in what follows that the legisla- 
tive organ has also the function of determining taxation 
and supervising the expenditure of Government. But 
further, there are important considerations — apart from 
the financial — which render it desirable to place the pro- 
cedure, if not the organisation, of the executive under the 
control of the legislature as such. In the first place, so far 
as it is necessary for the eflSciency of any department of the 
service of Government that the persons employed in it 
should be subject to severer penalties for breach of rules 
than would be imposed for the breach of ordinary contracts 
of service — as is commonly held to be the case with military 
forces — it is important that these penalties, and the rules for 
breach of which they are to be inflicted, and the procedure 
for determining their infliction in any particular case, should 
receive the sanction of the legislature. A reason of wider 
application is that, owing to the inevitable imperfection of 
law, there will always be some danger that the exercise of the 

^ Measures for raising revenue are generally regarded as a species of 
legislation, to be determined by the same bodies that determine other kinds 
of legislation ; but where the legislature consists of two chambers — as is 
usually the case — the distribution of the powers between the two chambers, 
in respect of measures for raising revenue, is often different from their 
distribution in respect of legislation generally. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 351 

power of the executive may become practically oppressive 
without being illegal. Hence it seems desirable, for the 
fullest possible security to the citizens generally, not only 
that this formidable power should be kept strictly within 
the limits of the law, but also that its exercise within these 
limits should be subjected to the watchful criticism of the 
legislature ; partly because the careful performance of this 
function of critical supervision is likely to throw light on 
defects in the law capable of being removed by new legis- 
lation,^ partly in order that the desire of avoiding incon- 
venient legislative restraints may itself operate as a moral 
restraint on the executive. 

§ 6. It may be expedient that some part of the i-egulation 
that I have summarily described should be withdrawn from 
the control of the ordinary legislature, and settled on a 
comparatively permanent footing by constitutional rules 
more stable than ordinary laws, being only capable of 
modification by a more elaborate and tardy process than 
ordinary legislation.* Still, the reasons just given would 
seem to justify the allotment to the ordinary legislature of 
so much power of control over the executive organ as to 
place the latter normally in a relation of subordination to 
the former. And indeed this relation of subordination is 
implied in the term " executive " : which properly denotes 
an organ whose function it is to carry out the orders of 
some other organ. In fact this implication has caused some 
writers to object to the term as applied to the high officials 
in modern States — kings or presidents and their ministers 
— who are the heads of what I have called the " executive " 
departments of government. It is urged that the popular 
designation of these officials as " the government " is really 
more correct : since within wide limits they fomi — and 
ought to form — resolutions and issue orders, general as well 
as particular, on their own responsibility. I think it is 
true that, for the effective performance of governmental 

* I do not here sssQme that the executive will be, formally or practically, 
appointed and dismissed by the legislature. 
' See chap, xxvii. 



352 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

functions, monarchs or ministers must have normally some 
power of making general rules to which not only their 
subordinates but other citizens also, under certain circum- 
stances, have to conform.^ But this does not render 
the term Executive inappropriate to describe the normal 
duties of these officials, so far at least as the internal func- 
tions of government are concerned : since, in internal affairs, 
the general character of normal governmental interference 
is capable of being defined by law, and must be expected to 
be so defined in an advanced modern community in which 
legislation is active:^ so that the special ordinances and 
regulations which the heads of the (so-called) executive 
departments issue are properly conceived as carrying out the 
general design of the legislature. It is true, again, that 
under exceptional circumstances, it may be the duty of the 
so-called executive to take measures, not capable of being 
defined beforehand, for preserving order or protecting the 
interest of the community from serious detriment, and that 
such measures may inevitably conflict with established legal 
rules. But I conceive that it should be the aim of states- 
men to keep such justifiable illegality within the narrowest 
possible limits : and it seems reasonable in our constitu- 
tional terminology to take account of the normal relations of 
the different organs of government rather than the abnormal. 
The case is, I admit, different as regards foreign affairs. 
In the first place, it is, generally speaking, an import- 
ant part of the business of the organ of government that 
deals in the name of a State with other States and their 
members, to conform to the established rules of international 
duty which do not rest on the authority of any one State's 

1 See p. 358. 

^ In a State whose constitution lias had a gradual development, the 
powers of the executive, like the rights of private persons, will probably be 
to an important extent detennined by custom and precedent, and not ex- 
pressly conferred by statute. But all such customary law is to be regai*ded 
as modifiable by legislation of some kind in a modern State : and it seems 
clearly convenient that the law governing the operations of the executive 
should be — to a great extent, if not altogether — modifiable by the ordinary 
legislature, in order that the changes which we must expect to be required 
from time to time may be effected without undue delay. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 353 

legislature, and therefore ought not to be regarded as 
normally modifiable by any such legislature ; — although the 
latter may sometimes have to give an authoritative defini- 
tion or interpretation of certain international rules for the 
guidance of members of its own State. And further, within 
the limits prescribed by international law and morality, it 
seems clear that the legislature could not conveniently 
determine the conduct of war or negotiations by general 
rules in anything like the same degree as the internal 
functions of government; owing to the extent to which 
wise management of foreign relations must vary with vary- 
ing combinations of circumstances incapable of being fore- 
seen. The legislature must either in the decision of these 
matters leave a very wide discretion to king or minister, or 
else itself take part in the decisions, and so go beyond the 
sphere of legislation. 

I admit, therefore, that the term "executive" is not 
quite appropriate to denote the power and function ex- 
ercised by the organ of government that deals, in the 
name of the community, with foreign states. Still, as 
we have seen, this power and function cannot well be 
separated from the internal executive power and function, 
as regards the highest direction, the ultimate control of 
both: since for either the whole organised physical force 
of the community may be needed in the last resort I 
propose, therefore, to take the term " executive," as imply- 
ing that the organ of government so denoted acts to a 
great extent under rules laid down by the legislative 
organ, and with a general duty of carrying out the inten- 
tions of that body.^ 

§ 7. It will be seen that the same general considerations 
which have led us to regard the executive as normally 
standing to the legislature in a relation of subordination, 
also tend to show that the subordination should not go so 

^ It may be noticed that the word *' administrative," which some writers 
— €,g, G. C. Lewis, Oovemment of Dependencies, p. 18 — prefer to use to 
denote the functions that I call *' executive," equally implies subordination 
to some higher authority. 

2a 



354 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

fiar — even in matters of internal administration — as to make 
the legislature practically the supreme executive. For, if 
this were the case, then the security against oppression, 
given by its critical supervision of the executive, would be 
lost : another independent organ would be required to watch 
and criticise the legislature. 

It may perhaps be asked, why should not, in any case, 
the danger of oppression by the legislature be as formidable, 
and call for as vigilant precautions, as the danger of 
oppression by the executive ? I should answer, first, that 
the need of guarding against legislative oppression un- 
doubtedly exists, and is — ^as we shall hereafter see — recog- 
nised as a fundamentally important consideration in 
determining the constitution of the legislature.^ At the 
same time the legislative danger seems to be less perpetual 
and pressing : since, £is G. C. Lewis says, " there is a 
great difiFerence between deliberate, universal, and avowed, 
and unpremeditated, particular, and casual rapacity and 
injustice. Many governments which habitually act towards 
their subjects in the most oppressive manner would be 
ashamed to reduce the maxims by which they are in fact 
guided into the form of a law, and to publish it to their 
subjects and the whole civilised world." ^ 

It seems then desirable that the executive organ should 
be not only distinct from the legislature — or at least from 
that part of the legislature that exercises the function of 
critical supervision — but also in some degree independent of 
it: though, as we shall hereafter see, it is a somewhat 
difficult problem to determine how far this independence 
should go, or by what means it may best be secured.* 
Similarly, the expediency of keeping the judicial organ 
separate from and independent of the executive may be 
inferred from what has been already said of the importance 

^ When an assembly, periodioally elected by the citizens at large, is a main 
part of the legislature, we may presume that the desires and alarms of the 
private persons who may suffer from or fear oppression wiU find adequate 
utterance in this assembly. 

' OovemmerU of Dependencies^ Preliminary Enquiry^ p. 30. 

' See chap. xzii. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 355 

of keeping the executive within the restraints of law : since 
such restraints can hardly be expected to be effective unless 
the question whether acts done by executive officials are or 
are not illegal can be referred — in the last resort — to the 
judicial decision of some organ distinct from the executive. 
Whether this organ should be an ordinary law court, or 
whether a special court should be established to deal with 
charges brought against executive officials, will be considered 
in a subsequent chapter (xxiv.) 

The expediency of making the judicial organ distinct 
from and independent of the legislature is no less obvious, 
so far as the ordinary legislature is bound to conform to 
constitutional laws which can only be modified by an extra- 
ordinary legislature : since in this case — no less than in 
that of the executive — the obligation of conforming to law 
cannot be effectually enforced, unless there is a judicial 
body independent of the legislature, competent to pronounce 
on the validity of legislation. How far such constitutional 
limitations on the authority of the ordinary legislature are 
necessary or desirable will be hereafter considered. Where 
there are no such limitations — or none having legal force — 
the need of separating legislative and judicial functions is 
less obvioua^ Still, even in this case, it seems clear that if 

^ The summary argument for this separation, repeated hy several writers 
after Montesquieu, appears to be based on the assumption that if the judica- 
ture had the power of legislating, any tribunal would necessarily have — or 
assume — the right of legislating ex post facto, and therefore of deciding the 
cases brought before it arbitrarily. Thus Montesquieu writes, in his famous 
chapter on the English Ck)n8titution, *' Si le puissance de juger 6tait jointe a 
la puissance legislative, le pouvoir sur la vie et la liberty des citoyens serait 
arbitraire " {Esprit des Lois, 6. xi. ch. vi.). Similarly, Blackstone says (I. ch. 
vii.), ** Were [the judicial power] joined with the legislative, the life, liberty, 
and property of the subject would be in the hands of arbitrary judges, whose 
decisions would then be regulated only by their opinions, and not by any 
fundamental principles of law." — So Paley {Moral Philosophy, Book VI. ch. 
viii.), *' It is evident, in the first place, that the decisions of such a judicature 
would be so many laws ; and in the second place, that, when the parties and 
the interests to be affected by the laws were known, the inclinations of the 
lawmakers would inevitably attach on one side or the other ; and that where 
there were neither any fixed rules to regulate their determinations, nor any 
superior force to control their proceedings, these inclinations would interfere 
with the integrity of public justice." But the identity of organs does not 



3S6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the two functions are given to the same organ, there will be 
a certain danger of confusion between them, tending to blur 
the fundamental distinction between the law as it is and 
the law as it ought to be. It is also important for justice 
that law should be applied according to an established and 
impartial method of interpretation : and this result is more 
likely to be secured if those who apply the law are not 
responsible for laying it down. Moreover, an independ- 
ent judiciary gives a security that equal justice will be 
done in disputes between legislators and private persons. 
Also the advantages of "division of labour" are an im- 
portant consideration: the work of the judiciary, in an 
advanced society with a complicated system of law, must 
require a concentration of energy which will hardly be 
maintained if the business of legislation is superadded. It 
may be added, anticipating the result of subsequent dis- 
cussions, that the kind of organ which, £uxx)rding to the 
received view in modern States, is best adapted for legisla- 
tive functions is not well adapted for judicial— or indeed 
for executive — functions ; partly from its size and com- 
plexity, partly from its mode of composition. 

§ 8. We have thus arrived at the conclusion that the 
work of government should be distributed under three main 
heads, as Legislative, Executive, and Judicial, each division 
being allotted to a separately constituted organ. This 
result is broadly in accordance with the actual constitutions 
of modern States: and I shall accordingly adopt it as 
determining the main outlines of the structure of govern- 
ment, which will be worked out into further detail in the 
chapters that follow. I think it, however, important to 
show that this triple division of governmental work cannot 

necessarily imply a confusion of processes : and it seems extravagant to sup- 
pose that the judges would avowedly and habitually disregard an elementary 
principle of justice, viz. that the law by which an act is judged should be 
law established and promulgated at the time that the act was done ; or to 
suppose that, as a body, they would be blind to the evil consequences of con- 
tinually altering general rules of law to suit their inclinations in any par- 
ticular case. Besides, it would obviously be easy to arrange that no single 
tribunal, but only a collection of tribunals sitting together, should exercise 
the legislative function. 



\ 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 357 

well be made complete. For this purpose, I shall now 
examine somewhat more closely the meaning of the funda- 
mental terms that we have adopted to denote these organs 
and functions ; in order to ascertain (1) how far the general 
notions of the functions are clearly distinguishable, and 
(2) how far the functions, as distinguished, are conveniently 
separable. 

In this examination we must, of course, discard the 
associations and habits of thought which lead us to consider 
anything done officially by a judge as a judicial act, to take 
any Act of Parliament for a piece of legislation, and to 
regard the regulations laid down by the Privy Council, or 
by individual Ministers, as essentially different from legis- 
lation. We must give the terms a purely abstract mean- 
ing, independent of the actual distribution of governmental 
functions in England or elsewhere. 

1. Grenerality of application appears to be an essential 
feature in the notion of a " law " ; legislation, therefore, 
according to its most obvious abstract definition, will be the 
laying down of general rules, enforced by penalties of some 
kind, either for the conduct of members of the community 
generally, or for the members or servants of government. 
Now it seems clearly impracticable to lay down that all 
general rules required to control the conduct of subordinate 
members of the executive must be framed by the legislature ; 
thus depriving the heads or councils that have supreme 
executive authority in different departments of the power 
of giving general orders to their subordinates. Hence 
legislation, as thus defined, so far as it directly atiects 
persons in the service of government — and indirectly other 
members of the community who have dealings with them 
— must clearly be shared with the executiva It is, how- 
ever, possible to restrict the notion of " legislation " to the 
function of laying down rules directly binding on members 
of the community other than the servants of government : 
and we have already seen that it is broadly and generally 
desirable, for the security of the governed, that the legisla- 
tive function — ^in this restricted sense — should be vested 



358 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

in an organ distinct from the executive. But it would be 
highly inconvenient to carry this principle so far as to 
leave the executive no power of lajdng down such rules. 
Not only at exceptional crises — of which I have before 
spoken — but ordinarily wherever it is desirable that govern- 
mental regulations should be elastic, vtirying with circum- 
stances, and easily modifiable from time to time in accord- 
ance with the results of experience, — as, for instance, in 
enforcing precautions against infectious diseases — it seems 
expedient to let the details of these regulations be deter- 
mined by the executive organ. On this view, therefore, the 
executive must have a share of the legislative function, 
even if taken in the narrowest abstract sense that seems 
at all admissible ; and we have already seen that this must 
also be the case to some extent with the judicature, so far 
as judicial precedents are held to be binding. 

2. It is a less easy matter to distinguish " judicial " and 
" executive " functions in the work of applying law to par- 
ticular cases— even if we restrict the term " laws " to rules 
laid down by the legislature. In discussing this distinction 
— since the functions classed as executive are, as we have 
seen, multifarious, — it seems best to begin by framing 
a definite general conception of judicial functions We 
should, I think, agree to apply the term " judicial " to any 
proceeding by which a competent authority determines the 
question whether a person has, by violating a law, deserved 
a legal penalty, or whether he possesses a certain legal right, 
or is subject to a certain legal liability, that another dis- 
putes with him. Now, doubtless, the non-coercive part of 
executive business has no affinity with judicial business, as 
thus defined ; e.g, the purchase of articles for the army and 
navy, the coining of money, the conveyance and delivery of 
letters, the maintenance of schools, the economic manage- 
ment of public property. The same may be said, for the 
most part, of such coercive work of the executive as con- 
sists in carrying out decisions of judges ; e.g, the execution 
or imprisonment of a convict But there are other indis- 
pensable kinds of coercive interference which have to be 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 359 

performed before or apart from any decisions arrived at by 
the judicial organ : and in this region the distinction be- 
tween executive and judicial functions is liable to be evanes- 
cent or ambiguous, since executive officials have to " interpret 
the law " in the first instance, and they ought to interpret 
it with as much judicial impartiality as possible. 

Consider, for example, the arrest of persons suspected of 
crime. In England when such arrest is made — as is some- 
times necessary — without a warrant, we regard it as an 
executive act, whereas the issuing of a warrant to arrest is 
commonly regarded as a judicial act : but there seems to be 
no essential difiference between the intellectual process by 
which a constable decides to arrest without a warrant and 
that by which a magistrate decides to issue a warrant. 
Similarly, when an executive official has to estimate the 
value of an individual's property, with a view to direct 
taxation, he ought to be guided by precisely the same con- 
siderations as would determine the decision of a judge if a 
disputed estimate were brought before him. Again, so far 
as the rules for the management of convicts undergoing 
imprisonment are legislatively determined, the executive 
officials who manage the prisons have to exercise essentially 
judicial functions in deciding whether and how far convicts 
are to be punished for violation of rules. But further, in 
the prevention of mischief unintentionally caused by men, 
or due to other than human agency, and in the regulation 
of industries dangerous to moral and physical wellbeing, 
there are various minor kinds of governmental interference 
which it is difficult to class decisively as " executive " or 
" judicial " ; — such as the issue of orders to remove or destroy 
public nuisances and the issue of licences to follow certain 
trades. Perhaps we may say that in such cases, where the 
official has a discretionary power to act or not to act, accord- 
ing to considerations of expediency, the function is properly 
regarded as executive ; but even so, it involves at least a 
quasi-judicial application of the law, if the power is exercised 
justly, and with due regard to the private interests affected 
by it. Finally, the control exercised by the heads of depart- 



36o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

ments over salaried and dismissible subordinates must involve 
judicial, or quasi-judicial work, so far as the tenure of office 
is — legally or practically— on " good behaviour " ; since, in 
inflicting the penalty of dismissal, the superior will have to 
consider not whether it would be advantageous to get rid 
of the subordinate, but whether he has committed a suffi- 
ciently grave breach of duty ; ^ and this judicial function is 
of course increased in importance when the superior has to 
apply the speciaUy stringent rules and severe penalties 
which are held to be necessary in the case of military 
service. 

On the other hand, considerations of particular ex- 
pediency, similar to those that normally determine executive 
decisions, are not to be altogether excluded from the processes 
of strictly judicial reasoning ; for instance, in deciding on 
the pimishment to be allotted to a criminal, it may be a 
judge's duty to consider whether an example of severity is 
required at the particular place and time. 

It should be added that it would be inconvenient not to 
give the judiciary some power of making decisions and 
issuing orders (besides the warrants before-mentioned) which 
must be regarded as executive rather than strictly judicial : 
that is, for the arrangement of judicial business, the fulfil- 
ment of prescribed forms of procedure by parties to actions, 
the maintenance of order during trials ; for the summoning 
of witnesses, and as to the mode of investigation of facts 
relevant to the issues tried ; and for the execution of such of 
their decrees as are unresisted. 

3. Let us now consider how far it is possible or desir- 
able to withdraw from the legislature the power of making 
decisions, whether of the executive or the judicial kind, on 
individual cases. In Eousseau's famous theory of the sover- 
eignty of the people, fundamental importance is attached 
to the separation of this function from that of legislation. 
The people, he holds, have inalienable supreme legislative 
power ; no law can be binding on a people but such as is 

^ How far it is desirable that an appeal should be allowed in such cases 
to an independent tribunal will be considered later. See chap. xxi. § 5. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 361 

the expression of its general will ; but the general will, to 
be really such, must be general in its object as well as in 
its essence ; it must " proceed from all in order to be applied 
to all;" it "changes its nature" and "loses its natural 
rectitude " when it aims at an " individual and determined 
object" 1 

It does not, however, appear possible to attain the ends 
of legislation without rules that are particular in their 
application, allotting special duties or special exemptions 
to particular classes of persons on the ground of special 
circumstances. And this being so, it does not seem possible, 
by any constitutional rule, eflfectually to prevent the legisla- 
ture from dealing with individual cases if it be disposed to 
do so ; since any individual case is practically distinguishable 
from all other cases by a combination of general character- 
istics ; and it would be hardly practicable to lay down that 
no general rule should be valid if it were not in foct appli- 
cable to more than one individual* Nor would it conduce 
to real equity to preclude the legislature from making 
exceptional regulations to meet exceptional casea Hence, 
though the principle which Rousseau laid down, regarded 
as a general maxim for the guidance of a legislative organ, 
appears to me sound, I do not think that the protection 
against legislative injustice which he has in view can be 
satisfactorily secured by any restrictive definition of legis- 
lative functions For the same reason, if the independence 
of the executive is to be eflfectually secured against encroach- 
ment on the part of the legislature, it must be by some 
expedient other than that of confining the legislature to the 
function of laying down general rules ; either the legislature 
must be precluded from dealing at all with certain adminis- 
trative matters — such as selection of officials, organisation 

^ CorUrat Social^ II. chap. iv. 

^ It may be observed that many important governmental acts are at once 
general and individual in their effects, according to the point of view from 
wliich they are regarded. E,g. the annexation of a new territory is a decision 
that deals with an ** individual and determinate object ; " but in its effect 
on the inhabitants of the territory it is usually equivalent to a complex 
system of strictly legislative changes. 



362 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of the army, peace and war, and treaties with foreign states 
—or the executive in its turn must have some control over 
legislation. 

Still more clear is it that this distinction between 
"general" and "particular" decisions cannot be usefully 
applied to limit the financial control of the legislature over 
the executive. It is, no doubt, easy to distinguish the 
laying down of general rules of taxation, as a properly 
legislative fimction, from the actual collection of the taxes, 
or the estimation of private property for the purpose of 
taxation, which are properly executive. But if the financial 
control of the legislature is to be effective, it must obviously 
have the power of examining particular details of expendi- 
ture and appropriating funds to particular purposes. 

The need of subordinate executive oflBcials— clerks, mes- 
sengers, etc. — for the transaction of the business of a legis- 
lative assembly, is a point of minor importance, which it is 
sufficient merely to mention. 

4. It is more easy to frame constitutional rules restrain- 
ing the legislature from exercising strictly judicial functions. 
However unlimited may be the power assigned to the legis- 
lature of modifying the/i^t^re legal rights of the governed, 
this may be kept quite distinct from the power of allotting 
pimishments or damages for an alleged 'past breach of 
law; and there seems to be no difficulty in precluding 
the legislature from exercising this latter power, either 
directly by a " bill of pains and penalties," or indirectly by 
" €x post facto " legislation. It may be said that this re- 
striction will be merely formal ; since the legislature will 
still be able to inflict on any citizen any injury that it may 
desire to inflict, only not avowedly as a penalty. But (1) 
there is no reason why the ordinary legislature should not 
be constitutionally precluded from ordering certain kinds of 
injuries — such as death or personal chastisement — to be 
inflicted on the citizens, otherwise than as judicial penalties ; 
and (2) even if it is not so precluded, the moral restraint of 
a constitutional prohibition against punishing for past acts 
is likely at least to prevent the legislature from any invasion 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 363 

of the established rights of individuals which could not be 
plausibly defended unless regarded as a penalty. 

Still, though the withdrawal of judicial functions from 
the legislature is to this extent possible, and, for the reasons 
before given, generally desirable, there are certain excep- 
tional cases in which it would be either plainly or probably 
inexpedient. For instance, if the legislative organ — as is 
actually the case in modern States — consists in whole or in 
part of one or more nimierous assemblies, it seems desirable 
to give these assemblies the final determination of penalties 
for breaches of order at their meetings, with a view to the 
due maintenance of their dignity and the prevention of or- 
ganised disturbance of their debates. It has also been 
widely held that such assemblies should have the power of 
punishing outsiders for attempts to obstruct or prevent 
legislation by intimidating legislators or otherwise ; that, if 
representative, they should have the power of deciding con- 
tested elections of their members ; and that judicial proceed- 
ings against highly placed members of the executive or 
judicial organs should be conducted by the legislature. 
These, however, are more doubtful questions, the considera- 
tion of which must be reserved for subsequent chapters 

On the whole, the conclusion seems clear that the separa- 
tion of governmental functions among the organs which we 
have distinguished as legislative, executive, judicial, cannot, 
from the nature of the case, be complete, notwithstanding 
the strong general reasons that we have seen for establishing 
it. Still, we may say that the business of the legislature — 
at least in internal affairs ^ — should be maiidy to modify 
the general rules of law and determine taxation ; the busi- 
ness of the judicature, mainly the judicial application of law 
to individual cases ; the business of the executive, all else 
that has to be done to carry laws into effect. And we may 
say that while judicial decisions will almost entirely relate 
to questions of strict right and duty, executive decisions 
will be largely determined by considerations of particular 

^ How far the legislative organ should intervene in the management of 
foreign affairs is a difficult question, which will be hereafter considered. 



364 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

expediency, which will but rarely enter into judicial 
reasonings. 

Before concluding this preliminary survey, we have 
to take note of another distribution of the work of govern- 
ment, which cuts across the lines of division which we have 
so far been examining: I mean the distribution between 
central and local organs. In an earlier chapter we briefly 
considered certain reasons why the operations and effects 
of government should vary somewhat from district to dis- 
trict within the limits of the same State : we have now to 
observe that — ^partly for these reasons, partly on grounds 
that will be considered in subsequent chapters — it is 
universally held to be desirable that certain portions of 
governmental work should be allotted to organs whose sphere 
of operation is confined to particular local divisions of the 
territory. As we shall see, the extent of the powers vested 
in local governments will reasonably vary very much, 
owing to differences in the internal constitution and circum- 
stances of difierent political societies; but it is generally 
held to be desirable that the local executive organs of 
government should be, at anyrate to some extent, independ- 
ent of the central executive. There will therefore be a 
need of rules determining the division of functions, laid 
down either by the ordinary central legislature or else by 
the extraordinary legislature that has the function of making 
changes in the constitution. And if it is thought desirable 
that there should be not only division of functions between 
central and local governments, but also some supervision of 
the latter by the former, it may be convenient to constitute 
one or more special departments of the executive for the 
purposes of this supervision. 

§ 9. In conclusion, before we pass to discuss the details of 
governmental construction, it may be well to consider a 
general doubt as to the utility of the whole discussion, 
similar to that which met us in treating of international 
relations.^ It is thought by some that — granting the 
value of clear principles for determining how governments 

^ See chap. xv. § 1. 



XIX METHODS AND INSTRUMENTS OF GOVERNMENT 365 

ought to act — no similar gain can reasonably be expected 
from any general conclusions as to the manner in which 
they ought to be constructed. For political constitutions, 
it is said, like other organic structures, grow and are not 
made : if ever they appear to be made, the appearance is 
illusory : the new constitution in such cases — ^with what- 
ever deliberation and precision it may be laid down in a 
fundamental statute — has never real vitality except so far 
as it expresses the result of a natural process of social 
change, which determines its fundamental character. The 
most that a statesman can do is, by watching carefully 
these natural processes, to mitigate and shorten the organic 
disturbances which they are liable to cause in the body 
politic at critical stages. In short, principles of ordinary 
legislation may be useful as rules of diet are; but there 
can be no practical advantage in considering how the 
fundamental structure either of the individual or the social 
organism might be improved. 

There is an element of truth in this view : but on the 
whole it must be regarded as a hasty generalisation from 
certain parts of political history to the neglect of other 
parts ; and, especially, it fails to apprehend the distinctive 
characteristics of political change in the present stage of 
development of European states and their colonies. In this 
stage — initiated more than a century ago — the " natural 
process of organic growth " in states takes, to an important 
extent, the form of a movement of opinion : and, in the 
great majority of the countries sharing West European 
civilisation, large and fundamental changes in polity, in a 
great measure determined by this movement of opinion, 
have been introduced in the " constitution-making century " 
which is now approaching its termination. No doubt such 
changes, even when most extensive, are only partial, and 
leave large portions of the previous organisation of govern- 
ment unaltered ; but experience shows that there is no 
important organ, central or local, which they may not 
affect; and a careful consideration of the principles on 
which they ought to be made, seems as likely to be bene- 



366 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xix 

fidal here as in the case of ordinary legislation. Again, it 
is quite true that new governmental institutions, hastily 
introduced without due regard to the special characteristics 
and previous history of the people for whom they are 
designed, are apt to have no stability ; and either not to 
work at all, or to work otherwise than was intended. But 
this is in some measure the case with ordinary legislation 
under similar conditions: and I conceive that the proper 
inference to be drawn from it is that which I have drawn 
in chap. i. : — viz. that before practical conclusions are drawn 
from any general theoretical discussion of these topics, the 
results of such discussion should be carefully combined with 
the results of a more special study of the political conditions 
and history of the state in question. 



CHAPTEfe XX 

THE LEGISLATURE 

§ 1. In the preceding chapter we have been led to adopt 
a threefold division of the functions of government, as (1) 
Legislative, (2) Executive, and (3) Judicial ; — extending the 
notion of legislation to include the imposition of taxes, and, 
accordingly, combining with it a supervision over public 
receipts and expenditura A general consideration of these 
three classes of functions has shown us reasons why they 
should be, in modem states generally, performed for the 
most part by different organs : at the same time we have 
seen that this separation of functions cannot conveniently 
be made complete. 

Both these conclusions will receive further support from 
the study of the construction adapted to each organ, to which 
we are now to proceed. I begin with the legislative organ, 
because we have already seen that, from the nature of its 
functions, the legislature must be in a certain way supreme 
over the other two organs, since it belongs to the legislature 
to lay down the general rules, which the judiciary has to 
apply, and in conformity to which the executive has to 
work ; while again, so far as it regulates public finance, the 
legislature must exercise a general control over all the 
operations of government that involve expenditure. It 
has seemed indeed desirable — and almost necessary, if the 
separation of functions is to be effectually carried out — 
that the executive and judicial organs should have a sub- 
stantial amount of independence within their respective 



368 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

spheres of action ; and I shall hereafter consider the con- 
stitutional rules or other measures by which the required 
independence may be secured. Meanwhile, I shall assume 
that there is in any case a qualified supremacy in the legis- 
lature, from the nature of its functions ; and that it will 
consequently be expedient to entrust the legislative organ 
with the function of critically supervising the action of the 
executive. 

Let us begin, then, by considering the construction of 
the legislature. 

If we ask — without reference to existing institutions and 
the habits of thought which they tend to generate — to whom 
should be entrusted the function of making or modifying 
laws, an obvious answer is that it should be entrusted to 
persons who are thoroughly acquainted with the laws that 
they are called upon to modify. As J. S. Mill justly says, 
''there is hardly any kind of intellectual work which so 
much needs to be done not only by experienced and exer- 
cised minds, but by minds trained to the task through long 
and laborious study, as the business of making laws : since 
every provision of a law requires to be framed with the 
most accurate and long-sighted perception of its effect on 
all the other provisions : and the law when made should be 
capable of fitting into a consistent whole with the previously 
existing lawa"^ Accordingly, we may lay down without 

^ RepresienlaXvoe Oovemment, chap. v. Mill goes on to say that ''it is 
impossible that these conditions should be in any degree fulfiUed when 
laws are voted clause by clause in a miscellaneous assembly. The incon- 
gruity of such a mode of legislating would strike all minds, were it not 
that our laws are already, as to form and construction, such a chaos, that 
the confusion and contradiction seem incapable of being made greater by 
any addition to the mass." 

His plan for remedying the defects of the existing system of Parliamentary 
Legislation is to create *' a small body, not exceeding in number the members 
of a Cabinet, who should act as a Ck)mmission of Legislation, having for its 
appointed office to make the laws. . . . No one would wish that this body 
should of itself have any power of enacting laws : the Commission would 
only embody the element of intelligence in their construction ; Parliament 
would represent that of wiU. . . . Instructions concurred in by both Houses, 
to draw up a Bill which should effect a particular purpose, would be im- 
perative on the Commissioners. . . . Gnu framed^ however^ Parliament 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 369 

hesitation that men who have that thorough knowledge of 
law which we can, generally speaking, only expect to find 
in able and experienced members of the legal profession, 
should have a large and responsible share in law-making. 
Proposed laws should be drawn up by lawyers, and any 
changes made in the draft should he carefully revised by 
lawyers before they are finally enacted by the Legislature. 
But, for several reasons, it does not seem desirable to entrust 
the substantial work of legislation entirely — or even mainly 
— to them alone. 

Firstly, the deductive operation of applying complicated 
general rules accurately and Mthfully to particular cases is 
very different from the inductive operation of collecting, 
comparing, estimating, the good and bad consequences of 
actual laws, and considering the consequences of proposed 
or possible measurea In either case, a knowledge of law, 
as it is, is required : but the use made of the knowledge, 
the habit of mind that it generates, the special points need- 
ful to be observed, the special difSculties that have to be 
faced and overcome, are obviously different in the two cases. 
Persons, therefore, may be highly skilled by natiire and 

should haw no power to alter the measure, but only to pass or reject it ; or, 
if partially disapproved of, remit it to the Ck>inmission for reconsideratioxL*' 

The plan, I think, has much to reconmiend it ; but the alteration of pro- 
cedure proposed in the sentence that I have italicisedappears to me certainly too 
drastic, and likely to involve a dangerous division of legislative responsibility. 
But, assuming the powers of Parliament to remain unaltered, I think much 
might be gained by the appointment of a body of legal experts, having the 
function of pointing out inconsistencies or ambiguities or other formal de- 
fects in new statutes before they were finally enacted ; and also of drawing 
attention to any probable legal consequences of the new provisions that may 
appear to be not designed, or imperfectly conceived, by the enacting body. 
I think that the suggestions of such a commission would be largely accepted 
by the legislature ; and considerable formal improvement in current legis- 
lation might be hoped to result. 

The need of such improvement in English legislation appears to remain 
as urgent as it was when Mill's book was published, — if I may judge from 
the repeated utterances of experts. While I write (26th March 1896) the 
Times brings a report of a speech of the Lord Chief Justice of England, 
which contains the following sentence : '*It was a lamentable fact that a 
large part of the time of the judges was spent in trying to make sense of Acts 
of Parliam^ent,'* 

2b 



370 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

practice for the application of law, which is the habitual 
intellectual work of the judge and of the advocate who has to 
convince him, without being qualified for the Toodification 
of law which is the proper work of the legislator. Again, 
in the judicial administration of law, it is most needful 
that the judge should have a scrupulous respect for the law 
that has actually been laid down : that he should resist not 
only the coarser temptation of warping it under the in- 
fluence of bribery, intimidation, party feeling, or personal 
affection, but also the subtler temptation to twist it in the 
direction of equity and utility ; ^ since, as each judge would 
be likely to twist it somewhat differently, the certainty of 
law, which is more important than any increase of equity 
that could be obtained in this way, would be lost : more- 
over, if this well-meant warping of rules were aUowed, it 
would be indefinitely more difScult to resist the influence 
of sinister interests. But this scrupulous reverence for 
existing law, though a needful habit of mind, is likely to 
prevent the heads of the legal profession from being un- 
biassed judges of proposed improvements in law ; especially 
as such improvements are likely to render a certain amount 
of their painfully gained knowledge and elaborately con- 
trived methods useless, and to impose on them the necessity 
of learning new rules and new methods. We need not 
suppose this last consideration consciously to operate as a 
motive, it is sufficient if it gives an unconscious bias. 

Hence, however desirable it may be to give to leading 
lawyers a large and responsible share in the work of con- 
structing laws, they are commonly more qualified to be 
hwUders than architects in this work* The ideal legislator 

^ When an established rule of law is found to be ambiguous or indefinite, 
considerations of equity or utility may reasonably influence a judge in apply- 
ing it ; but not so far as it is clear, even if it clearly needs change. 

' It may be added that, as in modem states the branches of law in which 
ordinary legal practice lies, have reached, for the most part, a tolerably 
stable condition, the bulk of new legislation relates to matters which come 
but little in the way of an ordinary practitioner. The advantage of his 
special training comes more often through the habit it gives of exactly 
estimating the force of expressions ; i.e. it bears on the form more than on 
the matter of legislation. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 371 

ought to know law as well as the lawyer, but he ought to 
know much more than law. He must have an insight, as 
I have said, into the actual relation of the laws to the 
social life of the community regulated; the manner in 
which they modify the conduct of the individuals whom 
they affect ; the consequences, proximate and remote, that 
are likely to result from any change in them. To obtain 
this insight he ought to have such an acquaintance with 
particular facts as it is difScult to obtain otherwise than 
from actual experience, or at least intimate converse with 
men of experience: and he ought also to possess such 
knowledge as is obtainable of the general tendencies of 
social development and the effects of different social causes. 
Taking men as they are, we shall hardly expect to find many 
whose knowledge qualifies them for dealing in a statesman- 
like manner with all the problems presented to a modern 
legislative body : if so, it becomes important in constructing 
our legislative organ to aim at including an adequate selec- 
tion of persons who, with general ability, combine special 
experience in different departments of social life. This, 
then, is one argument for the representative system, as now 
applied in most countries that share West European civil- 
isation ; that the periodical election of legislators by differ- 
ent divisions, sufficiently numerous, of the commimity, 
tends to give us, if not ideal statesmen, at any rate a body 
of men who possess in the aggregate the special empirical 
knowledge that is most indispensable. 

But this is not the sole argument for making an 
assembly thus chosen a main part of the legislative organ : 
nor is it generally thought to be the most important argu- 
ment. It seems even more needful to secure in legislators 
a keen coticern for the interests of the various elements of 
the commimity for which they legislate: and this seems 
likely to be attained by the system of popular election for 
a limited time, more effectually than by any other mode of 
appointing a legislative council or assembly. For, provided 
that the post of legislator is made adequately desirable, 
either by the remimeration or the power and social dignity 



372 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

attached to it, the desire of re-election will make it the 
interest of the legislator to promote at least the recognised 
interests of his constituents. 

Here I may point out the fundamental affinity between 
the main principle of the civil code, as constructed on the 
basis of individualism, and the principle of governmental 
construction just laid down. We have before seen that 
legislation (and other governmental interference), in modern 
civilised societies, is mainly based on the principle that the 
interests of the sane adult members of the community will 
be best promoted if they are left to provide for themselves ; 
owing to the combination of better knowledge with greater 
concern for their own interest, which may on the average 
be attributed to them. It is for a similar reason that, so 
far as legislative interference is required, an assembly chosen 
for a limited time by the people at large is held likely to 
know what the people at large want, better than any council 
or assembly otherwise appointed, and to be more concerned 
to provide it. 

What has just been said of laws applies with especial 
force to the rules under which taxation is levied. Such 
compulsory taking of private property for public purposes 
is a part of governmental interference which governments 
not adequately controlled are specially tempted to overdo : 
and it is a procedure of which the excess is specially for- 
midable to the governed. As we have seen, the liability 
to be deprived of an unknown portion of one's wealth by 
the tax-gatherer is an insecurity against which it is impos- 
sible to give complete constitutional protection to the 
individuals governed; but the insecurity is importantly 
reduced if the body that regulates taxation is periodically 
elected by the community at large and is thus effectively 
responsible to them. 

But there is another argument of weight for appointing 
legislators by popular election — which, again, resembles a 
reason previously noted for strictly limiting the " paternal " 
interference of government ^ — viz. that even if such election 

^ Cf. wnU^ p. 132. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 373 

does not lead to a more vnisely constructed system of laws 
than any other mode of appointment, it tends to render the 
legislation more acceptable to the governed ; and therefore 
less likely to be evaded, or, if obeyed, to cause friction and 
discontent. Just as an individual is more likely to con- 
form to the rules of a physician whom he has chosen than 
of one chosen for him, so a people will be less liable to be 
recalcitrant against laws made by a popularly elected body. 
Indeed the historic and current name for such a body — a 
House or Chamber of " Eepresentatives "-^suggests that 
laws made by it will be commonly felt to have been practi- 
caUy made by the people "represented," and so to have 
popular weight behind them. 

The argument just mentioned, however, might be used 
to support a different conclusion : it might be urged that if 
our aim is to have laws m^de as completely as possible in 
accordance with the wishes of the majority of those who 
have to obey them, there is no need of the intervention of 
representatives : it will be simpler and better to give the 
decision on legislative proposals to the people themselves. 
And, in fact, there seem to be strong reasons — which I 
shall discuss in a subsequent chapter ^ — for adopting this 
plan to a limited extent under certain conditions: but 
there is a decisive objection against giving the main work 
of legislation to the citizens at large : viz. that they lack 
the requisite knowledge and trained facultiea L^islation 
is a difficult art, the mastery of which requires such an 
expenditure of time and energy as the citizens at large — 
even if otherwise qualified — cannot ordinarily afford. It 
may be said that this deficiency must equally prevent them 
from choosing competent legislators ; since if one does not 
know whether a law is good or bad, one cannot tell whether 
the law-maker is competent or incompetent. I shall here- 
after consider the exact force of this objection to the repre- 
sentative system, and the best way of minimising it : for 
our present purpose it seems sufficient to reply that, in the 
division of labour which civilisation has brought, ordinary 

^ Chap, xzvii. 



374 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

members of a commimity organised on an individualistic 
basis have continually to choose experts for skilled work of 
which the chooser does not imderstand the methods : and 
the result is commonly accepted as tolerably satisfactory. 
Thus — to revert to a comparison already made — most men 
value highly the control that they acquire, by the free 
choice of their physician, over the operation of applying 
drugs to the cure of their diseases; though they know 
themselves to be wholly unable to prescribe medicines for 
themselvea We cannot exactly imitate this in the case of 
government, owing to the necessity of giving Grovemment 
coercive power over all persons living within the territory 
governed ; but we imitate it as far as we can by giving the 
individuals coerced a share in the appointment of the 
supreme organ of legislation. 

§ 2. The reasons above given for constituting a repre- 
sentative assembly as the whole or chief part of the organ 
of legislation are those that have usually been most promi- 
nently put forward by its advocate& But some writers ^ of 
repute appear to attach still more importance to what I 
may call the edtu^ative effect of representative or popular 
government. The alleged educative advantages are partly 
intellectual — the training given by participation in the 
management of public affairs ; partly moral — the "invigorat- 
ing effect of freedom on the character," in developing 
patriotism and public spirit, self-reliance and energetic self- 
help. As regards the first kind of advantage, this argimient, 
if valid at all, seems to make more strongly for the direct 
participation of the people in legislation than for representa- 
tive government ; since the mere choice of a legislator is not 
likely to exercise and train the intellect so effectively as the 
effort to estimate the groimds for and against any proposed 
law. Still, in proportion as choice implies supervision and 
criticism of the legislator's work, the argimient may be used 
in favour of either form of popular government. But in 
neither case does it seem to be a strong reason for giving 
legislative functions — either directly or indirectly — to 

' e.g, J. S. Mill, JtepresenUUive Ooverrvmmt, chap. iii. 



% 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 375 

persons whose minds are as yet incompetent to perform the 
intellectual processes required for coming to rational con- 
clusions on the questions with which a modern legislature 
has to deal There are, I fear, but slender groimds for 
thinking that such persons will receive valuable intellectual 
training through mere experience of the effects of their 
decisions; since it requires a certain grasp of the right 
method of dealing with any class of problems to be able to 
derive instruction from one's mistakes: and the political 
blunderer can generally, without manifest absurdity, attribute 
the bad consequences of his blunders to circumstances in- 
capable of being foreseen, or to the perversity and stupidity 
of other men.^ 

The consideration of the moral advantages of "free" 
government requires us again to note the confusion which 
the common use of the word " Freedom " is apt to cause.^ 
When a writer speaks of " Free *' institutions he sometimes 
means to imply that the government leaves the individual 
alone to look after his own affairs; sometimes that the 
private members of the community collectively exercise an 
effective control over the government : sometimes he seems 
to imply both together, apparently assmning a necessary 
connection between the two facts, which we may conveniently 
distinguish as "civil" and "constitutional" freedom re- 
spectively. But there is no certainty that a representative 
legislature, chosen by universal suffrage, will not interfere 
with the free action of individuals more than an absolute 
monarch would: the essential difference is merely, that 
under absolute monarchy a majority of sane adults may be 
forced to submit to laws that they permanently dislike, 

^ It would be satisfactory to feel confident, with Story {dmstUtUion of the 
United StcUes, Book III. chap. iz. § 575), that the representative system, by 
awakening " a desire to examine and sift and debate all public proceedings," 
must tend to "gradually furnish the mind " — of the mass of the electorate — 
** with safe and solid materials for judgment upon all public affairs ; " but I 
know no adequate grounds for this optimistic conclusion. As I shall here- 
after argue (xxv. § 1) the educative effect of popular control over government 
appears to depend largely on the adequate development of local organs of 
government. 

^ Cf. ante, chap. iv. § 1. 



376 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

whereas if a popularly elected assembly is supreme in legisla- 
tion, this coercion can only be applied to a minority. To 
this extent constitutional freedom affords a security for civil 
freedom ; but a priori reasoning and experience combine to 
show that there is no further necessary connection between 
the twa For instance, I understand that Grovernment does 
nothing to prevent a man from getting as drunk as he likes 
in Bussia: whereas the vigorous democracy of North America 
has established in several States severely restrictive liquor- 
law&^ 

Distinguishing, then, between constitutional and civil 
freedom, I think we may fairly infer, from our general 
knowledge of human nature, that the possession of the 
former will tend to develop patriotism and public spirit. 
Men who have a share in the control of public business are 
more likely to feel that it is their own business, and to 
exert themselves, and make sacrifices when required, to 
promote the welfare of the State. But there is no similar 
reason why constitutional freedom should make individuals 
more self-reliant and self- helpful in the management of 
their private affairs : it would be paradoxical to maintain 
that the proper method of rousing persons to energetic effort 
in the promotion of their private interests is to require them 
to attend to public interests, and to hold out to them the 
hope of persuading or compelling Government to improve 
their circumstancea Perhaps we may say that while active, 
self-helpful, self-reliant peoples are most likely to have some 
system of popular control over their government in effective 
working, it is rather true, that a people of this character 
will want such a control and will agitate till they get it, 
than that the exercise of the franchise will tend to give 

^ I may observe that the confusion of thought which hangs about the 
notion ''freedom" becomes still worse confounded in the case of the term 
** liberal," by blending with the notion of '* liberality " in the sense in which 
it is opposed to ** meanness : " so that the term ** liberal " comes to be applied 
not only to measures which secure to individuals civil freedom, or extend 
popular control over government, but also to measures which spend public 
money without stint. Both these confusions are effectively exposed in Mr. 
Bruce Smith's Liberty and Liberalism (1887). 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 377 

them these qualitie& In any case, when a nation of this 
kind has once obtained the influence over legislation, which 
is given by the establishment of a representative legislature, 
it is likely to be very diflBcult to bring it into a condition 
of permanent general contentment with any legislature that 
has no popular element : — at least until it has had prolonged 
and bitter experience of the disasters arising from popular 
government What we have practically to consider in 
laying down principles of governmental construction for such 
a nation is not whether it is to have a representative assembly 
as a main part of the legislative organ, but in what way the 
deflciencies of such an assembly may best be remedied or 
minimised. 

To sum up, I accept the general practical conclusion — 
widely regarded as the most fundamental principle of modem 
constitutions — ^that the persons who compose the legislative 
organ should be appointed, wholly or to a great extent, by 
popular election. But I do not accept it on the ground of 
any supposed " natural right " of each individual to refuse 
submission to laws to which he has not " consented personally 
or through his representatives " ; but for reasons analogous 
to, though not identical with, those which led us to the 
adoption of Individualism as the main principle for deter- 
mining the proper functions of government. I therefore 
accept it not as an absolute principle of constitutional equity, 
but merely as a rule based on generalisations with regard to 
human nature which I do not maintain to be universally 
true, and the force of which may be outweighed by other 
considerations. It still remains open to argument whether 
the whole, or an important part, of a given community is 
not in such an intellectual and moral condition that its 
interests will be better promoted by a legislature over which 
it has no control than by one which it is allowed to elect. 
All that can be fietirly contended on the general grounds here 
taken is that the burden of proof should be distinctly laid 
on those who wish to withhold the security for suitable 
legislation that such control affords. 

Further, if — ^in accordance with usage — we speak of the 



378 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

principle thus defined as that of " Representative " ^ Grovem- 
ment, it should be borne in mind that we do not adopt the 
method of popular election, in the view that the elected 
legislators will or ought to vote as on any particular question 
the persons electing them would vote ; but in the view that 
the persons so chosen will be more likely to promote the 
real interests of the community — which are the interests of 
an aggregate of individuals, now existing or to exist hereafter 
— than persons otherwise appointed. 

Taking this view, let us try to determine in accordance 
with the principle thus defined the chief questions that 
arise when we attempt to work out in detail this mode of 
appointing legislators. 

§ 3. The first question is, who is to choose ? Is the 
electorate to be coextensive with the adult portion of the 
community, or, if not, what classes are to be excluded, and 
on what groimds ? 

It is obvious that the general arguments for a repre- 
sentative legislature lead primd facie to the inclusion of all 
sane adults : if any class is deprived of representation, the 
advantages aimed at in the institution are lost so far as 
this class is concerned. Indeed, there may be even more 
danger that the special needs of such a class will be neglected 
and its special interests sacrificed, by a legislature represent- 
ing other classes exclusively, than there would be under a 
despotism ; since a despot has less motive than an assembly 
representing only a portion of the community for dividing un- 
equally any natural concern that he may feel for the inter- 
ests of those whom he govema This is the fundamental 
objection to any attempt to improve thequalityof a representa- 
tive legislature by restricting what is called the " suffrage," 
" franchise," or " active " electoral privilege — i,e, the right of 
voting, as distinct from the right of being voted for. A further 
objection lies in the sense of injustice that such an excluded 
class is likely to feel in consequence of its unequal treatment. 

^ In some respects the tenn "Responsible Government" would be more 
appropriate ; except that it does not clearly indicate to whom the government 
80 designated is to be responsible. 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 379 

Still these objections are not decisive, from a utilitarian 
point of view : in particular they may be repelled or out- 
weighed by special proof, either (1) that the class in question 
will not suffer by exclusion because its interests will be 
adequately cared for by the representatives of those included,^ 
or (2) that it is likely to make a dangerously bad use of the 
vote. The first of these arguments may be fairly used in 
support of exclusion on the score of youth and inexperience : 
since the natural concern of fathers for sons will suffice to 
prevent any material danger that the class thus excluded 
will suffer through a sacrifice of their interests to the inter- 
ests of other men. A similar argument has some force in the 
case of women, owing to the intimate relations of affection 
that bind them to men : it may be plausibly urged that the 
political interests of wives, daughters, and sisters are safe in 
the hands of husbands, fathers, and brothers. The argument, 
however, is obviously least applicable to the considerable 
minority of adult women — spinsters and widows — who are 
thrown on their own resources for a livelihood:^ and it 
is not supported, even in the case of wives, by the practice 
of the wealthier classes in framing marriage-settlements, 
since elaborate care is usually taken to protect the pecimiary 
interests of the wife against the misconduct of her husband. 
I do not know any other numerically important class of 
sane self-supporting adults in whose case the argmnent — 
so far as it is used to justify permanent exclusion — is even 
plausible in a modem state. 

The second argument — that the excluded class will make 
a dangerously bad use of the vote — is therefore the more 
important ; and it seems worth while to examine in detail 

^ It is to be observed that this argument only neutralises a part of the 
grounds for universalising the suffrage ; it does not affect the " educational " 
grounds. 

^ It is sometimes urged that women who are thrown on their oMm resources 
do not form a distinct economic and social class, like landlords or artisans ; 
so that their interests may be adequately represented by men of the same 
class. But we cannot assume either (1) that women are not more fit for some 
lucrative occupations than for others, supposing all to be equally open to 
them, or (2) that they are not in danger of being excluded from some lucrative 
occupations, in the interests of men. 



38o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the different species of such misuse that are chiefly 
dangerous. 

Firstly, this bad use may be (a) morally perverted, or (6) 
merely intellectually mistaken. Of the former misuse the 
three chief kinds are caused respectively by intimidation/ 
bribery, and immoral demagogy. The patriotic voter will 
obviously vote for the candidate whom he regards as most 
competent to promote the wellbeing of the community by 
legislation ; but it is in accordance with the general prin- 
ciple on which representative government is based, that in 
estimating the candidate's competence he should have 
particular regard for the special political interests of the 
section of the community to (which he belongs, and aim 
especially at securing an intelligent concern for these: — 
though he ought, of course, not to desire that these special 
interests should be promoted at the expense of justice and 
the common good. Now, if the elector is in such a position 
that a candidate or his friends may seriously injure him 
without open illegality, and without material sacrifice to 
themselves, there is an obvious danger that his private 
interest may be artificially weighted, — e.g, by fear of dis- 
missal, loss of custom, exclusion from employment, etc. — so 
as to induce him to vote for a candidate whom he does not 
really trust as a protector of his political interests. In this 
case the vote is perverted by intimidation.^ 

Again, if the elector is poor, his concern for his political 
interests may be similarly outweighed by a bribe which the 
candidate or his friends may afford without material sacri- 
fice. This, of course, is all the more probable in proportion 
as the elector is unenlightened as to his real political 

^ By ''intimidation " is here speciaUy meant the threatening of conduct 
that would be in itself legal, apart from its aim of influencing the vote of 
the person threatened. See chap. iv. § 4, pp. 59, 60. 

' The effects of intimidation by rich and powerful individuals must be 
distinguished from the effects of what Bagehot has called the '' habitual 
deference" which sometimes leads persons of humble social position to 
vote in accordance with the judgment of those above them in station: since 
this sincere deference to the opinion of the rich and powerful, though it may 
be mistaken, is not demoralising. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 381 

interests : still, it cannot be said that the danger of bribery 
proceeds entirely &oni want of enlightenment; since it 
may easily be that the probable difference, as affecting his 
private interests, between the kinds of legislation offered by 
competing political parties ought reasonably to be valued at 
less than the sum of money which the candidate is willing to 
offer. But the object of giving him a vote is not simply to 
secure his private interests, but to secure the presence in the 
legislative organ of the varied knowledge and intelligent 
concern for all sections of the community that is necessary 
for good legislation : and this aim is defeated so far as the 
elector yields to bribery. 

It is, however, a still worse form of bribery if the 
candidate tempts the elector with promises to further his 
political interests by legislation which both know to be 
contrary to the general good : since against the candidate 
who merely bribes pecuniarily we have only a certain general 
presimiption that he is not likely to be a good legislator, but 
a candidate who bribes by promising mischievous measures 
has definitely pledged himself to be a bad one. This third 
perversion of the vote I call immoral demagogy. 

It is to be observed, however, that even where the 
demagogue is dishonest, the elector may be honest but 
mistaken : he may believe that the legislation promised him 
is just and conducive to the common good, and may vote 
legitimately according to his lights. Or, again, the dema- 
gogue who is promising to further the sinister interests of a 
class may himself be honest but mistaken : he may be a 
charlatan who genuinely believes himself to be a statesman. 
The danger that under a widely-extended suf&age the ulti- 
mate interest of the community may be sacrificed to the 
real or merely apparent interests of the nimierical majority 
may occur through any of these modes of demagogy ; and 
in a community not radically demoralised the danger from 
the two latter modes is likely to be greater than from 
immoral demagogy recognised as such. 

Now intimidation — when the conduct feared is of a 
kind that cannot be treated as illegitimate apart from 



382 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

evidence of its motive — is very difficult to put down by 
legal penalties, as the fear may easily be produced without 
express threats. It may, however, be partly prevented by 
the secrecy of the ballot ; and the importance of prevent- 
ing it is, in my opinion, a decisive argument for secret 
voting in spite of the strong objections that may be urged 
against ii} Still, even this prevention cannot be made 
complete, since in many cases the way in which an elector 
has voted may be inferred, with a high degree of probability, 
from his own words and actions or those of others ; and if 
there is a strong probability that a particular class will 
vote in a particular way, such a class, when in a small 
minority, are liable to incur private risks by merely ventur- 
ing to go to the ballot-box. Bribery, again, may — ^more 
easily than intimidation — be partly put down by penalties : 
but the difficulty of legally preventing an exchange into 
which both parties are desirous to enter is shown by ex- 
perience to be very great in private transactions, and it is 
therefore likely that the purchase of votes will always go 
on to some extent, at least until a considerable improve- 
ment has taken place in public morality. Nor is it 
probable that any efforts to disseminate truth and sound 
reasoning are likely to put down demagogy altogether. 
Hence it must be recognised as possible that on these 
grounds the disadvantages of giving the suflfirage to poor, 
dependent, and ignorant persons may outweigh the dis- 
advantages of excluding them. Whether this is likely 
to be the case at any particular time and place it does not 
belong to general theory to decida The decision will 
partly depend on a consideration which I have not yet 
taken into accoimt — the intensity of the desire to exercise 
the franchise felt by the excluded class. For where this 
desire is weak, not only is the risk from exclusion less, 
since this cannot cause much discontent; but the risk 
from inclusion is greater, since persons who have no genuine 
consciousness of political interests needing defence lack the 
normal motives to legitimate voting, and are therefore more 

^ See, for instance, Mil], ReprtitniaJLiw Oovemmentf chap. x. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 383 

in danger of perversion. If their political interests are not 
actually suffering from their exclusion, the most pressing 
reason for giving them a vote vanishes : if their interests 
are suffering, and it is only the consciousness of their need 
that is wanting, it is a case for agitation rather than 
immediate enfranchisement. 

§ 4. On the whole it would seem that the permanent 
exclusion of any class of sane self-supporting adults, on 
account of poverty alone, from the share of the control over 
legislation which the representative system aims at giving 
to the citizens at large, is not easily defensible in face of a 
strong and steady demand for their admission. It is less 
difficult to maintain such an exclusion in the case of avoid- 
able ignorance of an extreme kind : i,t, to refuse the suffrage 
to' persons who have not attained a certain educational 
standard, provided that facilities for education are within 
the reach of all classes. Various other exclusions are 
permanently defensible on different grounds. Thus it 
seems reasonable to withhold the suffrage — ^partly as a 
deterrent, partly as a security against its perversion — from 
persons who have committed grave offences of any kind; 
also from all who have been convicted of buying or seUing 
votes, or intimidating electors. In some cases, disgraceful 
conduct not amounting to crime seems a sufficient ground 
for exclusion — e,g, the keeping of a brothel, where this is 
tolerated. It also seems reasonable to disfranchise tempor- 
arily persons who without crime have so far failed to maintain 
their economic independence as to receive support as paupers 
from public funds ; ^ on the ground that their use of the 
vote as a protection of their political interests is specially 
unlikely to be advantageous to the public. Other tem- 
porary exclusions appear to be desirable for reasons that 
involve no sort of discredit. Thus, as we have seen, the 
ordinary objections to electoral restrictions do not apply in 

' As before said, I should include, along with paupers, bankrupts who 
have not paid their creditors in full ; since they have equally failed to main- 
tain their economic independence, and disfranchisement, as a permanent 
mark of this failure, is useful as a deterrent from reckless borrowing, while 
it does not impair the bankrupt's industrial efficiency. 



384 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the case of exclusion on the ground of youth and inex- 
perience ; and it seems reasonable to impose, as a condition 
of the suffrage, an inferior limit of age somewhat higher 
than that of ordinary legal maturity ; so that a man may 
not have a share in the control of public affairs until after 
some years of the experience gained by the independent 
management of his own affairs. Again, when we examine 
the possibilities of bringing the motive of private interest 
into illicit operation in political elections, we are led to 
distinguish a special class of persons in whose case this 
operation cannot effectually be excluded, except by a partial 
withdrawal of the right of voting. I mean persons em- 
ployed by candidates or their friends for the work of an 
election: it is difficult to prevent the remuneration for 
such employment from practically operating like a bribe, 
if the employees are allowed to vote in the same election. 
A similar danger exists in some measure in the case of 
permanent employment, private or governmental : but not 
such as to justify a sweeping disfranchisement of employees, 
provided that the independence of the latter is tolerably 
secured by the protection of the ballot or otherwise. There 
is, however, a special ground for excluding from the exercise 
of the suffrage such employees of government as are charged 
wth the function of physical coercion — policemen or 
soldiers on service — on the score of the peculiar importance 
of keeping them impartial in political conflicts.^ 

Questions of wider importance are raised by exclusions 
on the ground of sex or race. I see no adequate reason for 

^ If the oommunity is divided locally for electoral purpoees, the with- 
drawal of the vote from soldiers is further desirable, in order to prevent the 
disturbance of this plan of division — and the possible manipulation of the 
army for electoral purposes — which would be liable to result from giving 
soldiers votes in the districts in which they were quartered. 

It is to be observed that the withdrawal of the exercise of the suffrage 
from soldiers on service is less likely to be felt as a grievance, as any portion 
of the army that is abroad must be practically excluded from voting. 

It may be added that soldiers on service are expressly excluded from the 
exercise of the franchise in France, Germany, and Italy. In England a 
result in the main similar is caused by the fact that the residence of a 
private soldier in a barrack is insufficient to give him a vote as a lodger. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 385 

refusing the franchise to any sane self-supporting adult 
otherwise eligible, on the score of her sex alone ; and there 
is a danger of material injustice resulting from such refusal, 
so long as the State leaves unmarried women and widows 
to struggle for a livelihood in the general industrial com- 
petition, without any special privileges or protection. The 
most important consideration on the other side is the in- 
feriority of women in physical force and their unfitness for 
warfare. This may be used as an argument in two ways : 
it may be considered (1) that the franchise belongs as a 
right to those who will defend their country when attacked ; 
or (2) that there is danger in allotting the franchise so 
that the preponderance of electoral power may diverge 
markedly from the preponderance of physical force, since 
this divergence may tempt a minority defeated at the polls 
to refuse obedience to the legislature. The two arguments 
are fundamentally distinct, as the first appeals to principles 
of Bight, the second forecasts an appeal to Might. Accord- 
ingly the second argument will be more appropriately 
considered later, when I come to treat of the sanctions of 
political order.^ Here I will only remark that — admitting 
the danger it signalises— the principle of governmental con- 
struction to which it points would, if thoroughly carried 
out, lead to very novel and startling results: since the 
manifest superiority of trained soldiers in physical conflict 
would have to be admitted as constituting a claim for 
electoral power out of proportion to their numbers ; whereas 
the contrary is the case in the leading West-European States, 
where soldiers on service are cwtually excluded from the 
exercise of the franchise. 

The first argument, which claims the franchise for men 
exclusively, as a compensation for onerous public duties 
imposed solely on the male sex, requires different treat- 
ment. It seems, however, to have obviously little force 
in an orderly modern state in which military service is 
ordinarily voluntary ; since, in such a community, men who 
are not soldiers or policemen are so rarely called upon 

^ Bee ohap. zzzi. 8§ 7, 8. 

2c 



386 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

to exercise physical force, that the indefinite duty of 
fighting if required can surely weigh little as compiired 
with the duty of paying taxes, which is laid on both sexes 
alike. The case no doubt is somewhat different in a state 
in which the dangers of war are so pressing as to necessitate 
compulsory military service : here no doubt there is a sub- 
stantial burden imposed on the male sex from which w^omen 
are free. But I know no principle on which it could be 
atgued with any show of reason that a monopoly of the 
franchise is the proper compensation for this peculiar 
masculine burden ; — since no one would gravely urge the 
danger that women, not having to fight, may support by 
their votes a war to which the majority of men are adverse. 
Apart from this chimerical danger, the kind of compensation 
which the masculine burden of military service seems primd 
facie to demand is rather something which would balance 
the economic disadvantage at which this burden might be 
supposed to place men in industrial competition with 
women. But when the question is regarded from this 
point of view it becomes evident that the superior physical 
force possessed on the average by men — which is the reason 
why military service is imposed on them — constitutes a 
natural advantage in industrial competition, in comparison 
with which the burden that we are now considering seems 
insignificant. 

So far we have been considering the case of women who 
are not economically protected by marriage. The argu- 
ments for extending the' franchise to wives appear to me 
less strong, and the objections more serious. I admit a 
certain general presimiption that any legislation in which 
the two sexes are treated differently will, so far as controlled 
by an electorate in which men largely preponderate, tend 
to postpone the interests of women unduly; and will be 
especially liable to be unfair to wives as such, if they are 
excluded from the franchise. On the other hand, if a 
husband is not abnormally wanting in domestic affection 
and the sense of domestic duty, the interests of his wife, at 
any rate in her relations to persons outside the family, are 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 387 

tolerably safe in his hands : while, if he is so wanting, he 
is likely to have little scruple in exercising on her a kind 
of intimidation which law is powerless to prevent. And 
even apart from intimidation, a wife's vote is likely to be 
biassed by the desire of domestic harmony, prompting her 
to avoid open political disagreement with her husband. 
Moreover, according to the necessary or customary division 
of labour between husbands and wives, the experience of 
the latter will, generally speaking, be of less value as a 
preparation for the wise exercise of the franchise : while at 
the same time this division of labour leads to a reduction in 
the number of men exercising the franchise — through the 
formal or practical exclusion of soldiers, sailors, etc. — which 
must tend to throw an inexpedient preponderance of electoral 
control into the hands of women, if wives generally are 
admitted to vote.^ 

Exclusion on the ground of race alone may be expedient 
if the general intellectual or moral inferiority of the race 
excluded is sufficiently clear. But a political society in 
which such exclusion is an important question, will be 
necessarily different from that which has been generally 
contemplated in the discussions of the present treatise, and 
will be likely to require different laws in other matters 
besides the franchise. 

The exclusions that we have been considering bring 
strongly before us the different meanings which may be 
attached to the word " citizen." In its widest sense it is 
simply opposed to " alien," and would include all members 
of a State in which slavery is not allowed : but in States 
in which the government or an important part of it is 
elected by a widely extended suffrage, it is not imcommon 
to mean by the " citizens " only those who have a right to 
vote in such elections — leaving out of sight the usually 
larger part of the community that hfis not this right The 
word " people " is also used in the same restricted sense by 

^ I may add that the danger, before noted, of an appeal to physical force 
on the part of a preponderantly male minority, seems to me only to become 
serious in the case of the extension of the franchise to wives. 



388 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

those who speak of "government by the people." It is 
convenient to use both terms in this signification, and I 
shall allow myself to do so without further explanation 
where the context excludes ambiguity; when there is a 
tianger of ambiguity, I shall speak of " electors " and 
" electorate." 

So far we have considered compulsory exclusions from 
the exercise of electoral rights : it remains to eisk whether 
voluntary abstention should be allowed, or whether every 
elector should be constrained to vote under penalties. Such 
constraint has often been proposed ; but I think it imadvis- 
able, for the following reasons : — (1) If the elector is really 
intimidated, and abstains from fear of giving oflfence, com- 
pulsory voting may simply aggravate the evil: what is 
needed is, if possible, to remove his alarms. (2) Ordinarily, 
in collective decisions, neutrality of individuals is allowed : 
it seems unreasonable to prevent it in electoral contests; 
and useless to drive a man to the poll to give a blank vote. 

(3) So far as abstinence is due to lack of public spirit, it is 
no doubt an evil, but an evil to be combated by moral 
censure and suasion rather than by legal penalties. For 
coercion will not generate public spirit, or secure that the 
coerced vote is given from right motives and after due 
consideration; and, just as the development of genuine 
public spirit in a community or class is the best protection 
against a misuse of the franchise, so by forcing persons 
devoid of it to vote we increase the danger of such misuse. 

(4) One of the reasons for extending the franchise is to 
prevent grave discontent with legislation or government: 
but the risk from the discontent of voluntary non-voters is 
hardly likely to be serious, as they will surely try what 
can be done by voting before they proceed to sedition ; 
they are more likely to be discontented if they are com- 
pelled to vote, as all coercion annoya 

§ 5. We have seen that any restriction of the suffrage 
involves a primd facie danger that the interests of the 
unenfranchised class will be sacrificed to the interests of the 
enfranchised. In pointing this out, I did not mean to 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 389 

imply that good legislation is a kind of bargain struck 
between conflicting class-interests ; it is the interest of the 
whole, which includes justice to all the parts, at which the 
statesman should aim: and justice, as Mill says, consists 
in giving a man not the half of what he asks, but the 
whole of what he ought to have. But good legislation is a 
result more likely to be attained in a representative assembly 
in which such class-interests are fairly balanced, as each class 
is more open to sound reason and impartial consideration of 
the common good where the interests of others are concerned. 
For this reason, as we have seen, a widely-extended suffrage 
involves a danger of a different kind : viz. that the ultimate 
interests of the whole commimity may be sacrificed to the 
real or apparent class-interests of the numerical majority of 
the electors, either through ignorance or through selfishness 
and limitation of sympathy.^ Nor is it easy adequately to 
meet this danger by any such exclusion from the franchise, 
on the score of poverty and ignorance, 6ts appears to be 
permanently defensibla But it may be more or less 
effectively met by giving the wealthier and more educated 
classes a representation in the legislature out of proportion to 
their numbers. There are several different methods of effect- 
ing this. The plan which — largely for historical reasons — 
has been most widely adopted in West-European states, is 
to divide the legislature into two Chambers, and give wealth 
and political intelligence a preponderance in the " Upper " 
Chamber, leaving the other to be elected by the citizens at 
large on the basis of electoral equality. This plan will 
be discussed in a separate chapter (xxiiL). Assuming for 
the present that laws are enacted by a single representative 
assembly, there are still various ways of aiming at the 
desired end;^ but it may be most simply and effectively 
attained either (1) by dividing the community into classes, 

^ I leave it doubtful whether this effect is due to moral or intellectual 
causes ; because it does not seem to me legitimate to assume a complete and 
universal coincidence between the real interests of all classes and sections of 
the community, and the real ultimate interests of the whole community. 

^ Two other methods, (1) limitation of eligibility, and (2) election in two 
or more stages, will be noticed later. 



390 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

according to the amount of their income or presumable 
intelligence, or both combined, and allotting to the higher 
classes a larger proportional number of representatives than 
to the lower ; or (2) by giving more than one vote apiece to 
the wealthier and more intelligent electors. The second of 
these methods is called " Plural voting " ; but both together 
may conveniently be spoken of as " Weighted voting." 

In discussing the advantages and drawbacks of either 
plan of electoral inequality, it is best to separate the con- 
siderations of wealth and intelligence ; which — as they tend 
to be combined in any practical scheme — I have so far put 
together. The argimient for weighting the votes of the 
rich is that, man for man, the rich have more important 
interests to defend than the poor. In considering this 
argmnent, it is important to observe that it is not the larger 
private interests of rich men that can justify the special 
protection given by a larger share of electoral power, but 
the social interests that are normally bound up with them 
and indirectly defended in defending the private interests.^ 
E,g, to throw the whole burden of taxation on accumulated 
wealth is not objectionable because it would reduce the 
incomes of the persons taxed, but because by checking the 
impulse to accumulate wealth it would ultimately diminish 
the aid rendered by capital to industry. So again, excessive 
interference, in the interest of labour, with the management 
of industrial capital is objectionable not because it reduces 
the profits of individuals, but because it needlessly diminishes 
the inducements to invest capital in England. The em- 
ployer or manager of capital has normally far fuller know- 
ledge than his employees, of the conditions favourable and 

^ In itself, the unequal share of wealth enjoyed by any rich individual 
does not call for special protection ; since this inequality in the distribution 
of wealth is pritnd facie not conducive to general happiness. We cannot 
indeed say that every man's happiness is of equal importance as an 
element of the general happiness ; because development of intellect and 
refinement of taste generally imply a capacity for superior pleasures. But 
it is just because this higher kind of happiness is at present enjoyed by few 
that a distribution of wealth much less unequal than the present would be 
undoubtedly desirable if it could be effected without any material diminu- 
tion in the total amount to be distributed. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 391 

unfavourable to the industry that he directs: and in de- 
fending his own interests he will to an important extent 
indirectly defend the economic interests of society as regards 
this branch of industry. 

This leads us to the second ground for inequality, 
superior political knowledge and insight. This undoubtedly 
tends to be possessed on the average by the classes with 
larger incomes ; partly from their more advanced education, 
and the habits of reading and thought thus acquired, partly 
from the exercise of intellect involved in the management 
of property, in the direction of industrial and commercial 
undertakings, and in the work of the " learned " professions 
and other higher forms of skilled labour. Superiority of 
this kind, however, does not universally, or at all imiformly, 
accompany wealth; and may in particular cases be pos- 
sessed by very poor persons ; accordingly, in any system of 
weighted voting formed on this basis, it is important that 
it should be open to the poorest to show themselves entitled 
— by passing examinations or otherwise — to the larger 
share of electoral power allowed to intellectual superiority.^ 

Both these reasons for electoral inequality appear to me 
strong; but the difficulties in the way of a satisfactory 
scheme of weighted voting are very great. In the first 
place, however fully we admit the general considerations 
above stated, any scheme for applying them must neces- 
sarily be to a great extent arbitrary : we have no means of 
determining, with any pretence to exactness, how much 
additional electoral power is due to wealth on account 
of the implication of social with private interests, or 
how much properly corresponds to any available evid- 
ence of probable superiority in political judgment. Hence 
any particular plan of electoral inequality will always pre- 
sent plausible grounds for agitation to modify the standards 
applied: while the interests of classes and parties will 
always supply strong motives for such agitation. Secondly, % 
in considering balance of interests, it must be borne in 
mind that it is impossible to divide society into classes 

^ See Mill, ItepreserUative OovemmerUf chap. viii. 



392 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

which remain identical and equally distinct for all legis- 
lative purposes: as we pass from one proposed law to 
another, we find that the important lines of division are 
continually changing. In England (e.^.) for some purposes 
we have the " agricultural " opposed to the " manufacturing 
interests"; sometimes, again, the conflict of interests is 
between manual labourers generally and their employers, 
sometimes between persons to whom fixed money-payments 
are due and the rest of the community: and no one of 
these oppositions coincides importantly with either of the 
other two. Hence any weighting of the vote of wealth must 
always involve some danger that the private interests of 
the few may prevaU when they are not coincident with 
sodal interests : in which case the weighted vote has not 
only an invidious appearance of aggravating the natural 
inequalities of a modem industrial society by adding arti- 
ficial political inequalities to correspond, but tends to cause 
a real injustice corresponding to this appearance. The 
weighting of votes on the score of superior intelligence is 
hardly less difficult and invidious ; from the impossibility 
of finding any satisfactory criterion of the superiority in 
political knowledge and judgment which constitutes the 
only valid claim to greater electoral power. For, in the 
present state of the political art, such superiority is 
largely derived from personal experience, and reflection on 
such experience : and in any case requires a steady direction 
of thought to political questions, of which, in most cases, a 
satisfactory guarantee is not afforded either by prolonged 
education, or certificates of scholastic attainments, or the 
exercise of professional functions. A thoughtful artisan 
who hfis only had an elementary education may easily have 
more political insight — and even knowledge — than e.g. 
a schoolmaster, physician, or engineer whose intellectual 
energies are absorbed in his special pursuit. 

Further, it must be borne in mind that superior intelli- 
gence, directed to political exposition and persuasion, is 
always likely to have great indirect electoral power by its 
influence on the votes of others: and this is a natural 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 393 

advantage of the educated classes in the struggle of class- 
interests, free from the invidiousness and arbitrariness 
inevitable in any artificial scheme. Similarly, we must 
recognise that, even without a formal advantage in voting 
power, men of wealth are likely always to count practically 
for more than one vote each. We must recognise, as was 
before said, that bribery cannot be completely prevented: 
nor, probably, even intimidation. And even apart from 
bribery, gratitude for services, private or public — and hopes 
of similar services in the future — will always be motives 
operating on the side of wealthy candidates, or candidates 
with wealthy backers. In one way or another, the economic 
power which wealth gives is likely always to be available 
for political ends. 

These considerations somewhat reduce the danger that a 
widely extended suffrage jprimd/acic involves, of legislation 
in which the interests of the rich minority are sacrificed 
to those of the poor majority in a manner disadvantageous 
to the community as a whola Still they do not suffice to 
show the danger to be immaterial ; and it is, I think, likely 
to become more formidable in the future history of Western 
Europe and America than it has been in the past : since 
we have not yet seen the working of a thoroughly organised 
democracy, with a strong urban element, in a crowded 
country with very marked contrasts of wealth and poverty. 
It seems to me preferable, if possible, to meet this danger 
by developing the natural and legitimate influence of 
wealth, when used as a means of performing social services, 
and of intelligence, when directed to political instruction 
and persuasion.^ But if these prove inadequate, it may be 

' Something may, I think, be hoped for from the future progress of 
political and economic science. There is no reason to think that the value 
of political insight is underrated by thoughful persons generally in any 
class, and if the less educated have now a difficulty, in determining where it 
lies, and are liable to take a charlatan for a statesman, it is largely because 
educated opinion is so divided ; — because the "royal art" of government, 
as judged by the criterion of ''consensus of experts," is still in so rudi- 
mentary a condition. If in the future, through the progress of knowledge, 
disinterested students of politics should come to greater agreement, it is 



394 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

expedient, if the conditions of political opinion in any 
country admit of it, to have recourse to the method of arti- 
ficial weighting. If so, the plural vote seems on the whole 
preferable to the plan of division into classes unequally 
represented, as the latter method emphasises somewhat 
more invidiously the class -distinctions which both sub- 
stantially recognise. In any case, if the weighted vote is 
to be efifective, the standard either of wealth or intellectual 
attainment should be low, so that the increased electoral 
power allotted to them may be widely shared, and the in- 
vidiousness of heaping votes on a privileged few may be 
avoided. 

§ 6. I pass to consider how the community is to be 
divided for the purpose of obtaining the various sections 
which are to be separately represented in the legislative 
assembly — ^assimiing for simplicity that the division aims 
at an equal distribution of electoral power among the 
citizens. Local divisions are most obvious and natural: 
but reflection shows that they involve the practical dis- 
franchisement, in each locality, of a minority that may 
amount to nearly one-half: and even in the case of the 
majority the candidate may be only taken fauU de mieux 
by a great many of those who vote for him. Hence it has 
been suggested that, in order to obtain a truer representa- 
tion of different interests and opinions, the formation of 
constituencies by free combination, independent of locality, 
should be allowed. This suggestion has been worked out 
by Mr. Hare ^ into an elaborate scheme : the advantages of 
which, both as a more complete realisation of the funda- 
mental principle of representative government, and as a 
security against the dangers of a widely extended suffrage,^ 

reasonable to hope that the less educated will in preponderant numbers 
foUow their lead. 

* See The Election of Representatives^ by Thomas Hare ; also Mill, Repre- 
sentative Oovemmentf chap. vii. 

' If the plan of local divisions be adopted, there is an obvious danger 
that under a widely-extended franchise, with a strong class-conflict between 
the poor and the rich, the minority enjoying comfort and culture will bo 
represented by a still smaller minority in the legislature. 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 395 

are urged by its advocates with much force and enthusiasm 
of conviction. It appears to me, however, to be open to 
the following serious objections : — 

1. There is a danger of losing a valuable protection 
against demagogy, if we remove the natural inducements 
which local divisions give for the more instructed part 
of the community to exercise their powers of persuasion 
on the less instructed. If the divisions are local, the 
wiser few in each locality, in order to carry the candidate 
of their choice, have to convince their neighbours, and thus 
the natural sociability springing from neighbourhood tends 
to become a channel of political education : but if an in- 
structed minority were allowed to combine with others on 
their own intellectual level elsewhere, this valuable edu- 
cative influence would tend to be lost. This consideration 
seems to me materially to reduce the probable efficftcy of 
this plan of representation as a protection against the danger 
of pernicious class-legislation. 

2. Though it is the aim of the representative system to 
secure intelligent concern for the special needs of different 
classes and sections, it is hardly desirable that each repre- 
sentative should represent exclusively one set of particular 
interests or opinions : we want for legislators men of some 
breadth of view and variety of ideas, practised in comparing 
different claims and judgments, and endeavouring to find 
some compromise that will harmonise them as far as possible. 
For a compromise of this sort is largely the kind of result 
to which the deliberations of the assembly as a whole ought 
to be directed : it is well, therefore, that the members of 
the assembly should be persons qualified to find it. Now 
it certainly seems to me that this is likely to be less the 
case if the community is not locally divided for electoral 
purposes. If the citizens are left to aggregate themselves 
into constituencies by free combination they are likely to form 
electoral bodies of a more uniform character, whether the 
combination is based upon identity of interests or similarity 
of opinions. The legislators will tend to represent either par- 
ticular trades or professions, or particular religious sects, or 



396 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

other associations, tending to be somewhat fanatical, of 
persons combining to effect special legislative ends — total 
abstainers, anti - vivisectionists, anti - vaccinationists, and 
the like : unless — as is possible — the result should be a 
more elaborate organisation of the great political parties, 
in which they would be subdivided into constituencies by a 
central committee, so that the elector's freedom of choice 
would disappear.^ 

On these grounds I am opposed to the introduction of 
Mr. Hare's, or any similar, scheme for the representation of 
minorities, as applied to the country as a whole. But 
granting that the principle of local divisions be adopted, it 
stiU remains to be considered how the divisions are to be 
formed. The simplest plan is to divide the country into as 
many approximately equal parts as there are to be members 
in the representative assembly, so that each such part may 
elect one member: and the simplicity of the plan is an 
undoubted merit, since any more complicated arrangement 
is through its complexity more liable to inequalities tending 
to become grievances. It has, however, been urged ^ as a 
strong objection against this plan that it gives too much 
advantage to a candidate of local, as compared with one of 
national reputation : ^ so that it leads to the election of less 

^ It will be obvious that this second objection applies with still greater 
force against a formal division of the community into trades and professions 
for electoral purposes. I have not thought it necessary to argue against 
this principle in the text ; since — though it was extensively adopted in the 
construction of governing bodies in the cities of mediaeval Europe, — it has 
not been formally introduced into any modern constitution (except to a very 
limited extent in the construction of the Senate or Upper Chamber). The 
massing of certain classes of labourers in particular districts, which the 
development of modern industry has caused, has, indeed, led to its practical 
realisation in some cases : but this partial and limited representation of 
economic classes is not open to the objections that arc valid against a 
systematic organisation of the electorate on this basis. 

^ This argument has been much used in the controversy in France between 
"scrutin de liste" and "scrutin individual" or ''d'arrondissement." 

' Here I may remark that a critic of my first edition asked, "Why is 
nothing said about the very important question whether the electors should 
be limited in their choice to persons resident in the electoral district or 
not." My answer is that I know no reason worth discussing in favour of a 
compulsory limitation of this kind. 




XX THE LEGISLATURE 397 

distingmshed men as legislators. There is some force in 
this argument ; but the disadvantage seems likely to tell 
rather against the lesser than the greater luminaries ; since 
a statesman of great national reputation could hardly fail to 
command a majority in some one small division, unless he 
were so generally unpopular that he would be likely to be re- 
jected by the majority in a larger division. And, undoubtedly, 
what I have regarded as the main aim of the representative 
system — to secure in the legislature adequate knowledge of 
and concern for the various needs and interests of different 
sections of the community — is, on the whole, more likely to 
be realised the more numerous the electoral divisions are, 
supposing that only majorities are represented. On the 
other hand, the simplicity of this plan of division is artificial, 
and involves the disadvantage of breaking up for electoral 
purposes portions of the community, — such as towns 
generally are,^ — which tend to have an intimate internal 
coherence in their economic and social life, and consequently 
important common interests. Generally speaking, to under- 
stand adequately the legislative requirements of any division 
of a town, a man must have a grasp of its economic life as 
a whole ; and this is a strong reason for arranging that the 
representatives of a town — or any other naturally distinct 
and internally coherent parts of the country — should repre- 
sent it as a whola If, however, the electoral divisions are 
thus made to correspond as far as possible to natural divisions, 
there will in many cases be divisions which will require to 
be represented by several members : so that the question 
will arise again whether all the members of each electoral 
division should be elected by the majority — each elector 
voting for all — or whether some representation of minorities 
should be devised. In this more limited application the 
obvious advantages of minority representation seem to me 
decidedly to outweigh the drawbacks : and it is chiefly from 
this point of view that the plan is now recommended by its 
leading advocates. 

^ The capitals of large states should perhaps be excepted, as liable to lack 
the internal cohesion on which stress is here laid. 



398 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

There are various modes of securing the representation 
of minorities in an election in which several candidates 
are to be chosen : the most effective ^ are framed on the 
plan of allowing any party or group of electors to have 
a representative, if the votes given for him reach the quota 
obtained through dividing the whole number of votes given 
by the number of places to be filled. I will briefly describe two 
leading varieties of this plan. The first — Mr. Hare's — may 
be distinguished as the Preferential vote. According to this 
each elector only gives one vote, but he is allowed to deliver 
a voting-paper on which the names of candidates may be 
written in any number not exceeding the number of places 
to be filled up. The names are understood to be in order 
of preference. Then if a vote for the name first on the list 
turns out to be superfluous, because the candidate's quota of 
votes is already made up, the vote is counted for the name 
second on the list ; and similarly, if need be, for the third, 
and so on. The weak point of this scheme is that no 
thoroughly satisfactory method has been devised for select- 
ing the particular votes that are to count for any candidate 
who hsLS votes in excess of the required quota. This defect 
is avoided in a Swiss form of the method of the quota, 
which combines party -voting with voting for persons. 
According to this plan each of the different parties of 
electors puts forward a list of candidates ; and the primary 
division of votes is among lists, not persona Each elector 
votes for one or other of the parties, giving as many votes 
as there are places to be filled up, and at the same time 
naming any candidate or candidates whom he prefers ; but 
he cannot indicate a preference among the names that he 
expressly selects. He may include among these names one 

^ Among less effective metliods we may notice (1) the Limited vote, by 
which each elector is restricted to either a single vote, or at any rate a 
smaller number of votes than there are candidates ; and (2) the Cumulative 
vote, which gives each elector as many votes as there are candidates, but 
leaves him free to bestow them all, or any number of them, on the same 
candidate. Either of these methods tends rudely and imperfectly to the 
representation of minorities ; but it is only by accident that either approxi- 
mates at all as closely to a proportionate representation of divergent opinions 
as the method of the quota. 



I 



XX THE LEGISLATURE 399 

- — __ _ ■ ^ 

or more candidates of some other party : but if so, for each 
such name a vote will be subtracted from the aggregate of 
votes given for his own party, and counted for the party 
to which the candidate belongs. Then any party which 
obtains a number of votes amounting to the quota will 
have one representative, or if they amount to twice the 
quota, two, and so on : the particular candidates selected in 
each case being those who have received the largest number 
of express personal votes.^ 

Whatever principle of dividing electoral districts be 
adopted, it is important to provide for a rectification of the 
division from time to time, to meet changes in population. 
Such a rectification should not, I conceive, be regarded as 
a constitutional change ; it should be performed regularly, 
as a natural consequence of a periodical census ; and where 
party government prevails, it will be better that it should 
not be performed by the legislature but by a permanent 
commission — in order to avoid or reduce the danger of 
" gerrymandering." * 

Assuming that the plan of local divisions is adopted, a 
question arises as to the length of residence that should be 
required as a condition of voting in any district. It seems 
desirable that it should be long enough to secure, on the 
average, some knowledge of local affairs in the voter, and at 

^ When aU the whole quotas made up have ohtained representatives, the 
fractions that remain over have to he compared for the remaining places. 
There is a little difficulty in determining the principle of comparison ; hut 
the fairest plan seems to he to allot the next place, not to the largest 
fraction of a quota, but to the party whose aggregate of votes forms the 
largest proportion of the number made by adding one quota to its sum of 
whole quotas : and so on for the remaining places. E,g, if the quota is 
1000, and one party (A) has 2700 votes, while another (B) has 3650, a 
fourth representative will be allotted to (B) rather than a third to (A). 

^ ''The aim of gerrymandering is so to lay out the [electoral] districts as 
to secure in the greatest possible number of them a majority for the party 
which conducts the operation. This is done sometimes by throwing the 
greatest possible number of votes into a district which is anyhow certain to 
be hostile, sometimes by adding to a district where parties are equally 
divided some place in which the majority of friendly voters is sufficient to 
turn the scale." — Bryce, Anxtrican CommontoeaUh, Part I. chap. xili. p. 
165. The danger of gerrymandering is, of course, much reduced by the 
adoption of any plan of representing minorities. 






400 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the same time to hinder — by rendering costly — attempts to 
introduce strangers on a large scale into the constituency, 
in order to make up an artificial majority. But it is un- 
desirable that it should be so long as to exclude from the 
franchise any considerable number of otherwise qualified 
citizens.^ 

§ 7. So far we have been considering the allotment of 
the right to elect. I pass to consider restrictions on 
eligibility. These will reasonably coincide to a great 
extent with the limitations on the " active " right. Thus 
crime, infamous trade, loss of economic independence, ex- 
treme poverty and ignorance, should disqualify equally in 
both cases: and if a minimum of age higher than that 
of ordinary legal maturity be adopted for electors, it will 
be reasonable to put the same restriction on candidates.^ 
Other important limitations — such as the incompatibility 
of legislative functions with employment in the executive 
departments — will be more conveniently considered in a 
subsequent chapter.* Apart from these, the most important 
question under this head is whether it is desirable to require 
a legislator to possess an income, or show evidence of in- 
tellectual attainments, considerably above the minimum — 
if any — imposed as a condition of exercising the franchise. 
The arguments both for and against such a regulation are 
partly similar to those already discussed in considering the 
weighted vote. On the one hand it is fairly urged that 
legislation is an art that can hardly be fittingly under- 
taken except by persons of high intellectual culture : and 
that only those whose income is above the average are 
likely to have had the time and means necessary for the 
acquisition of such culture. On the other hand it may be 
replied that legislation is an art that is yet in a very 
rudimentary condition, in respect of the application of 

^ The danger of such exclusion is likely to increase with the progress of 
civilisation, as the development of industry increases the mobility of labour. 

' I see no adequate reason for adopting a higher minimum of age in the 
case of the elected than in that of the elector — as is done in several modern 
European constitutions. 

^ See chap. zxii. on *'The Relation of the Legislature to the Executive." 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 401 

science and systematic method: that the knowledge and 
intellectual training, really useful for purposes of practical 
politics, which an ordinary legislator from the ranks of 
cultivated society has obtained &om schools and colleges 
and books, is not very important in extent ; nor beyond 
what an intellect of exceptional vigour can acquire in any 
class of society, in spite of the disadvantages of a short 
education and a life spent in manual labour. It may 
be urged further that the limitation of eligibility to a 
minority of comparatively wealthy persons is incompatible 
with an adequate realisation of the general aims of repre- 
sentative government : since, in order to obtain the varied 
empirical knowledge and the sympathetic insight into the 
needs of all sections of society, which we saw to be the 
characteristic merit of this form of government, it is neces- 
sary that every class of electors should be free to choose 
its own members. Moreover, the limitation must have a 
tendency to diminish the interest taken by the poorer 
classes in the election of legislators, and to weaken their 
confidence in the legislators elected. 

These arguments seem to me very strong against any 
formal limitation of eligibility by the requirement of definite 
pecuniary or educational qualifications : but they do not apply 
with anything like equal force to an arrangement which 
without excluding any class would yet operate very decidedly 
in favour of candidates possessing such qualifications. And 
this result, I conceive, may be simply attained by attaching 
no salary to the post of legislator. In this case, it will still 
be possible for any class in the community to select re- 
presentatives from its own ranks: only if they have no 
independent means they will require to be supported by 
voluntary contributions : and the electors are hardly likely 
to tax themselves for this purpose imless they have a very 
decided preference for such candidates.^ 

^ It may be said that this is unfair to the poorer classes, who will have to 
tax themselves in order to be represented by members of their own class, 
while wealthier persons are so represented gratis. But the tax will be com- 
paratively trifling, in a community of the size of an ordinary modem state : 
since the salary thus provided should not be large enough to stimulate vulgar 

2d 



402 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

I admit that it may be necessary to provide public 
remuneration for the work of legislation in poor commimi- 
ties, in which it would be difficult without payment to find 
fit persons to undertake it. But in societies as wealthy as 
modem states generally are, it cannot be difficult to find an 
adequate number of persons, qualified by nature and training 
and enjoying pecuniary independence, to devote themselves 
to this important and interesting work : which, if public 
opinion is in a healthy state, they will regard as at once a 
duty and an honour. And if the representative assembly 
is in the main composed of such persons, another very 
important advantage will be gained : it will tend to maintain 
a higher standard of pecuniary incorruptibility than would, 
ceteris paribus, be likely to be foimd in an assembly of paid 
professional legislators, — imless they were paid much more 
highly than has ever been proposed. I do not mean that 
it would ever be possible — or desirable — to compose a 
legislature entirely of persons whose mere wealth renders 
them unlikely subjects for corruption : but in a body whose 
members are to a great extent drawn from this class it will 
generally be easier to keep up a severe tone of public opinion 
in reference to the pecuniary temptations to which a legislator 
is exposed. If it be said that an assembly in which com- 
paratively rich men preponderate will tend, in framing 
legislative measures, to have special regard to the class- 
interests of the rich, I should reply that this tendency, in 
a country where the suffrage is widely extended, may reason- 
ably be regarded not as a drawback, but as a valuable security 
for just legislation; in view of the grave danger already 
noticed that the apparent interests of the poor, who fonn 
the numerical majority, will be preferred to the real ultimate 
interests of the whole community. 

§ 8. We have seen that one of the arguments against 
the restriction of eligibility just considered, is that it tends 

ambition or to enable and encourage the recipient to live in more expensive 
style than he would otherwise have done : it should be strictly limited to 
compensation for the earnings that ho has to forgo and for any quite inevitable 
expenses entailed by his new position. 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 403 

to weaken the tie of confidence between the majority of 
the citizens and their representatives. A similar objection 
applies against the method of election in two ^ stages which 
has been adopted in more than one modem constitution ; 
according to which the citizens at large merely elect electors 
to whom the election of legislators is entrusted. Moreover, 
where the party-system ^ is fully developed, there is a danger 
that the double election may be reduced to a cumbrous 
formality: the intermediate electors being chosen under 
pledges — or if pledges are illegal, imder a stringent though 
tacit understanding — that they will vote for the candidates 
of their party. This might perhaps be prevented by choos- 
ing the intermediate electors for comparatively long periods, 
independent of the duration of the legislative assembly : 
but then the ordinary citizen's sense of control over legisla- 
tion would be further weakened.^ It might also be partly 
prevented by giving the immediate electors other important 
functions besides that of electing legislators : — e,g, by giving 
the election of legislators to organs of local government 
elected by the citizens at large : — but this would have the 
drawback of introducing alien considerations into the 
election of the local governors ; since the man who would 
be preferred as an elector to the central legislature may not 
be best qualified for the function of local government or 
may not be willing to imdertake it. At the same time 
election in two stages has certainly a primA fdcie tendency 
to improve the quality of the legislative assembly, if it does 
not become a formality, and if both parts of the process are 
performed with independence and honesty of purpose : since 
the competence of the elected electors may be expected to 
be on the average greater than that of the citizens who 

^ I suppose only two stages for simplicity, and because the plan of indirect 
election has hardly ever been adopted in a more complicated form. But 
there might, of course, be three or more stages. 

^ See chap. xxix. 

3 Also, if the intermediate electors were chosen for periods independent of 
the duration of the legislative assembly, the "appeal to the people" by a 
dissolution of the assembly — which we shaU see to be a cardinal point of the 
English system of parliamentary government — could not be eflfectually 
carried out. 



w ' 



404 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

elect them, and their sense of responsibility stronger : also 
either set of electors is more likely to have useful per- 
sonal knowledge of the candidates among whom it has to 
choose. On the whole, it would seem that the advantages 
of the plan of election in two stages are likely to be greatest, 
and its drawbacks least, if it is reserved for the appoint- 
ment of a second and supplementary chaml>er, designed to 
te less directly under popular control than that which is 
primarily the " House of Eepresentatives," — supposing that 
such a second chamber is held to be desirable as a part 
of the legislative organ. 

We are thus led to the last of the principal expedients 
which have been proposed or adopted to remedy the defects 
of a legislative assembly elected by a widely extended 
suffrage most simply applied. We have considered five 
modes of modifjing the suffrage : 

(1) By restricting the ojdive electoral right. 

(2) By distributing representatives not in proportion to 

numbers. 

(3) By organising representation of minorities. 

(4) By restricting the right to be elected, formally or 

pmctically. 

(5) By election in two stages. 

It remains to discuss the method, just mentioned, of 
placing side by side with the House of Eepresentatives a 
legislative body otherwise appointed — a " Senate " or " upper 
chamber." This modific^ition of the structure of the legis- 
lative organ has been adopted in most modern constitu- 
tions. It is, however, of such fimdamental importance that 
it seems desirable to reserve the discussion of it for a 
separate chapter : and, for reasons that will appear in the 
sequel, I think it best to defer this discussion until we have 
considered the proper construction of the executive organ of 
government, and its normal relations to the legislature. 

For similar rciisons I shall also defer several important 
questions connected with the constitution and functions of 
the legislature : such as (1) how far its powers should be 
constitutionally limited, either to secure the independence 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 405 

of other organs or on other grounds : ^ (2) whether elections 
should be at fixed intervals, or at the discretion of the 
executive or of the constituencies ; and if at fixed intervals, 
how long the intervals should be, and whether the renovation 
of the assembly should be total or partial : ^ (3) whether the 
sessions of the legislature should be continuous through the 
year, and if not, whether the opening or the closing of 
legislative sessions should be fixed, or left to the discretion 
of the legislature, or of the executive : ^ (4) whether the 
validity of disputed elections should be determined by the 
assembly itself or by the judiciary : * (5) whether the initia- 
tion of legislative measures should be formally open to the 
executive, or to private citizens combining in sufiBcient 
numbers, as well as to members of the assembly.^ 

§ 9. For the present I shall only assume that, for good 
government in a modem civilised community, a representa- 
tive assembly, of which the members are elected for a limited 
time, should constitute at least an important part of the 
legislative organ. Let us now proceed to consider briefly 
the size, organisation, and mode of working of such an 
assembly. As we have seen, its proper function is not 
exactly to frame laws, but rather to determine the char- 
acter of the legislative measures to be brought forward, 
and by an adequate critical deliberation on their details 
to shape and mould them into the form best adapted 
to satisfy the complex needs, and to secure from injury 
the complex interests, of the diflferent classes of citizens 
affected by them. It is for this fimction that the re- 
presentative system has seemed to us specially adapted: 
and obviously the larger a representative assembly is, the 
more fully— other things being equal — its representative 
character admits of being developed, and the more varied and 
comprehensive will be the information and experience that 
it can bring to bear upon the problems presented to it. 

^ See chap. zxii. §§ 8, 11, and chap, xzvii. § 4. 

^ See chap. xxii. §§ 3, 9, chap, xxiii. § 3, p. 475, and chap, xxvii. § 2. 
^ See chap. xxii. § 10. * See chap. xxiv. § 2, p. 485. 

^ See chap. xxii. § 10, p. 458, chap, xxvii. §§ 2-4. 



tmmai0mHmmmmmsmmm^mmmmmt9i^^SBm^i^^^^^m^^^^^>^.m i m n i, j 



406 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Moreover, the larger a legislative body is made, the more 
difficult it becomes for the members to combine successfully 
for purposes recognised as improper. On the other hand, 
the enlargement of the 6wsembly beyond a certain point 
tends to give undue advantage in debate to the less valuable 
qualifications for oratory, and makes its meetings more liable 
to lapse into the confusion, impulsiveness, and intemperance 
of a mob : and it involves the further drawback that the 
members have greater difficulty in obtaining useful personal 
knowledge of each other. The most suitable number can 
only be determined by a rough balance of these opposing con- 
siderations ; and it will reasonably vary with the size of the 
community ; but we may perhaps take the number (670) of 
the English House of Commons — the largest of modem re- 
presentative chambers — as an extreme limit, if not clearly 
excessive. In any case the whole assembly is likely to be 
too large a body for the profitable discussion of the details of 
legislative measures ; and the varied knowledge and experi- 
ence which it may be expected to contain will be more 
effectively applied to its work if it is broken into committees, 
to each of which the consideration of certain classes of 
measures is allotted ; the final adoption or rejection of any 
proposed law being reserved to the house as a whole. 
Wliether the main preparation of legislative business should 
be left in the hands of a single leading conmiittee, is a 
question of which the decision is likely to be influenced by 
the relation of the legislature to the executive: but this 
arrangement has important advantages, from a purely legis- 
lative point of view, since the concentration of responsibility 
that it involves is conducive to a systematic and well- 
considered ordering of legislative work.^ The initiation 
of legislation should in any case be open to all members, 
the House being free to determine to what extent and 
under what conditions any legislative proposal should be 
orally debated. 

A point of some importance is the determination of the 

^ Seo Mr. Bryce's criticism of the American system, in which there is no 
such concentration. — American CommonvfetUth, Part I. chap. xv. 



XX THE LEGISLA TURE 407 

minimum number required either (a) for the opening or 
continuance of debate, or (6) for the validity of any decision. 
For the first purpose a comparatively small "quorum" 
ought, I think, to sufiBce : since it hardly seems desirable 
to subject legislators to any irksome coercion to attend 
debates in an advanced stage of civilisation ; as the 
printing-press supplies a means of considering the argu- 
ments for or against a legislative proposal, often preferable 
to speeches. Again, since, in the multiplicity of legisla- 
tive business, there must be many subjects on which 
the majority of members would in any case allow their 
votes to be determined by the opinions of a comparatively 
small number, it does not seem expedient to make a high 
minimum of votes or attendance absolutely necessary for 
the validity of decisions: all that seems needful is to 
provide that questions are not designedly or accidentally 
decided in a manner opposed to the really predominant 
opinion of the assembly. The simplest way of attaining 
this result seems to be to arrange that a decision shall be 
valid "however small the number voting, if it is not challenged; 
but that it may be challenged if the number voting falls 
short of a certain proportion of the whole ; and that, if it is 
challenged, the decision shall be deferred till a fixed time 
on the following day, and shall be then decided without 
debate by a majority of those voting, however small the 
number may be. 



CHAPTEE XXI 

TUE EXECUTIVE 

§ 1. We have seen that the governmental business classed 
as executive is very diverse in kind. It should include all 
the measures required for the due protection of the interests 
of the commimity and its members in their relations with 
foreigners, especially the organisation and direction of 
the military forces of the State ; all the actions not strictly 
judicial required to prevent members of the community 
from causing injury to each other or to the public interests, 
and to secure their co-operation for common ends, so far 
as this is not better left to volimtary association; and 
finally, all the industry required for utilising such part of 
the wealth and resources of the community as it is expe- 
dient to keep in public ownership, and for providing all 
commodities needed by the State or its members that are not 
better provided by private industry and free exchange. The 
extent of the work under these different heads, — especially 
the last mentioned, — will vary with the circumstances of the 
community and its political and social habits and traditions ; 
but in all modern States its multifarious nature has led 
to its distribution into several departments, imder separate 
management for ordinary purposea Now when we speak 
in constitutional discussion of "the executive," or "the 
executive branch of government," we commonly refer not 
to the whole aggregate of persons engaged in the perform- 
ance of these functions in the different departments, or 
even to all who exercise coercive power — it would seem 



CHAP. XXI THE EXECUTIVE 409 

absurd to speak of the policeman who bids one " move on " 
as a "member of the executive," — but to the body or 
individual that exercises supreme control, within the limits 
of law, over all these functions, or the most important of 
them.^ The first question, therefore, that suggests itself in 
considering the structure of the executive organ of govern- 
ment is why any such unity of supreme control over all the 
branches of executive business is reqiiired, in addition to the 
control of the legislature and the judiciary. 

In considering this question we must put out of sight 
the actual conditions of English government ; in which the 
" Cabinet," formed by the Parliamentary heads of the chief 
executive departments, is in fact a committee of the legis- 
lature, whose work largely consists in first preparing and then 
carrying through the legislature the most important new lawa 
Let us suppose that this work is done by other committees 
of the legislature, and that the " ministers " composing the 
Cabinet have merely to manage the executive work of their 
departments ; each making proposals from time to time for 
such new legislation as seems desirable in his own department, 
and advising on the proposals that are made by other persons 
affecting his work, but not otherwise taking part in legislative 
business. What reason would there then be for controlling 
the independence of action of ministers within their respective 
departments — so far as the law left them discretion — further 
than by the criticism of the legislature, backed by its power 
of legislative interference ? 

In the first place, the advantage of such further control 
is manifest, so far as the work of any one department is so 
related to the work of another that a mutual adjustment 
is continually required for the efl&cient performance of both : 
since in this case a disagreement in policy between two 
heads of departments might lead to a disastrous paralysis 
of governmental activities, and it will be clearly a gain to 

^ It is generally agreed that some functions may be properly placed under 
the management of local governments ; but the question how far these local 
governments should be independent of central control is one that we have 
yet to consider. 



410 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

obviate or materially reduce this danger by placing both 
under the supreme control of king, president, prime minister, 
or council. Now in the case of many departments of 
executive work it cannot be said that this intimate con- 
nection ordinarily exists: for instance, there seems to l>e 
no such need of continuous adjustment between the work 
of a Ministry of Education and that of the Post Office or a 
Ministry of Public Works, or between any of these depart- 
ments and the Foreign Office, or the management of the 
Army and Navy ; the idea of a " unity of general policy " 
to be maintained in the ordinary administration of all these 
departments would be quite fanciful. Still, there are im- 
portant cases in which this imity of policy is a continual 
need ; — thus in England questions of foreign affairs have to 
be constantly considered in reference to their effects on 
colonial interests '} and in other cases collisions and frictions 
are liable to occur from time to time, which a common 
control might prevent or speedily remove. But it is 
especially at grave crises of national existence that the 
importance of unity of control to secure harmony of action 
among the principal departments of the executive becomes 
manifest. Thus, in war, it is obviously necessary that 
the management of the army and that of the navy should 
harmonise with each other, and with the management of 
foreign affairs, and also with that of the financial depart- 
ment, — at any rate if financial pressure should occur. If, 
again, the war should be complicated by internal disorder 
or sedition, it would be important that the Home Depart- 
ment should not be at discord with the others. Again, as 
we have seen, the State must be prepared for exceptional 
occasions of extreme need, on which law has to be overridden 
or temporarily suspended by the executive for some great 
interest of social order or wellbeing ; and it is important 
that the responsibility of such interference should not rest 
on a single head of a department. 

Secondly, it seems clear that all departments of which 
the expenditure is considerable and liable to vary, must, so 

^ See Earl Groy, ParliajnerUary Oovemment and Reform (chap. iii. ). 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE ^\ i 

far as their cost falls on the national treasury, be under one 
supreme control from a financial point of view ; in order 
that the dememds made by each on the public purse may 
be duly considered in relation both to the demands of all 
the rest and the state of the public resources. It does not, 
however, necessarily follow that this control should be 
vested in an executive organ : indeed, as the legislature is 
the ultimate money-granting organ, it seems obvious that 
the estimates of expenditure and supply for the year — or 
any other period for which taxation may be determined — 
should be prepared by a committee of the legislature ; and 
that this should supervise, from an economic point of view, 
the organisation and working of the executive departmenta 
But such supervision is necessarily difficult and delicate, and 
its effective performance requires great knowledge of details, 
concentrated labour, and continuous experience : and perhaps 
we can hardly expect to find these qualifications in a finance 
committee of an assembly periodically elected — and thus 
liable to be changed at short intervals to an indefinite extent 
— unless it is aided by a permanent executive department, 
such as the Treasury is in England.^ Hence it seems 
probable that the best result will be attained in respect of 
economy and efficiency together, if the estimate of necessary 
or desirable expenditure, and the proposals for obtaining 
funds to meet it, are primarily made on the responsibility of 
a supreme executive body or individual, representing all the 
departments. 

I shall accordingly assume that — in a unitary state such 
as we are now considering^ — all or the most important 
permanent departments of centralised executive business 
will be under the supreme direction of one individual or 
body, to whose decisions the heads of departments and their 
subordinates will conform : and I shall refer to this depositary 
of the supreme executive power as the "supreme execu- 

^ I do not mean to affirm that the English Treasury, as at present 
organised, possesses the required qualifications in an adequate degree. 

^ The deeper division of governmental functions that characterises a 
composite State and its possible effects on the organisation of the executive 
will be considered later (chap. zxvi.). 



412 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

tive " or — where there is no danger of ambiguity — " the 
executive." 

§ 2. But before we inquire how this " supreme execu- 
tive " is to be constituted and appointed, it seems desirable 
to obtain a general view of the organisation suitable to the 
whole body of officials employed in executive work ; — con- 
fining ourselves to the work that belongs to the centralised 
executive, and leaving the consideration of local executive 
organs to a future chapter. As we have just seen, the 
whole executive business will tend to be divided into a 
number of branches whose interdependence at ordinary 
times will often be slight In some cases it may be neces- 
sary, for economy of highly skilled labour, to place two or 
more of such naturally separate branches under one man- 
agement, even as regards its ordinary routine. But the 
general aim of a rational distribution of executive work 
will clearly be to place under a common management, in 
each department, such portions of public business as have 
naturally a dose connection, — either because the efficient 
performance of one such portion of business is impossible if 
other portions are performed inefficiently or on independent 
plans, or because the experience gained in the manage- 
ment of one portion of the business will tend to render the 
managers more competent to deal with another portion. 
And in the most important departments this natural group- 
ing of business appears to be now carried out in modern 
States generally. 

Assuming then that the work in each of the depart- 
ments with which we are concerned requires unity of 
management for its effective performance, let us consider 
generally how the officials employed in the work should be 
appointed, and in what relations they should stand to each 
other. We may begin by observing that the line between 
"service of government" and ordinary civil obedience is 
not to be sharply drawn. As we have seen (ch. xi. § 2), it 
should be held generally incimibent on the governed to 
perform occasional services of a personal kind, in aid of the 
functions of government — such as giving evidence in courts 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 413 

of justice and otherwise assisting in the discovery of crime, 
giving information for statistical purposes, etc.; and in 
crises of defensive war or civil disorder all who are capable 
of bearing arms may be required to undertake more serious 
exertions and risks. Again, the skilled labour of profes- 
sional men not regularly employed by government — lawyers, 
physicians, men of science, artists — may be occasionally 
required for special governmental purposea In the present 
discussion, however, it will be convenient to leave out of 
accoimt these occasional services, and only to consider the 
case of the regular employees of government. And we may 
further limit our consideration to such officials as have — or 
are not unlikely to have — some share in the function of 
deciding or advising how the powers entrusted to the 
executive are to be used; as distinguished from persons 
who, in the ordinary course of things, will have merely 
mechanical or menial or clerkly duties, or the actual 
exercise of coercive force in obedience to orders. 

Confining ourselves, then, to the higher class of execu- 
tive functions — to which the term " governmental " would 
ordinarily be restricted — we may lay down that, as a 
general rule, the organisation appropriate to executive work 
must be essentially different from that which has been 
recommended for the legislature. In constructing the 
organ for determining changes in the ordinary law of the 
State, designed to be permanent, — so far as this term is 
applicable in a progressive community, — I have deemed 
it primarily important to provide that the complex and 
varied interests and needs of the different sections of the 
community shall be adequately discussed and duly regarded 
in the final legislative decisions. For this purpose it 
seemed desirable to constitute — as the whole or an import- 
ant part of the legislature — a numerous body of persons 
having equal voting power, elected and removable at short 
intervals by the citizens at large. The executive depart- 
ments, on the other hand, are mostly occupied with the 
continual accomplishment of particular effects, in accord- 
ance with prescribed general rules, and for the attainment 



414 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of some definitely prescribed end of public utility. Accord- 
ingly, executive business may be assumed to have so much 
general resemblance to ordinary private business as to 
render it desirable that the details of the work in each 
department should be carefully portioned out among sub- 
ordinates arranged in various grades and classes ; and that 
these subordinates should loyally obey the direction of a 
single head, or of a body of persons sufficiently small to be 
able to deliberate easily and rapidly and take prompt and 
sometimes secret decisions. Hence popular election seems 
generally undesirable as a mode of appointing even the 
highest grade of subordinates; partly because it would 
tend to give the elected official too independent a position : 
partly because the electors would not ordinarily be good 
judges of the special qualifications required for the different 
kinds of work. We may also assume that these posts 
should not be hereditary or purchasable; since neither 
birth nor wealth alone affords an adequate guarantee of 
the requisite qualificationa It would seem, then, to be, as 
a rule, desirable that subordinate members of the executive 
should be appointed by official selectors. 

Further, we may assume that the work of such sub- 
ordinates, if continuous and laborious, will — like most kinds 
of private industry in civilised society — be most efficiently 
performed if the main energies of the workers are absorbed 
in it ; and that it will therefore generally require pecuniary 
remuneration. We can hardly expect that even the higher 
subordinate posts, involving continuous professional labour, 
can be made so attractive to men of independent means by 
the honour and power attached to them that they will be 
adequately filled if unpaid : though the superior dignity of 
public business, and a judicious distribution of marks of 
honour in reward of meritorious service, may enable the 
State to purchase the skilled labour it requires at a lower 
price than private employers would have to give. I shall 
also assume that the services here considered are voluntary. 
The cases in which there seem to be adequate reasons for 
making it compulsory to render personal services to Grovern- 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 415 

ment are chiefly two: viz. (1) where it is important to 
keep such services out of the hands of a special professional 
class, (2) and where they cannot be obtained in sufficient 
abundance and adequate quality by the method of free 
contract, except by an expenditure of money which would 
be a greater burden on the community than the general 
obligation of rendering such servicea The services of jury- 
men are commonly considered in England, and come under 
the first head : an example of the second case — and, as some 
think, of the first also — may be found in the conditions of 
military service in the ranks in leading European states.^ 
Neither of these reasons, however, appears to be applicable 
to the ordinary civil service of the central executive or to 
commissions in the military service ; while we may assume 
that the special aptitudes and dispositions required for 
these posts are more likely to be obtained if the work is 
freely chosen by the workers. 

§ 3. It remains to determine the manner in which the 
official selection by free contract should be made : taking 
for granted that the selection should be solely determined 
by evidence of aptitude. 

If wrong motives could be excluded, it would seem best 
that the appointment to any vacancy should be left to the 
unrestricted choice of the superior official responsible for 
the management of the branch of work in question; as 
being the person likely to know most precisely the kind of 
aptitudes required, and to feel most keenly the bad con- 
sequences of a mistaken appointment. And in many cases 
I do not doubt that this mode of selection would lead to 
the best attainable resulta But in the present condition 
of average social morality and public spirit, there must be 
admitted to be a serious danger that the interest of the 
heads of departments in subordinate posts may not be 
sufficiently direct and strong to secure that their patron- 
age will not be used to provide for relations and gratify 
friends. This is to some extent a cause of inefficient work 
in private businesses, and is likely to be much more oper- 

^ See chap. xziv. § 5, and chap. xxxi. § 7. 



4i6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

ative in public departments, in which the personal claims of 
political partisans cannot fail to be superadded to those of 
kinship and private intimacy ; while the selector's interest 
in the efficient working of the department cannot ordinarily 
be equal to that which private employers of capital have 
in the working of their businesses. The danger will be 
greatest as regards the lowest grade of the appointments 
that we are considering, which will ordinarily be filled by 
persons not previously employed in the service ; especially 
as, with a view to their ultimate efficiency, it will be gener- 
ally desirable that they should be appointed young. In 
this case the large number of the appointments to be filled, 
and the necessarily low standard of qualification to be 
applied, will tend to make the business of selection — if 
conscientiously performed — a laborious and difficult one; 
while at the same time the importance of a good selection 
will be less strongly felt than in the case of the higher 
appointments. To meet this danger it seems generally 
expedient that the candidates for entrance into any branch 
of official work, requiring intellectual qualifications that 
can be effectively tested by examination, should be sub- 
jected to an appropriate examination, conducted by a board 
of examiners independent of the department. The most 
controverted question is, whether such an examination 
should merely secure a standard of efficiency, leaving to 
the head or manager of the branch of work in question 
free choice^ among the candidates who are declared to 
come up to the standard: or whether it should be com- 
petitive, and altogether determine the selection. If the 
former plan is adopted, opportunity is left for the selecting 
official to secure that the recipient of the appointment 
possesses, in some degree at least, such qualifications for 
his post as cannot be adequately tested by examination; 
and it may be assumed that this result will be to some 
extent attained. On the other hand, it is also to be ex- 
pected that personal influences of the kind before mentioned 

^ Whether the choice is exercised before or afitr a merely qualifying 
examination, is not of fundamental im}>ortance. 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 417 

will partly determine the selection, and the expectation of 
this will probably tend to reduce materially the number 
and average abilities of the candidates who are conscious of 
not possessing such means of influence : so that the stand- 
ard of what I may call examinable qualifications in the 
persons appointed must be expected, generally speaking, to 
be materially lower than on the competitive system. 

A balance between these different advantages and dis- 
advantages cannot, I think, be struck without appealing to 
specific experience ; and it is not unlikely to vary consider- 
ably with the varying nature of the work in question. I 
observe that some writers — as, for instance, J. S. Mill — 
consider competitive examinations "absolutely necessary." 
On the other hand, the Grerman civil service — ^which Grerman 
writers, not conspicuously blinded by patriotism, confidently 
affirm to be the most efficient in Europe — is entered by a 
non-competitive examination : but it is to be observed that 
this examination is not the sole guarantee of the training 
of these officials ; they SLre required, generally speaking, to 
have gone through a prescribed school -course terminated 
by an examination, and a course at a university or some 
similar institution. 

Speaking generally, it seems safer, in the present state 
of average morality in European countries, to decide for a 
competitive — as against a merely qualifying— examination 
as the only generally trustworthy protection against the 
influence of political partisanship. This may, of course, 
at a particular place in time, be adequately excluded by 
public opinion : but it is hardly prudent to rely on the 
moral sanction only. It is, however, quite possible that some 
intermediate plan of selection, involving an extunination 
neither purely competitive nor merely qualifying, may be 
foimd to be on the whole the best.^ In any case a period 

^ One intermediate plan is to select periodically, by open competition, a 
larger number of candidates than is likely to be required to fill the vacanoies 
occurring before the next examination, and to leave selection within this 
number free to the heads of departments. Another plan is to require nomina- 
tions to be made by the latter, considerably exceeding in number the number 
of the vacancies, and to make the selection among the nominees competi- 

2e 



418 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of probation will be desirable, at the close of which a novice 
who has been found inefficient may be discarded without 
grave hardship. 

In the case of the higher subordinate appointments in the 
diffierent offices the important qualifications are to a great 
extent such as cannot be adequately tested by external 
examination. Here, however, a customary limitation on the 
discretion of the selecting official is commonly imposed by the 
claims of existing employeea And since, generally speaking, 
the most important qualifications for the higher posts are 
such as tend to be both acquired and manifested in the per- 
formance of the duties of lower posts, it will be usually 
expedient that the higher posts ^ should be filled up by 
promotion from the occupants of the lower : not only because 
these latter will generally tend to have the fitness imparted 
by experience, but also because the prospect of promotion 
will tend to make them both more efficient while occupying 
the lower posts, and better qualified for the higher. Still 
it seems expedient that mere seniority should not give 
even a customary claim to promotion to posts where any 
important intellectual qualifications are required. In such 
cases it seems best that the head of the department — or 
other responsible superior official — should have a free choice 
among duly qualified persons : since, in the case of appoint- 
ments of this class, the grave and manifest responsibility 
resting on the official selector, combined with his personal 
interest in getting able assistance, will be a fair security 
against misuse of his discretion, provided that his duty of 
appointing for efficiency alone be clearly laid down. It is 
especially important that for any appointment requiring 
faculties or special knowledge for which the ordinary work 
in the department gives no scope, the selection among 
outsiders should be customary as well as legal. 

§ 4. In the performance of the higher functions in any 

tive. Of these two plans the former seems preferable, since selection after 
competition is likely to be more carefully performed than selection before 
competition. 

^ I am not speaking of the headships of departments, which will be con- 
sidered later. 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 419 

department a clear division and concentration of responsi- 
bility should be a prominent aim : at the same time, in 
departments where the extent and complexity of the work 
render it expedient to divide its ordinary management 
among several superior of&cials, it is obviously desirable that 
before decisions of importance are taken there should be 
consultation among the persons who are managing difierent 
parts of an organisation for a common end. We are thus 
led to the question, whether the ultimate control in any 
department should be entrusted to an individual or to a 
board or council The former arrangement tends to have the 
advantage in energy and decision of management, and also, 
by securing undivided responsibility, it increases the effective- 
ness of the criticism directed on the department by public 
opinion or by the legislature : the latter tends to secure 
greater circumspection, and a more complete, many-sided, 
and impartial examination of the considerations relevant to 
any question. Perhaps we may distinguish between different 
kinds of executive determinations ; and decide, in the first 
place, that the assent of a council should be ordinarily ^ 
necessary to the validity of any important general regulations 
that affect the interests of citizens other than the servants of 
Government, in view of the affinity between such regulations 
and laws. At the same time, it seems generally best that a 
department should have an individual head, who should be 
solely responsible for the most important appointments and 
for other particular decisions ; but in cases of important and 
difficult work, it may be expedient — in order to obtain the 
greatest possible advantage from undivided responsibility 
without losing the safety that is proverbially held to reside 
in a multitude of counsellors — to appoint along with an 
individual head of the department a council which the head 
is bound to consult on certain questions: so that the ultimate 
decision is left entirely to the individual head, but can only 

^ Tlie requirement may be unnecessary where the regulation in question 
had already been adequately deliberated on by some other council or assembly, 
t,g, in matters decided by local governments subject to the approval of a 
central department. Also in war, or other crisis, the need of prompt and 
decisive action may render it expedient to entrust larger powers to individuals. 



ji2r. ELEJifEXTZ Of fOLIT::S z^ki 

re/ii'Jri^:: — «ich merLr-per of ::.■=: 'xuncil to r^y.ri Lis :iiri:i. 
an*: :Lfr r^so:.-; for h in a d'xuiii«:n: cii^d^Ir ■:: z^zii^^ ir> 
'i-^':f:/i a: anv future iiL'.tr. This plan. Liw-rver. sLouII :iJv 
r-fi a/l'-'p:-^! in cik^r^ -.vhrrre the reason.^ that ou^iL: :•:• iiduenct: 
tl^iihVjn ixz^ hu'jh as oui^hi :o r.-e — an«l woul-i lie — wrlrien 
down under the condition.? hu j«pos*=:d : and ii i? liable n-: : :o 
work eff-y.-iiv^Iv if the councillors are di«:uise:Mt: .»: vl-ea-urr. 
or apj*oint<:d merely for a limited i>erioiJ with f-ce^ililiiy oi 
reappointment : as they may then have t*>j ^ir'jn;: an inducx- 
menl not to presn their dissent from their cliictl 

5 5. Tliis leads us to the general que^stion of the cvn- 
ditions of tenure of subordinate offices of the executive, which 
pre.sents .some difficulty. It seems especially imp<irtant 
for the State to '^ve to its employees as much security 
of tenure us can be reconciled with its need of loval and 
efficient work ; because they are deprived of the vagutr 
chane<^ of rising to wealth by ability which compensiite for 
instability of employment in many branches of private 
indiLstry. If possible, therefore, the conditions of tenure, 
ordinarily attainable after adequate probation, should be such 
as to give practically complete protection against arbitrary, 
oppressive, or partisan dismissals : while allowing ilismissal 
for crime or disgraceful conduct or serious breach of official 
duty, and also for such incompetence as would in an average 
man imply blameworthy neglect. A milder degree of in- 
com{x;tence in the lower ranks of the service might bo left to 
the natural penalty of non-prrjmotion ; while in the higher 
grades a carefidly-airanged system of pensions or " hall- 
pay " * would render it possible to take or keep important 
tasks out of unfit hands, while securing from financial ruin 
the individuals passed over. If adequate security can be 
attained without legal limitations on the right to dismiss, 

' by 'Mialf-^iay '* is meant a jiortion of the normal salary of an official. 
— varying in amount according to his rank in the service — which is secund 
to him iiidci»endently of employment. 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 421 

there will probably be a gain in respect of efficiency ; as 
there are certain kinds of serious incompetence and latent 
insubordination which are hard to prove before an indepen- 
dent tribunal, though they are grave drawbacks to the 
efficiency of an organisation that has to do difficult and 
delicate business. Hence, where public opinion and the 
established traditions of the service effectually exclude 
partisan appointments and dismissal, a legal tenure " during 
pleasure " of the head of the department, practically under- 
stood to be a tenure " during good behaviour," has much 
to recommend it. On the other hand, in certain states of 
political feeling and habits, protection more definite than a 
mere understanding may be necessary for adequate security 
of tenure. 

Moreover, the danger ought not to be ignored, that an un- 
scrupulous chief may use his power of dismissal to intimidate 
his subordinates into rendering services, to himself or to his 
party, that they ought to refuse. The subordinate's duty is, 
of course, only to obey such orders as the superior can legally 
give : at the same time, it would be unreasonable to require 
a subordinate to set his judgment against that of his official 
superior in any case in which the legality of the order 
appeared to the former merely doubtful : and even where its 
illegality would hardly be doubtful to an unbiassed mind, 
the subordinate's habit of official loyalty must be admitted 
as an extenuation for the offence of carrying out the order. 
It is therefore important not to add so strong a weight of 
self-interest on the side of blind obedience, as must be added 
if the subordinate's refusal to obey would involve a serious 
danger of professional ruin. Against this danger also public 
opinion may, at certain times and places, be a sufficient 
protection : but, on the whole, it seems generally safer to 
provide that subordinate executive officials who have attained 
a certain rank shall not be simply dismissible from the service 
by the head of the department alone, without the opportunity 
of appealing to some independent tribimal, which shall finally 
judge whether such dismissal has been deserved. There is 
less danger in leaving to the head of a department the power 



422 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of compelling a subordinate to retire on half-pay or with an 
adequate pension : and in the case of officials employed in 
posts of much responsibility and importance, the want of a 
power of summary removal may be the cause of grave evils. 

§ 6. It remains to consider the appointment, control, 
and dismissal of heads of departments. We have already 
seen that the undivided responsibility of the head of a 
department as such cannot properly extend to questions, the 
decision of which, though they arise in his department, will 
materially affect the operations of other departments also. 
On these matters the ultimate decision must be pronounced 
either by some supreme governing individual, — whether 
distinct from or selected among the heads of departments, — 
or by some supreme council of which they either do or do 
not form part ; and even questions that fall strictly within 
any one department will, if exceptionally important, be 
naturally reserved for this supreme executive. If, however, 
the supreme executive power is to be vested in a council, it 
will be more likely to possess the requisite knowledge and 
grasp of current affairs if it includes the principal heads of 
departments : — though it may be desirable to combine with 
these other persons of political experience, who being fi-ee 
from the burden of detailed executive work, may concentrate 
their attention on difficult questions of general policy. Such 
a council — according to the general view that we have taken 
of the organ adapted to executive functions — should not 
be a numerous body.^ This council, again, will need a 
chairman, into whose hands a general supervision of execu- 
tive business will naturally fall ; and to whom it will be 
convenient to give enlarged powers of control, whenever 
frequent and prompt decisions are required to ensure the 
effective co-operation of different departments. On the 
other hand, if the supreme executive power is vested in 
an individual, a council of this kind will be needed to 
advise him. 

The important final question, then, to which we are led 
in our process of constructing the executive organ from the 

^ This point will be further argued in the next chapter. 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 423 

bottom upwards, would seem to be this : should the supreme 
control be in the hands of a council or " Cabinet," composed 
mainly of the principal heads of departments, with a chair- 
mem whose powers vary at the discretion of the Cabinet, or 
in the hands of an individual to whom such a cabinet 
serves merely as a consultative council ? The answer seems 
to depend on considerations broadly similar to those that 
we have already had to balance in dealing with the 
organisation of particular departments ; except that in the 
case of the Cabinet the consideration of "undivided re- 
sponsibility" becomes less important; since, in dealing 
with high matters of policy, even if responsibility is equally 
diffused among all the members of a cabinet, the burden 
resting upon each member appears sufficiently heavy. Still, 
there would doubtless be important advantages — especially 
at crises — in placing the whole business of administration 
under the direction of a single mind ; provided there is a 
fair prospect that this mind will be really able to grasp 
and master it effectually. The probability of this is likely 
to vary with the size of the State, and the extent and 
complexity of governmental business : but perhaps we may 
assume, in the case of such a State as England, that the 
effective management of any one important department will 
demand the concentrated energy of a man of first - rate 
ability ; and if so, it would seem that only a man of very 
rare talents and industry will be able to maintain so much 
acquaintance with the working of different departments as 
to be safely trusted with an overruling decision in all cases. 
And if such a man has the gifts that would, under any 
system of appointment by merit, bring him to the head of 
the government, he may be expected, where a Cabinet is 
formally supreme, to ficquire prominent weight in it, and 
even a kind of informal dictatorship at any crisis that 
specially requires individual rula On the other hand, if 
no such rare genius is forthcoming ; and if, therefore, any 
available head of the whole executive is likely to have, at 
best, little more than the average ability of the head of a 
leading department, probably more harm than good would 



424 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

result from giving him the power of finally deciding all 
important executive questions: as he would be liable to 
intervene disturbingly, with inferior insight, in each depart- 
ment in turn, when its business became specially interesting, 
and when, therefore, it was probably in special need of 
consistent as well as skilful treatment. 

In any case, in order to maintain continuously the 
concentration of responsibility in each department, which 
we before saw to be desirable, the intervention of the 
supreme cabinet or individual in deciding any matter 
should not be held to relieve the head of the department 
of his responsibility for the decision, in the same way 
as the order of the head of the department relieves his 
subordinates of responsibility. In the latter case the sub- 
ordinates remain responsible, of course, for the legality of 
what they do under orders, but they cease to be responsible 
for its policy : the head of the department, on the other 
hand, should be held always responsible for the policy of 
the whole exercise of executive discretion in his department : 
it should tTierefore be his duty to resign, if important de- 
cisions, of which he strongly disapproves, are passed by the 
Supreme Executive. Hence, it may be observed, if the 
heads of departments are chosen within the service, it is 
important to provide that they should have the right of 
returning to the posts previously held by them, or to others 
of equal dignity and salary : since, otherwise, the uncertainty 
of the tenure of a headship may prevent the fittest man 
from accepting it. But, as I shall explain in the next 
chapter, this question does not arise under the system of 
Parliamentary government, as ordinarily worked. 

The question of i-esignation leads naturally to that of 
appointment and dismissal of heads of departments : which 
requires all the more careful consideration, because, as we 
shall see, the distribution of executive power within the 
Cabinet partly depends on the answer given to it. It seems 
clearly important that there should be an effective means 
of rapidly removing from their posts officials entrusted with 
extensive powers, if they should prove unfit. This may be 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 42S 

provided for either by appointment for a short fixed period, 
or by a tenure terminable at pleasure by some supervising 
authority. The advantage of the former method is that it 
is practically easier — as being a less violent measure — not 
to re-elect an unfit official than to remove him: on the 
other hand, an official irremovable for a fixed period may do 
much harm at a crisis, if, while palpably incompetent, he 
is so obstinately self-satisfied that public opinion cannot 
force him to resign. In either case we have to settle who 
is to pronoimce on the fitness or imfitness of the head of a 
department, — whether for purposes of appointment only, or 
for both appointment and dismissal It would seem that it 
must be either the supreme executive council or its head, 
or the legislature, or the citizens at larga Popular election, 
however, seems hardly more adapted to secure the special 
qualifications required for good administration in headships 
of departments than in subordinate posts :^ the choice, 
therefore, may be taken to lie between appointment by the 
legislature and by the supreme executive. The advantage 
which the former jurangement would give of securing 
harmony between legislation and administration, and its 
attendant drawbacks, will be considered in the next chapter : 
but if we merely regard efficiency, it seems clear that the 
majority of elected legislators are not likely to be so well 
qualified as the supreme Executive^ to select the most 
efficient heads of departments, or to dismiss them with 
thorough grasp and sound judgment of the evidence of 
their unfitness. At the same time, to give the power and 

^ I am not prepared to affirm with J. S. Mill {HcpreserUative Oovemjnent, 
chap. V.) that ''numerous bodies never regard special qualifications at all." 
But we may perhaps agree with him in holding that "there is no act which 
more imperatively requires to be performed under a strong sense of individual 
responsibility than the nomination to employments/' and ''scarcely any act 
respecting which the conscience of the average man is less sensitive." 

' I am not here considering the case of a legislative assembly that actually 
undertakes the business of administration, and assumes in fact supreme 
executive powers. I shall argue in the next chapter that such an assembly 
is not likely to perform executive functions well : but the assumption of 
such functions, in a regular and continuous way, would doubtless render it 
less unfit to appoint such managers of executive departments as it would 
require. 



426 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

responsibility of dismissing individual heads of departments 
to the Cabinet as a whole, would promote internal discussions 
and cabals tending to impair its harmonious working : more- 
over, this method of appointment could hardly be satisfactory 
in case a far-reaching change of policy should be required 
There seems therefore to be a decided advantage in giving 
both the power of appointment and — assmning dismissibility 
— of dismissal to an individual head : and this must greatly 
tend to increase his preponderance in the Cabinet, even if 
he has not formally more than a chairman's position. 

§ 7. We have now to observe that the decision of the 
questions discussed in the preceding section must practically 
depend to a large extent on the relation of the executive to 
the legislature Where the tenure of oflBce of the Cabinet 
as a whole is not for a fixed period but is terminable at any 
time by the majority of a representative assembly, the actual 
distribution of power among members of the Cabinet can 
hardly fail to be largely determined by their respective 
influence in the legislature and in the country. This may be 
illustrated by the case of England ; where the most important 
executive questions are practically ^ decided by a governing 
Cabinet whose head, the Prime Minister, under ordinary 
circumstances, practically appoints the other members of the 
Cabinet, and other heads of departments, summons Cabinet 
meetings and guides their deliberations. These functions 
naturally tend to give a special weight to his opinion in 
Cabinet discussions : and this weight is increased by the fact 
that his resignation would certainly cause a dissolution of 
the Cabinet, whereas the resignation of any other member 
would not necessarily have this effect.^ At the same time, 
as all members of the Cabinet are equally responsible for its 
decisions, and as in all cabinet appointments the Prime 
Minister is practically compelled to recognise the claims of 
influential members of his party in the legislature; — it 

^ I say '' practically,'* because its decisions are not formally binding : the 
law of the constitution knows nothing of the cabinet. 

* Of course the dissolution of the cabinet might be immediately followed 
by a reconstruction of the same elements ; but reconstructions are un- 
certain. 



XXI THE EXECUTIVE 427 

seems an exaggeration to say that '' power and responsibility 
are concentrated in the hands of"^ the Prime Minister. 
At any rate, so far as this is actually the case, this 
monarchical result must be attributed not so much to his 
position as practical head of the executive, but rather to his 
predominant influence in the legislature and the country : 
and the extent to which the statement is true would seem 
to vary considerably, as the relative popularity of prime 
ministers and their colleagues varies. 

§ 8. In what I have just said of the English type of 
government I have made no reference to the hereditary 
monarch, whose formal supremacy over the heads of execu- 
tive departments is indicated by the familiar term "minister," 
by which the latter are best known. As will be presently 
explained,^ this is not because I regard the functions of the 
hereditary monarch, in a country possessing representative 
institutions fully developed, as trivial or unimportant. But 
I take it to be undeniable that in our Constitution, as now 
established by the tradition of at least more than htdf a 
century, the general direction of the policy of the English 
executive is in the hands not of the hereditary monarch, 
but of a cabinet presided over by a prime minister, who, so 
long as he retains the confidence of the majority of the 
representative assembly, and of the majority of the electorate, 
is not practically removable by the monarch. And the same 
may be said of some at least of the Continental States which 
(for the most part recently) have adopted constitutions framed 
on the English model 

There is, indeed, a fundamenteilly different view of con- 
stitutional monarchy, which was in the last century the 
theoretically accepted English doctrine, and which is stiU 
maintained by leading publicists ^ in (Jermany, and appar- 
ently realised in the present (Jerman Empire. According to 
this view, the true constitutional monarch must govern as 

^ This is the view of Todd, Parliaynentary GovemjnerU, vol. ii. chap. iii. 
p. 173 ; adopted also by a well-informed contemporary writer, Mr. H. D. 
Traill, Central Oovemmentf in the ''English Citizen" series. 

' See chap. xxii. § 4. 

^ See, «.(/., Bluntschli, Theory of the States Book VI. ch. xv. xvi. 



428 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxi 

well as reign : and though, being irresponsible, it is necessary 
— as a protection against tyranny — that he should be con- 
stitutionally incompetent to perform any executive act 
without the co-operation of a responsible minister, still it is 
his duty in all such acts to exercise an independent judg- 
ment on the advice offered by his ministers, and to keep 
the reins of administration firmly in his own handa 

The advantages and drawbacks of this system will be 
examined in the next chapter. My aim here is merely to 
emphasise the essential difference — as regards the constitu- 
tion of the supreme executive — between the (Jennan type 
of government, which may be called Simple Constitutional 
Monarchy, and the English type, which we shall find it 
convenient to distinguish sometimes as "English Parlia- 
mentary Gk)vemment," sometimes as " English Constitutional 
Monarchy," according to the point of view from which it is 
regarded. The person«d irresponsibility of the monarch, in 
the English view, is essentially connected with comparative 
powerlessness in current administration^ — it is held that 
the ministers who have the sole responsibility for executive 
acts must also have the decisive will in doing them; whereas, 
in the German view, legal irresponsibUity is an essential 
attribute of supreme power, which is held to be vested in the 
monarch. It may be further observed that the " Constitu- 
tional responsibility " of ministers is differently conceived in 
the two views : in the German view it means — ^primarily, 
if not solely — their liability to punishment for illegal or 
corrupt use of their power : in the English view the most 
important part of the meaning is, that ministers are liable 
to dismissal if their policy is disapproved by a majority of 
the representative assembly and of the electorate. This 
difference is, of course, due to the essentially different rela- 
tions between the executive and the legislature in the two 
systems : which we will now proceed to examine further. 

^ I shall explain in the next chapter why and how important powers still 
remain to the monarch in the English form of government. 



CHAPTEE XXII 

THE RELATION OF THE LEGISLATURE TO THE EXECUTIVE 

§ 1. The relation of the Supreme Executive to the Legis- 
lative organ is one of the knottiest points in constitutional 
construction; it is variously conceived by different theo- 
retical politicians who agree in accepting the principle of 
popular control over legislation, and variously determined 
in different modem states in which a popularly elected 
assembly is actually a main element of the legislature. 
Moreover, in England since the accession of the House of 
Hanover, and in other West-European States more recently, 
this relation has, to an important extent, been determined 
rather by custom and opinion than by constitutional law : 
and, as we shall see, there are reasons for thinking this 
likely to be the case in future, in the type of polity histori- 
cally developed in Western Europe. Hence, in any directly 
practical consideration of this relation, special regard would 
have to be paid to the constitutional traditions of the 
particular country in question, and the actutd state of 
political thought in it. Accordingly, in the present treatise 
I think it best not to attempt a single solution of the 
problem; but rather to characterise the chief methods of 
dealing with it which experience has presented, so far as 
they seem at all acceptable, to point out their advantages 
and drawbacks, and to make some suggestions as to the 
particular modification of each method which seems most 
likely to be stable and eflBcacious. 

In a previous chapter it was shown that the legislature. 



430 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

from the nature of its functions, must be, in a certain 
manner and degree, supreme over the other organs of govern- 
ment : since, as legislative, it has to lay down the general 
rules which the executive and the judiciary, no less than 
other members of the community, are bound to obey ; while 
as the money-granting organ, it has complete control over 
any fresh expenditure that either of the other organs may 
require. Hence the most obvious and simple mode of 
determining the relations between the legislature and 
executive would seem to be that of complete subordination 
— i.e. that the supreme executive should be appointed by 
the legislature, bound to carry out any resolution it may 
pass, and simply dismissible at its will In this way the 
perfect harmony between the two organs, which is manifestly 
conducive if not indispensable to efficient government, might 
be easily and thoroughly secured. To attain this result, 
however, it seems necessary that the legislature should 
consist of a single body, capable of corporately deciding any 
question brought before it by a simple majority of votes, 
and not of two or more bodies, each of which can check 
the rest: since otherwise the desired harmony would be 
liable to be marred by a conflict among the bodies of which 
the legislatm-e is composed, sustaining a conflict between one 
or more of these bodies and the executive. 

This arrangement — on the assumption that the single 
legislative body is a numerous assembly, chosen at intervals 
of a few years by the citizens at large ^ — may be distin- 
guished as Simple Parliamentary Government. Its sim- 
plicity is an obvious and real merit: but the institution 
has not been adopted by any modern state, and appears to 
be open to very serious objections. The first of these is 
the consideration to which J. S. Mill gives most weight in 
favour of two legislative chambers, — " the evil effect pro- 
duced upon the mind of any holder of power, whether an 

^ In chap, xxvii. I shall consider whether the elected legislators should 
be, in their turn, dismissible at will by their constituents. This is }>erhaps 
the most natural arrangement according to one rather prevalent view of 
representative government : but I do not think it would be a good arrange- 
ment : and it seems more convenient to defer the discussion of it. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 431 

individual or an assembly, by the consciousness of having 
only themselves to consult. It is important that no set of 
persons should be able, even temporarily, to make their sic 
volo prevail, without asking any one else for his consent. 
A majority in a single assembly, when it has assumed a 
permanent character, easily becomes despotic and over- 
weening " ^ if released from all external check on its power. 
Further, an assembly that can dismiss the executive at 
will must be expected to grasp, either occasionally or per- 
manently, the supreme direction of the business of the 
executive: if, as is not unlikely, its control were only 
exercised in a fitful and irregular way, when any afiair 
reached a specially interesting crisis, its intervention would 
be almost certainly ignorant and impulsive: while if its 
control were of a more settled and regular kind, it would 
practically become the supreme executive, and the govern- 
ment would be liable to the disadvantages — before noticed ^ 
— that attend on the union of legislative and executive 
functions in the same hands. And even apart from the 
general objections to this cumulation of functions, it seems 
improbable that a numerous assembly, whose members are 
elected for a short period, would make a good supreme 
council for the administration of current affairs : especially 
where considerations of importance in deciding an adminis- 
trative question could not be made public without detri- 
ment to the community. This latter is most likely to be 
the case in foreign affairs : and here further — apart from 
any need of secrecy — there is reason for doubting whether 
a representative assembly will be well qualified for manag- 
ing wisely the external relations of the community. To 
the consideration of internal affairs a truly representative 
assembly is likely to bring — at the lowest estimate of the 
elector's faculty of choice — an important and indispensable 
element of the knowledge that a statesman ought to possess. 
For in such a body the political needs and aspirations of 
all the different sections of the community will find ex- 
pression ; and what even comparatively unenlightened and 

^ Representative Oovemiruntt chap. xiii. ' Chap. xix. §. 7. 



432 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

half-instructed persons feel and want in such matters is 
worth knowing ; they can at any rate tell us exactly where 
the shoe pinches, and their experience may help us some- 
what in finding a remedy. But in foreign affairs what the 
ordinary members of any community desire is, for the most 
part, the attainment of very vague and general ends — peace 
as far as possible, the respect of other nations, justice 
according to their own view of it in any collision of in- 
terests, and victory when they go to war: and the best 
means of realising these often incompatible ends can only 
be ascertained by a kind of study and experience different 
from that which an average member of the representative 
assembly can be relied on to possess. Again, in foreign 
affairs — especially when a nation is in keen competition 
and danger of conflict with vigilant and energetic rivals — 
we require combinations and preparations for remote con- 
tingencies, a power of concluding agreements with great 
promptitude, and a stability and consistency of policy 
which neither reason nor experience would lead us to 
expect in a numerous rapidly-changing assembly. And 
finally, as I before noted, what was said of thejpWm(i/acz> 
natural supremacy of legislative over executive functions in 
internal affairs applies much less in this other department : 
since the external relations of a community are hardly 
capable of being regulated by definite, stringent, and per- 
manent general rulea If, then, to avoid the dangers of 
disunited and conflicting directions at a crisis, it is im- 
portant that the ultimate control of internal and external 
executive functions should be in the same hands, we are led 
strongly to the conclusion that it is undesirable to make 
the executive the simple agent of the legislature. 

§ 2. If, however, in view of these considerations, we 
suppose a large share of power — such as the English 
Cabinet possesses — to be allowed by custom and opinion 
to the supreme Executive, still remaining simply dismis- 
sible at the will of the legislature, new drawbacks and 
dangers present themselves; — the drawbacks and dangers 
of a Parliamentaiy Executive. I use this term to denote 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 433 

the arrangement by which the headships of the most 
important departments of the Executive ai*e allotted to 
leading members of the majority in the Legislature. It is 
important to observe that this arrangement is not a neces- 
sary consequence of the undisputed supremacy of Parlia- 
ment : rather we may say that a parliament really govern- 
ing, in the popular sense of the term — i.e. really managing 
current affairs — would hardly make room for what I call a 
Parliamentary Executive. If we suppose Parliament to 
keep the control of current administration effectively in its 
own hands — dividing the determination of all important 
questions between the assembly in full session and com- 
mittees appointed for the different departments of work — 
it would only require further such executive heads as the 
highest permaTient ofl&cials in the English administration 
now are ; persons of ability and experience, and often large 
influence, but accustomed to carry out unquestioningly the 
decisions of their parliamentary chiefa Such permanent 
heads would be obviously fitted to supply the element of 
continuous special experience in which Parliament and its 
committees would be likely to be wanting; and, as this 
kind of subordinate work would not offer an irresistible 
piize to the parliamentary leaders, it would be natural to 
keep the management of the executive departments, under 
Parliament, in the hands of such permanent officials, chosen 
for their qualifications for their special work, — the leaders of 
the dominant majority in Parliament taking the position of 
chairmen of the respective governing conmiittees. Under 
these circumstances it would doubtless be difficult to pre- 
vent parliament from being an avenue to the posts : but at 
any rate it might be hoped that any member of parliament 
appointed would have some claims to special fitness for his 
post; and when appointed he would give up his parlia- 
mentary position. Appointments in the Executive woidd, 
in short, resemble appointments in the Judiciary under the 
present English system; by which parliamentary lawyers 
are often made judges, but a man ignorant of law could not 
practically be made a judge, although a man ignorant of 

2f 



434 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

finance may be made Chancellor of the Exchequer. This 
might, perhaps, turn out to be the least unsatisfactory plan 
for working simple Parliamentary Government, in spite of 
the disadvantages inseparable from administration by a 
numerous elected assembly. 

But if, to avoid these disadvantages, large powers be 
left to the supreme executive, the exercise of these powers 
can hardly fail to be an object of the highest political 
ambition, while at the same time the parliamentary 
majority will naturally demand that they should be en- 
trusted to persons who have its confidence. The chief 
executive posts will therefore be filled by parliamentary 
leaders, who, though they will be probably persons of 
general intellectual force, are more likely to be distin- 
guished for oratorical gifts and parliamentary tact than for 
administrative talent. This is one disadvantage of a par- 
liamentary executive ; another is that the prize thus offered 
to parliamentary ambitions is likely to stimidate intrigues 
and combinations for personal ends. The ministers will 
thus be in constant danger of being thrown out of ofiice by 
such intrigues ; or from honest changes of political opinion, 
whenever the majority supporting them in the legislature is 
either small or naturally unstable from the multiplicity of 
party divisions.^ In view of these dangers, they will be 
drawn to devote a large share of their attention to the 
business of managing the legislature, and their energies are 
thus likely to be distracted from their proper work. 

§ 3. In tlie modification of Parliamentary Government 
which has gradually been developed in England, under the 
forms of constitutional monarchy, the objections to a Parlia- 
mentary executive are diminished by the power which the 
executive possesses of dissolving parliament. In all cases 
where this system is actually working, the legislature con- 
sists of two chambers ; but it will be convenient for the 
present to ignore the Senate or Upper Chamber ; and in so 

* I shall hereafter point out (chap, xxix.) as a merit of the two-party 
system that it tends to reduce this danger, though it does not completely 
get rid of it. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 435 

doing we shall not diverge very materially from actual facts, 
as this chamber has usually little share in the control exer- 
cised by parliament over the executive. In this form of 
Government the practical head of the executive is practically 
though not formally selected by the majority of the repre- 
sentative assembly, — at least when the choice of this 
majority is clear and decided; while the other members 
of the supreme Executive Council or Cabinet are also 
leading members of the same majority (or persons of simUar 
views in the second chamber). But, when formed, the 
Cabinet is not removable at the will of the representative 
assembly that practically appointed its head : the executive 
has by established constitutional custom the power of 
dissolving the body by which it was indirectly appointed 
— or any subsequently elected assembly — and causing a 
new election. It is the recognised duty of the Cabinet 
to resign office, unless it can obtain the support of the 
majority of a representative assembly : and should it refuse 
to resign after a vote of want of confidence, it would be 
regarded as the constitutional right of the assembly — ^and 
the proper course under the circxmistances — to compel iti 
resignation by refusing to furnish supplies -} but the execu- 
tive may always by a dissolution appeal to the electorate 
from any particular assembly with which it may disagree 
on any vital question of policy. In this way two residts 
are attained : there is normally a close harmony between the 
Cabinet and the assembly, any breach in which tends to be 
rapidly healed by a change in the personnel of one or the 
other organ: while at the same time the two bodies 
mutually check each other in a manner which tends to 
remove from either the temptations that arise from the 
consciousness of supreme power. If the representative 
assembly could simply dismiss the Cabinet at any moment, 
the latter might be compelled to watch its drifts of opinion 

^ In England the resignation of ministers might also be compelled by 
refusing to pass the annual Mutiny Act authorising the discipline required 
for the army. But in the CTontinental adaptations of English constitutional 
methods, Refusal of Supplies is generally recognised as the normal method 
of enforcing pai-liamentary control over the executive. 



436 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and gusts of sentiDient with the aame absolute subserviencj- 
with which an Eastern vizier watches the whims and 
humours of an individual But when the executive has 
the power of dissolving the assembly the ease is altered : 
first, liecause the majority in the representative assembly 
can never be certain that it rather than the executive will 
be supported by the nation : and secondly, because an election 
ie usually a troublesome crisis in the parliamentary careei' 
of a representative, which he has, therefore, a personal 
inducement to postpone. Thus while parliamentary control 
effectually checks any misuse of power by the executive, 
which the ijarliamentary majority would diaipprove, on the 
other hand the power of dissolution enables the executive 
to resist any caprices and vagaiies on the part of the 
legislature, which the majority of the electorate, if appealed 
to, would disapprove ; and at the same time the possibility 
of any prolonged conttict between the two is completely 
excluded. 

The essential features of this system are independent 
of the existence of the hereditary monarch who, in most 
coimtries under Parliamentary Government, formally appoints 
the practical heatl of the executive. If the Prime Minister 
in England, or any country that has adopted tlie Englii^h 
type of " constitutional monarchy," were appointed directly 
by the House of Commons, the whole business of govern- 
ment might go on without any material change — at least 
in ordinarj- times. The question therefore arises how far 
Buch an official as the hcredifeiry monarch has come to be 
is needed in a constitution of the English type, except to 
maintain the continuity of constitutional development in a 
country that has been more mouai-chically governed. At 
present the hereditary monareh in such a constitution is the 
highest representative of the executive on all ceremonial 
occasions, and has to give formal assent to the most important 
executive acta. He has a right to have full infomiation aa 
to the groimds of all such acts, and to i-equire them to be 
discussed with him before his assent is given. But he has 
not, according to the existing constitutional uitdeistanding; 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 437 

a right to choose his ministers independently of Parliament, 
or to impose his own policy on them : if there is an irrecon- 
cilable disagreement in policy between him and them, the 
monarch is bound to give way — at least if their designs are 
not illegal, and if they are supported by a majority of the 
representative assembly and of the electorate. Let us con- 
sider, then, how far it would be desirable to establish such a 
hereditary monarch— or an elected official having correspond- 
ing functions — in (say) an English colony that was carrying 
out a peaceful separation from the mother country, and 
equipping itself for perfect political independenca 

§ 4. In examining the effects of such an institution it 
will be well to distinguish between the normal functions 
of the monarch — ^as it will be convenient to call him — in 
ordinary times, and his exceptional functions in relation to 
actual or possible changes of government. Among the 
former, if we are considering the actual social conditions 
under which the English type of constitutional monarchy 
exists in West-European states, we must certainly count 
as important, from its efiTect on popular imagination, the 
additional appearance of stability which the government 
gains by the permanence of its formal head amid the 
changes of ministries. The liability of these changes to 
occur with disturbing frequency is one of the defects of 
this form of government: and if it be said that the bad 
effect of such changes on the work of government is rather 
veiled than diminished by the unsliaken permanence of the 
hereditary monarch, we may fairly answer that to veil it is 
to mitigate it; owing to the practical importance of the 
prestige of government, in producing a general sense of 
confidence among the governed, and maintaining the habit 
of willing obedience. It seems probable, however, that as 
the political consciousness of a nation grows, and the 
sentiment of loyalty to the State comes generally to take 
the place of that personal feeling towards the (so-called) 
" sovereign " which West-European communities have in- 
herited from an earlier stage of development, this utility of 
hereditary monarchy will diminish. 



438 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

But further, the mere permanence of the position of the 
monarch, with the central and intimate acquaintance that 
he tends to have with all governmental affairs, affords an 
opportunity for an able man to acquire such political 
knowledge and experience as ought to qualify him for 
rendering valuable aid in the actual work of government. 
Such aid, in ordinary times, would be given mainly in the 
way of advice, whicli, in the last resort, the responsible 
minister w^ould have by constitutional usage a right to 
reject. But wise counsel based on long experience, from 
one superior in formal rank, is likely to have much effect on 
the decision of questions which the responsible ministers 
admit to be doubtful and difficult : and in fact — though an 
exact estimate is naturally unattainable — it is commonly 
believed that the counsels of monarchs of ability have often 
been influential, even in States in which the present English 
view of constitutional monarchy is fully accepted. 

The fimction just described is one, in the exercise of 
which a monarch, if able and energetic, may do much good ; 
while, if stupid or weak and frivolous, he can do little harm, 
except in the way of wasting time. The same cannot, how- 
ever, be said of the power which the constitution actually 
leaves to the monarch — and which can hardly be withdrawn 
without reducing monarchy to an empty ceremonial — of 
successfully opposing his will to that of his minister, on 
any points which for any reason the minister is unwilling 
to carry by threatening resignation. The exercise of this 
power may indeed be highly salutary ; but it may also be 
inconvenient and mischievous. It will tend to be generally 
salutary, so far as it prevents measures that involve a 
violation or straining of law, such as the majority of the 
legislature would shrink from supporting, if challenged by 
the monarch : or, again, corrupt measures, which might in 
the ordinary course of things escape censure, but would 
certainly meet with general disapproval, if exposed with all 
their circumstances to the full glare of publicity. On the 
other hand, the monarch's power is likely on the whole to 
be mischievous, so far as the responsible minister has exer- 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 439 

cised his judgment honestly within legal limits, and merely 
gives way on minor points from a desire to gratify the 
monarch ; or because it is his interest to avoid friction, 
lest a decided aversion on the monarch's part may at some 
future conjuncture prove an impediment to his ambition. 
On the whole, we may say that if the monarch's power of 
opposing up to the point at which the minister would 
threaten resignation is kept in ordinary use, it is likely to 
do more harm than good, though the harm will be of a 
minor kind : if it is regarded as a reserve power to check 
abuses, it ca,n hardly fail to do more good than harm, and 
the benefit may occasionally be considerable. 

So far I have supposed that the disagreement between 
the monarch and his minister does not lead to the resigna- 
tion of the Cabinet. But even if the conflict is pressed to 
this result, and if the Cabinet is supported by the majority 
of the representative assembly, the monarch's power of 
resistance is not necessarily at an end ; since he may appeal 
from Parliament to the electorate, by dissolving the repre- 
sentative assembly, provided he can find ministers willing to 
take the responsibility of this measure. It is quite con- 
sistent with the general scheme of English constitutional 
monarchy that the monarch should have this power : and I 
believe that — according not only to law but to the generally 
accepted constitutional understanding — the monarch in 
England is still held to have it : though it has not been 
exercised since 1834. That is, the monarch would not act 
unconstitutionally by dismissing his ministers, even though 
they had the confidence of a majority in the representative 
assembly, and appointing others, who woidd then dissolve 
the assembly, in hopes of changing the balance of parties in 
Parliament by a new election. Of course, if this hope were 
disappointed the new Cabinet would have to resign at once : 
in which case the monarch would incur the reproach of 
having caused a troublesome and costly interruption of 
political business with no useful result. Hence this power 
is not likely to be used except when the monarch has strong 
reason to think that the Cabinet and representative assembly 



440 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

together will be found in disagreement with the majority of 
the electorate as well as with himself. And under these 
conditions the exercise of such a power would probably be 
on the whole beneficial ; although, according to the line of 
reasoning adopted in the present treatise, it is not an un- 
doubted gain, nor the main object of the representative 
system, to secure that the executive and legislative organs 
of government shall follow as closely as possible all change 
in popular opinion and sentiment.^ 

It is a different question whether the monarch should 
have the right of refusing a dissolution when his Cabinet 
wishes for one, in consequence of its disagreement with the 
majority of the representative assembly. It is admitted 
that the monarch in England — and (I believe) in other 
countries which have adopted the English type of govern- 
ment — actually possesses this power of refusal : i.e. he could 
practically exercise it, without any breach of constitutional 
custom, if the leaders of the majority in the representative 
assembly were willing to form a ministry. And the exercise 
of such a power is certainly compatible with tlie fullest 
maintenance of ministerial responsibility, and cannot lead 
to any conflict tetween the executive and the legislature : 
moreover it can only be used to prevent — not to cause — a 
troublesome disturbance of the course of political life. At 
the same time, its advantage on the whole seems to me 
doubtful: since the consequent imcertainty as to the Cabinet's 
power of dissolution must tend somewhat to alter tlie balance 
between the Cabinet and the legislature in favour of the 
latter ; and it seems to me that under any form of parlia- 
mentary government the executive is mther in danger of 
being too weak than too strong. Also, the possession of 
this power may tempt the monarch to give effect to a 
preference for one party in the State : he can, for instance, 
grant a dissolution when a Conservative Cabinet are at issue 

* See ch. xxvii. It is further to be said that this power of dissohition 
might be valuable in a crisis as a means of defeating the designs of an 
ambitious minister, meditating a coup d'dtat. But it might equally be used 
to promote revolution, either by an ambitious monarch aiming at an increase 
of his power, or by a weak monarch worked as a puppet by others. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 441 

with the House of Commons, and refuse it to a Liberal 
Cabinet in the same situation : and such preferences are sure 
to cause friction and discontent. 

Finally : there are certain cases in which the monarch, 
however fully he has accepted the principle of parliamentary 
government, will have some substantial as well as formal 
power of selecting his ministers. For instance, if the parlia- 
mentary majority has no clearly marked leader, either from 
political divisions within it or from equality of personal 
claims, it is always possible that the monarch's selection of 
a Prime Minister may be generally acquiesced in as a 
tolerably satisfactory solution of a difiBcult problem, although 
a different man would have gained the majority of votes in 
the assembly. Again, though, under ordinary circumstances, 
constitutional morality would prevent the monarch from 
endeavouring to control the Prime Minister's choice of his 
colleagues, this rule admits of exceptions: e,g, party ties 
might lead a Prime Minister to recommend for office a 
politician whose reputation was so bad, that it would be in 
the monarch's power to refuse assent without incurring 
popular disapproval The existence of this occasional power 
would seem to be a clear advantage, though not a very 
important one. 

I have analysed carefully the functions, other than 
merely formal or merely consultative, of the English 
constitutional monarch, because I think it important to 
show exactly how much substantial power may be allotted 
to him consistently with a complete acceptance of the 
principle of Parliamentary Government. My conclusion is 
that the exercise of these powers is likely to have, on the 
whole, a good effect on the working of a parliamentary 
executive; though the benefits are balanced by not in- 
considerable drawbacks But, in any case, I do not conceive 
that if these powers were withdrawn, the other utilities of 
monarchy could be permanently retained. For if the 
monarch's public actions were ever absolutely reduced to a 
performance of merely formal and ceremonial duties, his 
private counsels would soon come to be listened to with a 



442 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

merely formal respect, and — as his real impotence would 
become known — the institution would lose the prestige 
that renders it a source of stability. If constitutional 
monarchy is to be retained as a permanent form of parlia- 
mentary government, I am convinced that the monarch 
must have at least as much real power as I have above 
attributed to him. 

§ 5. It remains to be considered whether the official 
who exercises these powers should attain his office by in- 
heritance. Actually — with the single ^ exception of France 
— the relation between the executive and the legislature 
that I have been describing has never been established 
in an independent state without a hereditary monarch as 
formal head of the executive. And there are certainly 
strong reasons — apart from historical continuity — for re- 
taining this institution ; since hereditary succession affords 
the best prospect of securing in the monarch due impartiality 
in relation to current political factions ; and the impression 
of stability, which is a valuable result of this permanent 
formal headship, is likely to be aided by the influence over 
popular sentiment which hereditary dignity now gives. 
But, on the other hand, the ceremonial and sentimental part 
of the monarch's utility seems likely to be only temporarily 
needed in an age of transition : while, in view of the services 
that he might render as a di^pdi of experience and source of 
counsel for transient ministries — and occasionally in resisting 
illegal or con-upt proposals, and in determining dissolutions 
and selecting first ministers — intellectual qualifications seem 
to be required such as heredity can hardly be expected to 
secure. On the whole, we may perhaps conjecture that if 
the English form of parliamentary government should ever 
be adopted in a modern state, otherwise than by the conces- 
sion of a hereditary monarch, who retains his position while 
sacrificing a portion of his power, it is hardly likely that the 
formal headship of the executive would be made hereditary. 

^ Moreover, the ParUainentary Govemnient of the present French Republic 
does not exactly realise the type above described, because in France the right 
of dissolution can only be exercised with the consent of the Senate. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 443 

Supposing that the fxinctions of the English constitu- 
tional monarch are to be given to an elected President, the 
period for which he is elected should be long enough to give 
the advantages of stability ; but not so long as to render it 
difficult to avoid the drawbacks of senility, while electing a 
statesman of ripe experience. 

§ 6. One important consequence of the harmony that 
the English system — and indeed any system which includes 
a parliamentary executive — establishes between the execu- 
tive and legislative organs, has yet to be noticed : viz. that 
the Cabinet naturally has the initiative in all important 
legislation. Composed as it is, entirely or mainly, of leading 
members of the legislature, who as heads of departments 
have at their command the most recent executive experience 
of the working of existing laws, it is for some purposes 
the best committee that could be appointed to frame new 
laws ; ^ and the advantage of a single strong committee for 
preparing legislative business has already been dwelt on. 
In fact, this prepturation of laws is so prominent and striking 
a part of the function of the Cabinet in the English system 
as actually worked, that probably many persons, if they 
were asked to give a general accoxmt of the fxmctions of 
ministers, would put first and foremost the duty of framing 
and carrying legislative measures. 

The result at which we have thus arrived is historically 
somewhat curious. On the one hand, in the English consti- 
tution of the eighteenth century, the cardinal point noted 
for eulogy by its admirer Montesquieu was the security for 
freedom given by se'paration of powers — legislative, executive, 
and judicial. On the other hand, one of the most conspicuous 
features of the actual working of the same constitution, in 
the nineteenth-century phase of its development, is the union 
of legislative and executive functions in the same hands. 
The ministers whose functions according to constitutional 
law are entirely executive have come to be practically also a 

^ I do not, however, think it necessary or desirable that so much legis- 
lative work should bo thrown on the Supreme Executive as is actually 
undertaken by the English Cabinet. See § 10. 



444 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

committee appointed by the majority in the representative 
assembly for the purpose of framing legislative measures : 
while the House of Commons is constantly concentrating its 
attention on its customary duty of modifying by criticisms 
and suggestions the most important and interesting ])oints in 
the executive policy of the Cabinet, as well as its legislative 
proposala 

§ 7. The harmony thus secured between these two chief 
oi^ns of government is in itself an undeniable gain, llut 
it must be admitted to be purchased by serious dniwbacks, 
to a large extent similar to those of Simple Parliamentarj' 
Government. In the first place, the advantages of division 
of governmental labour tend to be lost iu the fusion or 
confusion of legislative and executive functions above 
described ; ministers are liable to be distracted from their 
executive duties by the work of preparing legislative 
measures and carrying them through Parliament ; while 
Parliament is tempted away from legislative problems by 
interesting questions of current ailministration, in which, 
especially in foreign affairs, it is liable to interfere to an 
excessive extent. This evil is no doubt diminished by the 
counter-check exercised on the assembly when the Cabinet 
has the power of dissolution, but it is by no means removed : 
to maintain harmony between the two organs, the executive 
is continually led to udopt not what it considers on the 
whole the best course, but the course which it regards as 
most easily defensible in the face of parliamentary criticisui, 
or lejist likely to provoke it The burden of legislative 
work now laid on the Cabinet might no doubt be materially 
reduced by a proper devolution of the details of legislation 
on standing committees of the legislature, didy aided by a 
Legislative Council or other iiermancnt boily of legal experts ; 
but it would probably be difficult to lighten it sutticiently 
so long as the present system of party government ' is 
maintained. 

Again, the English tj'pe of " Cabinet Government " — 
us IJagehot calls it — shares, to a serious extent, in the 
' Sec cli«p. xxix. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 445 

instability which we have recognised as a defect of Simple 
Parliamentary Government.^ The supreme executive is 
liable to be upset at any moment by a breeze of popular 
disfavour, if the dominant majority in the representative 
chamber is either small or wanting in coherence : and in 
the latter case it is also liable to be upset by a new com- 
bination of parties in the chamber, — aided perhaps by per- 
sonal intrigues — if the opportunity for the combination is 
skilfully chosen, so that the newly-formed majority is not 
reversed on an appeal to the country. Thus, the mere 
uncertainty of tenure of office tends to render it very 
difficult for the executive to adopt a far-sighted and 
consistent policy.^ 

Another important defect of this system is its tendency 
to entrust the headship of the different departments of the 
executive to persons who are not — from a strictly executive 
point of view — experts. The Premier's choice of the heads 
of departments is seriously limited by the connection of the 
Cabinet with the legislature. He is practically forced to 
select them among the leading speakers of his party in the 
representative assembly, in order that the defence of his 
measures before the assembly may be as strong as possible. 
Hence there is no adequate presumption that they will 
possess even general administrative ability in a high degree : 
still less that they will possess the special knowledge required 
for particular departments. Nor will the prime minister 
even be able to distribute them among the posts in the 

* See p. 434. 

^ I ought perhaps to notice here a more remote risk of instability attach- 
ing to the English form of Parliamentary Government, which is not found 
in the 8imi)le fonn : viz. that the nominal head of the executive — whether 
hereditary or elected — may be tempted to grasp at a real share of power, 
corresponding to that which he formally possesses, and with this object to 
intrigue against his ministers and endeavour to gain partisans and popularity 
of his own. Parliamentary government, in the form of constitutional mon- 
archy, rests only on custom and opinion : it could be gradually metamorphosed, 
without any legal change, into simple constitutional monarchy, in which the 
monarch selects his own ministers and has a decisive influence in determining 
their policy : and the process of change — whatever may be thought of its 
results — could not but be disturbing and weakening to the efficiency of 
government. 



446 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

manner which would be best from an administrative point of 
view : since he will have to take into accoimt the relative 
dignity of different posts and to make this correspond 
to the parliamentary positions of the persons appointed.^ 
It follows that — especially when there are rapid changes of 
ministry — the heads of departments are liable to be persons 
who are not really qualified for managing, and if well 
advised do not attempt effectively to manage, the business 
of their departments. Hence there is an element of truth 
in the satire that represents Parliamentary government, under 
the form of constitutional monarchy, as resulting in a rider 
who merely pretends to rule, assisted by ministers who 
merely pretend to administer. 

There are, however, important considerations on the 
other side, which must not be overlooked.^ It is 
plausibly urged that, on the one hand, the special function 
of the parliamentary head of a department, which a 
permanent head could not so well perform, is to save 
his office from the deadly disease of routine, to act as a 
channel by which the useful part of outside complaints and 
criticisms may be forced on the attention of the ofiBcials 
who are too apt to despise them as uninstructed clamour : 
while, on the other hand, so far as the outside clamour 
is misdirected, the parliamentary head from his influence 
over the legislature is able to prevent unwise legislative 
interference with the department, far more effectively than 
an unparliamentary head could do — even if allowed a right 
of addressing the legislature. Thus, it is said, the parlia- 
mentary minister, even granting that in his administra- 
tive decisions he usually defers to the experience of his 
subordinates, is not to be regarded as a mere puppet : he 
is at once a conduit for useful influence, and a buffer 
against mischievous influence. 

* Even the conciliation of the jtarts of the country from which they come 
cannot be altogether neglected. 

^ They are forcibly urged by Bagehot in his book on the English Con- 
stitution : who maintains, moreover, that special experience is not so 
important as the critics of parliamentary ministers imply ; most businesses 
being more like each other in their upper parts than in their lower. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 447 

These arguments are not without weight: but it re- 
mains difficult to believe that any business can be under 
the best attainable management when the chief who has the 
whole responsibility of action lacks the knowledge and 
experience requisite for wise independent decisions. I 
conclude therefore that we have here a defect of the actual 
system of Parliamentary government, for which some 
remedy is needed, if governmental administration is to 
reach a high pitch of excellenca 

§ 8. A consideration of these defects has led some 
thinkers to the conclusion that they outweigh the advan- 
tages of any form of Parliamentary government, especially 
in a country whose foreign relations are of much importance 
and difficulty, requiring careful management. In a country 
like Grermany, in which representative institutions are of 
recent introduction and hereditary monarchy retains much 
of its old prestige, this conclusion leads influential j)ublici8ts 
to support the independence of the hereditary monarch in 
his choice of ministers, and in the direction of current 
administration within the limits of law. According to this 
view,^ the hereditary monarch, though it ought to be his 
aim to work in harmony with a representative assembly, 
ought not to be compelled to choose his ministers from the 
leaders of the parliamentary majority at any given tima 
The proper functions of Parliament, it is said, are legisla- 
tion and criticism, not nomination ; and though legislation 
includes the determination of the taxes to be paid by the 
citizens, it can never be the constitutional duty of the 
legislative assembly to make their criticism take effect in a 
general refusal of supplies ; — which is commonly considered 
in England to be the obvious constitutional resource for 
compelling a refractory monarch to take the ministers that 
Parliament approves. It is admitted that if the king's 
ministers do not possess the confidence of Parliament, the 

^ See for instance Bluntsclili's Ltlvre vom Modernen StcmU^ Part I. Book 
VI. ch. XV. and xvi., and Part II. Book II. ch. x. Other German publicists 
adopt a stiU more monarchical conception of Constitutional Monarchy, which 
substantially leaves the whole constitution dependent on the monarch's will. 



448 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

latter will legitimately manifest its distrust by refusing to 
support any dubious costly enterprises, foreign or domestic, 
in which the monarch and his ministers may wish to 
indulge, or only supporting them in a niggardly manner ; 
and it appears to be admitted that the obstacles thus con- 
tinually placed in the way of the monarch's designs are 
likely to lead, in the long run, to the retirement of a 
minister who cannot persuade Parliament to open its purse- 
strings ; but it is held that though in this way strong 
inducements are applied to the monarch to avoid a conflict 
with the assembly, these inducements ought never to amount 
to a moral coercion to take the leaders of the parliamentary 
majority as his ministers, or to let them dictate his policy. 
This system, in short, aims at making the real power of the 
monarch correspond to that formally given to him in the 
English Constitution, and others framed on its model : and I 
have accordingly termed it Simple Constitutional Monarchy. 
If we suppose a constitution of this kind established, 
and accepted without arrUre pensie, in a modern state, it 
seems quite conceivable that public opinion alone might 
prevent the legislature from so exercising its control over 
supplies, as to transfer the practical headship of the ex- 
ecutive from the monarch to a parliamentary leader ; since 
such an exercise of power would be a plain perversion of 
the express design of the constitution. And though the 
example of England would encourage attempts in this 
direction, it would also serve as a warning to the adherents 
of monarchy. At the same time this form of government 
would gain in stability if the independence of the monarch 
were protected from the encroachments of the representative 
assembly by other than merely moral restraints. Such 
protection may be given ^ by drawing a distinction be- 
tween " ordinary " and " extraordinary " expenditure and 
taxation, and fixing the ordinary budget ^permanently, like 

* I shall notice in the next chapter that such protection may to some 
extent be given by the institution of a Senate or Upper Chamber. At 
present, as I have before said, I assume that the representative assembly 
constitutes the ordinary legislative organ. 



xxii RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 449 

other matters legislatively determined, subject of course 
to modifications agreed upon by the assembly and the 
monarch. If the fixed taxation should exceed the fixed 
expenditure, a similar agreement would be required to 
dispose of the excess : in the opposite case of a deficit, the 
executive must have the power of imposing &esh taxes to 
the extent required to meet the deficit, until such taxes 
were imposed by the assembly. In this way the assembly's 
control over finance would become a less effective instru- 
ment for reducing the monarch to submission; but its 
power of defending the citizens from over-taxation would 
still be adequate to prevent unnecessary taxes from being 
imposed, or fresh expenditure incurred without its consent. 
Similarly, without impairing the security afforded by the 
representative system against new oppressive legislation, 
the monarch may be enabled by an effective right of 
"veto" to resist legislation designed to fetter and sub- 
jugate the executive ; indeed such a right of veto seems 
almost necessary to the stability of this form of govern- 
ment. The protection of the veto, however, may prove 
insufficient in the long run ; as, if in a weak moment the 
executive gives way, it may not be able to recover the lost 
ground. Hence, as a further barrier against such legisla- 
tive encroachments, it may be well that the assembly 
should be constitutionally^ restrained from interfering — 
otherwise than by criticism and the refusal of assent to 
new expenditure — in certain departments of executive 
business ; such as the selection of legally qualified persons 
for executive and judicial employment, conmiand of the 
army, and the management of foreign relations generally, 
except in the case of certain important decisions, in which 
the intervention of the legislature cannot well be excluded.* 
Measures of this kind might assist in securing a sub- 
stantial independence to the executive under the headship 
of the herditary monarch, without rendering illusory the 

^ The general expediency of such constitutional restraints on the ordinary 
legislature will be discussed in a subsequent chapter (xxvii.). 
^ This question is further discussed in § 11. 

2g 



450 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

popular control over legislation and taxation that is pro- 
vided by the representative system, and therefore without 
incurring the danger of unchecked bureaucracy. At the 
same time there are serious objections against giving so 
much power for life to an individual, whose moral and 
intellectual qualifications for its exercise are so uncertain 
as a hereditary monarch's must be. Moreover, such an 
arrangement involves the danger of an obstinate and irre- 
concilable conflict between the monarch and the majority 
of the citizena In a people whose political consciousness 
is fully developed, such a conflict when prolonged tends to 
become a serious political disorder : for all political order 
rests upon habitual obedience to government, which a 
certain amount of dislike and disapproval tends to under- 
mine. And it may be observed that in a society that 
takes a close and critical interest in public affairs there is 
a tendency for discontent with the executive government 
to grow and accumulate : since this organ exercises nor- 
mally a variety of invidious functions which almost inevit- 
ably tend to bring it into collision with individuals and 
classes; and every government makes mistakes. Such 
gathering clouds, in our present English system, are dis- 
pei'sed by changes of ministry. But if the executive has a 
permanent head who is morally responsible for what has 
been done, the legal irresponsibility which might be consti- 
tutionedly secured to him cannot be expected to shelter him 
from discontent : so that this method of restoring harmony 
of sentiment cannot be completely applied. This danger 
may be much diminished by skilful management — a " king- 
craft " that knows how to give way gracefully, stand firm 
without causing needless irritation, and energetically lead 
popular movements that it cannot safely resist. But it is 
evident that want of statesmanship in the monarch is 
likely to be much more harmful in this form of govern- 
ment than in the English form; and if a new constitu- 
tion were being framed for a modern state, the risk either 
of such a prolonged conflict as I have described, or of 
a prolonged misuse of power by an incompetent, irre- 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 451 

sponsible, and irremovable monarch, would seem to be too 
serious to run. 

Moreover, it seems likely that what I have called 
Simple Constitutional Monarchy will always have a certain 
tendency to pass over into the English type. For the con- 
trol over administration which must, I conceive, be allowed 
to the representative assembly, if its control over taxation 
is to be a reality, is so considerable, that a monarch who 
wishes to get any expensive plans carried out will always 
find it more convenient to manage Parliament than to fight 
it. He will thus be led to take as his first minister a 
person who has the confidence of the majority in the house 
of representatives, to avoid the annoyance and weakness 
resulting from friction with the assembly. A minister so 
chosen, and having consequently so strong a position in- 
dependent of the monarch's favour, will have a certain 
tendency to acquire the real control of executive functions.* 

§ 9. I conclude, then, that if in a modern state it be 
desired to give the executive greater stability and inde- 
pendence than can ordinarily be secured to it under Parlia- 
mentary Government, some modification of what Bagehot 
calls the "presidential system" of the United States is 
better adapted for the purpose than simple constitutional 
monarchy. According to this "presidential" system the 
supreme executive power is vested in a president elected by 
the people for a term of years ; his ministers are incapable 
of sitting as members of the legislature : and he is enabled 
to resist hampering legislation by a right of veto, except 
when a majority of two-thirds is opposed to him. A head 
of the executive so elected may of course come into conflict 
with the legislature, which may last till he lays down 

^ I do not at all mean to affirm that this tendency is irresistible : and I 
have already attributed to English constitutional monarchy a certain pos- 
sibility of change in the opposite way ; since the large power that it form- 
ally assigns to the hereditary monarch seems to offer both temptations and 
opportunities to an ambitious holder of the office to increase his real ix>vver. 
But in any case the unstable and fluctuating character that thus appears to 
belong generally to constitutional monarchy must be admitted to be a 
disadvantage, unless the type of government is regarded as essentially 
transitional. 



452 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

office : this is the unavoidable defect of such a constitution 
as compared with Parliamentary government. But as he 
will have the strength given by popular choice at the 
outset, and his power is only for a limited time, it is much 
less probable than in the case of the hereditary monarch 
that the assembly will adopt the extreme and highly incon- 
venient measure of refusing the supplies,— even if the 
constitution gives it an unlimited power of doing this.^ 
At the same time the president's inducements to take his 
ministers from the leaders of the parliamentary majority 
will be much diminished by the fact that becoming 
ministers they cease to be leaders. 

The sepcuration, however, between the legislature and 
the executive seems to be carried too far for convenience in 
the United States. It would seem better to give to the 
ministers the function of speaking * — though not the right 
of voting — in the legislature, in order to afford them full 
opportunity of explaining and defending executive acts 
that excite criticism, and co-operating in certain kinds of 
legislation. The president should have this right also, in 
order that this communication with the legislature may 

* This view is confirmed by the. recent experience of the United States. 
In 1867, in the struggle between the Republican party and President John- 
son, after the Civil War, Congress began to use its power of granting 
supplies to control the action of the executive ; it did not threaten to 
refuse supplies, but it tacked as a rider to the Army Appropriation Bill, a 
bill virtually depriving the President of the command of the army, and 
placing its management in the hands of General Grant. Johnson protested 
but signed the bill ; his veto would have been useless, as his opponents 
could have passed the bill over his veto by a two-thirds majority. From 
this time the practice of tacking measures of general legislation to the 
appropriation bills went on ; but usually not on account of conflict between 
Congress and President, but as an expedient to get necessary laws passed 
that might otherwise have been crowded out. In 1879, however, a conflict 
again arose between the dominant party in Congress and President Hayes, 
and similar tactics were tried by the former body ; but the dominant party 
had not now the requisite majority of two-thirds : the President resisted, 
vetoed one appropriation bill after another, and the parliamentary majority 
gave way. 

^ There is nothing in the constitution of the United States to prevent 
this ; though it has never been done since Washington's days. See Bryce, 
Ainerican Commonwealth^ Part I. chap. ix. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 453 

not gradually transfer supreme executive power from him 
to his ministers. 

We have further to observe that an executive appointed 
for a fixed period need not be monarchically organised, as 
the Federal Executive of the United States ia^ It would 
be quite possible to have a supreme executive organised 
like the English Cabinet, — or even one of which the mem- 
bers were practically more on an equality,^ — elected for a 
fixed period* by the legislature: though I think that, 
ceteris paribus, a higher standard of administrative effici- 
ency is likely to be maintained if the heads of departments 
are appointed by a single head — whether this head himself 
be elected by the legislature or directly by the people. In 
any case the fixed period should be, if possible, sufficiently 
long to gain the advantages of stability, and yet not long 
enough to weaken the sense of responsibility materially. 

By such a system some of the most serious disadvantages 
of parliamentary government would be avoided ; especially 
if independence were further secured to the executive by a 
permanent ordinary budget — or at least one fixed for the 
whole duration of its tenure. In this case, even if the ex- 
ecutive were appointed by the legislature, the motive for 
ambitious intrigues and combinations in the assembly would 
be much diminished, since they could have no immediate 

^ It is for this reason that I have not been able to use Bagehot's concep- 
tions of "Cabinet Government " and ** Presidential Government," except in 
a quite incidental way : since they seemed inevitably to mix up two ques- 
tions which I wished to keep distinct, — the question of the relation of 
the executive to the legislature, and the question as to the more or less 
monarchical organisation of the executive. 

' In the English system, the equality of members of the Cabinet, even if 
constitutionally established, could hardly be more than formal : since, 
when any serious disagreement between Cabinet and Parliament leads at 
once to the resignation of the former or the dissolution of the latter, 
individuals who have predominant influence in the House and the country 
must tend to have correspondingly predominant influence in the Cabinet. 
But if the Cabinet were separated from the legislature and appointed 
for a fixed period, the equality of voting power that might be secured to 
each member would have a much more substantial significance. 

' The Swiss Federal Council exemplifies this system : except that it lias 
less independence than I should propose to give to the executive. 



454 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

or certain effect in ousting the executive. And for a 
similar reason the executive would not be liable to be over- 
thrown by sudden drifts of opinion within or without the 
assembly : its administrative conduct during the fixed period 
would be judged as a whole at the expiration of the period.^ 

The system above described may be distinguished as 
that of a Periodical Executive ; as compared with Parlia- 
mentary government, it would, as I have said, necessarily 
have one disadvantage, — the danger of a temporarily in- 
soluble conflict between the legislature and the executive. 
To reduce this disadvantage to a minimimi, it would seem 
better that the executive should be elected by the legis- 
lature than by the country, as then the two organs would 
at any rate begin with harmony. This would not materi- 
ally diminish the independence of the executive; as it 
would not be dismissible by the legislature, and would not 
be re-elected — if at all — by the legislature that elected it. 

In discussing the relation of the executive to the 
assembly of representatives, I have attached importance to 
the power possessed by the former of dissolving the latter. 
If harmony between Cabinet and assembly is aimed at, on 
the principle that either is to give way if the other is 
supported by tlie electomte, then to give the Cabinet the 
right of responding to a vote of " no confidence " by a dis- 
solution seems to be the simplest and most effective way of 
attaining the desired end. But if the executive is not to be 
displewieable by the assembly, the advantage of allowing it 
to dissolve the latter seems at least doubtful; since the 
chance of restoring harmony by obtaining an assembly in 
agreement with the executive is balanced by the danger of 
greater strain on the constitution if the new parliament 
agrees with its predecessor, — the dissolution is then liable 
to have the air of an appeal to a judge whose decision is 
afterwards defied. It may be replied that even when the 
head of the executive — whether a president or a king who 

^ It will be argued in the next chapter that a Periodical Executive is 
better suited than Parliamentary government to the traditional method of 
constituting the legislature of two co-ordinate chambers. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 455 

■ — 

governs as well as reigns — holds ofl&ce permanently or for a 
considerable period, he should change his policy if it be 
disapproved by the people as well as by the assembly. 
But, granting this, if the system is intended to be stable, it 
would seem better to ascertain the people's sentiments 
otherwise than by a dissolution ; since a change of policy is 
likely to involve a change of ministers, and if such a change 
were palpably and repeatedly forced upon a monarch in 
consequence of dissolutions, it would be difficult to prevent 
the substance of executive power from passing to the 
leaders of the parliamentary majority. It would rather 
seem that " kingcraft " would be best shown in anticipat- 
ing a strong tide of popular aversion, and dropping an 
impopular minister with apparent spontaneity. 

§ 10. Assuming that the legislature does not undertake 
the management of current affairs, let us now pass to con- 
sider more closely the degree of independence which it is 
desirable to secure to the executive, by law or custom — 
however its relation to the legislature may be determined, 
in respect of appointment or dismissal We have seen it 
to be expedient that the executive should have some legis- 
lative powers on matters requiring regulations that vary 
from time to time according to circumstances; but that, 
for the security of the citizens at large, such powers should 
be ordinarily exercised for certain strictly defined ends, 
within limits fixed by the legislatura^ But I have ad- 
mitted that unforeseen occasions may arise, when the 
public welfare requires that the executive should act, in 
issuing commands, beyond its defined powera The ques- 
tion then arises how such salutary encroachments may be 
provided for with the minimum of harm or danger. 

There are two different ways of dealing with the prob- 
lem. (1) It may be made the duty of citizens to obey all 

^ See chap, xix., especially § 8. '*The substance no less than the form 
of the law," says Mr. Dicey {Law of the Con^ittUion, chap, i.), " would, it is 
probable, be a good deal improved, if the executive government of England 
could, like that of France, by means of decrees, ordinances, or proclama- 
tions having the force of law, work out the detailed application of the 
general principles embodied in the acts of the legislature." 



456 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

ordinances of the supreme executive, whether they are 
legally authorised or not, while the executive is made 
liable to penalties for issuing orders beyond its legal 
authority, unless its liability is afterwards removed by the 
legislature. This, however, seems a clumsy method, tend- 
ing to confuse and impair, in the citizens at large, the 
combined habits of respect for law and resistance to illegal 
coercion, both of which are important for the wellbeing of 
the community. (2) It would seem better to give the 
executive a general power of issuing ordinances having 
legal force without special authorisation; but subject to 
the restrictions that it is only to be exercised in case of 
urgency, that such ordinances are to be commimicated as 
soon as possible to the legislature, and that they cease to be 
valid if disapproved by that body.^ Here the question of 
cofUinuity in the exercise of functions by the legislature 
becomes important: since so long as Parliament is in 
session it can only be in very exceptional circumstances 
that the executive can have plausible grounds for acting 
without previous authorisation; while if such an excep- 
tional occasion did rise, the legislature could disapprove 
promptly of any oppressive or unwarrantable ordinances 
issued by the executiva If, on the other hand, there are 
considerable intervals between sessions of the legislature, 
the power thus given to the executive increases in danger- 
ousness in proportion to the length of the intervals. 
Actually in all modern states, it is customary for legis- 
lative assemblies to suspend their sittings for a considerable 
portion of each year : and the custom is defensible ; since 
the making of changes in laws is not necessarily a con- 
tinuous function; and representatives removed for the 
whole period of their tenure — even allowing for the brief 
holiday necessary for health — from the districts that they 
represented would be liable to lose touch of their constitu- 

^ If the legislature consists of two chambers, disapproval by either 
chamber should be sufficient to invalidate : otherwise the law might be 
modified to any extent by the executive together with the majority of one 
chamber, which would be contrary to the principle of the two-chamber 
system. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 457 

encies ; also the greater onerousness of the prolonged sever- 
ance from home and private affairs might inexpediently 
restrict the choice of legislators. If then, for these or 
other reasons, there is a considerable part of the year in 
which the legislature is not sitting, an imlimited right of 
issuing ordinances which have the force of laws during 
this period seems too formidable a power to grant to the 
executive. To obviate this danger the executive should 
be boimd to simimon the legislature for an extraordinary 
session at least simultaneously with — if not before — the 
issue of any ordinance which it has not been specially 
authorised to issue. 

It is a different question whether the executive should 
ever have the power of infringing the definite legal re- 
straints imder which its fimction of maintaining order is 
normally exercised — t,g, by arresting and detaining at its 
discretion persons suspected of dangerous designa It seems 
rash to deny that the exercise of such powers, even with- 
out special authorisation, may be advantageous in a dis- 
turbed condition of society : but we may reasonably require 
that such exceptional powers should only be assumed when 
there is — if not actual war, foreign or civil — at lecust 
imminent danger of violent and dangerous disorder ; and, 
of course, that the authorisation of the legislature should 
be as soon as possible obtained for the continued exercise 
of such powers. 

The assumption by the executive of the right of inflict- 
ing punishment as such, without the ordinary process of 
trial by an independent court of justice, can, I conceive, 
only be defended as a military measure, in time of actual 
war, within the range of military operations. 

If parliamentary sessions are discontinuous, the question 
arises how their duration is to be determined, apart from 
the case of dissolution. Under the English system, as the 
main legislative business of Parliament is prepared and 
managed by the executive, the opening and closing of parlia- 
mentary sessions is naturally left to the latter organ ; if, 
however, the executive is not dismissible by the legislature 



458 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

— and especially if it is not dependent on the legislature 
for an annual supply of the funds required for ordinary 
expenditure — ^it becomes important that it should not deter- 
mine the duration of parliamentary sessions. On the other 
hand, to fix the period of session by a rigid rule seems 
inconvenient, as the amount of urgent legislative business 
may vary much from time to time ; but it might be well 
to have a minimum period fixed by a permanent law for 
ordinary annual sessions, the legislature having the power 
of prolonging it, and of holding extraordinary meetings at 
its own discretion or at the summons of the executive. 

If the executive is independent of the legislature, it 
should have the constitutional right of proposing new 
legislative measures to the latter ; since, for certain kinds of 
legislation, an intimate co-operation between the two organs 
is expedient, if not indispensable. Where, however, the 
Cabinet is normally composed of members of parliament, this 
right becomes practically superfluous : here the important 
question rather is how far it is expedient to leave to the 
executive Cabinet the preparation and practical management 
of the legislative work of Parliament. The arrangement is 
clearly advantageous where the proposed legislation is closely 
connected with executive functions, so that one or other of 
the executive departments is a natural di'pot of experience 
on the matters in question ; and it is probably inevitable, 
wherever Parliamentary government is worked on the two- 
party system, as regards all questions on which the parties 
are understood to disagree. But there remain important 
kinds of legislation with regard to which the executive as 
such has no claim to special knowledge ; and which are even 
now to some extent — ^and might be to a greater extent — 
declared outside the arena of party conflict. It would seem 
that the management of such legislation might with advan- 
tage be entrusted to a committee other than the Cabinet, so 
as to diminish the danger of overburdening the executive 
with legislative work ; of which committee the chairmen of 
the standing committees appointed to deal with dififerent 
departments of legislation would naturally be members. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 459 

In financial matters there is a special advantage in 
leaving the initiative entirely to ministers, as they are in 
the best position for enforcing economy in expenditure, and 
are more likely to enforce it if the responsibility for financial 
proposals rests entirely on them. If this plan is not 
adopted, it will be at any rate indispensable to provide that 
no proposals involving a material addition to the public ex- 
penditure should be brought before the legislature without 
being referred to the same conmiittee that is responsible for 
proposals relating to taxation ; in order that no expenditure 
may be undertaken without due consideration of the relative 
importance of the need it is designed to meet, as compared 
with other public needs and with the public resources. 

§ 11. It remains to inquire how far the legislature in its 
turn ought to be restrained, either by law or by definite 
customary rules, from the excessive interference with execu- 
tive work which we have recognised as a danger. In dis- 
cussing this question, it will be convenient to consider 
separately (a) the regulation of the mutual relations of 
members of the community other than servants of govern- 
ment treated as such, (&) the organisation and management of 
the executive service, (c) the management of foreign affairs. 
The first of these constitutes the primary sphere of normal 
legislative activity, which we have had chiefly in view in 
constructing the legislature on the representative system. 
Here I have already^ recognised, as a generally sound 
maxim, that the general rules to be enforced by Grovernment 
should be discussed and determined apart from their parti- 
cular application, in order that they may be afterwards 
carried out without " respect of persons." It is obviously 
just and expedient that no individual, group, or class within 
the community should be arbitrarily subjected to special 
legislation, where there are no peculiar circumstances to 
justify exceptional treatment. But where such peculiar 
circumstances appear to exist, it does not seem either just or 
expedient to prevent Parliament from framing particular 
legislative provisions with a view to them. Hence constitu- 

^ See chap. zix. § 8. 



46o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

tional rules ^ against "special legislation," even supposing 
that they can be made effective, seem to me a clumsy and 
unsatisfactory method of guarding against injustice and 
jobbery. 

A noteworthy case of such special legislation is the class 
of measures by which powers of compulsory purchase of 
land, and other privileges, are granted to industrial com- 
panies formed to supply some important social need — such 
as the need for canals, railways, tramways, or for water or 
artificial light If the general expediency of thus rendering 
governmental aid to a certain kind of industrial enterprise 
is held to have been established, and if the general conditions 
under which the required powers or privileges ought to be 
granted can be decisively laid down, then it certainly seems 
most proper that Parliament should confine its action to the 
laying down of these general conditions, leaving it to some 
executive ^ body to deal with the particular applications of 
particular companiea When, however, a new departure is 
being made in this semi-public organisation of industry, it 
may often be the wisest course for the legislature to proceed 
tentatively, and not to separate its general regulations from 
their special applications in particular instances, until a 
certain amount of experience has been gained of the methods 
and effects of the novel enterprise. 

(&) As regards the organisation and management of the 
whole executive organ, it clearly belongs to the legislature 
to define the powers of the officials, and to determine what 
special privileges or liabilities it may be for the public 
advantage to allot to or impose on any class of the servants 
of government as such, and, generally, to lay down the con- 
ditions of appointment and tenure of executive offices. And 

^ Such rules are common in the American State Constitutions. See 
Bryce, American Commonwealth, Part II. chaps, xl. xliv. and xlv. 

^ The work is primarily of an executive character, because it consists in 
balancing considerations of public expediency, not interpreting rules of strict 
right. But the determination of the amount of compensation payable for any 
infringement of pre-existing rights that may thus be legalised is a strictly 
judicial matter, and should not be determined by the executive, but referred 
to arbitration or judicial decision. 



XXII RELATION OF LEGISLATURE TO EXECUTIVE 461 

it would seem that experience alone can determine the 
degree of minuteness to which the financial control exercised 
by the legislature over the executive should be carried, so as 
to secure the maximvmi of economy without impairing the 
general efficiency of the organ, or its power of promptly 
meeting sudden calls for special activity. On the other 
hand, for reasons before given, the legislature should be 
prevented, by law or custom, from interfering in the 
selection of individuals to fill vacant posts, or in the 
particular allotment of tasks to them, within the range 
of the business assigned to the department to which they 
belong. 

(c) It is not easy to establish a satisfactory distribution 
of functions between the two organs in relation to foreign 
afiairs. There is usually little room here for the exercise 
of strictly legislative functions, and, as we have seen, the 
direct intervention of a nimierous representative assembly 
in the management of particular questions in this depart- 
ment is not likely to be advantageous. At the same time, 
there are certain decisions of fundamental importance to 
which the consent of the supreme legislative and money- 
granting organ seems indispensable. Thus, the control of 
the organ over finance would be seriously impaired if treaties 
of commerce, regulating the taxation of imports from certain 
countries, could be made without its consent. War, again, 
from the additional expenditure that it entails, must require 
the active co-operation of the money-granting organ ; and, 
again, it seems right that the consent of the legislature 
should be necessary to the validity of any change in the 
territory for which it has the constitutional duty of making 
laws. Perhaps the least unsatisfactory arrangement would 
be that the consent of the legislature should be required, 
as a general rule, for making war, or ceding or annexing 
territory, or making treaties that pledge the State to any 
such measures or that otherwise affect materially the financial 
liabilities or resources of the State : while at the same time 
certain acts falling under this rule should be allowed to be 
validly performed by the executive without such consent if. 



464 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxii 

to be necessary in a State in which ordinary citizens are 
adequately secured against this kind of oppression. Perhaps, 
however, a power of exercising such protection might be 
advantageously secured to the legislative assembly, for use if 
the occasion shoidd arise. 



CHAPTEE XXIII 

TWO CHAMBEKS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 

§ 1. The division of governmental functions into legislative, 
executive, and judicial, which has so far formed the basis 
of our discussion of governmental structure, is not merely 
suggested by the historical separation of the corresponding 
organs in the states of Western Europe : it appears to belong 
to the essential nature of law and government, at least from 
the time that the former has come to be regarded as normally 
modifiable by the latter. The business of changing the 
general rules by which the relations of citizens (so &r as 
compulsory) are determined, the judicial application of these 
rules to particular cases, and the performance of the coercive 
and industrial work of government within the limits which 
such general rules define, — we can hardly conceive that 
these will not always remain operations broadly distinct in 
their character, and requiring, for the most part, different 
kinds of intellectual and moral qualifications in the indi- 
viduals and bodies to whom they are entrusted. And the 
general tendency to specialisation of functions which char- 
acterises the development of civilised societies affords 
a presumption in favour of a continually more marked 
separation of these branches of governmental work, — at 
least so far as the most important matters are concerned, 
— however intimate and complex may be the relations 
among the organs to which these functions are severaUy 
entrusted. 

The case is different with the other threefold division, 

2v 



466 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

which, in West-European states, is widely regarded as no 
less normal and universally expedient than that which we 
have been discussing : I mean the distribution of legislative 
power among " Crown, Lords, and Commons," — to use the 
old English terms. We have seen, indeed, that, if the 
executive is to have any substantial independence within 
the limits of the law, it should have some means of resist- 
ing new hostile legislation, such as is given by an efifective 
veto — whether absolute or qualified; unless, as in the 
English system, the main work of legislation, together with 
the supreme executive power, is entrusted to a committee 
of the legislature, with authority to dissolve the legislative 
assembly and appeal to the constituencies: otherwise it 
seems difficult to prevent a legislature in conflict with the 
executive from passing laws so minute and detailed in their 
provisions as almost to nullify the independence of the 
executive. But I know no equally obvious reason for 
complicating the legislative organ by the introduction of a 
second chamber : and the complexity is certainly in itself 
an objection; — a proposal to establish a three-chambered 
legislature would be generally rejected without hesitation, 
merely on account of its complexity. There is, however, a 
decided preponderance of opinion — even where representa- 
tive institutions are fully developed — in favour of institut- 
ing a supplementary chamber, which I shall call the 
Senate, whose co-operation with what I shall call the 
House of Eepresentatives ^ should be normally necessary for 
the passing of laws : though, as to the exact grounds on 
which such a chamber is desirable, and the relation in 
which it ought to stand to the other chamber, we find 
considerable divergence. 

Thus in one set of arguments urged in favour of two 
chambers, the mere duality — with adequate dissimilarity — 
of legislative bodies appears to be the important point, 

^ It is difficult to find clearly distinctive terms for the two chambers, 
since, as we shall see, the members of both may be periodically elected. 
The American names that I have adopted seem to me on the whole most 
convenient. 



xxiii TIVO CHAMBEJiS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 467 

rather than any particular character or quality which the 
members of the Senate are intended to possess : stress being 
laid on the completer discussion of proposed laws which is 
thus obtained, the protection against the passions which 
are more likely to affect a single body than two, the check 
on the temptations which the consciousness of possessing 
supreme power carries with it. As regards the last of 
these points ^ I think that, in the English system of Parlia- 
mentary government, the evil effects of the mere intoxica- 
tion of power — so far as this is supposed to operate through 
the esprit de corps of a governing organ — tend to be materi- 
ally reduced, in the House of Eepresentatives no less than 
in the Cabinet, by the check which each exercises on the 
other, and especially by the appeal to the people that is at 
any time possible. At the same time, the danger of en- 
croachments by the legislature on the fimctions of the 
executive is undoubtedly diminished by the existence of 
two legislative chambers; as this necessarily maintains a 
broad and palpable distinction between the resolutions of 
either chamber and binding laws. Again, the danger of 
hasty legislation in harmony with the aims of a temporarily 
predominant faction of the electors — from which no form 
of parliamentary government is free — is reduced by secur- 
ing a rediscussion of all proposed legislation, by a body 
independent of the House of Eepresentatives; provided it 
is appointed in such a manner as to be less influenced 
than the latter by passing drifts of popular opinion. Some 
protection is also afforded against a sinister combination of 
private interests to pass measures opposed to the public 
good ; since such a combination is at any rate more easily 
managed in one chamber than in two. That these ad- 
vantages may be realised, it is of course necessary that the 
Senate should actually have sufficient prestige and influence 
to enable it effectively to modify legislation : and the gain 
will clearly be greater the more the mode of appointing its 
members tends to secure in them, on the average, such 

^ This is the point on which most stress is laid by Mill, Hepresentative 
Oovemmentf chap. xiii. 



468 ELEMENTS OP POLITICS chap. 

legislative qualifications as are likely to be most lacking in 
the primary chamber. 

This last consideration leads ns to another, widely pre- 
valent, view of the upper chamber, which regards it as 
required to give adequate representation of the aristocratic 
element of the community, in order to balance the undue 
preponderance of the masses in the House of Bepresenta- 
tives. The need of such a balance I have already re- 
cognised ^ : but in considering this method of meeting the 
need, we have to distinguish clearly two elements, fre- 
quently blended in the notion of "aristocracy" as thus 
used: (1) superiority in general culture and political en- 
lightenment, and (2) inherited wealth — especially landed 
property — considerable in amount. For these two attri- 
butes are only to a limited extent likely to be found 
together ; since, though the leisure and opportunities which 
large wealth brings with it have a certain tendency to 
produce culture and enlightenment in their possessors, this 
tendency is seriously counteracted by the temptations to 
idleness and self-indulgence which beset the rich. And, 
though I fully admit the danger that a House of Bepre- 
sentatives, elected on a widely extended sufirage, may pass 
bad laws hostile to the interests of the rich, it hardly 
seems that the institution of a second chamber, avowedly 
representative of wealth on a large scale, is likely to be a 
permanently effective way of meeting this danger; on 
account of the specially marked and invidious opposition 
between wealth and numbers which it introduces. I think, 
therefore, that a wise partisan of the wealthy minority, in 
framing a new constitution for a modern country, would 
accept as a principle of construction that a Senate ought 
primarily to represent superior culture or political enlighten- 
ment rather than wealth. 

§ 2. I shall take, therefore, the main end for which a 
Senate is constructed to be that all legislative measures 
may receive a second consideration by a body different in 
character from the primary representative assembly, and, if 

^ See chap. zx. § 5. 



xxiii TIVO CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 469 

possible, superior or supplementary in intellectual qualifica- 
tions. Let us, then, consider (1) in what relation such a 
chamber should stand to the House of Representatives; 
and (2) how its members should be appointed. Of these 
questions the first should, I think, have prior consideration, 
since the answer given to it must to some extent determine 
the answer to the second question. 

The most obvious and simple arrangement is to make 
the two chambers co-ordinate, with equal powers ; so that 
the free consent of both shall be necessary to any binding 
decision of the legislature ; and, therefore, if either house 
refuse its consent to any proposed legislative measure, it 
must drop or be postponed. Now, apart from the advantage 
of harmony between the legislative and executive organs, 
there would seem to be ordinarily ^ little danger of harm in 
the postponement in such a case of a proposed law, assum- 
ing that the judgment of the Senate on the merits of the 
law is as good as that of the primary representative 
chamber : a conflict between the chambers would mostly 
have only the efTect of deferring legislation, of which the 
advantage is at best doubtful The cases in which both 
chambers were agreed as to the urgency of the need for 
some legislation, but disagreed as to the kind of legislation 
needed, would probably be exceptional, and might perhaps 
be left to be met by compromise on each occasion.* But it 
hardly seems prudent to deal thus with financial disagree- 
ments ; at least if — in order that this control may be as 
complete as possible — the provision even for fixed and 
necessary expenditure is only determined for short periods. 
For in this case the Budget cannot be postponed, as most 
new laws can ; so that there will be a regular danger of a 
deadlock whenever the two chambers disagree either as to 
the mode of raising funds by taxation, or as to the appro- 
priation of the fimds to difierent branches of expenditure. 

^ In exceptional cases the disadvantage of delay might be greater ; see 
chap, zxvii. § 3. 

^ If compromise was found very difficult, recourse might be had, with 
the consent of both Houses, to a direct vote of the electorate. See p. 473, 
note, and chap, xxyii. § 3. 



470 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

To meet this difficulty — otherwise than by relying on 
the wisdom and moderation of both chambers — ^we must 
sacrifice either (a) the duality of the chambers, or (&) the 
equality of their powers, or (c) the extent of their financial 
controL (a) It may be provided that, in case of disagree- 
ment between the chambers on a financial question, the 
point shall be decided by the majority of votes in the two 
chambers taken together : but this — besides rendering the 
two-chamber system pro tanto a superfluous complication — 
also tends to diminish the security of the taxpayers, unless 
the Senate is equally trusted as guardian of the public 
purse, (b) The knot may be cut by confining the financial 
control to the House of Eepresentatives, — as it is practi- 
cally confined in England, where the upper chamber has 
only the power of accepting or rejecting financial measures 
en bloc, not of initiating or modifying in detail ; — but this 
method, of course, gives a very decided preponderance of 
power to the chamber that possesses this controL (c) The 
danger may be reduced by settling ordinary taxes, and the 
appropriations for ordinary expenditure, permanently as far 
as possible ; so that a disagreement between the chambers 
may not deprive the Government of absolutely necessary 
supplies ; but this expedient would not certainly be ade- 
quate, unless the executive had also some power of impos- 
ing supplementary taxes on its own authority, since the 
returns from the fixed taxes in any year might prove 
insufficient to meet the fixed expenditure. 

Supposing the question of financial control to be settled 
somehow, no further difficulty is introduced by the two- 
chamber system as to the relation of the executive to the 
legislature if the former's tenure of office is independent 
of the latter : indeed, in this case, the division of the legis- 
lative organ into two bodies with equal powers is likely to 
be useful as tending to protect the independence of the 
executive, by rendering encroachments on the part of the 
legislature more difficult — assuming it to be the design of 
the constitution to maintain the executive in effective 
independence. 



XXIII TH^O CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS ^^l 

On the other hand, the system of two really co-ordinate 
chambers does not seem to be suited to any form of Parlia- 
mentary government : because a conflict between the cham- 
bers tends to destroy the harmony between legislation and 
administration, which appeared to be the characteristic 
merit of this form of government. For, if the two cham- 
bers are to have equal powers, the dismissal ^ of the exe- 
cutive could only be effected either (1) by concurrent 
resolutions of the majorities in the two chambers, or (2) 
by a resolution of the majority of the whole body formed 
by uniting the two. In the first case, it is obvious that so 
long as the two chambers are in conflict the dismissal is 
not likely to be effected; while, on the other hand, the 
executive may be unable, for an indefinite time, to obtain 
legislation that it considers vitally important. Nor would 
it help matters to unite the chambers into one body for 
the purpose of appointing and dismissing the executive; 
since this would not bring the latter into effectual harmony 
with the legislature, so long as the duality is retained for 
the purpose of legislation. Nor would a termination of 
the conflict be certainly attained by allowing a simul- 
taneous dissolution of both chambers, — supposing them 
both to be elected — unless they are elected on methods so 
similar that they are sure to agree immediately after 
election: in which case the ends aimed at in the two- 
chamber system would hardly be attained at ordinary 

^ I have not thought it right to assume that the power of dismissing the 
executive is inseparably connected with financial control, though it actually 
is so connected in the English constitution and others formed on its model ; 
since it is quite conceivable that the two should be separated. Of course if 
there is an annual Budget, and a refusal of necessary supplies is regarded as 
a legitimate exercise of the financial control of the money-granting organ, 
the latter must have the power of dismissal. But, as I have before sug- 
gested, ordinary expenditure might be settled by a Budget that would 
remain in force if not modified by agreement between the legislature and 
the executive ; or, again, it might be regarded , as an improper use of 
financial control to compel ministers to resign by a refusal of the supplies 
necessary for such expenditure ; and, on the other hand, it is quite con- 
ceivable that the constitutional right of dismissing the executive should be 
given to the legislature directly, without any refusal of supplies. 



472 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

timea Nor, again, could a solution be arrived at by the 
English plan of giving the right of dismissing the executive 
to the House of Eepresentatives alone — balanced by the 
executive's power of dissolving the House — so long as the 
co-ordinate position of the Senate was really maintained in 
legislation. If, however, so great an inequality of powers 
between the two chambers were introduced, it would be 
practically difficult to maintain the Senate's position; 
owing to the pressure that would be put on the Senate to 
yield to the " verdict of the people " whenever the executive 
and the House of Eepresentatives, after a dissolution, were 
agreed in desiring a new law. If the Senate resists this 
pressure the discontent and constitutional friction generated 
are likely to be a serious evil; if it gives way against 
its real judgment, its power of performing its functions 
efTectively will not be assisted by its formally co-ordinate 
position. 

It appears to me, therefore, that a really co-ordinate 
second chamber is an alien element in Parliamentary 
government when fully developed. In a country like 
England, where the existing distribution of power is the 
result of a process of gradual change, a second chamber 
invested formally with co-ordinate powers, but practically 
restricted in their exercise by custom and opinion — with 
the Crown's right of creating new peers as an ultimate 
control ^ — may work tolerably well. But if, in framing a 
new constitution, we desire as far as possible to combine 
the advantages of a two-chambered legislature with those 
of a Parliamentary executive, it would seem better to limit 
in some way the Se:nate*s power of resisting legislative 
measures approved both by the House of Eepresentatives 
and by the people. It is, however, difficult to devise a 
limitation which shall be effectual without going too far : 
perhaps the best compromise would be to make the 
functions of the Senate merely consultative in respect of 

^ I do not mean to imply that the use of this power to coerce a hostile 
majority in our House of Lords would not be semi-revolutionary. See 
chap. xzxi. § 5. 



XXIII TIVO CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 473 

any measure approved by the House of Representatives 
in two successive parliaments.^ 

If, however, the advantages of intimate connection and 
harmony between the legislative and executive organs are 
sacrificed to obtain the advantages of greater stability and 
clear separation of functions — as appears to be the case 
under any form of government in which the Supreme 
Executive holds office for life or for a fixed period — I see 
no reason why the Senate should not be made so far really 
as well as formally co-ordinate, as to be able to offer effectual 
resistance to legislation which it regards as pernicious or 
dangerous. 

§ 3. Supposing that this real power of resistance is de- 
sired, it is important to appoint the Senate in a manner that 
will make it practically strong enough to hold its own in a 
conflict with the House of Eepresentatives. The application 
of this principle will vary considerably with the varying 
historical traditions of different societies But I think that 
the desired result is not likely to* be obtained in a com- 
munity where there is a House of Eepresentatives freely 
elected and in full consciousness of its power, unless the 
members of the Senate have also the strength given by 
popular election. I fully admit that the opinion of a Senate 
composed of distinguished men nominated for life by the 
executive, or appointed ex officio as holding or having 
held for a certain period important executive or judicial 
posts, is, under ordinary circumstances, likely to have weight 
with the public ; and may be effective in checking from time 
to time dangerous drifts of popular opinion. But suppose 
that such a chamber has expressed its opinion and has not 
persuaded the public : then, surely, the sight of a handful 

^ Another method might be adopted, with the consent of both chambers, 
in case there was urgent need of a more rapid settlement : viz. to aUow a 
direct vote of the electorate to be taken on a measure passed by the House 
of Representatives and rejected by the Senate. This would have the 
advantage of obtaining the decision of the citizens at large on the particular 
issue disputed between the chambers, more clearly than it could be obtained 
by a general election of representatives : since the choice of representatives 
ought not to be, and probably never would be, entirely determined by their 
opinions on a single measure. See chap, xxvii. § 8. 



474 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of individuals, presuming on the score of their personal 
superiority to resist permanently the "will of a people" 
whom they are unable to convince, is likely to rouse popular 
indignation and clamour, and to cause at least a dangerous 
strain on the constitution. I think that a second chamber, 
in order to be able to maintain a really co-ordinate position 
against the pressure of a popularly elected assembly, must 
itself be also in some way, though perhaps indirectly, the 
result of popular election. 

It is not, however, easy to find a satisfactory mode of 
election, calculated to furnish a Senate at once strong in 
popular support and at the same time sufficiently different 
in character from the House of Eepresentatives to realise 
the full advantages of the two-chamber system. A small 
upper chamber elected, as in Norway, both by and from the 
House of Eepresentatives, would have the advantage of 
being at once popularly elected, and yet chosen by persons 
who are comparatively experts: but this method hardly 
seems likely to produce a sufficient degree of difference in 
the quality of the two chambers. A Senate elected by or 
from a class of citizens above the average in education and 
culture might be expected to have a higher degree of 
political enlightenment : but it would, in any conflict with 
the primary representative assembly, be open to the invidious 
charge of contending for sectional against national interests.^ 
Election by persons who are themselves elected by the people 
at large is free from this objection and has much to recom- 
mend it: but, as we have seen,^ unless the intermediate 
electors have other important functions, there would be a 
danger of their becoming mere puppets. This leads us to 
the plan of election by elected local governments, which 
was adopted in the appointment to the Senate in the United 
States,^ and has since been introduced elsewhere. This plan, 

^ This objection remains strong, even though the limit is educational, not 
pecuniary ; owing to the inevitable tendency of superiority in education to 
be connected with superiority in wealth. 

» See p. 403. 

' The importance of this mode of election, in a Federal system, will be 
explained in a subsequent chapter (xxvi.). 



XXIII TfVO CHAAfBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 475 

however, is open to the objection that it tends to import 
alien considerations into the election of local organs of 
government. 

Perhaps it might be best to elect intermediate electors 
simply for the function of electing senators, avoiding or at 
least reducing the danger of their being elected under 
pledges to vote for particular candidates by appointing 
them some time before they have to exercise their functions. 
At the same time, the Senate might be further differentiated 
from the House of Eepresentatives by combining a number 
of minor differences, and providing that the members of the 
Senate should be (1) fewer in number and so chosen from 
larger districts, and therefore likely to have a higher 
average of personal eminence; (2) appointed at a more 
advanced age, and (3) for a longer period ; and also (4) on 
the plan of partial renewal. As regards this last point I 
may remind the reader that, in discussing (in chap, xx.) the 
conditions of election of a representative assembly, I omitted 
to consider whether such an assembly should be elected all 
at once — except in the case of accidental vacancies— or only 
renewed in parts, a certain number of seats being vacated 
and filled up at each new election. I deferred this question, 
because the answer to it seemed to depend partly on the 
relation between the executive and the legislature, partly 
on the choice made between one and two chambers. There 
seems no doubt that simultaneous renewal is the only 
method suitable, where it is important that a dissolution of 
the representative assembly, and a consequent appeal to the 
people, should be at any time possible: the appeal could 
not otherwise receive a clear and decisive answer. But in 
order to get the full advantages of the system of two 
chambers, with co-ordinate powers, it seems desirable that 
they should be elected on different plans, in respect both of 
extent of renewal and of duration of powers ; so that while 
the primary representative chamber, being chosen all at 
once for a comparatively short period, may more freshly 
represent the opinions and sentiments of the majority of 
the electorate, the Senate, elected for a considerably longer 



476 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

period, and on the system of partial renewal, may be able 
to withstand the influence of any transient gust of popular 
passion or sentiment. 

If, however, the Senate is only designed to have the 
power of delaying objectionable legislation, and enforcing 
ample consideration of the objections urged against it — 
we shall rather seek to obtain a body of persons whose 
judgments are likely to be received with respect, from 
their individual merit and experience: and in this case 
appointment tx officio, supplemented to a certain limited 
extent by nomination for life by the executive, has much to 
recommend it. Some combination of these methods seems 
preferable to co-optation in any form: since a co-opting 
Senate would be liable to be unduly swayed by the 
intriguing of cliques and the exclusiveness of party-spirit, 
and still more liable to odiiun through a general belief 
that it was so swayed. Or one or both of the methods 
above mentioned might be combined with that of election by 
the organs of local government, — the objection to which is 
less when the legislative power of the Senate is reduced, 
since in this case the members of local governments are less 
likely to be elected with a view to their elective fimction. 

I have not spoken of heredity as a mode of determin- 
ing the membership of the Senate. It must, I think, be 
considered a survival from an earlier stage of social develop- 
ment: no influential statesman has ever suggested it, so 
far as I know, for any of the new commimities founded by 
Englishmen in America and Australia: nor has it been 
adopted in the European constitutions framed most under 
the influence of modern ideas — in France, Belgium, and 
Holland, or in the Scandinavian coimtries, or in Italy. On 
the whole, I think it can now hardly be counted among 
methods requiring to be seriously considered in construct- 
ing a second chamber for a modern community, in which 
birth is generally disregarded in the allotment of executive 
and judicial functiona The chance of obtaining superior 
intellectual qualifications, through physical inheritance, in 
the sons of statesmen, though it must be allowed to be 



xxiii TIVO CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 477 

worth something, is too indefinite and uncertain to be 
worth much. Again, a hereditary legislator has no doubt 
special opportimities of obtaining the best educational pre- 
paration for a statesman's career, and of imbibing the 
results of political experience in the intimacy of domestic 
and social intercourse; but these advantages would seem 
to be, on the average, at least balanced by the temptations 
incident to rank and wealth, and the absence of the spur 
to sustained intellectual effort which economic necessities or 
social ambitions supply to youths of humbler origin. 

To sum up, then : assuming that a Senate is desirable, 
I should reject as generally inexpedient modes of appointing 
senators — under the social and political conditions of a 
modem state — co-optation, inheritance, and those modes of 
election which manifestly render the elected chamber repre- 
sentative of a section of the whole body of citizena Among 
the acceptable modes of appointment I should distinguish 
(1) those that aim at securing personal weight in the 
senators; and (2) those that aim at securing representative 
weight. I should place in the former class nomination on 
the ground of eminence by the executive, and appointment 
as a consequence of holding or having held for a certcdn 
time certain high offices. In the latter class I should 
include all modes of election which would render the 
persons elected representative in some way of the whole 
body of citizens. The methods included in the first class 
appear to me well adapted for the purpose of providing a 
chamber that is only designed to have the power of delay- 
ing, and not that of permanently resisting, the legislative 
measures approved by the primary representative assembly : 
but if a chamber with really co-ordinate powers is wanted, 
I think that the weight required for the conflicts it must 
be prepared to face is most likely to be secured by some 
method that will render it undeniably representative, 
though perhaps in an indirect way, of the nation at large. 
And of these two kinds of relations between the two cham- 
bers, the former, as I have said, appears to me alone 
adapted to Parliamentary government : the latter requires. 



478 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

I think, for its satisfactory working some such careful 
separation of legislature from executive as is realised in 
the " presidential " system of the United States of America. 
§ 4. So far I have supposed the functions of the two 
chambers to be generally similar, even when their powers 
are not equal But different arrangement has been sug- 
gested as regards the Budget : and, perhaps in other than 
financial matters, the legislative powers allotted to the 
chambers might conveniently be made diverse in kind, to 
some extent, by custom, if not by law. Thus, one or other 
of the two might have the sole function of initiating 
measures of a certain kind, or of modifying such measures 
in detail For instance, where the chief power of determin- 
ing the substance of legislative changes admittedly belongs 
to the House of Eepresentatives, the Senate might advan- 
tageously have a special responsibility for the work of mak- 
ing the formal improvements from time to time required in 
the law — by removing ambiguities, inconsistencies, and 
cumbrous superfluities — and for the avoidance of formal 
defects in new legislation. For this purpose legal experts 
should be made senators, by nomination or ex officio, who 
might form, alone or along with others, the chief legislative 
committee of the Senate. 

2. A similar diversity might be introduced in any 
functions other than legislative allotted to the chambers. 
Thus, if a general power of control over treaties with 
foreign states— otherwise than by criticism and inquiry — 
were given to the legislature, it may be appropriately con- 
fined to an elected Senate constituted as I have above 
suggested: since, from the longer duration and partial 
renewal of this chamber, it would be more likely to main- 
tain a far-sighted and consistent foreign policy than the 
House of Eepresentatives. 

3. It may be suggested that the Senate should be con- 
stituted a judicial tribunal for the trial of offences com- 
mitted by public men of high position in violation of theii* 
public trust and duties ; the prosecution of such offenders 
being assigned to the House of Eepresentatives. Both 



xxiii TPV-O CHAMBERS AND THEIR FUNCTIONS 479 

these arrangements were adopted, after the example of 
England, in the constitution of the United States ; and the 
judicial function of the Senate in particular is elaborately 
and ably defended in Story's well-known work.^ But, 
granting that a special court of high dignity is required to 
deal with offences of this class, and that to construct a 
suitable tribunal for them is a matter of considerable difl&- 
culty, it hardly seems a good solution of the difl&culty to 
give this judicial work to a chamber appointed primarily 
for legislative purposes, most of whose members cannot be 
expected to have had any judicial experience. I cannot 
think that such a body is likely in any case to be a good 
court of justice : and the party-system that now prevails in 
states under popular government must tend to increase its 
unfitness. I am more inclined to think that — if it be 
decided to constitute a special court of this kind — the 
fimction of selecting from time to time some of the mem- 
bers of the required tribimal might be properly entrusted 
to the Senate ; as it would be well qualified to supply the 
element of political experience that such a tribunal ought 
to possess. I shall have occasion to return to this question 
at the conclusion of the next chapter, which will treat of 
the judicial organ as a whole. 

Further, the legislative powers belonging to the two 
chambers jointly may be limited by the right of each 
chamber separately to determine its rules of procedure. 
This limitation is expedient, partly in order that each 
chamber may be as free as possible to adopt — and therefore 
responsible for adopting — the rules best fitted to secure 
full and fair debate and prevent hasty resolutions, without 
allowing mischievous obstruction and delay; partly in 
order to avoid the necessity of subjecting the procedure of 
either chamber to the control of an external judiciary.^ 

Before concluding the discussion of the Legislative 
Organ, it should be again pointed out that the legislative 

^ Constitution of the United States, Part III. ch. x. 
^ On the expediency of constitutional restrictions on this freedom of 
each chamber, sec chap, xxvii. § 5. 



48o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxiii 

powers of both chambers together may be formally limited 
by constitutional rules, by which certain matters are either 
positively determined or excluded from the sphere of ordi- 
nary legislation. Such rules vrill, of course, be somehow 
modifiable; but only by some extraordinary legislative 
process, under conditions more difficult of fulfilment than 
those of ordinary legislation, and probably involving — 
directly or indirectly — the intervention of the citizens at 
large. The expediency of this distinction between ordi- 
nary and extraordinary legislation, and the best conditions 
for the latter, vrill be discussed in chap, xxvii. Further, 
certain legislative powers may be reserved for or delegated 
to local governments ; the reservation or delegation being 
either (a) revocable at the discretion of the legislature, or 
(6) not so revocabla These two cases will be discussed in 
chapters xxv. and xxvi., on Local and Federal Grovemment 
respectively. 



CHAPTER XXIV 

THE JUDICURY AND ITS RELATION TO THE LEGISLATURE 

AND THE EXECUTIVE 

§ 1. The importance of the Judiciary in political construc- 
tion is rather profound than prominent. On the one hand, 
in popular discussion of forms and changes of government, 
the judicial organ often drops almost out of sight ; on the 
other hand, in determining a nation's rank in political 
civilisation, no test is more decisive than the degree in 
which justice as defined by the law is actually realised in 
its judicial administration; both as between one private 
citizen and another, and as between private citizens and 
members of the Government. To attain this result we 
require legal knowledge and skill, impartiality, incorrupti- 
bility, and independence in the persons forming the judicial 
tribunals : also that such tribunals should be accessible to 
all, and sufficiently numerous, and that no one should be 
hindered, by Government or private persons, from seeking 
judicial remedies for legal wrongs : accordingly, the judicial 
process should be as simple, short, and inexpensive as 
is consistent with adequate security for justice and ade- 
quate provision for the correction of judicial errors; at 
the same time, vexatious litigation should be discouraged, 
lest the remedies for social mischief prove worse than the 
disease. I have not space to enter into the interesting 
technical questions that arise, in trying to adapt judicial 
procedure to the attainment of these partially incompatible 
ends : but we ought to keep these ends in view in discuss- 

2i 



482 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

ing the general characteristics of the constitution and 
working of the judici£il organ in such a governmental 
structure as we have so far sketched out. 

The general reasons for not allotting judicial and legis- 
lative functions to the same organ need only be recalled 
very briefly. The advantages of division of labour, which 
become more important as the complexity and difficulty of 
law increase with the complexity of society; the import- 
ance of concentrating the main attention of the judge on 
the imparti£d administration of law as it is ; the different 
intellectual qualifications required for the making and for 
the applying of laws ; — these have been sufficiently dwelt 
on in previous chapters. I have also mentioned the 
advantage of securing impartiality in disputes between 
legislators and private persons: this no doubt becomes 
unimportant where popular government is in efTective 
working; on the other hand, it is clear that numerous 
representative assemblies are especially unlikely to possess 
the qualifications required for the Judiciary. 

This separation of functions, however, must be under- 
stood with certain qualifications. Judicial experience, how- 
ever insufficient by itself, ought to supply a valuable element 
of the knowledge required for wise legislative changes. 
Indeed, one advantage of constituting a Senate partly of 
ex officio members is, that it might thus include a certain 
number of persons who are^ or have been engaged in 
judicial work, whose aid ought to be peculiarly useful in 
the work of freeing the law from formal defects, which we 
have seen to be specially appropriate to the Senate, If 
the Senate cannot be made available for this purpose — or 
perhaps in any case — it would seem desirable to appoint a 
permanent Law Council,^ containing persons of judicial 
experience. It should be the primary business of such a 
Council to remove inconsistencies and ambiguities in the 

^ Actual judges to whom this function is given would naturally have 
less than a full burden of judicial work. 

* See a Plan for the Formal Amendment of the Law of England ^ by T. E. 
Holland, M.A., 1S67. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 483 

recognised authoritative statement of the law : but besides 
this, it might from time to time serve as a channel for 
bringing judicial experience to bear on legislation whenever 
this experience clearly pointed to the expediency of material 
changes in civil and criminal law. 

But further ; as the varying characteristics of the social 
relations which laws are designed to regulate can never be 
completely foreseen by the legislature, it is impossible to 
prevent the judges from exercising functions that go beyond 
the mere application to particular cases of rules laid down 
by the legislature, and practically involve the more precise 
determination of the law itself. They have to apply rules 
of law to cases that were not foreseen, and in reference to 
which therefore the intention of the legislature is not clearly 
declared ; and while it is generally their duty, under these 
circumstances, to be guided as far as possible, when the 
meaning of words is ambiguous, by inferences as to the 
general design of the legislature drawn from other rules of 
analogous import, — it is still almost inevitable, and some- 
times not undesirable, that in drawing such inferences they 
should be swayed to a certain extent by their own views of 
what is reasonable and expedient. 

It does not necessarily follow that the court which has 
to decide an unforeseen case should have the power — ^which 
English courts have — of laying down a binding precedent 
to govern all similar decisions hereafter. It may indeed be 
questioned whether the legislature should not try to prevent 
the judges from doing this, by declaring it the duty of a 
judge to give to the words of the law what he thinks their 
true meaning, without regard to previous decisions. This 
would render feasible a separation of legislative from judicial 
functions more complete than the English system admits, 
would diminish the bad consequences of judicial mistakes, 
and might perhaps make it possible for citizens generally, 
other than lawyers, to know the main rules of law by which 
they were incontrovertibly bound. But it would make it 
impossible even for the highly -trained expert to foresee 
decisions on points which a code or statute had left 



4^4 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

ambiguous ; and it would seem that the greater certainty 
attainable on details of law at any given time, that results 
from judges being bound by precedents, outweighs any 
advantages of the opposite system. 

If the judges are to recognise as valid the precedents of 
previous decisions, so that a certain amount of legislation 
under the guise of intei*pretation is inevitable, the question 
arises, What precedents are to have this binding force ? In 
a large country, if justice is to be effectually accessible to 
aU, there must be a large number of tribunals with co- 
(»tlinate jurisdiction, whether concurrent or locally divided ; 
hence if the law is to be kept practically uniform over the 
whole country, there must be a single final court of appeal — 
for all judicial work or for each separable part of it — which 
alone will have the power of finally determining disputed 
points of law. It seems, however, desirable that judges of an 
inferior grade should be provisionally bound by the decisions 
of those of a superior grade, on points not decided by the 
final court of appeal^ 

§ 2. So far I have not supposed the legislature's power 
of making laws to be confined by any legal limitations. But 
we have already seen it to be possible in any commimity — 
and we shall hereafter see it to be necemiry in a community 
federally organised, if the terms of the federal union are to 
have legal force and precision — to restrict the powers of 
any ordinary legislature within definite limits fixed by 
constitutional rules, which can only be modified by some 
extraordinary legislature or by some process more difficult 
than that of ordinary legislation. It is further clear that, 
if such constitutional rules are to have the force of law so 
long as they are not modified, there must be some body 
that has the function of deciding whether the ordinary 

^ It does not seem reasonable that a tribunal should be bound by the 
decision of a co-ordinate tribunal on a point not carried up to the final court 
of appeal. But, to maintain a clear uniformity in the interpretation of the 
law, it might be made the duty of a judge who definitely rejects the inter- 
pretation of a co-ordinate judge, to communicate his difference, with its 
grounds, to the court of appeal : which might then decide the point at 
issue, whether the litigants appeal or not. 



xxiT THE JUDICIAR Y 485 

legislature has not transgressed them in its legislation; 
and that this is primd fdcie a strictly judicial function. 
There are, however, certain objections against assigning 
this function to the judicial organ in a unitary state, which 
will be more conveniently considered hei'eafter:^ for the 
present, therefore, I shaU assume that the ordinary 
legislature — with or without the assent of the executive 
— has a legally unlimited power of modifying the rules 
applied by the judiciary: and is not responsible for the 
use of this power except to the electorate and to public 
opinion. 

But granting that the judiciary cannot question the 
validity of any law duly made by the Legislature,^ it may 
still be the final authority for interpreting any and every 
law that actually exists ; and therefore for determining any 
disputed questions of constitutional no less than civil right, 
— so far, that is, as the constitutional rules in question are 
strictly laws, and not merely dependent on custom and 
convention. And it would seem that, in most cases, no 
other body can be so well qualified to exercise this authority. 
For instance, I conceive that the judiciary should decide 
disputed questions as to membership of a legislative 
chamber, — especially when the chamber is elective, and 
the election is alleged to have been vitiated by bribery, 
intimidation, or other causa Such questions eminently 
require judicial impartiality ; and both reason and experience 
would lead us to regard them as unfit to be decided by the 
chamber itself or any committee of it ; owing to the habits 
and sentiments of partisanship which cannot be excluded 
from such bodies. 

I conceive, however, that, notwithstanding any danger 
of partisanship, it should be left to the chamber itself — 
either acting as a whole or through its chairman or a com- 
mittee — to administer judicially its own rules of procedure.' 

* See chap, xxvii. § 4. 

^ With the consent of the Supreme Executive, if the latter has a veto. 

3 I am here assuming that the chamber is not bound by rules of procedure 
constitutionally fixed, so as not to be modifiable by the ordinary process of 
legislation. 



486 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

In particular, it should have power to enforce its rules of 
order, by silencing or excluding disorderly members : since, 
for the effective maintenance of order, it is necessary that 
such penalties should be promptly administered, and no 
external tribunal is likely to estimate the gravity of breaches 
of order so well as the members of the chamber. Some 
limitation, however, of the power of exclusion would seem 
to be necessary, to prevent such a perversion of the repre- 
sentative system as would take place, if this power of 
excluding members were used so as to enable measures to 
be passed which would have been rejected if the excluded 
members had voted — or vice 'otr^ Similarly, for the 
maintenance of order, the chamber should also have the 
right of forbidding — and, if necessary, punishing — the 
intrusion of strangers: publicity of debate, therefore, 
though it should be customary, should not be enforced by a 
rigid rule : but there seems to be no adequate reason why 
any attempts to intimidate or interfere with debates, other- 
wise than by intrusion into the buildings under the control 
of the chamber, should not be left to the judiciary to punish. 
Attempts of this latter kind are chiefly to be feared at 
crises of excitement : under ordinary circumstances, there is 
no serious danger of legal conflicts arising between legislators 
as such and private individuals, in which the impartiality 
of judges might be strained. The case is different with the 
executive. As we have seen, it is necessary, for the main- 
tenance of law and government, to invest the executive with 
rather extensive powers of interference with the liberty and 
property of private citizens ; while at the same time the 
security of the latter requires that these powers should be 
exercised as far as possible under strict rules and limitations : 
it is therefore important that the private individuals who 
suffer from their exercise should have the right of appealing 
as soon as possible to an independent and impartial law 
court in the case of any alleged transgression of these rules.^ 

^ See chap, xxvii. § 5, p. 568. 

' On the question whether the cxeontive should have the right of 
suspending these rules in exceptional emergencies, see chap. xxii. § 10. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 487 

The chief constitutional regulations established with a view 
to this result are, indeed, commonly recognised as the most 
important protections of civil liberty ; and this is perhaps 
the most convenient place to give a brief general account of 
them ; since the most difficult questions as to the structure 
of the Judiciary are connected with its function of main- 
taining legal order against the guardians of that order 
themselves. 

§ 3. First, we may note the need of rules reducing within 
the narrowest possible limits the power of the executive to 
imprison private citizens before trial The most important 
provisions under this head are (a) that no one shall be 
arrested except on a definite charge of having committed 1^ 
certain offence ; (6) that the person arrested shall be brought 
as] soon as possible before a judicial functionary who shall 
decide whether the charge is made on groimds primd fade 
reasonable, and whether the ofifence charged is sufficiently 
grave to render it needful to keep the accused in confine- 
ment until the trial ; (c) that if the charge is of this grave 
kind the accused shall be brought to trial as soon as possible, 
and that if it is of a lighter kind, he shall be set at liberty 
on bail In order that these latter provisions may be 
effective, it is clearly desirable that the judicial functionary 
before whom the accused person is brought should be dis- 
tinct from the executive and independent of its influence. 
This independence is further required to secure an impartial 
trial in any case in which the conduct of private persons 
which is alleged to be illegal is certainly inconvenient 
to the executive. It is also required to secure the effective- 
ness of another of the constitutional bulwarks of freedom to 
which I above referred, — the right of suing or prosecuting 
Government officials for any illegalities committed by them 
in performance of their functions. For if the conduct 
of one member of the executive had to be judged by 
another, or by a judge practically under its control, the 
esprit de corps which may be presumed to exist in the 
executive as a body, and its natural tendency to resist any 
restriction on its powers, would diminish the complainant's 



488 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

chance of obtaining an impartial hearing and adequate 
redress.^ 

How, then, is the required independence to be secured ? 
Let us first assume that the judges are to be professional 
experts ; — since it can hardly be doubted that to obtain the 
knowledge and skill required for the consistent and accurate 
determination of legal rights and duties in particular cases, 
continual professional practice as well as systematic pre- 
paratory study are generally necessary in an advanced stage 
of ciidlisation, in most if not in all departments of the 
administration of law. We may further assume that these 
professional judges will be arranged in grades, so that the 
nwst important cases may be reserv^ed for the ablest 
intellects; and especially the courts of appeal required to 
correct judicial errors may command confidence by their 
superior grasp and insight. It seems then clear, in the first 
place, that to secure the judicial independence of the judges 
in all grades they should be not simply dismissible — or 
appointed for short periods — by the executive. On the 
other hand, it is obviously undesirable to make the appoint- 
ment and dismissal of judges a part of the regular business 
of a ntimerous elected legislature. Such a body can hardly 
be expected to estimate efficiently the special knowledge 
and skill required for judicial decisions, and is likely to be 
too much influenced by popular sentiment and party spirit ; 
especially under parliamentary government, where judicial 
independence is chiefly required for the protection of 
minorities, — since the relation of the heads of the executive 
departments to the representative assembly would suffice to 
restrain the former from encroachments likely to be resented 
by the majority of the electorate. For similar reasons, 
direct popular election of judges is even more open to 
objection. On the whole, it seems best that judges in all 
grades should ordinarily hold office during good behaviour ; 
and that the power of dismissal required to meet cases of 
misbehaviour or grave imfitness, should be normally exer- 

* Whether cases of this kind should be tried by the ordinary tribunals 
will ho considered later, § 8. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 489 

cised by a body of judges of the highest grade. The dismissal 
of any member of this body ought to be a very rare event : 
if the occasion for it should arise, any danger of undue 
indulgence on the i)art of this high tribunal towards one 
of its members might be met by constructing a special 
court, in which members of the legislature form a majority, 
with power to dismiss any member of the judiciary for 
adequate reasons. The control of a tribunal so constituted 
seems necessary, in the last resort, to secure that the judges 
loyally apply the law laid down by the legislature.^ 

The appointment — as distinct from the dismissal— of 
judges of the lowest grade might be given to the executive, 
without any danger to judicial independence : but promo- 
tion by the executive from a lower grade to a higher may 
be as dangerous to independence as the power of dismissal, 
since it would be practically much easier for the executive 
to reward judicial subserviency by promotion than to punish 
its opposite by dismissal. On the other hand, it hardly 
seems desirable to give the function of appointing judges 
to one or more judges of the highest grade, since being 
normally irremovable they could not be made effectively 
responsible for bad appointments: while to prohibit pro- 
motion altogether within the judiciary would sometimes 
exclude the most competent persons from the higher posts. 
The problem does not seem to admit of a perfectly satis- 
factory solution : we can hardly avoid either some danger 
to judicial independence, or some risk of inferior appoint- 
ments ; hence, whatever solution is adopted, we shall have 
to trust to public opinion — especially the opinion of the 
legal profession — to minimise the consequent danger. 

§ 4. So far we have confined our attention to profes- 

^ The English plan, by which the executive is empowered to remove 
judges of the High Court on the recommendation of the two Houses of 
Parliament, has some advantages : but the plan suggested in the text 
seems preferable, because for reasons already explained (chap. xxiiL § 4), I 
do not think it possible to secure that either chamber of the Legislature shaU, 
generally speaking, be well adapted for exercising judicial functions. The 
tribunal suggested in the text might also deal with certain charges brought 
against executive officials. See § 9 of this chapter. 



490 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

sional judges. But since the administration of justice 
requires not only a knowledge of law but also knowledge 
and sound judgment of the particular facts of the case 
tried, it has been widely held that it tends to be improved 
by the introduction of what is called a " lay " element — ix. 
of persons other than professional lawyers — into judicial 
tribunals. Actually, such a lay element in various forms 
has a large place in the judiciary of modern states : and as 
its introduction is partly advocated as a solution of the 
problem of securing judicial independence, we may con- 
veniently now proceed to consider it. 

The professional and lay elements may be associated in 
judicial work in four distinct ways : 

(1.) Legal experts may decide all questions with lay 

advisers. 
(2.) Lay judges may decide all questions with legal 

advisers. 
(3.) Both elements may blend in one tribunal, of which 

all members have an equal voice in deciding all 

questions. 
(3.) The whole judicial function may be divided into 

two parts, one allotted to the legal, and the 

other to the lay element. 
The first arrangement seems appropriate to cases where 
the main difficulty lies in determining points of law, but 
special experience is frequently required for the right 
application of the law to the fticts. On the other hand, 
where the law to be applied is mostly clear and simple, so 
that difficulties arise chiefly in as<?ertaining facts and judg- 
ing of motives and intentions, there are strong economical 
considerations in favour of the second plan: since the 
services of unprofessional judges, if the demand made on 
their time is not very heavy, may be often obtained 
gratuitously or for a comparatively small expense. Where 
there is no such preponderance of either kind of difficulty, 
the choice would seem to lie naturally between the third 
and the fourth method: and of these the latter seems 
primd facie preferable, as it assigns to each part of the 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 49^ 

tribunal the sole responsibility for that part of the judicial 
function for which it is deemed to be best qualified. The 
division of work, again, may be either compulsory, or at 
the discretion of the judge or of the parties ; and the two 
elements of the tribunal may do their work either (1) 
separately — ^as when a scientific investigation required for 
deciding a judicial issue is conducted by referees — or (2) 
in combination. 

The arrangement last mentioned is that adopted in the 
ancient and still surviving organisation of the judicature in 
England, — to some extent in civil cases, and universally in 
criminal cases where the offence is grave. The law as 
applicable to any case is determined by a judge possessing 
legal knowledge and skill, who also in criminal cases 
assigns the punishment within limits laid down by law ; 
while the ascertainment of the facts of the particular case, 
and the final decision on the issues raised,^ devolve on a 
jury of twelve persons, commonly selected for each pcffti- 
cular case from a list of the householders of the district 
possessing a certain property qualification — some special 
classes of persons being excluded. The impartiality of 
the tribunal is supposed to be secured by the introduction 

^ It secmsTimportant to recognise expressly three parts of the judicial 
process, besides the assignment of the punishment — (1) the determination 
of the general rule, (2) the ascertainment of the facts in any particular case, 
and (3) the application of the law to the facts. It is necessary to dis- 
tinguish this last from the other two, because, oven where there could be no 
doubt or difficulty about it if the other two parts of the process have been 
properly executed, still, if we consider the process as divided between an 
actual judge and actual jury, having human defects and weaknesses, and 
liable to the ordinary human perversions of motive, wc can see that it may 
make an important practical difference whether the application of the law 
to the facts should be left to the expert who declares the law, or to the 
twelve plain men who pronounce on the facts. And if the institution of 
the jury is valued rather as a protection against Governmental encroach- 
ments on private rights, than as an instrument for performing in the most 
efficient manner the intellectual process involved in the judicial administra- 
tion of law, there can be no doubt that the protection is more complete 
if the jury has not only to supply the minor premiss of the legal syllogism 
but also to pronounce the conclusion. Sometimes, too — as we shall see — 
the question of guilt falls as naturally within the province of the "plain 
man '' as any question of pure fact. 



492 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of a suflScient element of chance into the selection, and by 
the right of the litigants ^ to challenge any person selected, 
for reasons assigned, and in important criminal cases to 
reject a certain number without reason. This institution 
is probably the most famous of the judicial bulwarks of 
liberty to which I before referred ; and the question how 
far this, or any similar admission of a lay element, is ex- 
pedient, in the judiciary of such a society as we have been 
contemplating throughout, is perliaps the most important 
of all the questions that belong to this department of con- 
stitutional construction. 

I do not think it a question on which a clear general 
decision can be reached, apart from a consideration of the 
habits and sentiments prevailing in a partictdar country 
at a particular time ; but it may be instructive briefly to 
examine the arguments for and against it, distinguishing 
different cases. 

§ 5. Firstly, in many disputes of legal right, arising 
out of industrial and commercial relations, it is difficult to 
apply legal principles properly — however precise they may 
be in themselves — ^without special experience of the con- 
ditions and customs imder which particular businesses are 
carried on : since such experience is required to judge 
rightly of the motives, intentions, and implied imder- 
standings of the persons concerned. In such cases a com- 
bination, in some form or other, of legal experts with men 
of business possessed of the special experience required, 
seems likely to furnish the best qualified tribunal. Further, 
there are cases in which the estimate of culpability in- 
volves more than merely knowledge of the rules of law and 
ascertainment of particular facts ; it involves the applica- 
tion of a standard which can never be quite definite and 
can only attain adequate definiteness for practical purposes 
through experience of similar afiairs ; — as when the ques- 
tion is whether a man has taken "reasonable care" to 
avoid causing mischief in certain circumstances. Here 
again special experience of a particular business is some- 

^ Including under this term prosecutor and defendant in criminal cases. 



XXIV THE JUDICIARY 493 

times required ; sometimes, again, what is needed is rather 
a general experience of affidrs — ^which legal experts generally 
are as likely as other people to possess, but of which any 
one such expert might happen to be devoid. In the latter 
case the best security for justice seems to lie in a tolerably 
numerous tribunal: and as a numerous tribimal of legal 
experts would be costly, — and wasteful so far as legal 
knowledge and skill are concerned, — there is a strong 
economic argument for some such institution as the 

Some advocates, however, of the jury system go much 
further; they argue, broadly and generally, that for the 
ascertainment of truth on the questions oifact that come 
before a law court there is an intellectual superiority in 
the judgment of " plain common sense," as compared with 
conclusions reached by the " artificial and technical methods 
of proof to which the legal mind is prone." Where, how- 
ever, the right conclusion has to be drawn from a mass 
of more or less conflicting testimony of witnesses of all 
degrees of trustworthiness, supported by a web of infer- 
ences, often necessarily subtle and complex, from circum- 
stances of all degrees of evidential relevancy and importance, 
— it would seem that in such processes the skill derived 
from special training and experience will be an advantage 
difficult to coimterbalance. A competent judge will norm- 
ally be, through practice, an expert in the performance of 
these processes, as well as in the more technical reasonings 
by which the legal rules appUcable to any given case are 
determined : nor do I see any ground to suppose that his 
practice in the latter kind of inference will interfere with 
the empirical skill gained by his practice in the former. 
It may be replied that the judge can and does give the 
jury the full benefit of his skill in summing up the evi- 
dence before their final deliberation. This is, no doubt, the 
English practice, but it is a compromise hardly consistent 
with a full belief in the superiority of plain common sense ; 
and it is therefore not surprising that in the United States 
the judges are generally " forbidden to charge a jury upon 



494 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the facts of the casa" ^ Nor does the compromise really 
obviate the objection just stated. For firstly, if the 
decision does not rest with the judge, it is probable that in 
the very cases in which, on account of their difBculty, the 
opinion of an expert would be of most value, the judge will 
be inclined to avoid the responsibility of drawing the 
balance between conflicting considerations, and will simply 
confine himself to his recognised duty of impartially stating 
these considerations. And secondly, even supposing the 
conclusion of the judge to be always plainly stated, it does 
not follow that the jury will adopt it; indeed, to prove 
this would prove too much, as it would show that the 
intervention of the jury was no less superfluous than harm- 
less. In fact, it is notorious that English advocates con- 
tinually address appeals to juries which would have no 
weight with experts, and that these appeals sometimes 
prevail against the clearly indicated opinion of the judge. 

A somewhat different turn is sometimes given to the 
argument just discussed when used in special application to 
criminal justice. Thus Bluntschli ^ says that the " principle 
of the jury system " — in this application — ^is, that " no one 
shall sufler punishment for an offence unless his guilt has 
been made clear to the plain understanding and natural 
sense of justice of men taken from the people at large." 
This may either mean that the justice of the general rule 
applied, or that the cogency of the deduction by which it 
is applied, should be made generally intelligible. The 
latter demand should, I think, be satisfied as far as possible 
— though it may often be impossible to satisfy it fully — 
since, if the cogency of the judicial deduction cannot be 
made thus clear, the law is evidently wanting in "cog- 
noscibility." But the former demand seems to be some- 
times intended: and it would certainly seem that the 
power of the jury to give a "general verdict," — i.«. to 
declare an accused person guilty or not guilty, instead of 
merely declaring whether he has or has not committed 

* Sec Bryce, A'inerican CommcmwcaXQi^ Part II. chap, xxxviii. 
^ Allgemeines StaatsrecJU, Bk. Y. chap. iv. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 49S 

certain acts, — has been used in England to secure the 
satisfaction of this demand; the jury have more or less 
consciously applied not the actual law, — ^which they could 
hardly claim to know better than the judge, — but what, in 
their opinion, the law ought to have been. Now it is no 
doubt to be wished that all penalties imposed by law 
should be, so far as possible, approved by the moral senti- 
ments of the community. But where the legislature is 
adequately under the control of the citizens at large, an 
irregular rectification of law by a small casual selection of 
citizens is surely undesirable. If the law is to be nullified 
in any district in which it happens to be unpopular, it 
seems better that the right of nullification should be form- 
ally allowed to a local legislature than that it should be 
assumed by a jury. If, on the other hand, it is admitted 
to be necessary to repress by penal statutes conduct which 
some local majority — or even perhaps the common sense of 
persons who have not fully considered the matter — does not 
regard as gravely blameworthy, it seems more conducive to 
the realisation of the legislature's designs that the applica- 
tion of such laws should be entrusted to professional judges, 
instead of being placed in the hands of " plain men " whose 
" natural sentiment of justice " will irresistibly incline them 
to dangerous indulgenca 

The case is dififerent where legislation is not effectively 
under popular control; here the jury — or some similar 
introduction of the lay element into the judiciary — ^may be 
useful in keeping the development of law in harmony with 
the changing needs of the conmiunity. But in such a 
government as we are now considering, I cannot but con- 
clude that the intellect of an average judge is generally to 
be preferred to that of an ordinary jury, as an instrument 
for attaining right conclusions on questions of fact. At the 
same time I have already admitted that there are certain 
cases where the intervention of a jury of persons specially 
experienced in the affairs with which the trial is concerned 
may be of real value. 

Another argument often used in favour of the jury 



496 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

relates to the moral qualification necessary for the adminis- 
tration of justica It lays stress on the greater chance of 
incorruptibility in a judicial organ improvised ad hoc in 
each trial by casual selection from the community at large, 
as contrasted with a permanent professional organ. But if 
jurymen are personally corruptible, it will be hardly possible 
to prevent them from being bribed, at any rate if the case 
is important and prolonged ; and, on the other hand, the 
inducements to refrain from bribery can easily be made more 
effective in the case of the judge. Indeed, the experience 
of modem England seems to show that if judges are 
adequately paid, the fear of social disgrace and professional 
ruin is sufficient practically to exclude the danger of bribery 
in their case. 

And, on the other side, if both judge and jurymen are 
not corruptible, it may be presumed that the former is more 
likely to be free from unconscious bias than the latter : as 
the performance of his daily duties will tend to give him an 
exceptional habit of impartiality. Whereas jurymen will 
tend to be imduly influenced by popular dislikes and 
sympathies: and if they are mainly drawn from certain 
classes, they are likely in civil controversies to have a bias 
in favour of these classes as against others. It has been 
said,^ that in England "no insurer resisting a life policy, 
no great company resisting a claim for an accident, no 
lawyer or doctor suing for his bill, no gentleman contesting 
a tradesman's charges, no landlord suing for a forfeiture, no 
informer suing for penalties, no person in any way generally 
unpopular, can depend on the impartiality of common 
juries : " and though the statement is, I hope, too sweeping, 
it can hardly be doubted that there is a considerable danger 
of partiality in the directions indicated. 

So far I have been considering the institution of the 
jury as an instrument for obtaining right judicial decisions ; 
but it may also be considered in another aspect — which 
may be called in a special sense political — i.e. in respect of 
its influence on the relations between the citizens and their 

^ Brown, Dark Side of Trial by Jury, 1859. 



XXIV THE JUDICIARY 497 

government. From this point of view it must be admitted 
to have important advantages: bnt in a varying degree 
according to the subject matter of the judicial procedure 
in which it is used. In ordinary civil cases its main 
reconmiendation is that a wide diffusion of the experience 
of actually taking a part in governmental work of some 
kind has a valuable educative effect on the citizens: it 
tends to keep alive their political consciousness^ and make 
them regard the business of government, not as a mystery 
beyond their comprehension and concern, but as their own 
public business, the management of which they ought .to 
understand sufficiently to be able from time to time to 
take a part in it. But though this is an argument for 
giving some public functions if possible — besides the 
function of voting periodically for members of parliament 
— to some members of the class from which jurymen are 
drawn, it is hardly a strong argument for giving them 
judicial functions especially. 

There is, however, a further argument in the case of 
criminal justice: viz. that the function of condemning to 
punishment — especially capital punishment — is liable to 
involve the functionary in more or less odium, which from 
time to time may reach an intense degree of impopularity, 
if for any reason the sympathy of the people in general is 
enlisted on the side of the criminal If, then, this odium 
is entirely borne by a professional judge, it may accumulate 
until it generates a dangerous amoimt of discontent against 
the administration of the law. Whereas if the responsi- 
bility of pronouncing the verdict is thrown on a tribunal 
formed of a casual combination of private citizens, which 
is resolved again into its elements when the verdict is 
once given, their judgment is likely in the first instance 
to cause less discontent even when it jars on popular 
sympathies ; and any discontent that it may cause is likely 
to be shortlived, and can hardly be a source of public danger. 
There is a special kind of criminal trials in which the 
jury system has oeen regarded with approval even by 
thinkers who were fully alive to its defects as an instrument 

2k 



498 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

for the ordinary administration of justice: viz. trials for 
what are called " political " offences, — Lt, for acts, whether 
otherwise criminal or not, of which the alleged design is to 
overthrow or to control its action, by the exercise or threat 
of unlawful force. It is obviously of special importance for 
seciirity of impartial justice that the tribunal which decides 
thesd cases should be independent of the influence of the 
exeoutive; and we have seen it to be diflScult to secure 
this completely in the case of the legal expert to whom 
the function of declaring the law must be entrusted, without 
sdcrificing the best mode of appointing such experts. It 
seems, however, doubtful whether there is a better chance 
of impartiality if the application of the law is left to a 
jury, in a community in which the executive is directly 
er indirectly under popular control : since, in such a com- 
munity, party feeling is likely to run high, and it will be 
very difficult to find jurymen who are not strongly biassed 
either for or against the government.^ 

To sum up : it seems to me that the weight of argument 
is on the whole against the use of the jury in civil trials : — 
•except in certain cases, in which it should be composed of 
persons possessing some kind of special experience. As 
regards criminal trials of importance — especially for capital 
offences — the balance of argument seems to me at present 
the other way: but perhaps we may predict that if 
civilisation continues to progress, the arguments on the 
negative side will be ultimately found to be decidedly the 
stronger. 

I may observe that the distinction above drawn between 
the use of the jury in civil, and its use in criminal, cases 
<5orresponds to the historical development of the institution : 
since the civil jury remains almost^ peculiar to England 

. * I observe that this view of tlio inevitable partiality of juries, in 
political trials, appears to be generally accepted by both political parties in 
Sngjand at the present crisis (1888-90), though its application by each 
party is different. 

* It finds a place in the constitution of Portugal ; and it has been intro« 
duced from England into Scotland ; where, however, it is not so largely 
tised as in England, and is not thought to work so welL 



XXIV THE JVDICIAR Y 499 

and her colonies, while the criminal jury has spread from 
England to several other European countries 

For the requirement of UTmnimiiy in the verdict of a 
jury it is hard to find even plausible grounds in civil cases. 
It is commonly defended in criminal cases as a protection 
of innocence: and it is doubtless better that a guilty 
man should escape than that an innocent man should suffer 
unmerited punishment : but jurymen generally are likely to 
feel adequately the force of this argimient for giving the 
accused the benefit of the doubt : there is no reason, there- 
fore, to suppose that where a minority refuses to condemn 
it will more often than not be right in so refusing. To 
require somewhat more than a bare majority for condemna- 
tion is the utmost that seems defensible. 

§ 6. We may now proceed to notice briefly certain 
other important differences in the machinery for reaUsing 
civil and criminal justice respectively, corresponding to the 
difference of aims in the two cases. As we have seen,^ in 
civil actions the direct aim of the judicial intervention of 
Government is to decide disputed points of private right, and 
give adequate remedies for private wrongs. If, therefore, 
any individual can obtain the satisfaction he requires other- 
wise than by the intervention of Government, there is no 
need that the latter should take place : indeed, it is obviously 
better that the expense, trouble, and probable increase of 
ill feeling which a formal public trial is likely to entail, 
should be spared to both parties. Hence, it is desirable 
that Grovernraent should encourage suitors to resort to arbitra- 
tion ; and should enforce the decisions of an arbitrator — if 
he has been duly appointed and there is no ground for 
impeaching his good faith — in case either party refuse to 
abide by the result of the arbitration. And when the 
intervention of the judge is necessary, it should be limited 
to the decision of disputed questions brought before him by 
one or other of the disputants : it is therefore clear that 
the manner of procedure in a civil action should be 
litigious and not inquisitorial, and that the judge should not 

^ See chap. viii. p. 115. 



50O ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

initiate a civil action, or carry it on against the will of both 
parties, or decide any issues of right not raised by the parties. 

In all these respects criminal or penal justice presents 
an important contrast. Punishments, as distinct from 
damages, are inflicted for the prevention of offences, and 
therefore primarily in the interests of the community: 
and where they are inflicted (as is the commonest case) 
for mischief that falls primarily on some private individual, 
it is important — at least unless the offence is slight — that 
the matter should not be settled by private compensation 
to the individual This result may be partly attained by 
making it illegal to "compound a felony." But it seems 
inequitable that the burden of bringing the offenders to 
justice should be legally thrown on the person who has 
already suffered the mischief of the ofience, or his nearest 
relatives : nor is it desirable to rely entirely on revenge — 
which is an objectionable motive — or safe to rely on public 
spirit for the performance of this important duty: while, 
again, it is not in most cases expedient that individuals 
should be tempted to take up this invidious task as a 
trade, for the sake of a pecuniary reward.^ Under these 
circumstances, the necessity for a public prosecutor or 
investigator of crime appears incontrovertible. 

It is not so clear whether the prosecution or investigation 
of crime should be regarded as belonging to the executive 
or to the judicial organ. As the business requires energy, 
discretion, and skill more markedly than judicial impartiality, 
it seems expedient that the officials engaged in it should be 
under conditions — in respect of dismissibility — similar to 
those of executive officials generally: also the work of 
discovering the perpetrators of crime and proving their 
guilt is naturally connected with the essentially executive 
business of forcibly preventing and repressing crime. More- 

^ There are only two cases in which the expedient of repressing niis- 
ohicvous acts by "penalties'* recoverable by "common informers" appears 
to bo admissible on special grounds : (a) in the case of offences at once difH- 
cult to discover and imjiortant to repress, and yet not directly mischievous 
to private persons ; and (6) as a constitutional security in the case of 
offences committed by public officials. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 501 

over, on the assumption that a criminal trial is to take a 
litigious form, and to be conducted as a dispute between 
two parties, any close official connection between prosecutors 
and judges is primd facie objectionable as tending to throw 
suspicion on the perfect impartiality of the latter. On the 
other hand, if the prosecution of crime be made a part of 
executive business, there is some danger of its being 
performed with undue partiality towards members of the 
executive. To obviate this, it should be open to private 
persons to prosecute — judicial permission being obtained 
— if the public officials decline to do so, or even along 
with them: and the power — which seems necessary — of 
prohibiting prosecutions as vexatious should be vested in a 
judicial and not in an executive organ. 

It may, however, be doubted whether the litigious form 
of procedure, which is proper to civil suits, ought to be 
adopted in a criminal trial. Certainly a public prosecutor, 
in presenting his case, ought not to show, and would be 
generally condemned for showing, the partiality which is 
tolerated as natural and inevitable in a private litigant. 
Hence the litigious form of criminal procedure is open to 
the objection that the litigants cannot really be on equal 
terms : e.g. an advocate for the prosecutor would be severely 
blamed for concealing evidence telling in favour of the 
}U5Ciised, while the opposing advocate would not be similarly 
blamed for concealing evidence against him. Still, to secure 
justice, an unbiassed judge who has no responsibility for the 
prosecution seems indispensable, not only in the final trial, 
but also to decide whether there are adequate grounds for 
imprisoning the accused before trial : so far, therefore, the 
litigious form of procedure seems inevitable, and it is difficult 
to combine it satisfactorily with a procedure to any extent 
inquisitorial At the same time, it must be admitted that 
where an accused person has in any case to be kept in 
prison for some time before his trial, there is an obviously 
convenient opportunity for a private inquisitorial investiga- 
tion by a judge ; and that such an investigation is often 
likely to be a more effective instrument for finding out the 



S02 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

truth than a merely litigious procedure. Perhaps it should 
also be admitted that the English dislike of inquisitorial 
examination of accused persons is partly due to a confusion 
between the sound principle that an innocent person should 
be allowed every means of proving his innocence, and the 
unsound principle that a guilty person should be allowed to 
resist or evade attempts to prove him guilty. 

I may note briefly the characteristics of criminal pro- 
cedure — at least in grave cases — which seem to follow 
properly from the soimd principle just mentioned. The 
accused person should be allowed complete information as 
to the charges against him, full time for preparing his 
defence, and the advice of experts. He should be allowed 
to hear all the e\'idence given against him and to cross- 
examine the ydtnesses personally or by counsel — to make 
the latter privilege completely eflTective, it seems desirable^ 
generally speaking, that only oral evidence should be ad- 
mitted ; ^ imless the accused himself wishes to put forward 
written testimony on his behalfl He should be allowed 
to summon witnesses on his side who should be boimd 
to attend, and, if he wishes, to give evidence personally, 
subject to cross-examination. As a final guarantee against 
official oppression, his trial should be in a place to which 
the public are normally admitted; though exceptions to 
this rule of publicity are needful in special cases, in the 
interest of morality; and the judge should always have 
such powers of exclusion as may be necessary to maintain 
order, and repress demonstrations of popular feeling danger- 
ous bo the independence of the tribunal. 

§ 7. A right of appeal against the decision of any coiu't 
of first instance should generally be allowed, in order to 
correct mistakes and preserve uniformity in the judicial 
interpretation of law. It is a more difficult question how 
far an appeal should be allowed from a decision on a ques- 
tion of fact, which does not form a precedent. In parti- 
cular, such an appeal does not harmonise well with the 
jiuy system ; except in cases where there is fresh evidence, 

^ i,e, in the final trial. 



XXXV THE JUDICIARY 503 

of which the absence in the first trial was not due to the 
negligence of the party whom it favours. For it hardly 
seems consistent with the principle of the jury system tq 
appeal from a jury to a court of professional judges ;: while, 
if the appeal be made to a second jury, it is hard to see 
why this should be generally expected to judge more cor- 
rectly than the first. It would seem therefore, that, in 
civil cases at least, a decision of a jury should not be set 
aside by a court of appeal because it is against the weight 
of evidence, except when an unmistakable and scandalous 
miscarriage of justice has occurred. In any case, the in- 
dependence of the court that has the power of overruling 
the jury should be guarded with especial care : and, if the 
principle of the jury system is thoroughly maintained, the 
result of the overruling must be not a decision on tha 
question at issue, but a new trial by another jury. 

The question of appeal — on other than purely legal 
issues — ^in criminal trials is beset mth peculiar difficulties, 
especially where the punishment is severe, and such as 
either could not, or practically would not, be increased on 
appeal: since, in such cases, one would expect criminals 
always to appeal, unless prevented by cost : while if cost 
alone prevented the appeal, the inequality between rich 
and poor would be flagrant. A widely accepted way of 
meeting this difficiQty is not to grant a formal right of 
appeal to convicted criminals, but to give to a high exe-r 
cutive official the power of remitting or mitigating punish* 
ment at his discretion ; a power which can also be used in 
cases where the infliction of the full legal punishment 
would be for special reasons impolitic, as well as in cases of 
judicial error. The objections to this are (1) that an 
executive individual or council is not likely to be parti- 
cularly well qualified for difficult judicial functions, r and 
(2) that the executive thus acquires a dangerous power of 
weakening the restraints of law. On these grounds it 
seems desirable that if this power be vested in the execu^ 
tive its exercise should be in some way subject either to 
judicial approval or to the sanction of parliament : judicial 



504 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

approval being required when the " pardon " or commuta- 
tion of punishment is granted on strictly judicial grounds, 
parliamentary approval — direct or indirect — when it is 
granted on extrajudicial grounds The latter kind of 
intervention should, however, be extremely rare, lest the 
deterrent effect of legal penalties be dangerously weakened ; 
and the initiative should in no case be taken by parliament, 
so that the responsibility for the exceptional procedure 
may be concentrated on the executive. 

Finally, the consideration of expense renders it expedi- 
ent to deal with cases of minor importance in a more 
summary manner, with a procedure in which simplification 
for the sake of economy overrides to some extent precaution 
against error. The same consideration may reasonably 
prevent the separation of executive and judicial functions 
from being carried out to the extent that would otherwise 
be desirable. 

§ 8. So far I have taken note of the differences of 
grade in the judiciary required on grounds of economy — 
tribunals of the lowest grade being confined to cases of 
minor importance ; — and also of the differences in organisa- 
tion corresponding to the fundamental distinction between 
civil and criminal procedure. It remains to consider how 
far any further specialisation of judicial work and machinery 
is expedient. It is obvious that if a lay element, qualified 
by special experience, is introduced into the tribunals, they 
must be so far different for different departments of busi- 
ness: but it does not follow that the legal element, even 
of these tribunals, need be similarly restricted. The chief 
arguments for specialisation, here as in other matters, are 
that it renders possible a completer adaptation of the 
worker to his work, and tends to increase the skill derived 
from practice: on the other side, we have to take into 
account difficulties in defining the competence of different 
courts, and the waste of labour and expense entailed either 
by disputes about competence or by the necessity of break- 
ing up a complicated dispute and dividing its naturally 
connected parts among different tribunals. In some cases. 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y $0$ 

of course, the dividing lines are much easier to draw than 
in others : e,g. questions of divorce or of electoral right are 
easily separated from other matters of legal controversy, 
but it is difficult to find a definition of commercial transac* 
tions which will distinguish them in a clear and intelli- 
gible manner from other transactions. In any case it 
seems desirable, in order to maintain consistency in the 
administration of the law, that there should be one strong 
Supreme Court, with the power to correct errors committed 
by other tribimals in the general definition of civic rights 
and duties.^ 

A question of great importance that comes under this 
head is whether there should be special " administrative " 
courts " for disputes of right between governmental officials 
and private persons. For some disputes of this class there 
certainly seems to be no need of special judicial machinery : 
e.g. disputes as to pecuniary claims in respect of taxes or 
otherwise, made on private individuals in behalf of the 
public, or similar claims made by individuals on the State, 
in consequence of contracts between them and the Grovern- 
ment. There is no reason for withdrawing the decision 
of such questions from the tribunals that deal with the 
mutual pecuniary obligations of private persons.^ The case 
is different when damages are claimed or punishment de- 
manded for illegal violations of private rights by executive 
officials. Where, indeed, the alleged offences are committed 
by officials either avowedly not acting as such, or palpably 
misusing their official position for illegitimate private pur- 
poses, it again seems dear that it may be left to the 
ordinary tribunals to punish them, and to exact adequate 

^ Such a court need not necessarily have the x>owcr of deciding cases on 
appeal : it may have only the power of cancelling decisions arrived at by a 
process involving a material error in law. 

^ Tribunaux Adminittratifs. 

^ It does not follow that the public should have no special advantages in 
such litigation, to balance the force of self-interest that must be expected 
continually to prompt private encroachments on public rights. But these 
advantages should be carefully defined by law, not secured by any partiality 
in the tribunals that apply the law. 



5o6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

reparation for the mischief caused by them. It is only 
where a wrong is alleged to have been committed by an 
official boTid fidt discharging his official duties, that the 
expediency of referring the question to the ordinary courts 
becomes doubtfuL 

In admitting this doubt, I do not lay stress on the 
danger — which seriously alarms some foreign publicists — 
of the conflicts of authority between the executive and the 
judiciary that must be expected to result from giving to 
the latter the function of sitting in judgment on the 
former. Such conflicts are doubtless to be regretted : but 
if the executive is to be kept efiectively within legal limits 
— which has seemed indispensable — it must meet with the 
resistance of some independent body when it transgresses 
these limits: and the evils of conflict are likely to be 
minimised if the independent resisting body has simply 
the judicial function of interpreting law, and no call or 
excuse to interfere ydth the exercise of the discretion that 
the law has assigned to the executiva Any impulses on 
the part of the judiciary to usurp a control over the dis- 
cretion of the executive will ordinarily be easy to check by 
further legislative definition of that discretion : in the last 
resort, the power of dismissing judges, that I have proposed 
to reserve to a body in which members of the legislature 
form the majority, would suffice to overcome any obstinate 
attempts at usurpation. 

My fear is rather that a tribunal not specialised by 
containing as one element persons who have had experi- 
ence of executive work will hardly be well qualified to 
interpret the limiting rules of law wherever a somewhat 
indefinite standard has to be applied. For instance, if the 
question is whether an official had reasonable cause for 
arresting a suspected criminal without a warrant, detaining 
a ship as unseaworthy, or breaking up a public meeting, it 
seems more likely that a just decision will be arrived at by 
a court including persons who have had official experience 
of somewhat similar matters: though to secure the inde- 
pendence and impartiality of the court, it is important that 



XXXV THE JUDICIARY 507 

such persons should not be actually members of the execu- 
tive at the time. There is, however, a considerable diflS- 
culty in constructing a tribimal of this kind that will 
command general confidence, and not be widely suspected 
of imdue bias in favour of the excutive. If this difliculty 
be found insuperable, it may be necessary, for the effective 
performance of governmental work, to give the executive 
somewhat wider legal powers than it ordinarily requires ; 
trusting to public opinion and parliamentary criticism to 
keep its exercise of these powers within somewhat narrower 
limits than those enforced by the judiciary.^ 

§ 9. A cognate question is raised by the need of a 
tribunal for dealing with charges of official misconduct, of 
which the mischief falls on the public, and does not give 
rise to a private claim for damages. Where the alleged 
offender holds his post " during pleasure " of a superior, and 
the offence charged is such as will be sufficiently punished 
by dismissal from employment, or some lighter disciplinary 
penalty which the ordinary official superior can inflict, the 
need of a formal judicial procedure does not arise ; but if 
the offender's tenure is on " good behaviour," and he refuses 
to accept dismissal, or if the gravity of the offence calls for 
a severer penalty than dismissal, some judicial process is 
obviously required ; the only question is whether it should 
be conducted by an ordinary court, or a special one, com- 
posed in whole or in part of experienced officials. The 
necessity of special military tribimals to punish breaches of 
military discipline is universally recognised ; here, however, 
there is a peculiarly intense need of strict subordination 
and prompt punishment, and a frequent impossibility of 
having recourse, at least without intolerable delay, to 
external tribunals ; reasons which do not ordinarily apply in 
the case of the civil service. In the latter case the ques- 
tion seems more doubtful — so far as punishment going 

^ It should be observed that a right to receive services from executive 
officials does not necessarily imply a right to bring actions against such 
officials when the services in question are imperfectly rendered or impro- 
perly withheld. In the case of some governmental services — e,g, the relief 
of indigence — it would be palpably inexpedient to grant this latter right. 



5o8 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

* 

beyond dismissal is concerned ; and the answer to it seems 
to depend on the degree of precision with which the oflScial 
misconduct reqidring punishment can be defined. Cer- 
tainly the mere requirement of special penalties for breaches 
of official duty does not in itself involve a requirement of 
specially constituted tribunals; ordinary judges might be 
trusted to administer such penalties, and to understand 
that faults of omission and commission which are venial in 
private persons — e.^. breach of confidential secrecy — become 
grave ofTences in the case of oflSciak. The question rather 
is, whether the kinds of gross neglect or corrupt misuse of 
official power or other flagrant postponement of public to 
private interests, for which severer penalties than dismissal 
seem to be necessary, are in fact so "various in their 
character and so indefinable in their actual involutions 
that " — though " easily understood by statesmen " — it " is 
almost impossible to provide systematically for them by 
positive law." ^ So far as this is clearly the case, it would 
certainly seem that justice and the public interest require 
that such offences should be referred to a specially consti- 
tuted tribunal, adequately supplied with the requisite 
experience of executive as well as judicial work. At the 
same time, a liability to punishment beyond dismissal, for 
offences that elude legal definition, is so formidable a risk 
to attach to the service of government — and so open to 
abuse in party conflicts — that I should hesitate to admit 
the need of it, without more proof than I have yet seen 
adduced. 

The case is different with dismissal — even if accompanied 
with permanent exclusion from the public service: — since 
the official on whom this penalty may be inflicted by a 
judicial process, but not otherwise, has at any rate a securer 
tenure than most employees in private businesses. And for 
this purpose it would not seem difficult to construct a 
suitable tribunal, of the kind above indicated — so far as 
subordinate officials are concerned. But the phrases I have 
above quoted are applied by Story to the more highly 

* Story, ConstUtUion of the UnUed Stales, Book III. ch. x. § 762.'; 



XXIV THE JUDICIAR Y 509 

placed functionaries, for whom the process of impeachment 
before the Senate is mainly provided in the constitution of 
the United States; and certainly the danger of official 
misconduct, at once grave and difficult to define ydth pre- 
cision beforehand, seems to increase with the extent of the 
power placed in the hands of a functionary. At the same 
time the difficulty of finding a tribunal at once of adequate 
strength and impartiality, and adequate insight, seems to 
increase in equal or even greater ratio: while if judicial 
forms came to be used without judicial impartiality, as a 
method of party warfare, the remedy might prove worse 
than the disease. Further, it is not clear that such a 
tribunal is needed under Parliamentary Grovernment for the 
repression of offences of this kind that may be committed 
by the heads of executive departments, since these func- 
tionaries will be practically dismissible by Parliament 
supported by the people ; and the loss of reputation that 
would be caused by such misconduct as would justify 
condemnation by a tribunal, would most probably lead to 
the retirement of the offending functionary. The case is, 
however, different where the supreme executive is appointed 
for a fixed period and is not dependent for its tenure of 
office on a parliamentary majority; in this latter case it 
would seem that the need of some process for getting rid of 
high officials guilty of grave misconduct may be occasionally 
very urgent, so that the advantages of establishing a 
tribunal before which they may be impeached outweigh 
the disadvantages. 

Supposing that it is decided to establish such a tribunal, 
it might properly be made identical with that before sug- 
gested for the ultimate control of the judiciary. It should 
accordingly consist of a small number of persons, partly 
judges of the highest grade and partly members of one 
or both legislative chambers, elected by their respective 
chambers in some way that would secure a proportional 
representation of different sections. 1 say " one or both " 
chambers, because I think that the function might with 
advantage be given to the Senate alone — as being more 



5IO ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxir 

likely to contain and elect statesmen of ripe experience and 
judicial temper — ^provided that the Senate is so elected as 
to possess adequate representative weight. In any case the 
element contributed by the legislature — ^which should form 
the majority in the tribunal — might be expected to bring 
experience of political business, and to counteract any 
tendency on the part of the judges to apply too technical 
methods to the case; while it might be hoped that the 
judicial element would prevent the matter from being 
decided by a mere party vota 



CHAPTEE XXV 

LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 

§ 1. Even in the larger modern states, if of the unitary 
type, the greater part of the supreme decisions in the work 
of government are normally made in a city selected as a 
political centre. It is here that the supreme legislature 
usually meets, and the courts that finally decide doubtful 
points in the interpretation of the law; and the superior 
officials in most executive departments ordinarily transact 
business here. Still, as we have seen, to prevent excessive 
cost or delay in the administration of justice an adequate 
provision of local tribunals is required. Similarly, most 
internal executive functions, whether coercive or industrial, 
obviously need officials locally dispersed, — policemen and 
soldiers for the maintenance of order, collectors of taxes 
direct and indirect, managers of roads and public land of 
all kinds, postmasters and other officials occupied in con- 
veyance and communication, relieving officers, sanitary 
inspectors, and so forth. In speaking, however, of " local 
governments " in a unitary state, we chiefly mean organs 
which, though completely subordinate to the central 
legislature, are independent of the central executive in 
appointment and, to some extent, in their decisions, and 
exercise a partially independent control over certain parts 
of public finance; and in the present chapter I shall 
confine my attention mainly to such partiaUy independent 
organs. 



512 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

The primary reason for this local independence is, that 
it is required to realise the full advantages of that reaction 
of the governed on the governing organs which represent- 
ative or responsible government seeks to bring about. Such 
advantages may lie in the direction either of greater 
efficiency or of greater economy. First, as we saw, the 
theory of responsible government rests on the principle that 
the interests of any group of governed persons will be most 
safely entrusted to governing persons whom they have the 
power from time to time to dismiss, directly or indirectly. 
It is an obvious inference from this principle that govern- 
mental functions which affect solely or mainly the inhabitants 
of a limited portion of a state should be placed under the 
special control of this section of the commimity ; in order 
that the criticism of this section, backed by the power 
of appointment and dismissal, may bring about a closer 
adaptation of administrative activity to its peculiar needs. 
Especially in matters — such as education and poor-relief — in 
which valuable aid can and should be given to governmental 
work by the voluntary efforts of private persons, we may 
expect to secure important gains by localising the control 
of the electorate over the work. Again, so far as any 
class of governmental services are rendered exclusively 
or mainly to a group of persons who live within a certain 
district, it is obviously equitable to throw the whole or main 
expense of such services on these persons ; and — so far as 
this expense cannot conveniently be met by payments 
voluntarily made by the recipients of the services, — the 
comparison of cost with utility is likely to be more accurately 
performed if the financial management of this department 
of governmental business is entrusted to a separate locally- 
elected organ. 

But there are other reasons why a vigorous development 
of local government is important, if not indispensable, to 
the effective working of representative institutions in a 
community as large as most modern states are. Over- 
centralisation, in such a community, introduces two opposite 
dangers. In the first place, if the only action that an 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 513 

ordinary citizen is called upon to take, in reference to 
public affairs of any great interest or importance, is that of 
voting at intervals of several years, as a unit in a group 
of many thousand electors, for a member of the central 
legislature, — or even for the head of the executive, — there 
is a danger that the control of the citizens generally over 
their government will become slack and ineffective; so 
that their exercise of the vote will be especially liable to 
be perverted by the sinister influences which we have 
before examined. But again, the same cause that tends 
to render the political consciousness of the ordinary citizen 
too languid at ordinary times also tends to increase the 
risk from occasional gusts of discontent and excitement, 
causing unreasonable expectations and complaints of govern- 
ment; since the mass of the community cannot but lack 
that general diffused knowledge of the real nature of 
governmental business, and the conditions and limitations 
under which it is carried on, which results from being 
brought into intimate social relations with the persons 
actually responsible for it. In short, whatever " educative '* 
value is rightly attributed to representative government 
largely depends on the development of local institutions. 

We must also take into account the danger of over- 
loading the central government with work. The importance 
of this danger grows in proportion as a more extended 
view is taken of the proper functions of government ; if the 
tendency actually operative in England towards increasingly 
extensive and complex governmental interference is in 
the main justifiable — as we have seen reason to think — it 
becomes increasingly important that the work to be done 
should be carefully distributed among different organs, so 
that none may be overburdened. 

On the other side, we have to reckon the economic and 
other advantages of having similar matters everywhere 
managed on a single imiform plan. We have also to con- 
sider the probability that both the central government and its 
critics — as compared with local governments and critics — 
will have the superior enlightenment derived from greater 

2l 



514 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

general knowledge, wider experience, and more highly-trained 
intellects ; and we have to consider the greater danger in a 
small locality that the sinister influence of a powerful 
individual, or corporation, or combination of persons with 
similar interests, may predominate to the detriment of the 
publia The force of these considerations will naturally 
vary with different circumstances, such as the condition 
of the arts of industry, the size of the local areas to which 
separate organs of government are allotted, the ease or 
difficulty of communication between different parts of the 
territory of the State. Moreover, the practical conclusion 
to which these considerations point may often be not 
centralisation pure and simple, but a combination of local 
and central organs— or of organs representing smaller and 
larger areas respectively — in the same department of 
governmental work: the organ representing the smaller 
area having the management of details, while the deter- 
mination of principles and general supervision are left to 
the government of the larger area. 

This division of labour, however, is often difficult to 
arrange ; and the difficulty is increased when the question 
arises of using the organs of local government, as subordinate 
organs of the central executive, for the performance of 
functions which are of national rather than sectional 
interest — such as the enforcement of obedience to laws 
passed by the central legislature. On the one hand, it may 
be obviously inconvenient and uneconomical to divide the 
local business of government between two sets of organs, 
the one independent of the central executive and the other 
strictly subordinate to it ; while yet, if this is not done, the 
independence of the locally-appointed organs is liable to inter- 
fere with the harmonious performance of executive functions. 

Finally, we have to note that the allotment of any con- 
siderable independent powers to local organs of government 
is — like any other division of authority — liable to be a 
source of danger at crises : since local disaffection may find 
in these organs a ready-made machinery for organising 
resistance to the central government. 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 515 

§ 2. It is by balancing the different considerations 
above given that the separation of governmental functions 
into central and local, and the local limits of the localised 
independent functions, are to be determined; so far as 
they can be determined apart from the special historical 
conditions of the particular state, on the assumption that 
the community in question is tolerably homogeneous 
and adequately united by common national sentiments.^ 
Actually, in determining the divisions and subdivisions of 
districts, historical conditions will rightly be allowed great 
influence; on account of the importance of respecting as 
far as possible traditional sentiments of conununity and 
habits of co-operation— especially in states formed by the 
union of previously independent or semi-independent com- 
munitiea Apart from historical associations, convenient 
local divisions are sometimes decisively indicated by physical 
boundaries— such as the intervention of seas or mountain 
ranges — or by marked differences in the density of the 
population, exemplified by the current distinction between 
city and country. The close-packed inhabitants of a city 
have special need of more elaborate provision for water, 
light, drainage, and of fuller precautions against mutual 
mischief of various kinds ; they have an almost exclusive 
interest in the paving and lighting of the streets and 
bridges of the city; and they have no direct interest in 
any regulations required for agricultural industries. It is 
therefore convenient to take cities as separate districts for 
many purposes of local government; though the lines of 
separation must often be rather arbitrary, as industries 
other than agriculture extend beyond urban limits, and 
variations in the density of population are gradual Indeed, 
the determination of districts for local government must 
almost always be a somewhat imperfect compromise : as the 
arrangement fittest for some purposes can hardly fail to be 
less suitable for others ; while at the same time, the com- 
plexity arising from a combination of several different plans 

^ The effects of heterogeneity due to historical causes will be further 
considered in the following chapter. 



Si6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

of division is likely to be inconvenient. Moreover, the divi- 
sion abstractly most convenient is likely to vary continually 
with changes in the density of population, changes in the 
means of commimication,^ and other changes in the arts of 
industry, rendering scientific knowledge and systematic 
management more important than before in one or other 
branch of governmental action. 

As regards the size of governmental areas, it may be 
noted that the smaller any such area is, the greater will 
generally be the tivjcativt effect of the control of its in- 
habitants over their government ; ^ especially if the divisions 
are natural, so that an effective tifprit de corps tends to 
exist within each group of persons thus divided off. At 
the same time, the more important the work that is 
assigned to the independent activity of local authorities, the 
more necessary it is that the area should be large enough 
to furnish an adequate supply of persons competent to 
direct and criticise this activity : also, districts should be 
sufficiently large to bear any ordinary burden of varying 
expenditure without excessive strain. Moreover, by in- 
creasing the area we diminish the danger of the predomin- 
ance of the sinister interests of any one individual or class ; 
thus in England a rural district that has important inde- 
pendent powers should be, if possible, large enough not to 
present the dilemma of either giving overwhelming in- 
fluence to a single large landowner, or rendering him a too 
easy victim of democratic oppression. 

The division of governmental functions will partly 
depend on the division of areas, — as it will properly vary 
with the size of the district Apart from this considera- 
tion, we may say generally that the matters assigned to 
independent local organs should be those in which local 
separation of interests is most clearly marked, local know- 
ledge most important, the need of uniformity and system 

^ E.g, it has been greatly altered by the introduction of railways. 

' One point of importance in the determination of local areas is the 
question of the desirability of direct government by the aggregate of 
citizens. This will be more appropriately considered in chap, xxvii. 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 517 

least evident, and the co-operation of private and govern- 
mental agencies likely to tell most, — care being at the 
same time taken to avoid any formidable danger of local 
class-injustice. Where the interests concerned are clearly 
common to all parts of the State — as is mostly the case in 
the management of foreign relations — or where the ad- 
vantages of system and imiformity are overwhelming — as 
in military matters, postal communication, provision or 
regulation of currency — the control over the administration 
should clearly be national and not local. On the other 
hand, where the interests affected by governmental action 
have definite local limits, there is a primd facie reason for 
a partially independent organ of local government; but 
this reason may be outweighed by others, and even where 
it is decisive its application is not always clear ; since, as 
the separation of local interests is rarely complete, and is 
very various in degree, a carefully adjusted co-operation of 
local and central organs is often required to attain the 
best results. 

§ 3. It will be well to give one or two illustrations of 
the complex and varjring considerations that have to be 
taken into accoimt in determining the division of functions. 
To begin, the expense of paving and lighting the streets of 
a town should be thrown on those who reside in it, and 
the management of the business correspondingly localised ; 
for though the resulting advantages will be partly shared 
by travellers and persons who make a temporary sojourn in 
the town, this will only be the case to a minor extent, and 
its effect seems fairly compensated by the contributions 
which such persons will indirectly make to the material 
prosperity of the town by their purchases from innkeepers, 
shopkeepers, etc. But the case of a highway between two 
towns is less clear ; for though it is likely to be more used 
by the inhabitants of these towns than by other persons, 
it may be also in regular use as a part of the instrument 
of transit connecting remoter places. Hence, if the plan 
of defraying the expense by levying toUs on the carriages 
that use the road is abandoned as uneconomical, — owing 



Si8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

to the expense and loss of time involved in collecting the 
tolls — it will be reasonable that larger and smaller districts 
should combine to undertake the expense and management 
of such roads. Similarly, the management of natural 
resources — forests, natural waterflow, unappropriated land 
in general — is usually of special interest to parts of the 
conununity ; at the same time, the general interest of the 
whole conununity in their good administration is usually 
too strong to render it safe to abandon these matters 
entirely to local control 

The incompleteness of the separation of interests which 
we are considering assumes a different aspect in the case 
of the sanitary intervention of Government — one of the 
most important functions of local authorities in the present 
stage of science and civilisation. The sanitary state of 
any district is a matter of serious concern to its neighbours, 
owing to the tendency of many diseases to spread ; but the 
prevention of this diffused mischief may fairly be deemed 
to be not a positive service for which other districts ought 
to pay, but rather a part of the general negative duty of 
non-interference, which each individual, or group of indi- 
viduals acting corporately, owes to all other individuals 
and groups. Hence the expense of such provision as 
should be made out of public funds for sanitary purposes 
may reasonably be thrown on the district primarily bene- 
fited by it ; and, while its management in ordinary cases 
should be correspondingly localised, it still seems desirable 
that the central government should exercise a supervision 
over the local authorities, and have the power, in case of 
their default, to intervene and do the required work. 
Further, where the diffusion of disease — among human 
beings or useful animals — is likely to be rapid and danger- 
ous, so that promptness and uniformity are specially neces- 
sary, the central government should have the power of 
intervening, without giving time for the local authorities 
to neglect their duty. For similar reasons, it seems ex- 
pedient that central and local governments should have 
concurrent powers of taking measures for the extermina- 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 519 

tion of noxious plants and insect& On the other hand, 
the prevention of mischief from fire may ordinarily be left 
altogether to the local organs. 

The grounds for co-operation between organs of govern- 
ment representing respectively larger and smaller areas may 
be illustrated by the important matter of poor-relie£ I 
have already mentioned poor-relief as a case in which the 
efficiency of the action of government may be materially 
assisted by the voluntary activity of private citizens; 
which is more likely to be stimulated if the responsibility 
for the operations of government be localised, so that the 
concern for their efficiency may be intensified in each 
district. From this point of view, we may contrast the 
case of ordinary poor-relief with that of provision for the 
care and support of lunatica The enlightened concern of 
private persons for the less fortunate members of society 
may do much to reduce the number of paupers, but it can 
do little or nothing to reduce the number of lunatics; 
hence, if the expense of supporting paupers is localised, an 
advantageous encouragement and reward is given to such 
private efforts by the diminution in the burden of local 
taxation which it tends to bring about ; but there seems 
to be no similar gain in localising the expense and manage- 
ment of lunatic asyluma Also, the knowledge of the 
circumstances of the applicants for poor-relief, indispens- 
able to its judicious administration, is more likely to be 
secured if it is administered by local authorities. On the 
other hand, it is desirable that the treatment of pauperism 
should be systematic and uniform within any country of 
which the parts are efiectually connected by the modem 
machinery for conveyance and communication; and if in 
any such country the whole expense of poor-relief is thrown 
on local taxation, it seems difficult to secure the inhabitants 
of any one district from bearing the burden of pauperism 
that they are not responsible for causing, without a mis- 
chievous interference with the free movement of labour 
from one district to another. It seems therefore at once 
equitable that the cost of poor-relief should be divided 



520 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

between local and national funds, and expedient that the 
management should be similarly shared. 

The division of functions between central and local 
executives is a peculiarly delicate matter in the case of the 
management of the police. On the one hand, the persons 
residing in a town or other district have obviously a special 
interest in the repression and detection of crime within 
their district ; and to entrust this function to local authori- 
ties is useful in keeping alive in the minds of the citizens 
at large the sense that the prevention of crime is a public 
duty which ought not to be entirely resigned into the 
hands of officials; since circumstances may at any time 
arise in which the aid of private citizens in performing this 
function is valuable and even indispensable. On the other 
hand, it is of great concern to the whole community that 
no part shall be allowed to harbour law-breakers; and, 
assuming that the rules of law are in the main determined 
by a central legislature, it seems important that the co- 
ercive organisation for their enforcement should be under 
the ultimate control of the central executive ; since, if it 
is placed in the hands of locally appointed organs of govern- 
ment, there is a danger that laws locally unpopular will 
not be effectively enforced. At the same time, local legis- 
lation will on similar grounds be most appropriately 
enforced by local police; and the existence side by side of 
two police organisations separately directed is likely to be a 
troublesome complexit}-. It seems, therefore, on the whole 
best that the main part of the police force should be sup- 
ported from national funds and in the service of the central 
government, but that, together with any additional police 
locally appointed and paid, it should be normally left 
under the control of local executives, who should for this 
purpose act as subordinates of the central executive; it 
being always in the power of the latter to resume the 
control of the force paid by it, in case of necessity. 

In the case of the machinery for the punishment of 
crime, the considerations in favour of a central organisation, 
for any area over which a common system of law is estab- 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 521 

lished, seem more decisive. The impulses of indignation 
that occasionally prompt private persons to take the punish- 
ment of crime into their own hands call, in a normal state 
of society, for repression rather than encouragement ; while 
the importance of uniformity in order to avoid injustice is 
very manifest. The task of justly apportioning punish- 
ment to crime is in any case a profoundly difficult one ; but 
a needless and preventable kind of arbitrary inequality is 
introduced into the application of punishments, if (e,g.) a 
period of imprisonment, nominally the same, involves very 
different degrees of privation and discomfort in different 
localitiea 

§ 4. So far I have chiefly had in view the executive 
or administrative work of government, together with the 
financial business which this entails. But perhaps the 
most important question that belongs to the present 
chapter — and one of the most important questions in the 
whole discussion of the structure of government — ^relates to 
the extent to which Legislation should be allowed to be 
localised. We have seen before that some power of laying 
down general rules, to be obeyed by others besides the 
servants of government, cannot without inconvenience be 
denied to the central executive : and in the same way the 
local executive work that we have been considering will 
naturally involve some exercise of legislative functions. 
Thus we may assume that local governments will have a 
limited^ power of making general regulations for the 
common use of streets, bridges, parks, and other public 
property, of which the use is necessarily confined in the 
main to the inhabitants of certain localities, and of which, 
therefore, as we have already seen, the expense may pro- 
perly be localised. So again the sanitary intervention of 
government and protective measures against noxious plants 
and insects, and against destructive floods, will usually 
involve a certain amount of general coercive regulation. 
But the peculiar interest that a man's neighbours have in 

^ If the power were unlimited it might be abused for the oppression of 
classes locally unpopular. 



522 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

his right behaviour is obviously not restricted to his ob- 
servance of such rules as these. Even as regards the 
fundamental rights of personal security, property, and con- 
tract, it is indefinitely more important to a Yorkshireman 
that they should be properly defined and protected in 
Yorkshire, than that they should be properly defined and 
protected in Kent Nay, further, it is to be expected that 
diflferences of physical conditions and industrial develop- 
ment — if not of race and political history — ^will render the 
special needs of Yorkshiremen in respect of protection from 
mutual mischief, enforced co-operation for common benefit, 
or regulated use of natural resources, somewhat difiTerent 
from the special needs of Kentishmen ; thus Yorkshire may 
require factory acts, but be indifferent to the regulation of 
hop-picking, or compulsory insurance against &uit disease, 
which may be prominent objects of concern in Kent. 
Hence localised legislation will tend to be more fully and 
closely adapted to these varying requirements than central- 
ised legislation is likely to be. Even where the real re- 
quirements do not materially vary, it is not unlikely that 
there may be wide differences between the views prevalent 
in different localities as to the nature and limits of desir- 
able legislative interference; and if this is the case, the 
gratification of the consequently divergent demands — even 
at the cost of some amount of bad legislation — may avoid 
the grave evil of spreading a general aversion to law in 
any district when the wishes of the inhabitants are over- 
ruled in deference to the opinions prevailing in other 
districta It is true that the total amount of coercion 
involved in the enforcement of law does not necessarily 
tend to be reduced by extending the legislative power of 
local governments, even if such extension results in con- 
siderable local variations in law; since the aggregate of 
local minorities opposed to the different local laws may be 
as large as the previous minority opposed to the law of the 
state. But so far as there are any causes tending to make 
different opinions prevail in different districts, we may 
assume that legislation will be more closely adapted to the 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 523 

wishes of the inhabitants of all the districts taken together, 
in proportion as it is localised.^ 

On the other hand, we may assume that, speaking 
generally, the average statesmanship of the aggregate of 
local legislators will be inferior to that of the members of 
a single central legislature ; and further, that the danger of 
mischievous legislation in the interests of a predominant 
class will be on the whole greater in the bodies responsible 
to sections of the community. But the strongest reasons 
for limiting narrowly the legislative powers of local govern- 
ments are drawn from the bad effects of diversity in the 
laws enforced in different parts of a coherent civilised 
community. In certain important cases, the protection 
from mischief which the law is designed to afford cannot 
be effectively given except by rules enforced throughout 
the whole country; thus, if Yorkshire refused to protect 
industrial inventions from imitation, any encouragement to 
inventors given by patent-laws in Lancashire would become 
practically worthless. But even in cases where uniformity 
is less indispensable, serious inconveniences must be ex- 
pected to result from allowing the definitions of important 
legal rights to vary from district to district, within a 
country where migration from one district to another is 
unfettered and frequent. In the first place, such variations 
are likely to bring the doubtful equity and expediency of 
the varying laws prominently before the minds of ordinary 
citizens ; so that it will become more difficult to maintain 
in due strength the habit of obedience to law and the 
sentiments condemnatory of illegal conduct. Further, the 
intellectual labour necessary to acquire adequate knowledge 
of the law for practical purposes will be seriously increased, 
— at any rate for traders and other persons whose callings 
bring them frequently into legal relations with inhabitants 
of different districta And finally, since the law courts of 
any one district will be continually called upon to recognise 

^ Also, assuming that there is less aversion to migration within a country 
than to emigration from it, a quiet reduction of dissidence through the 
departure of the dissidents wiU be more probable in the case of local laws. 



524 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the validity of legal relations determined by the laws of 
other districts, the judicial administration of law must 
become more laborious, through the bewildering variety of 
legal rules which judges and legal practitioners will be 
required to know and apply; and the same cause will 
have an unfavourable effect on the average quality of 
judicial decisions. 

These disadvantages make it generally expedient to 
avoid any extensive devolution of legislative powers on 
local governments, at any rate in a community of which 
the parts are not strongly divided by marked diflferences of 
race or civilisation, or the habits and sentiments surviving 
from previous political independence, and are not precluded 
by distance or physical obstacles from active mutual com- 
munication. It should, however, be noted that the dis- 
advantages above mentioned are likely to be very different 
in degree in different departments of law. Thus, we have 
before seen^ that local variations are especially to be 
deprecated in the law regulating family relations, on 
account of the special importance in this department of 
harmony between legal rules and moral sentiments; and 
also in the law regulating commercial relations, on account 
of the natural and desirable tendency of such relations to 
extend over the lines of local division in a modem civilised 
community. On the other hand, we may expect the dis- 
advantages of mere variation — apart from any consideration 
of the goodness or badness of the different rules — to be 
decidedly less in the case of laws regulating the tenure of 
agricultural land : since the purchase or occupation of such 
land is an important act that is not likely to occur very 
frequently in the life of an ordinary member of the com- 

^ See chap. xiv. § 6 : where I have quoted from au American writer 
(Professor Munroc Smith) an illustration of the bad effects of local varia- 
tions in family law. It is, however, to be noted that the inconveniences 
due to local variations in law have been much reduced in the United States 
by the fact that most of the States have inherited the English common law, 
and both Federal and State Courts, in interpreting and applying this law, 
have co-operated to keep it practically the same in the different States. 
See Professor Munroe Smith's Article (II) on "State Statute and Common 
Law,** in the PolUieal Science Quarterly for March 1888. 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 525 

munity; and the disputes arising out of it will rarely 
involve any perplexing conflict of laws. 

One argument for allotting legislative functions to local 
organs deserves special notice from a student of politics, 
since it interests him — if I may say so — professionally; 
viz. that it would assist the progress of political science, 
through the greater opportimities that it would give for 
the trial of legislative experiments. And certainly, in 
matters on which the opinions of experts appear to be 
evenly divided as to the expediency of a given legislative 
measure, valuable instruction might often be gained by 
allowing it to be partially introduced by way of experiment 
in a district favourably disposed to it. I think, however, 
that this consideration would not usually lead to a com- 
plete devolution of legislative functions upon local organs, 
as regards the matter in question ; but rather to a careful 
division of the legislative function between local and central 
organs : since the central organ, from its presumably greater 
skill and wider range of experience, is likely to be best 
adapted to ascertain and turn to accoimt the scientific 
results of the experiment 

§ 5. In determining the structure of local governments, 
the general principles which have been laid down for the 
organisation of the central government are applicable, but 
with important differences, cori'esponding to the differences 
in the nature and extent of the functions assigned to the 
local organs. In the first place, assuming that legislation 
is mainly centralised, we may omit the judiciary from our 
present consideration; since, though it is fundamentally 
important that there should be an adequate supply of local 
tribunals, it is not desirable that they should be under 
local control Secondly, assuming that the control of local 
as of national finance is given to a representative body, as 
this local parliament wiU only have legislative functions to 
a very limited extent, it wiU have leisure to undertake a 
larger share of the work of administration than it has 
seemed expedient to allot to the central parliament. The 
objections to the direct intervention of such a body in 



526 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

executive business apply less in the case of local govern- 
ment ; as secrecy, vigour, and promptitude are less import- 
ant in the matters of internal administration placed under 
local control, while the aggregate of special knowledge 
which a tolerably numerous representative body may be 
expected to possess is likely to be peculiarly valuable in 
such matters. On the other hand, the advantage of con- 
centrating responsibility on an individual, instead of dis- 
persing it among the members of a numerous council, is no 
less important in local than in national administration : it 
is even likely to be relatively greater, in proportion as the 
criticism of local administration tends to be less vigilant 
and vigorous than the criticism of national administration. 
Another point to be noted is that the unpaid work of 
persons of leisure has naturally a larger place in local 
executive business, as the demands that this usually makes 
on the time and energies of the persons managing it are 
less heavy and incessant. 

It seems generally expedient that the different functions 
of local government exercised over the same areas should 
be united — at least so far as legislation and ultimate con- 
trol are concerned — in the hands of a single deliberative 
assembly or sub-parliament ; in order that the importance 
of the aggregate of business thus formed may help to draw 
to the work the best talent available, of men who have 
suflScient leisure. The expediency of this is, however, con- 
ditional on there being a sufl&cient supply of competent 
persons available who have the amount of leisure required 
for the proper performance of this accumulated work, and 
are willing to give it to the public service. Where this is 
not the case the work may be better performed if it is 
distributed in smaller fractions : supposing that there are 
in the locality only a few persons able or willing to give 
mvjch time to the work of local government, while there are 
a good many who can and will give a little. 

§ 6. In some cases another reason for distributing 
governmental functions among different bodies in the same 
district is supplied by the consideration that is the primary 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 527 

ground for establishing local organs of government : — the 
principle that those who profit by any governmental ex- 
penditure should at the same time bear the burden of it, 
and exercise financial control over it. For within any 
district the utility of some expenditure, for which govern- 
mental intervention appears to be requisite, may accrue 
mainly to a section of the community. So far, then, as 
the inequality of benefit is definite and unmistakable, it is 
primd facie reasonable that there should be a corresponding 
inequality in the allotment both of the burden of expendi- 
ture and of the power of control : but the extent to which 
this can be arranged, and the manner of arranging it, will 
probably differ in different cases. (1) If the work in 
question tends to promote, primarily and directly, the 
interests only of one special clearly defined class — bene- 
fiting other classes only vaguely and indirectly, in the way 
in which most economic advantages tend to be diffused — ^it 
seems generally expedient to leave the control of the work 
entirely to the persons primarily interested; only giving 
them power to act as a body in spite of the resistance of 
a minority.^ Thus, power may be given to a sufficient 
majority of the owners and occupiers of land in a district 
— or a sufficient preponderance of opinion, taking wealth 
as well as numbers into account — to undertake necessary 
works of drainage or irrigation, imposing on aU the perZ 
interested a share of the expense proportionate to their 
respective interests; the method of apportionment being 
determined by some impartial authority, — probably the 
central legislature. (2) If the advantage to be derived 
from the work by the inhabitants of the district generally 
appears palpable and considerable, though the advantage 
accruing to a special class predominates, a pecuniary sub- 
vention might be granted on certain conditions from funds 
raised by local taxation, the ordinary management of the 

^ I assume that the coercive action of goyernment is necessary to secure 
a satisfactory result, on the general principle on which this kind of inter- 
ference has before been justified in exceptional cases. See chap. x. § 2, pp. 
147, 160. 



528 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

work being still left in the hands of an association of the 
persons specially interested: provided that there is no 
material divergence between the common interest and the 
interest of the special class in question. (3) Where, on 
the other hand, the general interest is preponderant, though 
special benefits accrue to a small minority, it would usually 
be impracticable to allot to the latter any special share in 
the financial control of the work. Under these circum- 
stances, though special taxation of the persons specially 
benfited still seems theoretically just, it will be liable 
to become practically oppressive unless the rules under 
which it is imposed are strictly determined by an impartial 
authority. 

The discussion of what is properly " local " government 
has thus led us to consider a case of what, in the title of 
this chapter, I have ventured to describe as "sectional" 
government I use this latter term to denote the cases in 
which governmental functions are exercised — by bodies (or 
individuals) partially independent of the ordinary executive 
— over portions of the community defined not by local 
habitation but by some other characteristic It is quite 
conceivable that subordinate governmental functions should 
be largely distributed on this plan. A civilised commimity 
is naturally divisible, otherwise than locally, into classes 
that have to some extent common class-interests; and it 
seems at first sight a plausible suggestion that any such 
class that may stand in need of any special kind of govern- 
mental interference should be organised on the representa- 
tive system into a partially self-governing body for the pur- 
poses of such interference. Thus, the farmers throughout the 
country, or in a certain district, might elect a Chamber of 
Agriculture, the traders might elect Chambers of Commerce, 
etc., to which certain powers might be given for the 
management of the details of such governmental inter- 
ference as is needed for agriculture and trade respectively ; 
on the groimd that such bodies are likely to have more 
full and exact knowledge of the matters to be regulated, 
and of the probable effects of any given regulation, than 



XXV LOCAL AND SECTIONAL GOVERNMENT 529 

any governmental organ otherwise appointed^ Certainly 
there would be some advantage in such an organisation: 
the counsels and criticisms of such bodies ought to furnish 
important instruction to Govemment. But there is a 
strong reason against any considerable delegation of govern- 
mental functions to such bodies in a modem state, namely, 
that the interests of the industrial classes into which a 
modern community is naturally divisible, cannot ordinarily 
be more than a part of the interests that (rovernment has 
to consider in the case of any special interferenca They 
are the interests of the producers of some commodity, 
material or immaterial, as distinct from those o£ the con- 
sumers ; since the latter are usually too numerous and dis- 
persed, and as individuals too slightly interested, to combine 
effectively for the purpose of sectional government. Now 
a combination of producers usually tends to aim more or 
less at the advantage of monopoly ; and its power of thus 
affecting adversely the interests of consumers calls for re- 
pression rather than encouragement from Government. 
Only so far as the interests of any body of traders or pro- 
fessional men can be made to coincide with those of the 
community, can the former be safely entrusted with any 
share of the functions of Govemment ; and this result can 
usually be attained only to a very limited extent. This 
objection does not indeed apply to associations formed 
either for supplying the needs of the persons associated, or 
for promoting the general good of the community in some 
unremunerative way: but it is only in exceptional cases 
that such associations seem to require the intervention of 
Govemment in their organisation and management. I may 
note, however, that special grounds for such intervention 
are widely held to exist, in the case of bodies of persons 
united by a common religious creed and the practice of 
similar religious rites. This case will be further discussed 
in a subsequent chapter (xxviii.) 

^ It may be observed that trade guilds, at an earlier period of European 
history, actually exercised such powers of "sectional" government. 

2m 



CHAPTEE XXVI 

FEDERAL AKD OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 

§ 1. In the preceding chapter I noticed briefly the liistori- 
cal conditions to which great weight has to be allowed in 
dividing the territory of a state for purposes of local govern- 
ment ; but I did not take these conditions into account in 
discussing the distribution of functions between central and 
local govemnient& Actually, however, the same historical 
considerations that are decisive in determining areas will 
often powerfully influence the division of functions. When 
states or parts of states which have either been formally 
independent, or have enjoyed a large amount of practical 
autonomy, are united — either voluntarily or through con- 
quest — ^into one political commimity, the portions thus 
combined are likely to desire to retain important differences 
in laws and customa Such differences may be intensified 
by differences in race, in religion, or in the level of civilisa- 
tion attained ; but independently of these the mere memory 
of the past may leave behind in such "part-states" a 
sentiment of nationality strongly opposed to complete 
absorption in the larger political whole of which they have 
become parts. In this way an extension of the powers 
of local governments may become expedient, considerably 
beyond what would be either desired or desirable, if a 
single tolerably homogeneous people had merely been sub- 
jected to different physical conditions, and spread itself 
over its common territory with different degrees of density. 
But further, even in the case of such a homogeneous 
people physical conditions may cause and justify a great 



CH.xxvi FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 531 

enlargement of the powers of local authorities. The mere 
distance of one part of the territory from another may have 
this effect, especially when a nation is expanding in the 
way of colonisation; this is exemplified by the whole 
history of the English colonies, through all the varieties 
and changes in their forms of government.^ 

A state including parts that have, from one or other of 
the above-mentioned causes, a high degree of political 
separateness, may be called practically composite ; even if 
the governments of its parts are regularly controlled by 
one supreme legislature and one supreme executive, so that 
its constitution still remains formally unitary. If such 
a state is under popular government and its supreme 
legislature is elected only by — or consists only of — the 
citizens who reside in a portion of its territory, the other 
parts of the state are commonly said to be " dependencies " 
of the portion to which the legislature is formally respon- 
sible : and a similar difference may practically exist under 
other forms of government, although the formal constitu- 
tional rights of the great majority of the inhabitants may 
be the same throughout the territory of the state. E.g. 
imder absolute monarchy, though no part of the state can 
be formally a dependency of any other part, it may be so 
practically ; the monarch may choose his leading subordin- 
ates exclusively or mainly from a portion of his dominions, 
and be practically under the exclusive influence of its public 
opinion. This position of dependence, whether formal or 
only practical, tends to cause discontent: and it is not 
likely to be permanently accepted by communities habitu- 
ated to popular government, and feeling themselves on a 
level in civilisation with the dominant community ; — unless 
their inferiority in strength to the latter is such as to render 
a conflict hopeless, or unless their exclusion from political 
rights is compensated by economic or other advantages.* 

^ The maintenance of the federal system in the United States may be 
partly attributed to a sense of the diflSculty of governing its vast territory 
by the methods of a unitary state. 

' Such compensations will, of course, be generally likely to excite the 
jealousy of the inhabitants of the dominant portion of the state. 



532 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

Hence, unless one portion of such a composite state is over- 
whelmingly superior in size and strength, there will be a 
tendency to demand an approximate equalisation of political 
status among the parts. If, under these conditions, there is 
a general desire to maintain the political separateness of the 
parts as well as their union in the larger whole, an obvious 
method of satisfying this desire is to introduce a stable 
constitutional division of functions between the government 
of the whole and the governments of the parts, securing to 
the latter a substantial amount of legislative independenca 
We thus arrive at the general idea of a " Federal " state, 
as a whole made up of parts politically co-ordinate and 
constitutionally separate: though, as we shall presently 
see, there remain considerable divergences of view as to the 
exact definition of " Federality." 

§ 2. A federal state has to be distinguished on the one 
side from a unitary state with well-developed local govern- 
ments, and on the other side from a league or confederation 
of independent states : but in neither case is the distinction 
simple and sharp, since the balanced combination of " unity 
of the whole aggregate " with " separateness of parts," which 
constitutes Federality, may be realised in very various modes 
and degrees. It will be well therefore to examine either 
distinction carefully before we consider the circumstances 
under which any form of federal constitution is expedient. 

The clearest formaP difference between a federal state 
and a unitary state whose parts are approximately equal in 
political privileges is, as I have just said, that in the former 

^ We doubtless find in history instances of federal unions in which there 
was no clear and precise constitutional division of powers, although practi- 
cally the parts retained their independence, while effectively unit^ in a 
larger whole. And no doubt a modern state might be practically rederal, 
vrithout a precise and stable division of powers, if the substantial autonomy 
of the parts were maintained by custom and public opinion. But if the 
central legislature were recognised as having the power to abolish this 
autonomy, I should regard the state as fomuUly unitary ; and if the point 
were left doubtful, I should regard the form of government as seriously 
lacking in dofiniteness. And such lack of definiteness is not merely a 
theoretical defect: it involves an obvious risk of friction and conflict 
between the government of the parts and the government of the whole. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 533 

the power of the ordinary legislature of the whole is con- 
stitutionally limited in favour of the autonomy of locally ^ 
distinct parts. But we may further lay down (1) that 
unless this autonomy is considerable in extent, it would 
be paradoxical to call the state federal; (2) that when 
the federality is well marked, the compositeness of the 
state will find expression somehow in the structure of the 
common government ; (3) that if the federal character of the 
polity is to be stable, the constitutional process of changing 
the constitutional division of powers between central and 
local governments must be determined in harmony with the 
principle of federalism. 

Let us consider briefly each of these three conditions : — 
I. In laying down that the autonomy of the parts of a 
federal state must be considerable in extent, I mean that we 
should hardly call a state federal merely because the inde- 
pendence of local governments in certain minor matters was 
guaranteed by the constitution. At the same time, we 
cannot say that Federality implies any definite division of 
functions between the governments of the parts and the 
common government of the whole. The principle of federal 
union is sometimes stated to be that the federated parts are 
to be independent as regards " internal matters," while they 
have a common government for "external matters." And 
no doubt this statement indicates roughly the line of division 
that is both usual and expedient. But, firstly, it leaves 
doubtful how matters external to the parts but not to the 
whole — matters that concern the mutual relations of the 
parts — are to be determined ; and this intermediate region 
is very important in modem states : — for instance, hardly 
any point is likely to be more vital for the cohesion and 
stability of a federal state than to secure free trade among 
the federated part -states.' And, secondly, matters that 

^ TheoreticaUy we should perhaps include the case in which parts divided 
by race or religion, and not by locality or habitation, have a substantial auto- 
nomy ; but the term '* federal " is not usually applied to such combinations. 

' The constitutional prohibition of restrictions on commerce among the 
federated part-states has been of fundamental importance in the history of 
the Korth American Union. 



534 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

must be admitted to be strictly internal to each part may 
be of serious common interest to the whole, on account of the 
mischief or waste of labour caused by want of uniformity, 
as was pointed out in the preceding chapter. This is the 
case («.^.) with such matters as regulation of currency, 
patents and copyrights, bankruptcy, and generally com- 
mercial law — and, in short, all such matters as it would be 
most palpably unwise to assign to local governments in a 
unitary state. Such matters as these should undoubtedly 
be included in the province of the common government, 
— at any rate if the federal territory be approximately 
continuous — no less than the management of foreign 
relations, and the organisation and the control of the 
military forces necessary for protection against foreign 
aggression. Again, the common government ought to have 
the power of enforcing the fulfilment of international 
obligations, and this must occasionally involve interference 
in the internal affairs of the part -states, to suppress or 
punish conduct mischievous to foreigners. It may even be 
expedient for the wellbeing of the whole that the internal 
political constitutions of the part-states should be to some 
extent determined in the federal constitution ; owing to the 
mutual disturbance which polities based on fundamentally 
diverse principles are likely to cause if brought into close 
contact through federation.^ 

It may be further noted that the federal character of the 
whole state becomes more marked if the powers of the 
common government are defined, while those of the partial 
governments are left indefinite in the constitutional division ; 
so that the residuary powers belong to the part-states. 

II. It is a natural, if not a necessary, characteristic of a 
federal polity that the separate political existence of part- 
states as members of the whole state should be somehow 
represented in the structure of the common government. 
This may be done in various ways and degrees: (1) as the 
part -states, if independent, would be formally equal in 

^ On this ground the North American Union prescribes a republican 
constitution as an absolute condition of membership. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 535 

international rights, their partially retained independence 
may be represented by giving to all equal shares in the 
election of some important part of the common government, 
so that normally any decision of the body or individual so 
elected will represent the decision of a majority of the 
part-statea^ If, however, the part-states are very unequal 
in size, this arrangement may be rejected as conflicting too 
strongly with the constitutional right of a majority of 
citizens to determine in the long run the policy of the 
common government. (2) In this case another method 
may be adopted of representing the separateness of the 
part -states: a representative body may be constituted as 
part of the common government, in which representatives 
of each part -state vote not individually but collectively, 
according to the decision of a majority of their number; 
the aggregate voting power of each set of representatives 
being proportioned to the size of the part-state that they 
represent.^ (3) The federal character of the polity may be 
still further accentuated by making it the constitutional 
duty of the representatives to conform to instructions 
received from the governments of the respective part-states. 
This last plan, however, is objectionable as tending to 
hamper inconveniently the deliberative independence of the 
governmental organ composed of these delegates. 

III. It remains to consider how far, and in what way, 
stability is to be given to this balanced division of govern- 
mental powers between whole and parts. In a " unitary " 
state the division may depend entirely on the will of the 
central legislature ; the powers (e.^.) of our county councils 
were given by Act of Parliament, and another Act of 
Parliament might take them away to-morrow. But I have 
regarded it as characteristic of a federal government that 
the ordinary central legislature has no such unlimited 
power of modifying the division of power between itself 

^ This plan is adopted in the construction of the Senate in the United 
States and in Switzerland. 

^ This is the method adopted in the constraction of the Federal CJonncil 
in the Oerman Empire. 



536 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and the legislatures of the separate federated states: the 
division is fixed by the constitution, which the ordinary 
central legislature, no less than the local legislatures, is 
bound to obey. It is conceivable that the rules of such a 
constitution should be immutable, i,t, that there should be 
no legal method of changing them. But such immutability 
is indefensible from a utilitarian point of view ; and would, 
I think, be generally condemned by political thinkers of all 
schools at the present day. We realise too fully the 
inevitable changes of social needs and conditions, and the 
limitations of human foresight, to approve of establishing 
constitutions that cannot be altered without illegality. 
Hence a federal constitution must include a governmental 
organ — permanent or temporary — having the function of 
modifying the constitution when a change is required. 

It is not, indeed, absolutely necessary that the modifying 
organ should be different from the ordinary central legisla- 
ture, provided the process of changing a constitutional rule 
be m£tde more difficult than that of ordinary legislation ; as 
(«.^.) by requiring a majority of two-thirds or three-fourths 
in every branch of the legislature. If in one branch of 
the legislature the part-states are equally represented, this 
arrangement will secure that no change is made unless 
supported by the representatives not only of a decided 
majority of citizens but also of a decided majority of 
part-states. But it would seem better to attain the same 
result directly, by making the consent of a majority — or, if 
greater stability is desired, two-thirds or three-fourths— of 
the legislatures ^ of the part-states necessary to the validity 
of a change in the federal constitution. It might even be 
plausibly maintained that the principle of Federalism, 
strictly taken, requires that the consent of any part-state 
should be given to any change in the constitutional division 
of powers between the whole and the parts; on the view 
that the powers allotted to the part-states belong to them 
independently, in their own right, and being not conferred 

^ The legislatures appointed for this purpose in the respective part-states 
need not be the ordinary legislatures. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 537 

by any authority external to the state, cannot legitimately 
be withdrawn by any such authority. But, while admitting 
that a federal constitution ought to be stable, I think this 
degree of rigidity would be in most cases inconvenient; 
since it would render any constitutional rule — however 
inexpedient it might turn out to be — unalterable without 
revolution, if it was the decided interest of a single part-state 
to maintain it. This form of federality seems to me rather 
suitable — not to a federal state but — to a federal union of 
states dissoluble at wilL 

§ 3. We are thus led to the second distinction required 
to complete our definition of a federal state; we have to 
distinguish it from a federal union, which is not held to be 
a state, but a Confederation or league of statea Such a 
confederation may vary indefinitely in closeness : — t,g, the 
term is sometimes applied to a mere Alliance for a limited 
time, which does not result in the formation of any important 
common organ of government. By a " confederation," how- 
ever, I shaU here mean a union of states designed to be 
permanent; and if states unite for permanent common 
action in important matters, they are likely to establish 
some common organ having power to make decisions of 
importance in respect of this common action. The most 
obvious motive for such a union is to gain security and 
strength in foreign relations ; but this end is hardly likely 
to be permanently attained unless there is some conmion 
council, — authorised to represent the aggregate of the con- 
federated states in any dealings with states outside the 
union, — as weU £is common management of military forces 
in case of war. If such a permanent organ of common 
government is established, the union clearly goes beyond a 
mere Alliance. At the same time, to secure the strength 
that union gives, it would seem almost indispensable to 
prevent wars within the confederation, and therefore to 
give to the same or some other organ judicial functions 
for the settlement of disputes among the confederated 
statea Combination to this extent will further render 
it convenient to have a financial organ to determine the 



538 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

contributions of the different states for common pur- 
poses 

Taking some such scheme as this for a starting-point, it is 
obvious that the powers of the common government might be 
gradually extended, and the relative importance of the govern- 
ments of the part-states gradually reduced in the same pro- 
portion. The question then is, whether we can mark any 
definite point of transition at which unity predominates over 
plurality, and the " confederation of states " passes into the 
" federal state." This — like other questions of definition — 
comes ultimately to be a question of words; but it may 
be instructive to consider briefly the importance of diflFerent 
characteristics, by reference to which the line may be drawn. 
(1) I conceive that, so long as the united states or part- 
states retain the right of withdrawing from the union at 
will, then — whatever be the extent of the revocable powers 
that they agree to allow to the central government — we 
must continue to regard them as independent states con- 
federated. (2) But irrevocability alone vrill not suffice for 
the required distinction; since we can conceive states 
irrevocably united in a permanent league, while yet re- 
taining a substantial amount of independence in their 
relations with foreigners ; and in this case we could hardly 
regard them as forming a single state. If, however, the 
federated communities are completely controlled by a single 
common government in all their foreign relations, and in 
all important matters solely represented by this government, 
it seems clear that they become a single state from an 
international point of view, however great may be the 
internal independence of the parts. (3) Still, for the 
£tdequate and stable realisation of the unity of a state a 
further condition seems indispensable : viz. that the central 
government should enter normally into important direct 
relations with the citizens, instead of merely acting on 
them through the governing organs of the part-states : — i.e. 
that there should be a federal legislature whose laws in 
certain matters are binding on the citizens as individuals, a 
federal judiciary to decide, in the last resort, whether these 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 539 

laws have been obeyed or not, and a federal executive that, 
in enforcing the laws and collecting taxes, deals normally 
with individuals, as such. I do not say that this condition 
is to be taken as essential to the conception of a federal 
state : but certainly so long as the central government only 
acts on individuals through legislatures, executives, and 
judicatures of the part-states, the aggregate governed — 
whatever we may call it — retains the form of union appro- 
priate to a confederation of states. The distinction between 
the two cases seems to me very profound from the point 
of view of an individual member of the community ; since 
in the latter case the individual citizen will have a habit of 
undivided allegiance to the government of his part-state — 
with which, therefore, he will naturally side if any dispute 
should arise between central and local organs ; whereas, in 
the former case, it will be his recognised and habitual civic 
duty to obey either government within its own sphere. 
This habit of divided allegiance I take to be an essential 
characteristic of a well-organised federal state, as contrasted 
on the one hand with a unitary state, and on the other 
hand with a confederation of states. 

§ 4. A consideration of this divided allegiance raises a 
question of fundamental importance in the construction of 
a Federal government. Suppose that governmental powers 
are divided by a federal constitution between central and 
local organs : how is the division to be practically main- 
tained? how are the different organs to be practically 
kept within their constitutional limits? If there is a 
conflict between the common government and the govern- 
ment of the part, is the private citizen to determine for 
himself whom to obey? or, if not, how is he aided in 
determining it ? A case somewhat parallel may occur in 
a unitary state, even when the legislature is formally 
imlimited, if the executive issues commands in excess of the 
powers conferred on it by law. Here, however, it would 
be clear— according to the principle laid down in chap, 
xxiv. — that the private citizen might refer the point to the 
judiciary, who would pronounce upon the legality of the 



S40 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chaf. 

commanA The same method ^ is obviously applicable in the 
present case: the courts of law can treat as invalid any 
commands of either central or local legislature that conflict 
with clauses of the constitution. And where the principle of 
federality is thoroughly carried out, there is a special advan- 
tage in dealing with the question by a strictly judicial method; 
since the balanced division of powers which belongs to the 
essence of federality is especially likely to lead to disputes 
as to the exact limits of the divided powers. But it is 
evident that the position of the judiciary relatively to either 
central or local legislature will be materially different from 
that which we have so far contemplated, if we assume the 
former to have the duty of sitting in judgment on the 
legality of the acts of the latter : and the more stability 
is given to the constitution by making the process of 
changing it difficult, the greater becomes the importance 
of this judicial function of interpreting its clausea To 
ensure the efficient performance of this function, the 
supreme court of justice must be made adequately inde- 
pendent of both central and local legislatures, no less than 
of the executive governments : and it is a delicate problem 
to find conditions of appointment and tenure that will 
secure this independence, without at the same time giving 
the supreme court too predominant a power. 

Perhaps we may suggest (1) that the members of this 
court should be appointed for life, or for a term of years 
that cannot be prolonged : (2) that no additional members 
should be added without the consent of the court, and no 
member compulsorily removed from office except by a 
tribunal of which the greater part consists of judges of this 
court, — provided that either of these changes may be made, 
in the last resort, by the process provided for effecting a 
change in the constitution. 

Apart from the question of the decisive interpretation 
of constitutional rules, the chief special problem presented 
by the construction of a Federal Government, is to provide 

^ Other methods of dealing with this problem will be noticed in the next 
chapter, § 4. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 541 

adequate security that the different interests of the part- 
states are duly regarded in legislation. So far as this 
security is provided by the constitution, federal sentiment 
will tend to make the constitution stable by requiring the 
assent of a large majority of part-states — as represented 
either by ordinary or extraordinary legislatures — to any 
change in the constitution.^ And where the part-states 
are either numerous or not very imequal in size, it does not 
seem that any further security — beyond that given by 
ordinary representative government — is necessary to protect 
the sectional interests of the part-states, so far as they are 
affected by the action of the federal legislature within the 
limits of the constitution. But where the part-states are 
so few or so imequal in size that a single part, if repre- 
sented in proportion to its nimibers, would tend to pre- 
ponderate in the central legislature, the smaller part-states 
incur a certain danger of becoming practically dependencies 
of the larger — so far as the action of the central govern- 
ment is concerned — at least if the preponderant part-state 
has important separate interests, or strong particularist 
sentiment. Such a danger may, as we have seen, be 
averted by giving equal representation to the part-states 
in the Senate. It seems, however, improbable that this 
arrangement would be accepted by a large part-state if the 
inequality of size were very great — t.g, if one part-state 
was larger than all the rest put together ; while the other 
plan before mentioned of expressing Federality in the 
constitution of the common government — by making the 
representatives of each part-state vote collectively — would 
materially increase the danger of undue preponderance of a 
large part-state. If, therefore, the parts of a Federal State 
are few, it is better that they should be not very unequal 
in size : and the fewer they are, the smaller is the inequality 
that would be dangerous. 

^ Thus, as we saw (p. 26), in the North American Union, the assent of 
three-fourths of such legislatures — ^as well as two-thirds of either house of 
the federal congress — is required. This requirement has rendered the con- 
stitution so stable that only five amendments have been passed in a century, 
three of which represent the result of a civil war of four years' duration. 



542 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

I have assomed that the part-states will be approxi- 
mately equal in political privilegea Of course Federality 
is not destroyed by the allotment of some minor special 
privileges to particular part-states; such special privileges, 
however, are hardly likely to be secure unless the constitu- 
tion provides that they cannot be withdrawn without the 
consent of the privileged states ; ^ and this provision may 
render them inconveniently stabla 

§ 5. I pass to consider the reasons for forming a federal 
union — either in a closer or in a laxer form. Firstly, it 
enables small independent communities not strongly divided 
by interests or sentiments, to escape the chief military 
and economic disadvantages attaching to small states, at the 
least possible sacrifice of independence. A small state with 
large and powerful neighbours incurs some danger of high- 
handed aggression — though the mutual jealousy of the 
neighbours may often render this remote and vague — and 
the milder disadvantage of being usually obliged to yield 
in disputes where the question of right is ambiguous. 
Further, so long as modern states endeavour, by elaborately 
arranged tariffs, to exclude or hamper the competition of 
foreign producers in their markets, it will generally be some 
disadvantage to the members of a small state that they can 
only rely on a comparatively small area of imrestricted 
trade. Of these disadvantages, military weakness has been 
historically most important; if we examine the leading 
instances of federations in modem history — Switzerland, 
the United Netherlands, and the United States of North 
America — the fear of foreign subjugation or interference 
appears as the main cause of the union of the federating 
commimities. In the case, however, of North America, 
though the first federal imion was due to the war of inde- 
pendence, commercial considerations had a large share in 
bringing about the second and more stable union of 1789 ; 
and, as the federal state has grown and expanded over the 
North American continent, the advantages of the federal 

^ Several German part-states — especially Prussia, Bavaria, and Wurtem- 
berg — have such special privileges in the present German Empire. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 543 

union as a means of preventing commercial exclusions as 
well as internal wars have become more prominent. 

Further, North America may also illustrate the advantages 
of federalism from a different point of view ; i.e, as a mode 
of political organisation by which a nation may realise the 
maximum of liberty compatible with order: since, as we 
have already seen, the amount of governmental coercion is 
likely on the average to be less, in proportion as the powers 
of local governments are extended at the expense of the 
central government. It seems, indeed, very doubtful how far 
a body of persons, £is independent in sentiments and habits 
as the English colonists of North America, would have held 
together upon any other terms than those of a federal union, 
when sparsely distributed over so large a territory as that 
of the United States. For the federal form of polity also 
diminishes — in proportion as the functions of the central 
legislature are restricted — the practical difficulties ^ which 
extent of territory tends to throw in the way of good 
government ; especially the difficulty of enforcing obedience 
if the inhabitants of distant districts are recalcitrant, and 
the difficulty of securing that the central government is 
sufficiently informed as to the needs of such districta These 
difficulties combine to place natural limits to the size of an 
orderly and well-governed state, if remaining practically 
imitary, — ^limits indeed of a vague and elastic kind, and 
greatly extended in recent times by railways and telegraphs, 
but which still cannot be ignored in considering the 
government of a territory as large as that of the largest 
actual states. 

The chief disadvantages of Federalism have been inci- 
dentaUy noticed in the preceding chapter, when we were 
discussing the proper limits of the powers of local govern- 
ment in a unitary state. I have there sufficiently dwelt on 
the drawbacks of localised legislation in a country whose 

^ It may be remarked that these difficulties tend to be increased if long 
intervals of seas arc interposed between different parts of the territory, pre- 
venting the continuous expansion of the community, and tending to render 
the circumstances of its divided parts materially different. 



544 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

parts are in active mutual communication. I also pointed 
out that the strength and stability which a state derives 
from internal cohesion tend to be somewhat reduced by 
the independent activity of local governments, if the latter 
can be effectively used as centres of local resistance to the 
national will ; it is obvious that in a federal state the danger 
from this latter source is greater, owing to the habit of 
divided allegiance that belongs to federality; while in a 
confederation of states the cohesion is — and is designed to 
be — weaker still, because the loyalty of the ordinary citizen 
is concentrated on his own state.^ On the other hand, if 
disorder and disruption are prevented, the federal form of 
polity, requiring as it does a rigid and stable constitution to 
secure the partial independence of the part-states, is exposed 
to the general objections which may be urged against such 
a constitution as compared with a more flexible one.^ 

In conclusion, it may be observed that federalism arising 
from historical causes is likely to be in many cases a 
transitional stage through which a composite society passes 
on its way to a completer imion ; since, as time goes on, 
and mutual intercourse grows, the narrower patriotic senti- 
ments that were originally a bar to full political union tend 
to diminish, while the inconvenience of a diversity of laws 
is more keenly felt, especially in a continuous territory. 
Partly for the same reason, a confederation of states, if it 
holds together, has a tendency to pass into a federal state. 
On the other hand, the development of democratic thought 
and sentiment, so far as it favours liberty and self-govern- 
ment, tends in favour of federality. 

§ 6. Several of the distinctions drawn in defining Feder- 
ality apply mtUatis mutandis to a composite state, of which 
one part is dominant and the rest dependencies. Thus, a 
dependency may be simply a part-state that has no consti- 
tutional control over the government of the whole, while 

^ Hence hereditary monarchy — so long as it is sustained by an effectiye 
sentiment of personal loyalty — has a peculiar utility in the way of strengthen- 
ing the looser form of federal union ; if the uniting states will accept the 
same monarch. 

' These objections will be considered in the next chapter. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 545 

practically enjoying the same independence as a federated 
part-state in the management of its internal affairs. Or it 
may have merely the more restricted self-government of a 
district in a imitary state. Or, on the other hand, the 
government of the dominant part may merely exercise the 
power of the common organs of government in a Confedera- 
tion ; — or it may have even less formal power, since, just as 
Confederation shades off into mere Alliance, so the position 
of a Dependency shades off into that of a Protected state. 
For though, in speaking of the external relations of states, 
I have usually for simplicity assumed the states to be 
completely independent ; still in fact we have to recognise 
various relations of protection intermediate between com- 
plete dependence and complete independence.^ 

If we ask the best mode of governing dependent part- 
states, the answer must vary with the varying conditions 
under which the relation is suitabla Where the depend- 
ence is compulsory or semi-compulsory,— due to what we 
may assume to be legitimate conquest, — there is an obvious 
reason for not allowing the imwilling members any influ- 
ence on the government of the whole; which is also a 
sufficient reason for keeping the organised force of the 
dependency entirely in the hands of an executive organ 
appointed and controlled by the dominant government, and 
for making the assent either of this organ or of the domi- 
nant government practically as well as formcdly necessary 
to any special legislation required for the dependency. It is 
a more difficult question how far such legislation should be 
ordinarily allowed to be framed by a representative assembly, 
freely elected by the citizens of the dependent community — 
supposing them to be adequately homogeneous and civilised, 
and otherwise fitted for representative institutiona On the 
one hand, such an assembly is likely to become the mouth- 
piece of disaffection, and to render combination easier for 
the purpose of hampering and resisting the dominant 

^ If a favourable position is secured to a dependency by a treaty regarded 
as having the stability of a constitutional rule, the relation assumes an inter- 
mediate character, piurtly resembling Federality. 

2n 



546 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chaf. 

government : on the other hand, so Ceu* as it works e£BBct- 
ively within the sphere assigned to it, its operation is 
likely to diminish discontent and improve legislation ; since 
it will be generally difltenlt to devise a satis£Eu:tory substi- 
tate for snch a body, as a means of ascertaining the real 
needs of the population of the dependency. The decision 
in any particular case must depend largely on the extent 
and intensity of disaffection in the dependency ; since, so 
l<mg as this is extensive and violent, the risk of fodlitating 
dangerous organised agitation, through the election and 
operations of a representative legislature, would generally 
outweigh any probable gain in the way of pacification 
or useful legislative work. Similar considerations must 
also largely determine the answer to another important 
question, — ^viz. how £Etr the subordinate posts of the execu- 
tive and the judiciary in the dependent coimtry should 
be filled from the inhabitants of the dominant coimtry. 
Generally speaking, it is an inevitable disadvantage to a 
dependency of this class that the work of government has 
to be largely performed by foreigners; who are usually 
more costly than natives, and — other things equal — ^more 
likely to show selfishness and rapacity; and who, even 
when well intentioned, are liable to understand imper- 
fectly the laws and institutions of the country they are 
governing. 

As to the form of government for dependencies of this 
kind, it may be observed firstly that, owing to the special 
need of promptitude, decision, and often secrecy, a monarchical 
organisation seems generally suitable to the executive of 
the dependency ; secondly, that if the dependency be distant 
from the dominant country, it is important that it should 
be in some way represented in a special central organ of 
government in the dominant state, in order that the 
dominant government may make as few nustcikes as possible 
from lack of knowledge. 

§ 7. Let us now consider the case of a dependency that 
is such voluntarily and contentedly. This relation may 
result either (a) from the voluntary union of states pre- 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 547 

viously independent, or from union originally compulsory, 
out of which the element of constraint has vanished through 
lapse of time ; or (6) from the expansion of a commimity 
into new territory. In the former case, the relation of 
dependence may be an acceptable arrangement when the 
gain in the way of protection, trade, etc., is felt by the 
dependency to be worth the price paid for it — whether in 
taxation or in loss of independence ; — while the dependency 
is too much attached to its peculiar institutions to acquiesce 
in absorption by the dominant country, and at the same 
time the inequality of size is so great as to render the 
federal relation somewhat unsuitable. 

A more important case for modem states is that of de- 
pendencies resulting from the expansion of a unitary state 
into new territory. This process would not necessarily tend 
to this result, if the new territory colonised were continuous 
with the old, and were also empty, and not too large. Some 
special legislation would indeed be required to determine 
the conditions of appropriation of land and natural re- 
sources ; but so soon as the new districts became suificiently 
peopled under these conditions, they might have local 
governments similar to the rest, and similar representation 
in the central Parliament. But, as we have seen, after the 
whole territory had thus been enlarged beyond a certain 
size — varying with the development of the arts of con- 
veyance and communication — good government according 
to the methods of a imitary state would tend to become 
more difi&cult : and the difficulty would arise sooner if the 
expansion took place across a broad interval of sea, as the 
physical separation thus caused is likely to be attended by 
a marked difference in the conditions of the social life of 
the colonists, and consequently in their needs of govern- 
mental interference. For these colonial needs a central 
government constructed on the representative system can 
hardly be expected to legislate successfully; the mass of 
members of Parliament would tend to be too ignorant, and 
the representatives of the colonies too few in number and 
liable through distance to lose touch of their constituents. 



548 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

and to be absorbed in the political movements of the mother- 
country. This being so, the local government of the colony 
has a reasonable claim for an independence far exceeding 
that of a local government in the old country : and if this 
is granted, it appears imreasonable that representatives of 
the colony that enjoys this extent of autonomy should take 
part in managing the domestic afiairs of the mother-country. 
Under such circimistances, the principle of Federation is 
'prima facie applicable ; but, as we have seen, the great 
inequality in size of the parts that would be federated 
constitutes a special objection to its application. If, for 
this or other reasons, a Federal imion is out of the 
question, the best temporary substitute seems to be to 
constitute the colony self-governing within a sphere some- 
what similar to that of a part-state in a Federation, but 
without any formal control over the operations of the 
central government of the state of which it is a part 

The exact extent to which this colonial self-government 
should go must vary considerably with the degree of de- 
velopment of the colony, its situation and external relations, 
and other circumstances. It should also partly depend on 
the conception formed of the desirable ultimate destiny of 
the colony, — ix, whether this is to be a permanent political 
connexion with the mother-country, probably in a federal 
form, or complete independence, with perhaps some special 
tie of alliance.^ Thus, if the connexion is designed to be 
permanent, the colony should not have the power to tax or 
otherwise restrict its external trade without the consent of 

^ As complete political separation between a colony and its mother- 
country is most likely to be due to a real or supposed divergence of political 
interests — esi)ecially in foreign affairs, — the same cause will probably render 
any alliance between the two for military purposes transient and precarious. 
Still, it may be hoped that in future any political divorce that may take place 
between a civilised state and its colony may be effected without a violent 
rupture ; and may accordingly leave behind, in the separated nations, such 
sentiments of goodwill and habits of friendly intercourse as may tend to 
maintain a durable peace between them. Perhaps this result might be pro- 
moted by a mutual grant of the full rights of citizenship, without formal 
nationalisation, to emigrants from either country into the other, — ^an arrange- 
ment quite compatible with complete political independence. 



XXVI FEDERAL AND OTHER COMPOSITE STATES 549 

the mother-countrj ; since the industrial separation which 
tends to result from a protective tariflF will render political 
union more difficult to maintain. 

In any case, the position of dependence is not likely 
to be found permanently satisfactory, — at least for such 
colonies as I have before distinguished as '' colonies of 
settlement," in which the population is mainly derived from 
the dominant state. In such colonies, when they have 
reached a certain pitch of population and wealth, the 
absence of any control over the central government— even 
though compensated by a corresponding reduction in the 
burden of taxation — is likely to be felt as a grievance 
whenever the colony and the mother-country have conflicting 
views on matters which affect the interests of the former but 
are entirely under the management of the latter. Friction 
and discontent from this cause will be specially liable to 
occur in the department of foreign affairs ; since the central 
government, being responsible to foreigners for all acts and 
omissions of the colonists, will be imperatively boimd to 
interfere to prevent violations of international right, however 
much such interference may run counter to the wishes of 
the colonists generally. Under these circumstances, special 
care is required in organising the department of the central 
government that has to manage those colonial affairs, in 
which the interests of the mother-country are too much 
involved to leave them entirely to the colony. The 
head of the department should be advised by a council 
carefully selected from persons who have empirical know- 
ledge of the different colonies: and the self-governing 
colonies should be encouraged to use any convenient 
channel for making their needs and wishes known to 
the central government 

One specially important peculiarity usually found in the 
circimistances of colonists is, that the territory colonised is 
partially occupied by less civilised societies, whose relations 
to the colonists require careful regulation. To impose on 
the colonists unaided the task of dealing with these 
'' aborigines " would in some cases involve a serious risk of 



550 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxvi 

bloodshed : the foroes of the mother-country would have to 
intervene at a certain point ; and, so long as there is any 
danger of this, it seems clearly expedient that the mother- 
country should retain sufficient control over the colony to 
enable it to interfere efiTectually before this point is reached. 
Even when the colonists have overwhelming superiority in 
physical force — which soon comes to be the case, if it is not 
the case at first, in colonies of settlement— the greater im- 
partiality that may be reasonably attributed to the home 
government seems to render it generally desirable that the 
management of the aborigines should not be regarded as an 
" internal affair " of the colony, so long as there is any serious 
danger of a conflict of races or persecution of the inferior race. 
But, as was before said,^ the question of the relations to 
be established between colonists and aborigines is most 
important in colonies where the manual labour can never 
be in the main supplied by the superior race : since here 
the composite character of the population must be r^arded 
as permanent unless the races blend. To a society so con- 
stituted the governmental structure sketched in the pre- 
ceding chapters is prima fcLcie unsuited : but the extent and 
nature of the modifications that should be introduced into 
it must vary very much with the degree of civilisation 
actually reached by the inferior race, and its apparent 
capacity for further improvement It will be difficult to 
prevent a simple oligarchy of the superior race from being 
tyrannical : on the other hand, it seems a desperate resource 
to give equality of electoral privileges to members of the 
inferior race while admittedly imfit to control the operations 
of government, in the mere hope that experience may in 
time educate them up to a tolerable degree of fitness. So 
long as the composite society presents this dilemma, it will 
probably conduce to its wellbeing as a whole that the 
colony should remain a dependency; so that, even where 
the business of government is mainly left in the hands of 
the colonists, the control of the central government may pre- 
vent or mitigate any palpable oppression of the inferior race. 

* Chap. xviiL § 8. 



CHAPTER XXVII 

CONTKOL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 

§ 1. In the preceding chapters we have been considering 
the structure of governing organs, on the assumption that 
government is a business requiring specicd gifts, training, 
and practice ; and that, accordingly, it ought to be placed in 
the hands of a special group of persons, carefully selected 
for the purpose. We have now to turn to an important 
question, briefly noticed and postponed at an early stage of 
the discussion, viz. what share in the work of government 
should be assigned, in a modem civilised community, to 
the mass of the citizens? In some ages and countries 
it has been the prevalent opinion, the established con- 
stitutional doctrine, that the mass of the people "have 
nothing to do with the laws but to obey them." But 
this is not the view upon which our construction of 
government has proceeded. In framing our supreme legis- 
lative and executive organs we have adopted, in the 
main, the principle of "representative" or "responsible" 
government; we have regarded it as fundamentally im- 
portant, not only that governors should be subject to the 
watchful criticism of the governed, but also that the latter 
should periodically, in selecting their governors, pass judg- 
ment on the political conduct of those who seek their 
sufi&ages a second time. It remains to consider whether 
this indirect influence on government is sufficient, or whether 
there should be further any direct intervention of the 



SS2 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

citizens at large — whom, for brevity, I will call " the 
people " — in legislation or governmental administration.^ 

This question is closely connected with another of 
fundamental importance: viz. whether the freedom or 
interests of individuals should be protected from encroach- 
ment on the part of the legislature by any constitutional 
rules, which the ordinary legislature is legally bound to obey. 
For, if the latter question be answered afl&rmatively, the 
direct intervention of the people is a simple and obvious 
mode of providing for the changes that may be from time 
to time required in such constitutional rules. It is not, 
however, the mode actually adopted in West-European 
states generally : * while to most Englishmen the very con- 
ception of constitutional limitations on the legislative power 
of Parliament is now unfamiliar : the old difficulty '' Quis 
custodiet ipsos custodes ? " is commonly thought to be suffi- 
ciently met — in the case of the legislature — by establishing 
representative government. And certainly in a state in 
which the fully qualified citizens directly appoint, at intervals 
of a few years, the members of the chief organ of legislation, 
and directly or indirectly determine the heads of the execu- 
tive departments, no governmental aggression on the rights 
of individuals is likely to take place, except such as the 
majority of fully qualified citizens receive with at least 
acquiescence This acquiescence may indeed be due to a want 
of full perception of the effects of governmental measures, or 
a want of ready sympathy with the persons who are most 
directly injured by them : accordingly, in order that the 
protection aflforded by the representative system may be 
as effective as possible, it is important that any persons 
aggrieved by the action of government should have the 
opportunity of arousing the attention and interest of the 
mass of their fellow-citizens, by oral and written discussion. 
And, speaking more generally, in order that the function of 
electing legislators and administrators may be well performed 
by ordinary electors, it is recognised as desirable — we may 

^ The arguments for and against the intervention of a casually selected 
group of ordinary citizens in judicial work have already been considered. 
« See p. 560. 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE O VER GO VERNMENT $53 

say indispensable — ^that they should be enlightened and 
stimulated by full and free criticisms of current legislation 
and administration. 

This is, indeed, in England almost undisputed: and 
hence fireedom of speech, freedom of the press, freedom to 
assemble peacefully for the consideration and emphatic state- 
ment of political grievances, are, in the view of Englishmen, 
an essential part of the " free institutions " on which they 
pride themselves : but it is not commonly felt to be neces- 
sary that these or any other rights of individual citizens 
should be protected by fundamental laws which the ordinary 
legislature is legally incompetent to £dter. It is held that 
they will be sufficiently protected by public opinion and the 
representative character of the legislature 

Accordingly, before considering the expediency of any 
legal restraints on the ordinary legislature, it seems desirable 
to examine more closely the nature of the moral control 
which the representative system provides. In one view of 
this system, the essence of representative government is 
that " the people represented govern through their repre- 
sentatives": the latter are regarded as agents, appointed 
to carry out the wishes of their constituents, and properly 
liable to dismissal if in any point they insist on carrying 
into eflfect their own judgment, in opposition to the judgment 
of those whom they " represent." This view is manifested 
in the demand sometimes made by a constituency that their 
representative should resign because he does not vote as 
they like, in the statement that the House of Commons 
has not " received a mandate from the electors " to do such 
and such things, — and similar utterances, common in 
England at the present time. 

This view is very naturally suggested by a consideration 
of the historical origin of representative government, I 
sliall begin therefore by pointing out that the form of 
representative government actually established in this and 
most other European countries — Switzerland being an 
exception — is in any case ill adapted for realising this 
conception of its spirit and design. 



554 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 2. If the framers of a constitution really aimed at making 
the will of the majority, at any given time, supreme in legis- 
lation, it would be easy to make regulations which would at 
any rate secure a much closer approximation to this result 
than is realised under the ordinary representative system of 
government. It would be easy to introduce what is known 
in Switzerland as the "Obligatory Referendum^": t.c. to 
treat all parliamentary deliberation as merely preliminary, 
and enact that all Acts of Parliament should be submitted 
to the electors for formed approval before they become veJid 
as laws. It would be possible, indeed, to go further still, and 
introduce the right of " Initiative " actually established in 
some Swiss cantons : i,t, to make it the duty of the Legislature 
to publish legislative proposals brought forward by a certain 
proportion of the electorate, and cause them to be voted on by 
the constituents at local polling places. Perhaps it may be 
held that it would be absurd to throw on the people at large 
the actual work of legislation, — since the people only form 
general aims and wishes, for which it is the business of the 
l^islative expert to supply appropriate particular rules fit to 
be enacted,— but that these general aims and wishes should 
be regarded as paramount by a representative legislature. 
And certainly it would be difficult for the citizens at large 
to perform eflfectively the complicated discussion that is often 
required to mould a legislative scheme into the most accept- 
able form. Nor would it be practicable for the constituents to 
direct the action of the representative in every detail during 
such discussions ; since it would sometimes happen that com- 
promises and modifications were suggested at the last moment, 
rendering any previously expressed wishes of the constituents 
irrelevant to the issue finally put to the vote ; while to give 
time for a reference to the constituencies in all cases would in- 
volve intolerable delay. Still this difficulty need not prevent 
the allotment of a large share of direct control to the people 
at large. For a substantial amount of such control could 

' In contrast to the "Facultative Referendum": by which a measure 
is referred to the popular vote, only when such reference is demanded by a 
certain number of citizens. 



xxvii CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 555 

be secured to a constituency by making it the constitutional 
duty of a representative to conform in his parliamentary 
voting to all clear and precise instructions laid down by 
a majority of his constituents; and it would be easy to 
arrange that — except in case of urgency — no clause of a 
law should be finally passed by a representative assembly, 
without time being allowed for a vote of the citizens in any 
constituency ; and that any resolution passed by a majority 
of those voting should be binding on the representative. It 
would doubtless be inconvenient to allow legal doubts to be 
raised as to the validity of laws, on the ground that the 
legislators had disobeyed their constituents ; but the simple 
expedient suggested by Bentham, of giving such a majority 
the right of dismissing a representative at any time, would 
generally suffice to prevent any wilful disobedience; and, 
assuming that elected legislators are to be regarded as 
mere agents of their electors, it seems clearly most con- 
sistent to make them thus promptly dismissibla Or, perhaps 
— to avoid the practical mischief of distracting the attention 
of the elected legislator from his legislative functions — ^it 
would be better, if this view were adopted, to renew his 
appointment annually ; taking a vote of the electors, in case 
of a contest, during the parliamentary vacation; and the 
final ratification of the legislative measures of the year 
might be deferred till this annual election, so as to give the 
people a regular opportunity for cancelling any unpopular 
legislative innovation. 

These suggestions have a paradoxical appearance. But 
I am seriously disposed to think that, if the doctrine which 
reduces the representative to a mere delegate, bound to carry 
out from day to day the wishes of his constituents so far 
as he can ascertain them, were firmly established as a part 
of constitutional morality, there would be important advan- 
tages in making this obligation more definite and stringent 
by such arrangements as I have above suggested. For, if 
this were done, the electorate would express their wishes 
imder a more serious sense of responsibility, and their real 
desires would be more likely to be ascertained ; it would 



SS6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

be less easy for a fanatical or intriguing minority to 
assume the semblance of a majority.^ At the same time, I 
do not think that changes of this kind would bring us to a 
system of government which is either abstractly desirable 
or the best attainable I think that the periodical election 
of legislators should aim at being as far as possible a 
selection of persons believed to possess superior political 
capacity; and it seems reasonable to assume that the 
responsibilities and experience of such persons must tend 
materially to increase their original advantage in political 
insight I therefore think that it cannot conduce to good 
government to let their judgment be overruled at any 
moment by the opinions of a comparatively ignorant and 
inexperienced majority. I consider, on the contrary, that a 
representative who does not follow his own best judgment in 
the exercise of his governmental functions — even when it 
brings him into conflict with the temporary opinions and 
sentiments of a majority of his constituents — should be 
held guilty of a plain dereliction of duty. 

It may perhaps be said that the absurdity of "folly 
controlling skill " is inherent and inevitable in the system 
of government that we have been throughout contemplating : 
that, in any case, the ignorant have to judge the experts at 
the periodical election, which is just as absurd as overruling 
their opinions at any other time ; and that the prospect of 
this judgment must cause elected governors to yield to all 
decided popular prejudices and wishes. I admit the force 
of the objection. I think, however, that the practical danger 
that it signalises may be very materially reduced, if the 
duration of parliament be adequately prolonged; for if a 
body of electors is normally called upon to express a practi- 
cally decisive opinion on the conduct of their representative 
only at intervals of some years, the more intelligent electors 
will probably be able to judge of at least important parts of 

^ Similar arrangements might be made for bringing the Supreme Executive 
under direct popular control ; but I have not thought it necessary to work 
these out, as I think that tlie disadvantages of such arrangements would in 
any case outweigh the drawbacks. 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 557 



his conduct after events have unmistakably shown their 
wisdom or unwisdom. This consideration, I hold, shows us 
the groimds on which the proper duration of parliaments 
should be determined : while they should not be so long as 
to weaken the sense of responsibility in the person elected, 
they should be long enough to give an honest and intelligent 
elector a fair opportunity of taking the measure of the 
intellectual and morcd qualifications of his representatives. It 
is, of course, impossible to deduce from general considerations 
the exact number which fulfils best these two conditions : 
but I may perhaps say that a period of five, six, or even 
seven years, appears to me to fulfil them very fairly. A 
period of this length gives the electors fair opportimities of 
judging, with regard to members of parliament who offer 
themselves for re-election, whether they have consistently 
carried out the principles and pursued the aims avowed by 
them at the time of their election, and how far their fore- 
cast of consequences has been confirmed by events ; while, 
on the other hand, the period is not long enough to lead 
either side to forget the promises and predictions made at 
the beginning of the period, or the account which will have 
to be rendered at its close. 

I have spoken of "promises"; but, on the principle 
above laid down, no Pledges, strictly speaking, should be 
required of candidates by their constituenta Declarations 
of opinions and present intentions may reasonably be given 
and demanded, and are indeed necessary, if the respon- 
sibility of the representative to his constituents is to be 
effectively maintained. It is also reasonable that new 
candidates should be partly chosen for the conformity of 
their declared opinions and intentions with the views of 
their constituenta It is not to be expected that the latter 
should choose a representative who disagrees with them on 
matters seriously affecting their interests, and falling within 
the range of their personal experience ; it is not to be desired 
that any considerations should induce them to elect an 
avowed supporter of measures opposed to their moral con- 
victiona But in dealing with questions of mere political 



558 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

expedieucy, recognised as such, and on which they cannot 
suppose themselves to have empirical knowledge, it can 
hardly be the duty of every citizen of a free community to 
construct for himself a set of fixed political dogmas, and to 
adhere to them in defiance of the judgment of any other 
person, however greatly his superior. It rather appears to 
me important to keep alive in the mass of comparatively 
ignorant and uneducated persons a due consciousness of their 
inferior means and opportimities of forming a judgment on 
most political questions, as compared with the means and 
opportimities possessed by persons of more education and 
leisure. What the electors have to do is to choose the man 
best qualified for the business of government, not to teach 
him his business : and they have obviously in many cases 
means of judging of the candidate's qualifications other than 
that of ascertaining his agreement with their own opinions 
on contemporary political questions ; — such as specific ex- 
perience of matters, public or private, which he has managed 
well, or evidence of grasp and reasoning power shown in 
books or other writings : evidence of character too is very 
important. They cannot, doubtless, always have evidence of 
this kind with regard to new candidates : but I am inclined 
to think that the more exacting they show themselves in 
requiring it, the better on the average will be the quality of 
their governors. 

§ 3. For the reasons given in the preceding section, I do 
not think it expedient that there should be any regular 
and direct intervention of the people in ordinary legislation, 
or — a fortiori — in the administrative work of the central 
government. The considerations above urged undoubtedly 
apply less strongly to local government, as the matters with 
which this deals fall more within the range of the experience 
of ordinary citizens. But even here it seems to me that the 
normal action of the latter is likely to do most good with 
least harm, if it is confined to criticism and periodical 
appointment of the persons primarily responsible for govern- 
mental decisions : though the duration of ofi&ce may with 
advantage be shortened in the case of local government, so 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 559 

that the indirect control of the governed may be closer and 
more sustained 

There are, however, special cases in which the direct 
intervention of the people in legislation appears to me on 
the whole advantageous. The first case arises when in a 
legislature constructed on the two-chamber system it is 
important to avoid the deadlock resulting from a disagree- 
ment between the two chambers : i,e, when the urgency of 
the need of some legislation on a particular point is generally 
recognised, but the chambers cannot agree upon the form 
that the legislation is to take. Under these conditions, a 
reference to the citizens at large has many advantages, as a 
method of terminating the disagreement The dignity of 
either chamber is saved if it has to yield to the people and 
not to the rival chamber; while, by the reference of a 
particular measure to the judgment of the citizens a more 
clear expression of the people's will is obtained than a 
general election of representatives can give. Again, the 
process is more educative, since a single definite issue is 
placed before the country ; it also avoids the danger involved 
in the representative system, that an interested or fanatical 
minority of citizens may, by concentrating its whole voting 
power at a general election on a particular question, obtain 
a fictitious majority of representatives pledged to support its 
demands. In the case of such a reference to the people as 
this, in the course of ordinary legislation, and with the 
consent of both chambers, a simple majority of those voting 
would naturally be decisive. 

Another case, in which a similar exercise of governmental 
functions by the citizens at large is for different reasons to 
be recommended, is when changes are proposed in con- 
stitutional rules designed to have greater stability than 
ordinary laws. A modem civilised state — as we have 
already assumed — ^will be normally a constitutional state, 
in which all the organs of government carry on their work 
under certain fundamental laws, which at once assign and 
limit their powers. We may assume that such laws should 
be somehow legally alterable : it is primd facie reasonable 



560 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

that it should be beyond the power of the ordinary legisla- 
ture to change them ; and it is obviously desirable that so 
long as they exist they should have the support of popular 
acceptance. If so, there seems to be no way so efiTective to 
secure the desired stability and popularity at once, as to 
place them formally under the guardianship of the people 
at larga This may, no doubt, be done indirectly, according 
to the method adopted in several European constitutions, by 
requiring any change in the constitution to be approved by 
two successive legislatures, so that a general election may 
always intervene between the proposal of the change and 
its final adoption. But, it seems imdesirable that legis- 
lators should be elected solely on account of their opinions 
on one particular question ; and on the whole better that, 
where the assent of the people at large is required for the 
validity of any legislative change, this assent should be 
sought and given in a direct and simple form. 

I pass, therefore, to consider how far it is really ex- 
pedient to give special stability to a certain portion of the 
law of the state ; and on what principles the portion thus 
rendered exceptionally stable should be determined. 

§ 4. We may begin by removing certain ambiguities 
which are found in the ordinary political use of the terms 
"constitution," "constitutional" In states where there 
are certain laws not alterable by the ordinary process of 
legislation, this body of specially stable laws is commonly 
spoken of as " the constitution " without regard to its sub- 
ject-matter. According to this use of the terms, a " con- 
stitutional" rule (1) is always strictly a law, and (2) its 
essential distinction from other laws lies in the fact that a 
special process is required for abrogating or altering it. 
But, according to another no less common usage, the same 
tenns are implicitly defined by reference to the subject- 
matter of the rules which they denote. In this sense a 
" constitution " is understood to mean a body of rules that 
either (a) determine the structure of government — the 
mode of appointment of diflFerent organs, and the distribu- 
tion of functions and jwwers among them — or (6) impose 



xxvii CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 561 

obligations, positive or negative, on the government in the 
interest of the governed, and thus establish " constitutional 
rights " of the governed which the government is bound to 
respect • Now these two definitions are hardly ever com- 
pletely coincident in their application ; and sometimes they 
do not coincide at alL For (1) important points in the 
actual structure of any government may be determined not 
by law, but merely by custom, convention and prevalent 
opinion possessing no legal force — as we have seen to be 
the case in England The whole structure, no doubt, cannot 
be so determined ; since in every orderly state there must 
be some law determining the persons who have a rightful 
claim to supreme legislative authority ; — even an absolute 
monarchy must have a law of succession. But (2) there is 
no necessity that such structural laws should be enacted or 
modified by a process different from ordinary legislation ; or 
that there should be any legal limitations whatever on the 
power of the legislature when once constituted. In fact, 
as we have seen, there are no such limitations in England— 
or at least none definitely recognised. The law determin- 
ing the structure of the English Parliament is alterable by 
precisely the same process as any other part of English 
law: no one (e.^^.) has ever doubted that the House of 
Lords might be abolished at any time by a simple Act of 
Parliament. Now where this is the case it would be para- 
doxical to say that there is " no constitution " — as we should 
have to say if we used the term consistently in the sense 
first explained. It is better to express the difference by 
saying that in such a case the constitution is Flexible: 
while, if the legal structure of government cannot be altered 
by the ordinary process of legislation, we may call it more 
or less Bigid, according to the difficidty of the process of 
change. 

The grave and — I think — decisive disadvantage of flexi- 
bility lies in the ease with which fundamental changes may 
be made ; so that valuable rule« and institutions may be 
abolished in a transient gust of unpopularity, and thus lose 
irreparably the stability given by antiquity and unbroken 

20 



562 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

custoHL The danger varies, of course, according to the 
manner of composition of the legislature: but it seems 
likely to be important in the case of any state in which 
the legislature is solely or mainly composed of persons 
popularly elected for short periods. The corresponding 
drawbacks of rigidity are partly that clearly expedient 
changes are prevented, partly that, by making change more 
difficult, the danger of violent revolution is increased. These 
drawbacks perhaps render it dangerous to require for a 
constitutional change a preponderance of votes so great that 
a majority, large enough to be plausibly described as *^ the 
nation," is still constitutionally unable to change its funda- 
mental law& But this objection could hardly be serious if 
no more than an absolute majority of the votes of the 
citizens were required for the validity of such changes; 
since a restraining rule can hardly be felt as an intolerable 
burden by citizens who will not take the trouble of walking 
to the polling-places to get rid of it ; at the same time, this 
requirement seems an important protection against hasty 
changes. Perhaps a constitution protected in this way — 
and by the requirement of a similar majority in at least one 
of the chambers of the central legislature,^ before any change 
could be proposed — would have as high a degi*ee of stability 
as it is desirable to aim at in a unitary state.^ 

There are, however, certain further disadvantages attach- 
ing to a rigid constitution which require careful considera- 
tion. Firstly, when changes are proposed, the attention of 
statesmen and of the public, which should be concentrated 

^ In a two-chambered legislature, in which the members of both chambers 
are appointed by periodical election, an absolute majority in each of the two 
chambers might reasonably be required to concur in bringing forward any 
change in the constitution. But to allow a non-elective senate permanently 
to obstruct constitutional change, would obviously not be consistent with 
the popular basis here advocated for the constitution. The refusal of con- 
sent by such a senate should therefore only have the effect of delaying 
for a time a change supported by an absolute majority of the house of repre- 
sentatives ; and any power of veto vested in the supreme executive should 
be similarly limited. 

' For the reason why a federal constitution is naturally more stable, see 
chap. xxvL § 4. 



xxvii CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 563 

on the difficult task of weighing considerations of expediency 
for and against the change, is liable to be inconveniently 
distracted by the question of its legality; secondly, it 
is hard to find a satisfEUstory authority for deciding 
this latter question. The former disadvantage is to some 
extent inevitable ; but in order to minimise it, minute and 
complicated constitutional restraints should be avoided as 
far as possible. The difficulty of finding an unexceptionable 
organ for deciding disputed questions of constitutional 
interpretation may be met in various ways ; none of which, 
however, is altogether satisfactory.^ 

JPrimd facie, this interpretative function belongs to the 
judiciary ; at the same time, an arrangement by which the 
judiciary has to sit in judgment on the legislature is open 
to certain objections. In the first place, in the ordinary 
administration of justice, the function of the judge comes 
into play when a breach of law requiring reparation or 
punishment is alleged to have been committed ; but if an 
act is passed by the legislature in excess of its constitu- 
tional powers, it seems hard that an ordinary citizen should 
sufiTer either for obeying or for disobeying it. To prevent 
this, an authoritative decision on the validity of the act 
might be obtained from a responsible body of legal experts 
before it was finally passed ; but such a decision is hardly 
likely to carry as much weight as one arrived at in the 
ordinary way of litigation, after the court has heard the 

^ It is to be observed that this difficulty may conceivably arise even when 
the stractore of government is flexible ; since any structural rules, limiting 
the powers of governmental organs, may lead to disputes as to the power of 
one or other organ, even though such rules are as alterable as ordinary laws ; 
and it may not be possible to settle such disputes by new legislation, if 
ordinary legislation requires the agreement of several differently appointed 
bodies or individuals. Especially where the Executive is not dismissible by 
Parliament, and has a veto on new legislation, it is not unlikely to disagree 
with the legislature as to the exact limits of its powers under the existing 
law. In such a case the question must arise who is to settle the point at 
issue ; and it will be a disadvantage if the constitution — whether fixed by 
precedent or by statute — does not clearly assign, either to the ordinary 
judiciary or to some other body, the function of decisively interpreting 
the rules. 



564 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chaf. 

arguments of professional advocates on both side& Perhaps 
it would be, on the whole, best that a short interval should 
be allowed in which objections might be formally taken to 
the constitutionality of any new law passed by the legisla* 
ture, and that if such objections were taken the law should 
not come into operation until the points raised had been 
argued before and decided by a tribunal In case no such 
objections were taken the decision of some body of legal 
experts without litigation — ^perhaps the Law Council before 
suggested— might be final 

But the plan of making the ordinary judges interpreters 
of the constitution has drawbacks of a more fundamental kind. 
Since it confers on the judges a final and supreme power of 
practically determining the law, wherever the constitution 
is ambiguous and a majority sufficient to change it un- 
attainable, it introduces a danger that the judges may 
be drawn into party conflict, and the confidence in their 
impartiality thereby be impaired. And from the same 
cause there arises a further danger that the legislature or 
the executive may be tempted to misuse its control over the 
appointment and dismissal of judges, in order to obtain a 
tribunal subservient to its wishes ; while yet the withdrawal 
of all control of this kind would leave the judges in too 
independent a position. 

On the other hand, if, to avoid these difficulties, we leave 
the interpretation of constitutional rules to the ordinary 
supreme legislature,^ we can hardly expect an impartial 
decision in any dispute as to the limits of constitutional 
restraints imposed on legislation. If, therefore, in the 
case of any legislation that excites strong opposition, 
the charge of transgressing constitutional limits is urged 
against the parliamentary majority by their opponents, 
it is likely to be a permanent source of resentment, 
and seriously to aggravate any discontent that the dis- 
puted legislation may cause on other than constitutional 
grounds. 

' This objection obviously applies still more strongly to the central legis- 
lature in a federal state. 



xxvxi CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 565 

(I may here notice a simpler and more drastic method 
of avoiding the evils of a conflict among the organs of 
government, — viz. by depriving all constitutional rules of 
strictly legal force as against the supreme executive, and 
making it the duty of the judges to regard its commands 
as finally valid : since this is an interpretation of " Con- 
stitutional Monarchy " still surviving in Grermany. It 
might doubtless sometimes assist the monarch in meeting 
a dangerous crisis, by facilitating a salutary extension of 
executive power which would otherwise be illegal and dis- 
orderly. But this advantage appears to me too dearly 
purchased by a sacrifice of the normal relation between 
the legislature and the executive.) 

Another possible method would be to refer to the 
citizens at large any question of legislative change of 
which the legality is disputed by a sufficiently large 
minority in the legislature. This plan, however, is open 
to the objection that the citizens at large are obviously not 
qualified to decide disputed points of interpretation : and it 
is liable to make the constitutional rules practically more 
elastic than they were designed to be, if the assent of a 
mere majority of the votes given is sufficient, and more 
stringent than they were designed to be, if it is not 
sufficient. 

On the whole, the judicial method, with the modifica- 
tions above suggested, seems preferable in a unitary no less 
than in a federal state; though the disadvantages of it 
appear to me to constitute a strong reason for reducing to 
a minimum the restraints on legislation which it is thus 
left to the judiciary to interpret and apply. 

In any case, changes in a rigid constitution shoidd be 
initiated by the ordinary central legislature : to allow them 
to be initiated outside it would tend to diminish its re- 
sponsibility and influence, and withdraw a security against 
hasty change without any corresponding advantaga At 
the same time, when extensive changes are desired, there is 
some advantage in calling a special convention to consider 
the details of such changes: as there may be persons 



566 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

recognised as peculiarly qualified for this important work 
who are not members of the ordinary legislature. 

§ 5. Let us now examine more closely the kinds of 
constitutional rules that it is expedient to render imalter- 
able by the ordinary legislature if a rigid constitution be 
adopted 

Such rules fall naturally under three heads : — 

(1) First will come the class of rules that are primarily 
suggested by the original meaning of the word "con- 
stitution " : t.e. rules determining the mode of appointment 
and dismissal of the persons composing the different organs 
of government, or determining the distribution of functions 
among them. Of such rules the discussion in the preced- 
ing chapters will have already afforded abundant examples. 
E,g. the constitution of the legislature as one-chambered or 
two-chambered; the conditions of tenure of the office of 
legislator in either chamber ; the duration of Parliament ; 
the general definition of the electorate, and the principles 
of its division into constituencies ; the mode of appointing 
(and, if dismissible, of dismissing) the Supreme Executive ; 
regulations for securing adequate independence to this and 
to the judicial organ ; the composition of the latter, especially 
as regards the introduction of a non-professional element in 
the form of the jury ; — these points will all be naturally 
and properly determined in a rigid constitution, so as to be 
unalterable by ordinary legislation. And, of course, in a 
federal state the division of powers between central and 
local governments must be so determined. 

(2) In the second place will come rules determining the 
procedure of the organs of government, or limiting the 
modes of action available for performing their recognised 
duties or supplying their admitted needa Such rules may 
relate to the legislature, — as the rule that no legislative 
proposal be passed by either chamber, until after it has 
been considered a certain number of times, or the rule 
prohibiting ex post facto legislation; — or again to the 
Judiciary, as the rides prohibiting judges from receiving 
fees for their own usa But in modem constitutions 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 567 

generally it is for the executive especially that such 
restraints have seemed necessary: — as, for example, the 
rules prohibiting '' unreasonable searches of houses/' or the 
opening of letters in the post-office, or the detention in 
prison of persons before trial, imless accused of certain 
grave ofiences ; or the arrest of an alleged criminal other- 
wise than on a definite charge communicated to him. 

The rules just mentioned, while affecting importantly 
the methods of governmental interference, do not limit or 
prescribe the kind of laws that Government is to lay down 
for the conduct of the citizens at large or in any way 
determine the mutual legal relations of the latter. They 
are thus distinguishable from (3) a third class of rules, 
designed to prevent Government from interfering at all in 
certain matters, or to establish certain general legal relations 
among' the citizens which Government is boimd to main- 
tain. Examples of this third class are rules prohibiting 
interference with religious belief or worship, or civil dis- 
qualifications on the score of race : and also — in respect of 
part of their scope ^ — rules prohibiting legislation that 
takes private proverty without compensation, or impairs 
the obligation of a contract.^ 

The particular rules falling under the two latter heads 
that ought to form part of a rigid constitution will properly 
be determined to a great extent by the special customs and 
traditions of the state in question, and its experience of the 
need of protection against oppressive governmental inter- 

^ Sach rules will fall under the second head if the property is taken for 
the use of Government, or the contract made on behalf of Government. 

' In West-European constitutions the constitutional provisions that fall 
under this third head are usually of the broad and general kind exemplified 
in the text. But the case is different in many of the State Constitutions of 
the United States. We find there *' minute provisions regarding the 
management and liabilities of corporations, ... we find a declaration of 
the extent of a mechanic's lien for work done ; we even find provisions for 
fixing the rates which may be charged for the storage of com in ware- 
houses " (Bryce, American Commonwealth, Part II. chap, xxxvii). But to 
include in a constitution the determination of such details as these 
obliterates all distinction — so far as subject-matter is concerned — between 
constitutional rules and ordinary laws: and it is difficult to find any 
adequate general reasons for such a procedure. 



568 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

ference by any organ, or against misconduct of l^islators 
or members of the executive considered as individuals. 
We may, however, distinguish certain classes of cases in 
which there appear to be special reasons — of different 
kinds — for regarding the ordinary legislature as liable to 
be biassed in a direction opposed to the interests of the 
community. 

Firstly, it may be possible by constitutional rules to 
counteract to some extent the tendency of legislators to 
sacrifice the public interest to their interests as individuals. 
For instance, they are under some temptation to vote them- 
selves pay or privileges which it is not for the good of the 
community that they should have : this danger, then, may 
be met either by fixing in the constitution the emoluments, 
if any, and the personal privil^s of members of parlia- 
ment ; or— less rigidly— by providing that no legislation 
increasing the emoluments or privileges of members of 
parliament should affect the legislators who pass it until 
after they have been re-elected. 

Secondly, in any form of polity except where the 
supremacy of Parliament is intended to be practically com- 
plete and undisputed, there is a danger that the tsfprit de 
corps of the legislature may prompt to encroachments im- 
pairing the qualified independence of the other organs, unless 
this independence be protected by constitutional securities. 
This class of rules has been sufficiently illustrated in previous 
chapters (xxiL and xxiv.). 

Thirdly, a dominant party in Parliament may be tempted 
to tamper with its elective basis, in order to gain a party 
advantaga For this reason I conceive that the maximum 
duration of Parliament, the general principles on which the 
electorate is divided into separate constituencies, and other 
important points in the arrangements for electing legislators, 
should, in a rigid constitution, be placed beyond the control 
of the ordinary legislature. For a similar reason, it may 
be desirable to limit the power of any legislative assembly 
lo determine its own rules of ordinary procedure and inflict 
penalties for the breach of them, in case experience shows 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 569 

that this power is practically liable to be exercised oppres- 
sively towards minorities. 

Fourthly, the legislature, acting 6o7id fidt for what a 
majority of its members believe to be the good of the com- 
munity, is likely to have from time to time so keen a desire 
for the attainment of particular governmental ends by legis- 
lation as to be tempted to underestimate the comparative 
importance of protecting the freedom of individuals from 
oppressive governmental interference ; and may thus be led 
to abrogate or suspend, without sufficient cause, rules and 
institutions designed to protect this freedom. 

§ 6. This last consideration has been the chief ground 
for many important structural rules in modern constitutions, 
such as the rule securing trial by jury in criminal cases ; 
and it is, I think, by far the most important argument 
for maintaining constitutional rules other than those relating 
to the structure of government. It should, however, be 
observed that it is often a matter of considerable difficulty 
to frame such rules with sufficient precision to make 
them legally efiTective, without at the same time hampering 
the legislature unduly. Hence, in many cases the declara- 
tions of " fundamental rights of citizens," that have been 
included in modem constitutions, would seem from their 
vagueness to be chiefly designed to produce a moral efiect ; 
so far as they impose legal restraints, these seem to be often 
hardly more than formd.^ 

I may conveniently illustrate this difficulty by considering 
more particularly the fundamental rules securing freedom of 
speech and of the press, which find a place in most modem 
constitutions in which " fundamental rights " are enumerated: 
since such rules have a special importance when we are 

^ For instance, the prohibition of ''ex post facto legislation" will pre- 
vent the avowed infliction of penalties for mischievous acts that were not 
legally prohibited when they were done ; but it will not legally — though 
it may moraUy — restrain a legislature from inflicting damages on the persons 
who did the acts, so long as it is not inflicted avowedly as a penalty. So 
again, the rule ''that private property is not to be taken for public use 
without just compensation " would not legally restrain a legislature from 
giving inadequate compensation, — owing to the vagueness of the term 
"just." 



570 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

considering the general relation of the governed to the 
government as a whola 

We have seen that the control over government given 
to the governed by periodical elections is likely to be com- 
paratively ineffective and ill-directed, unless the danger of 
blindness or apathy on the part of the governed be met by 
full and free criticism of current legislation and adminis- 
tration. At the same time, such criticism is likely to be 
often very distasteful to the governmental organs criticised, 
even when it is highly useful: hence there is a "primb, 
facie reason for including in any rigid constitution rules 
protecting the citizen's right " to speak the thing he 
will " from undue governmental interference. But with a 
view to the maintenance of order, it seems important that 
this protection should only be given to criticism that 
(1) is ho'ML fide intended to recommend only legal methods 
for obtaining the reform of what is criticised, and (2) would 
not be understood as an incitement to illegality by a person 
of ordinary intelligence. And in applying this maxim due 
regard must be had to cases where agitation is undoubtedly 
on foot tending to cause attempts to overthrow or resist 
government by violence ; since it is obviously possible for 
speakers and writers in such circumstances to fan the 
flames of sedition dangerously, by utterances which are kept 
carefully free from any recommendations to illegality. We 
before observed that expressions of opinion which would not 
ordinarily be incitements to violations of private rights may 
become so through the special circumstances attending their 
utterance ; and the same is obviously true of offences against 
government Hence any constitutional rule restraining the 
legislature from "abridging freedom of speech or of the 
press " will require to be qualified by a tolerably compre- 
hensive permission to prohibit seditious utterances. 

So again : it is an important practical security for free- 
dom of political utterance that man shall not be prevented 
from writing and publishing what he likes, by any interfer- 
ence, before the act, of an executive official, — but oply 
restrained by the dread of punishment judicially inflicted 



XXVII CONTROL OF THE PEOPLE OVER GOVERNMENT 571 

after publication. It is, indeed, indispensable to maintain 
this security, if we are to get the advantage of free criticism 
of the acts of the executive: since the question whether 
such criticism has kept within the legal limits laid down for 
it is too delicate a one to be left to the judgment of the per- 
sons criticised. But it does not follow that there shoidd be 
no special press law : and it would be inexpedient that such 
a law should be constitutionally prohibited: since the power 
and the inducements that an unscrupulous editor of a news- 
paper has to disseminate calumnies about public officials — 
or even private persons in any way important — constitutes 
a grave danger, against which it is desirable to take special 
precautions. Thus {t-g^y to facilitate the infliction of deserved 
punishment the names of printer and publisher — if not of 
author or editor — shoidd be affixed to published documents : 
while to diminish the danger of libels without imposing the 
necessity of legal proceedings, it seems reasonable that 
newspapers should be compelled to publish gratis a reply 
from any person whom they have attacked — provided such 
reply does not exceed the attack in length or in violence of 
language— or at least to publish a reference to any other 
journal in which such a reply may appear. 

So far I have been treating the relation between govern- 
ment and the governed, considered as individuala The con- 
stitutional rights of " free speech " and " free press " have 
been historically associated with those of free meeting and 
free association. But the consideration of these latter rights 
belongs to the general question how far any special need of 
governmental interference arises in consequence of the com- 
bination of individuals for purposes not demonstrably un- 
lawful; whether they combine transiently in public meetings, 
or in leagues for some special end, to last till their end be 
achieved, or in associations designed to be permanent. This 
question appears to me sufficiently important to be reserved 
for a separate chapter. 



)■' 



tV CHAPTEE XXVIII 



THE RELATION OF THE STATE TO VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 

§ 1. In the first chapter of this book it was noticed that 
Gk)vemment, in the sense in which we have been concerned 
with it, — the (Jovemment whose existence is the essential 
characteristic of political societies as such — is only one 
species of " government " in a wider sense ; and that human 
beings, especially in modern states, are drawn together, 
by important relations other than political, into associations 
which have a kind of government. The most venerable of 
these — and the only associations that have had a continuous 
life rivalling that of states in duration and in importance to 
their members — have as their bond of imion religious belief 
and worship. But there are various other associations, 
mostly with narrower and more temporary aims, which are 
of some importance in the social life of modern states: 
political parties and leagues ; industrial associations, such as 
trade- unions of workmen, federations of employers, joint- 
stock companies of capitalists ; scientific, literary, and phil- 
anthropic societies of various kinds. 

Any such association of persons for the realisation of 
common aims will ordinarily have a kind of government, the 
structure of which will often resemble more or less closely 
that of the political government which we have been con- 
templating. In the most ordinary type of such an associa- 
tion — ^if recently formed — the ultimate control is vested in 
the general assembly of the associates, whose assent is 
required to a change in the fundamental rules: but piost 



CH. XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 573 

of the detailed regulations are left to an elected council, 
with perhaps an executive committee, and, in any case, 
executive officials, appointed to carry on the work of the 
association in accordance with the rule&^ Sometimes such 
associations take a federal form, and have branches in 
different districts, with a division of functions between 
central and local organs of management. If penalties are 
found necessary for breach of rules — as is sometimes the 
case — some quasi-judicial machinery is framed for deter- 
mining whether such penalties have been incurred ; so that 
all the fundamental functions of government are brought 
into exercise. 

The general distinction between the " quasi-govemment " 
(if I may so call it) of such associations — when neither 
aided nor repressed by the state — and the government 
with which we are concerned as students of politics, is, that 
the former, in an orderly community, can inflict no penalty 
worse than exclusion from the benefits of the association, 
and from voluntary relations with its members. Any 
individual who withdraws from the association and is 
content to have nothing to do with its members can 
suffer no further penalty, — except that, if by withdrawal he 
commits a breach of contract from which the association 
suffers damage, he may be compelled to make adequate 
reptiration, just as if he had broken any other contract.^ Of 
course if the government of the state confers special powers on 
the government of the association, the penalties that the latter 
can inflict on its own members or on other persons may be 
correspondingly extended. For instance, a voluntary asso- 
ciation of persons instructed in medicine may, without any 
special authorisation, confer — and if necessary withdraw — 
certificates of qualification for the profession of medicine : 

^ It is noteworthy that in the case of the religious association that is most 
widely extended and powerful in the countries sharing West-European civilisa- 
tion — the Catholic Church (commonly so called) — a strictly monarchical 
form of government survives from earlier, though not the earliest, ages. 

^ It is as implying this distinction that I have used the term voluntary 
association : — which is not intended, as we shall presently see, to exclude 
the possibility of social coercion to a very serious extent. 



574 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

but it is only in virtue of special powers conferred on the 
association by the government of the state that an un- 
certificated practitioner can be placed in a position legally 
inferior to that of the holder of such a certificate. Powers 
of this kind may be sometimes conferred with advantage 
where the association in question has the confidence of the 
public, so that the repression of quackery effected by the 
exercise of such powers, while less invidious than if it were 
carried out directly by Government, is practically no less 
usefuL Other minor fragments — ^if I may so say — of 
governmental power are sometimes conferred on voluntary 
associations whose work is of social importance : thus, as we 
have seen, a banking company may have the privilege of 
issuing notes having legal currency ; and a railway company 
may have the power of making bye-laws for the regulation of 
its traffic, the breach of which entails penalties enforced by 
the ordinary tribunals of the State. Usually the associations 
thus privileged are in return subjected to special govern- 
mental regulation. In this way the associations become 
— as I have before said — semi-public: and the "quasi- 
governmental" powers of the bodies that manage their 
affairs become to a certain extent " semi-governmental " — 
in the sense in which the term " government " is used in 
this treatise. 

§ 2. But, as I have before observed, it is generally only 
to a very minor extent that this devolution of governmental 
powers on voluntary associations is likely to be expedient. 
More important questions arise when we consider the 
possibility of conflict between the government of the great 
coercive association which we call the State, and the 
government or " quasi-government " of one of these vohm- 
tary associations, — either within the State, or possibly 
extending across political boundaries and including elements 
belonging to several states. At first sight the right method 
of dealing with such conflict may seem to be simple : since 
— it may be said — if the associates break the law they may 
be punished as individuals, and if they do not there can be 
no ground for interfering with the association. But firstly, 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 575 

the danger of obstinate and systematic disobedience to 
Government is materiaUy increased by the formation of 
organised associations, through the consciousness of strength 
derived from numbera,— perhaps also from wealth— and 
from the habit of concerted and combined action. And 
secondly, there are certain kinds of acts unsuitable for 
legal repression when done by individuals without concert, 
which become both more gravely and more palpably mis- 
chievous when carried out by the organised co-operation 
of a large group of persons. 

The first argument applies especially — though by no 
means solely — to political leagues or associations that, seeking 
to effect some particular change in the structure or regular 
action of Government, tend in consequence to be permanently 
in opposition to the actual governing organs. So long as 
such combinations confine themselves to the work of 
influencing opinion by argument, they are a useful — 
perhaps almost indispensable — means of educating the 
electorate for the performance of their constitutional duties.^ 
But if the conflict in which they are normally engaged 
with existing political arrangements should become bitter and 
exasperated, the consciousness of strength derived from the 
organised concert of numbers constitutes a special temptation 
to deviate into illegality. The ease with which the govern- 
ment of a civilised state is able, under ordinary circumstances, 
to secure obedience to its conmiands — in spite of strong and 
widespread aversion that may from time to time be aroused 
among sections of the governed— is largely due to its 
manifest and overwhelming superiority in force, as compared 
with any individual, or any scattered number of individuals 

^ The influence of orderly political associations or "parties" on the 
normal working of representative or popular Oovemment is so important 
that I propose to discuss it separately in the next chapter. 

It should be observed that, if any part of the structure of Oovemment is 
constitutionally unchangeable, an association that aimed at changing it would 
bei^riTTt^/acitf illegitimate : but I do not think that it should be necessarily 
treated as such, if it repudiates violent methods. As I consider the pro- 
vision of absolute immutability in a constitution irrational, I think it safer 
to interpret it loosely in practice. 



576 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

acting without concert : hence the greater the force that any 
recalcitrant element can count on exerting if it defies th^ 
government, the greater the danger of disorderly conflict. 
This is not a decisive argument for discouraging such 
associations, since increased possibility of resistance to 
Government may be also a protection against tyranny. Bat 
it constitutes an adequate ground for special repressive 
intervention, if it becomes manifest that the ultimate design 
of a political association is to use unlawful violence for the 
attainment of its ends; or if, even though it formally 
repudiates unlawful methods, its operations have a manifest 
and persistent tendency to cause such violence. Under 
these circumstances it is in harmony with the principle on 
which " indirectly individualistic " interference has before ^ 
been justified, that the whole corporate action of such an 
association shall be prohibited and suppressed, even though 
a part of its operations may be perfectly lawful ; ^ but the 
measure should only be adopted in extreme cases, since 
it involves the danger that the prohibited society may 
continue to operate secretly, and that its operations may 
thereby become more mischievous in quality— even though 
more limited in extent. 

Similar reasoning is applicable to the case of more 
transient combinations of men in political meetings of a 
numerous character. Here the consciousness of strength due 
to combination is not generally likely to prompt to overt 
opposition to Government, without the additional influence of 
inflammatory rhetoric; but a crowd under this influence 
may constitute a serious danger to order: hence, where there 
is reasonable ground — capable of being judicially proved — 
to fear wrongful \dolence in consequence of the meeting, it 

^ See chap. ix. § 2. 

' It will often tend to minimise the required interference if the sup- 
pression be not performed once for all by the legislature, but from time to 
time, so far as may be required, by the executive, temporarily invested with 
special powers. Such powers, if they are to be useful at all, should be some- 
what wide ; or else the attempted repression may be evaded by the recon- 
stitution of the dangerous association under a new name : but the use of these 
wide powers should bo carefully watched by the legislature. 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 577 

seems expedient that the meeting itself should be treated as 
unlawful, whether such acts fieill within the design of the 
promoters or not; and persons taking part in it should 
be liable to penalties, if it can be shown that they had 
means of knowing its unlawfulnes& And, if experience, 
at a particular place and time, shows that the tendency of 
a certain kind of meeting to cause crime is sufficient to 
constitute a serious danger, it is not beyond the scope of 
" indirectly individualistic " interference that the Executive 
Government should have the right of preventing the evil : 
either by prohibiting it altogether, or by sending an official 
to watch the proceedings and close the meeting if the 
oratory becomes dangerous. It seems, therefore, inexpedient 
to restrain the legislature absolutely, by a constitutional 
rule, from conferring on the executive powers to prohibit or 
close public meetings : but as there is an obvious risk that 
such powers may be abused, it is important that they should 
only be conferred (or in case of urgency temporarily assumed) 
on special grounds, and exercised under careful limitationa^ 
§ 3. The other important ground for interference with 
associations was incidentally noticed in a previous chapter 
(iv.) in speaking of " moral coercion." We there observed 
that acts which would not merit legal repression apart from 
their coercive purpose, may become mischievous encroach- 
ments on freedom if they are threatened and done by A with 
a view to induce B to act contrary to his own interests 
and inclinations. To a great extent, however, this kind of 
mischief, so far as it is caused by individuals acting inde- 
pendently, must be left to be repressed by public opinion ; 
partly on account of the general difficulty of proving an 
act to be criminal, when the criminality lies solely in the 
coercive design with which effects, in themselves legitimate, 
are produced. But where this kind of coercion is threatened 
and carried out by an association, it becomes generally easier 
to prove the coercive intention from the mutual discussion 
and arrangement which such combined action necessarily 

^ As to the manner in which such limitations should be enforced, see 
chapter zziv. §§ 8 and 9. 

2p 



578 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

involves: while at the same time the increase of power, 
which association tends to give, increases the danger of 
oppression and the need of Governmental interference to 
protect the freedom of the persons threatened. 

Attention has been recently called to this point by the 
appearance in Ireland, and subsequently in the United 
States, of " boycotting," or concerted refusal to have com- 
mercial dealings with certain individuals, whom the boy- 
cotters wish to coerce into some action which the persons 
coerced regard as contrary to their interests. A comparison 
of this practice with the ordinary operation of trades-imions 
in England, for the purpose of raising or maintaining wages, 
will illustrate the different degrees in which coercive inten- 
tion may enter into concerted action for the promotion of 
the interests of the persons who act in concert. 

When a trade-union of labourers fixes the terms on 
which the labour of its members is to be purchased, and 
threatens to stop work unless its terms are accepted, it may 
be said — and in a certain sense truly — that it is trying to 
coerce the employers of labour into action contrary to their 
interests : but here the coercion is no more than what is 
inevitably involved in any sale in which the seller enjoys 
a partial monopoly and is determined to avail himself of the 
advantage that this gives him. The aim of the trade-union 
is merely what individualism assumes to be the aim of every 
exchanger of commodities, — to sell in the dearest market : 
and the method adopted for realising the aim has no other 
element of intimidation than necessarily follows from fixing 
a price and sticking to it : it is, at any rate, only incidentally 
coercive. But if the combination is extended to include 
another group of labourers, who pledge themselves not to 
purchase the products sold by the employers of the first 
group, or not to work for any employers who purchase such 
products, — then the concerted action of the second group 
may be said to be essentially coercive, since its tendency to 
promote the interests of the persons adopting it depends 
entirely on the annoyance it causes to the persons on whom 
it inflicts los& 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 579 

I think that the distinction is important, and indicates 
the point at which the repressive action, either of law or 
of public opinion, is required : at the same time, I think 
that it is extremely difficult to lay down a legal rule that 
will effectively prevent the mischief in question, without 
imposing severe and dangerous restraints on the freedom of 
industrial intercourse. 

Firstly, in matters of buying and selling it is difficult, 
without injustice to the poor, to place any restrictions on 
the action of an association which are not placed on the 
action of individuals: since in such matters the coercive 
force capable of being exercised by an association is for most 
purposes not more than equivalent to that of a single indi- 
vidual whose wealth is equal to the aggregate wealth of the 
association. Combination is, in fact, the only way by which 
the poor can place themselves on a par with the rich in 
bargaining. Now, we can hardly lay down as a general 
rule that individuals are not to be influenced in buying by 
considerations other than the quality of the article purchased, 
and the labour spent in purchasing it; or in selling by 
considerations other than the price : and yet, if such other 
considerations are admitted, it seems hardly possible to 
exclude conditions that are designed to have a coercive effect. 
Thus a man must be generally ^ allowed to exchange with A 
rather than B, for the sake of consanguinity, or friendship, 
or because A promotes his convenience in other ways, or 
because B is surly and ill-mannered : but if so, he cannot be 
prevented from using the exchange as a means of coercing 
B to conform to his wishes in other matters besides the 
exchange. He must be generally allowed to prefer an 
employer who employs his friends : can he be legally pre- 
vented from refusing to work for an employer who employs 

^ I do not mean to say that, under special circumstances, it may not be 
possible and expedient to place certain traders under the legal obligation of 
dealing similarly with all customers, without regard to any considerations 
other than the quality of the commodity that the customer offers in exchange. 
I think that this kind of interference may, in certain cases, prevent more 
harm than it causes. But it would hamper trade intolerably to make it 
general. 



S8o ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

his enemies? He must be generally allowed to sell on 
unremunerative terms in order to draw business away from 
his rivals : can he be prevented from doing this in order to 
force a rival out of the trade ? And if such prevention is 
impossible in the case of an individual, it will be difficult 
to make it equitable, even if it be possible, in the case of an 
association, — for the economic reason above stated. 

Further, in attempting to repress mischievous moral 
coercion, there is a danger of preventing moral coercion 
of a kind useful to society. For instance, it is 'primA 
facie to the advantage of society that a physician should 
refuse to consult with one whom he considers a quack : 
he is hardly likely to do this unless he is supported by a 
preponderance of medical opinion : and though the prepon- 
derance of medical opinion may err, there is no general pre- 
sumption that Government will be qualified to correct its 
errors. Similarly, it is primd fade to the advantage of 
society that any skilled workers should refuse to work with 
those who use bad methods : and though in some cases the 
criterion of " badness " applied may be the interest of the 
class where this diverges from the interest of the community, 
it does not seem generally advantageous that Grovernment 
should intervene to determine what methods are admissible. 
Again, it is difficult to say that an employer may not refuse 
to employ workmen of whose character he disapproves — even 
if they are efficient workmen — or to require him to prove to 
the satisfaction of a tribunal that his disapproval is well 
grounded : and if so, a workman can hardly be prevented 
from refusing to work for an employer, or with other work- 
men, whose conduct he disapproves. In short, in these and 
similar cases, it is difficult to interfere without hampering 
the natural operation of the moral or social sanction, 
whose indispensability as a supplement to the legal 
sanction has been pointed out in a previous chapter (xiii.). 
Nor does it seem reasonable to lay down that the operation 
of the social sanction is only salutary when it is due to the 
spontaneous and unconcerted action of individuals, and that 
it becomes dangerous to freedom when it is the result of 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 581 

concert ; since exclusion from social relations, as an expres- 
sion of moral disapprobation, is generally likely to be more 
judicious if performed after consultation and with knowledge 
of the intentions of others. I admit, however, that a new 
danger to freedom is introduced if concert in such action 
is the result of pressure : — i,t, if among the persons who 
combine to exclude others from voluntary social relations, 
there are some who are only induced to combine by the 
fear of being similarly excluded if they refuse. I think 
that this moral coercion to coerce — ^" coercion in the second 
degree " — is usually mischievous : but it is difficult to say 
that it is so always : it is difficult to say that there is no 
vice so dangerous and contagious as to justify a concerted 
refusal to associate with the associates of those who 
practise it. And it could hardly be expedient to require 
judicial proof of the presence of such vice in order to 
justify this concerted exclusion : since it is often in cases 
where such judicial proof is difficult that the social sanction 
is especially needed to supplement the deficiencies of the 
legal sanction. 

On the whole, therefore, while admitting that the social 
sanction may easily be misapplied in such cases, I should 
generally prefer to leave it to the moral opinion of other 
sections of the community to censure and repress the mis- 
application. I conclude, therefore, that the moral coercion 
exercised both by individuals and by associations, so far as 
it is effected by acts legitimate apart from their coercive 
intent, should not generally be made a legal offence, if 
the mischief it causes can be kept within tolerable limits 
by any other means: though any intimidation by com- 
mitting or threatening acts of physical violence or other 
violation of ordinary rights — including breaches of contract 
— should of course be repressed with as much severity as 
may be required. 

Even where an industrial combination cannot reasonably 
be treated as encroaching on the freedom of outsiders, or as 
otherwise oppressive to individuals, it may still be opposed to 
the interest of the community as a whole, so far as it aims at 



582 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the establishment of a monopoly, — total or partial We have 
already seen that the theoretical demonstration of the tendency 
of industrial freedom to promote the most economic production 
of social utility fails in the case of monopoly : in fact, the 
most deep-seated weakness and most formidable danger of 
Individualism lies in the indefinite possibility — which it 
cannot but admit — that the " free competition " on which it 
relies may by " free combination " be turned into its economic 
opposite, Monopoly. But here, again, it does not seem 
desirable — unless under very exceptional circumstances — to 
meet the danger by direct repression : since any attempt to fix 
legal limits to the extent to which traders may profit by the 
intensity of demand for their commodity, and the limitation 
of its supply, would involve too extensive interference with 
freedom of exchanga If, however, any department of produc- 
tion shows an irresistible tendency to fall under the conditions 
of monopoly, Grovemment may sometimes advantageously 
intervene in the way of industrial competition — supposing 
the business to be such as may efficiently be carried on by or 
under the control of Government Also, where commercial 
associations — such as railways, water companies, etc. — re- 
quire special powers of compulsory purchase, Government 
may, in return for the grant of such powers, impose conditions 
which may prevent any resulting monopoly from being used 
to the disadvantage of the community. 

So far I have been speaking of combinations of which 
the aim is to promote the economic interests of the com- 
biners. It is, of course, possible that combinations for other 
ends — political or non-political — may attempt to gain their 
ends through intimidating opponents by the threat of 
exclusion from economic or social relations: but this 
method is likely to be dangerous to those who use it in a 
civilised community, so far as such an association mainly 
depends for its force on agreement in opinion and sentiment ; 
since it will ordinarily be liable to lose more by alienating 
all who respect intellectual independence than it can gain by 
moral coercion. At any rate such economic or social pressure 
is more likely to be formidable so far as it is sustained by^ — 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 583 

and partly springs from — the natural exclusiveness of a 
group of persons bound together by strong community of 
sentiment springing from community of beliefs on matters of 
vital moment. 

§ 4. This leads us to the question that has historically been 
the most important of those that arise under the present 
head, — viz. as to the relation which the (Jovernment of the 
State should take up towards religious associations. If 
we approach this question from the point of view of the 
State, as we naturally do in the present connection, two 
divergent methods of treatment at once suggest themselves. 
We may (1) start with assuming the existence of voluntary 
religious associations, and consider how the State should 
proceed in order that the advantages derivable from them 
may be the greatest possible, and the dangers that they 
involve may be avoided or reduced : or (2) we may start 
with the existence of religious associations as problematical, 
and consider whether the social needs that they supply are 
needs which it is in any case the business of Government to 
meet somehow, and, if so, how they should be met. The 
former of these points of view is most natural to a European 
student of Politics : at the same time, in a theoretical dis- 
cussion of the subject, it seemed best to begin with the 
latter ; which I accordingly adopted in a previous chapter 
(xiiL § 5), in which I considered how far it is the business of 
Grovemment to provide efficient instruction in morality. In 
the present chapter I shall adopt the other point of view ; 
I shall assume the existence of the historic religious associa- 
tions called Churches, with the character that they actually 
have in the communities that share West-European civilisa- 
tion, and shall consider what relations the State should 
endeavour to maintain with them. I may begin by stating 
the following conclusions, to which the previous discussion 
seemed clearly to lead. 

Firstly, the Christian churches meet a social need of 
fundamental importance, which it would be desirable for 
Grovemment to supply if it could do so effectually ; while 
yet there are strong objections to any governmental organ- 



584 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

isation for this purposa With a view, therefore, to the 
systematic teaching of morality, it is a gain to the State 
that the action of the churches should be vigorous and 
effective, so far as it is in harmony with the social and political 
order which it is the aim of Government to maintain. 

Secondly, so far as this harmony exists, the churches are 
likely to fulfil their function better if kept independent of 
the State. For, if the clergy acquire the character of officials 
appointed and paid by the State, they become exposed in 
some degree to the objections before stated against a govern- 
mental organisation for teaching morality : and are therefore 
likely to be less effective in rendering the service for which 
the State appoints and pays them. 

It remains to consider whether there is adequate ground 
for governmental interference with a church — or any other 
association that offers men moral instruction and guidance — 
on account of the danger of conflict between the conception 
of social order advocated by the Church, and that which 
Grovernment aims at maintaining. If the collision takes the 
open and palpable form of incitements to resist or disobey 
the laws or legal commands of Grovernment, it must of course 
be repressed : but it is a more doubtful question whether 
the general danger of disobedience promoted by the rulers 
or leaders of the Church — or of mischievous intimidation, 
difficult to repress by legal penalties — is an adequate justi- 
fication of a permanent interference of Government with a 
view to avert the danger. 

It would, I think, be unwise to attempt a decisive 
general answer to this question ; since there is hardly any 
subject on which the traditional habits and sentiments 
which a community derives from its previous history are so 
important a factor in determining the proper course of 
action. But it may be pointed out that the right solution 
of the problem must largely depend very much on the size 
of the religious eissociation in question and the character of 
its organisation. The risk of collision is obviously less — as 
Adam Smith pointed out — where there are a number of 
small religious bodies than it is where one decidedly pre- 



xxviii THE STATE AND V0LUN7ARY ASSOCIATIONS 585 

I)onderatea It is less where private judgment is encouraged 
— as in Protestant sects — than it is where obedience of 
laity to clergy, and of clergy to their ecclesiastical rulers, is 
strongly inculcated. It is seriously intensified and com- 
plicated when the Church is not confined within the limits 
of one State, supposing the habit of obedience to ecclesiastical 
rulers to be strong ; since, in this case, there will be a body 
of persons within the State who may at any time be boimd 
by their ideas of religious duty to obey the orders of 
foreigners. And it reaches its maximum when the foreign 
rulers of such a church are known to have aims and interests 
opposed to those of the particular Government with regard 
to which the problem is being considered. 

§ 5. Supposing it decided that intervention of some kind 
is desirable on the ground above stated, the question remains 
of what kind. Direct prohibition of any religious teaching 
not clearly inciting to illegal conduct, or otherwise immorsd 
in its tendency, is invidious and objectionable, as interfering 
with the free communication of beliefs on which the develop- 
ment of himian thought depends; and it is likely to be 
ineffective or worse in the most dangerous cases, from the 
ease with which opinions and sentiments hostile to govern- 
ment may be secretly propagated among persons united by 
a community of religious feeling, and the increased violence 
that they are likely to assume from the resentment caused 
by repression. 

A better course is for the State to secure a certain con- 
trol over religious teaching, by the grant of privileges the 
withdrawal of which would only reduce the Church to the 
level of other voluntary associations. There are various 
methods by which this result may be attained. Firstly, 
apart from pecuniary aid, there are various minor privileges 
which the State may allow to religious bodies, which would 
seem to be an obviously reasonable return for the services 
received from them. It may give special protection to 
religious meetings from disturbances — whether of a hostile 
kind, or caused by sellers of refreshment, hawkers, etc., if the 
meeting is in the open air. It may give to religious beliefs 



586 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

special protection from contumelious treatment — such as is 
now given by our law of blasphemy (as reduced by modem 
judicial interpretation),at least to the beliefs which Christians 
have in common. It may exempt the ministers of specified 
religious associations from compulsory civil functions, such as 
serving on juries, and from military functions where military 
service is compulsory ; on the other hand, it may allow them 
to exercise certain civil functions in which they are specially 
interested, — such as the validation, under proper conditions, 
of marriage contracta It may give certain religious associa- 
tions special opportunities of religious teaching in schools 
where secular instruction is supported from public funda In 
these ways a certain amount of inducement might be given 
to a Church to avoid as far as possible conflict with (Jovem- 
ment, without anything like establishment or endowment. 

But, secondly, endowment may be given in various 
minor degrees, without converting the clergy generally into 
salaried servants of Government. Thus, for instance, im- 
munity from taxation may be granted to certain parts of the 
property devoted to religious uses with the approval of the 
State. Another degree of endowment is by the selection 
and payment of religious teachers in certain cases in which 
the State is specially bound to make provision for religious 
teaching and worship : i,t, in the case of persons supported 
from public funds, such as adults in workhouses and prisons, 
and soldiers and sailors, and children in pauper and re- 
formatory schools. If this provision be made in such 
a manner as to avoid proselytism as far as possible, a sub- 
stantial subvention — which the recipients will hesitate to 
imperil — may be thus given to one or more religious 
societies, without the cost entailed by an adequate endow- 
ment of religious worship and teaching for the community 
generally ; and without encountering — to any serious 
extent — the awkward dilemma of either endeavouring to 
make one set of religious opinions prevail over others held 
by equally educated persons, or of endeavouring to moralise 
the community by imparting a number of mutually incon- 
sistent beliefs. 



XXVIII THE STATE AND VOLUNTARY ASSOCIATIONS 587 

A stronger means of control without anything like estab- 
lishment may be exercised in the form of a supervision of 
the wealth of Churches derived from private sourcea If, 
indeed, the expenses of religious teaching and worship 
are defrayed by contributions from the incomes of its 
members, it will be difficult for Government to interfere 
in the employment of such contributions, without measures 
of violent and invidious repression : but if they are paid 
from funds bequeathed to form a permanent endowment 
for the association, the case is different. Here, in the 
first place. Government may refuse to admit any religious 
society to the position of a corporation capable of holding 
and administering property, unless its organisation fulfils 
certain conditions, framed with the view of preventing its 
" quasi - government " from being oppressive to individual 
members of the association or dtmgerous to the State.^ 
Secondly, Government may take advantage of a collision to 
bring the funds of any such society permanently under its 
control, in pursuance of its general duty of supervising the 
management of wealth bequeathed to public objects and 
revising the rules under which it is administered, in the 
interest of the conmiunity at larga And it is to be observed 
that, apart from any question of overt conflict between 
Church and State, there are special grounds for the general 
vigilance and occasional intervention of Government in the 
case of bequests for religious purposes. Firstly, at the point 
of death the influence of the priesthood is likely to be 
especially strong, from the belief that they have exceptional 
means of predicting — and even, perhaps, of determining — 
the future happiness and misery of the dying person ; while 
at the same time his personal interest— of a mundane kind 
— in the employment of his wealth after death is then at its 
minimum. For this reason, it maybe necessary to place special 
restrictions on testation for religious uses, rendering bequests 

^ For instance, in New York, it appears to have been the intention of the 
legislature — in a general Act for the incorporation of religious societies — to 
** place the control of the temporal affairs of the religious corporations in the 
hands of a majority of the corporators, independent of priest ^ biahopf pre^>yUry, 
or synod, or other eeclesuutical judicatory" 



588 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxviii 

or gifts made under the imminent fear of death liable to be 
invalidated as sucIl But further, the bequest of funds to 
be permanently employed in payment of persons teaching 
particular doctrines is liable to supply a dangerously strong 
inducement to the conscious or semi-conscious perpetuation of 
exploded errors, which, without this support, would graduaUy 
disappear : hence it should be the duty of Government to 
watch such bequests with special care, and to intervene 
when necessary, to obviate the danger just indicated, by 
modifying the rules under which ancient bequests are 
administered^ 

' This principle is of coarse applicable to other endowments besides those 
devoted to religions teaching. 

NoU, — It may be noticed that some interference in the employment of 
fonds for religions purposes may be forced on Government by disputes within 
the bodies eigoying the benefit of the funds : it may have to determine 
which of the disputing sections has the real claim to endowments. I observe, 
however, that the Supreme Court of Illinois decided, in an action for wrong- 
ful dismissal, that the "free exercise of religious profession'* — which the 
eonstitution of Illinois guarantees — is incompatible with the claims of civil 
courts to decide whether the judgments of the judicial authorities of the 
Church are in accordance with the laws or Canons of the Church. 



CHAPTEE XXIX 

PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 

§ 1. By parties I mean political combinations, designed for 
indefinite duration, and having distinctive aims and opinions 
on some or all of the leading political questions of con- 
troversy in the state in which they are formed It is 
obvious that such combinations may be connected with illegal 
acts in various ways, just like the more temporary associa- 
tions for special political objects discussed in the last 
chapter, and may require similar repression. Such repres- 
sion, however, is likely to be difficult and dangerous when 
it has to be applied to a large and important political party; 
and party strife that reaches this degree of violence must be 
regarded as an inflammatory disease of the body politic, for 
the cure of which no general rules can be laid down, — 
except that every effort should be made to subdue it by the 
removal of real grievances, in order to avoid or shorten the 
application of the repressive method. But political parties 
have for the student of politics an interest of a difierent 
kind, from their tendency, when perfectly legal and orderly 
in their aims and methods, to modify importantly the normal 
working of representative institutions ; and it is from this 
point of view that I propose to consider them in the present 
chapter. 

It is not easy to say how far the nature and extent of 
the influence of parties on representative government could 
have been predicted from a general knowledge of human 
nature. Certainly nothing like what has actually taken 



590 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

place, in England and the United States, in which the 
modem ' representative system has had the longest trial, 
seems to have been foreseen by earlier writers who have 
discussed this system. The authors of the Ftderalist (1788), 
throughout their careful and minute examination of the 
probable working of the newly-framed constitution of the 
United States, never seem to have imagined that the system 
they were considering would have a predominant tendency 
to group the citizens into two main parties, competing for 
victory at all elections : the operation of party is only dis- 
cussed under the name of **^ faction " as an evil against which 
precautions have to be taken; and Madison, when expounding 
the advantages offered by the new constitution, in reducing 
the danger of fS^ction, lays stress on the "greater security 
afforded by the probable greater variety of parties against 
the event of any one party being able to outnumber and 
oppress the rest."^ Even Story, writing in 1833, seems to 
have no foresight of the party-system by which the consti- 
tution of the United States was destined to be worked 
during the next half-century ; for instance, he quotes with 
emphatic approval, and without any qualifying comment, a 
summary of the President's duties, in which he is simply 
directed to " disregard the bias of party " in the appoint- 
ment of subordinate officials.^ And even J. S. Mill, writing 
in 1860, hardly seems to contemplate a dual organisation of 
parties as a normal feature of representative institutions.* 

Parties of some sort, indeed, based on agreement in 
principle or community of interest, or perhaps most fre- 
quently on a combination of the two, are generally recog- 
nised by English writers, of the last as well as the present 
century, as an inevitable incident in popular government ; 

' Representative assemblies of a certain kind, with various degrees of 
|iowor, have had a nearly continuous existence from the later Middle Ages 
downward, in several European countries. But their nature and conditions, 
until very recent times, have diverged so widely from the institutions which 
we have boon led to consider, that their experience throws but little light on 
our present question. ' Federalist, No. X. 

» See CcmstUution of the United States, Book III. ch. xxxvii. § 1627. 

* See his Hepresentative OovemmerU, 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 591 

and, since Burke, the prevailing tendency of our writers has 
been to view their operation with tolerant acquiescence, if 
not positive approval In order that a proposed scheme of 
governmental policy, or any important change in the struc- 
ture of government desired by a number of persons, may 
have a fair chance of being carried out, it is obviously ex- 
pedient that those who are in favour of it should combine 
for the purpose of compromising their minor differences, and 
determining jointly the line of action most favourable to the 
attainment of their common end. The probable number, 
however, of such combinations, and the range of their objects, 
could hardly be determined by any general reasoning : but — 
apart from the effect of periodical elections, of which I shall 
presently speak — the more natural grouping would seem to 
be in associations aiming each at a particular set of closely 
connected political results ; some differing but little in the 
range of their aims from the leagues discussed in the last 
chapter, others having a wider scope, but still not concerned 
with the whole business of government. For instance, 
instead of an " anti-corn-law " league, which would naturally 
cease when protective duties on com were abolished, we 
might expect to have a free-trade league, opposed to all 
kinds of protection to native industry : then, taking a wider 
sweep, the persons opposed to interference with trade might 
naturally join in a more comprehensive union for the main- 
tenance of " natural liberty," and the reduction of legislative 
interference in all departments to the individualistic mini- 
mum. In opposition to this there would naturally be 
formed a socialistic or semi-socialistic party, who would aim 
at reducing by the action of Government the inequalities and 
other evils resulting from " unrestricted competition " in any 
department of industry. But, wide as the scope of these 
combinations would be, there seems to be no reason why the 
members of either should necessarily act together on any 
question of change in the structure of Grovemment. There 
might, therefore, naturally be a third party, distinct from 
either of the above mentioned, formed to promote measures 
for increasing the part taken by the people at large in 



592 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

government, — such as short Parliaments, the Keferendum, 
abolition of the Second Chamber, payment of members, eta; 
and another party, again, with the opposite aim of increasing 
the political power of the highly educated class, by dis- 
franchising illiterate voters, giving more than one vote to 
educated persons, etc. A fifth party, again, might be formed 
to promote a pacific and guarded foreign policy ; and a sixth 
in favour of bold enterprise and aggrandisement, with a 
corresponding increase of taxation for military expenditure. 
There seems to be no clear general reason why any one 
of these parties should coincide with any other; persons 
convinced of the expediency of extended popular control 
over government might easily differ on questions relating 
to the limits of governmental interference, or as to the 
proper character of the foreign policy of the State. 

The division into parties that I have just sketched is 
supposed to be based on disinterested differences in political 
judgment To complete the sketch we have — as I said at 
the outset — to consider the influences that the divergent 
interests of different classes are likely to exercise in 
determining such combinations. But, apart from the 
necessity of uniting for electoral purposes, I conceive that 
this influence would naturally tend to complicate rather 
than to simplify the formation of party groups ; since the 
divisions corresponding to difference of interests would vary 
very much according to the nature of the legislative or 
administrative measure that was under discussion; while, 
again, persons of the same class would often disagree pro- 
foundly as to the best means of promoting their sectional 
interests, from the same causes that lead to disinterested 
disagreements as to what is best for the commimity as a 
whole. It may be urged, however, that the most obvious 
division of interests is that between the poor and the rich ; 
and that this must tend to coincide broadly with the division 
between the advocates of government by the people, and the 
advocates of government by a highly educated minority ; 
since the latter will tend to be largely drawn from the richer 
classes, who enjoy superior educational advantages, and will 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 593 

at any rate usually belong to these classes, from the 
higher remuneration that their skill commands. And I 
admit that on some momentous questions — such as the 
distribution of taxation — the political interest of the 
mass of the poor is privid facie opposed to that of the 
rich. Still there are many subjects of fundamental import- 
ance, on which the natural line of separation of parties 
according to interests would seem to be quite difierent. 
For instance, if protection is demanded for certain native 
industries, of which the products are consumed by the poor, 
the interest of the labourers employed in these industries 
would be opposed to that of the poor consumers outside them. 
Again, if the issue of war or peace should be raised, there is 
no reason why the poor should agree any more than the 
rich on the diflBcult question, whether the prospect of suffer- 
ing and loss from war is a less or greater evil than the 
dangers incurred by submitting tamely to foreign encroach- 
ments. Similarly, if the question should be as to the extent 
of the provision required for warlike purposes, the line of 
separation is likely to be determined by differences of political 
judgment rather than by manifest conflict of interests ; 
since it is no more the interest of the poor as a body than 
of the rich as a body that the provision for war should be 
inadequate, and no more the interest of the rich than of the 
poor that it should be excessiva 

§ 2. On the whole, then, I should conclude that the for- 
mation of parties in a modern state which would naturally 
result from the grouping of persons either according to 
similarity of convictions or community of interests, or both 
combined, would probably be of a complicated and shifting 
kind ; and that it would almost certainly have a multiple 
and not a dual character. And if we put out of sight the 
influence of elections — especially elections of the head or 
heads of the executive — there appears to be no sufficient 
reason why a group of persons united by common principles, 
or common interests, should enter into permanent union, for 
political purposes, with another group formed on an entirely 
different basis. No doubt such a union might sometimes be 

2q 



594 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

the easiest way of forming a majority for carrying the 
measures which each group desires; but it would be an 
obviously artificial means to this end : since the success of 
any one party such as we have been considering, in obtain- 
ing a majority in favour of its measures by the more natural 
and legitimate methods of reasoning and persuasion, would 
not interfere materially vdth the efforts of another party to 
carry measures relating to a different subject. 

The case is no doubt altered when we take elections into 
account ; at least under a system in which no provision, or 
no adequate provision, is made for the representation of 
minorities ; since in any such election, if the vacancies are 
filled up by the candidates of one party, the candidates of 
any other party can only be elected accidentally, unless 
the parties have formed an alliance, and agreed upon 
a common list of candidates. Hence arises an important 
infiuence, tending to reduce the number of competing 
electoral combinations to two. It seems not unlikely, how- 
ever, that such combinations would be very transient, and 
would vary from place to place, if the sole concern of the 
electors were to choose representatives for the purpose of 
legislation : the decisive impulse towards a permanently dual 
organisation of parties appears to be given by entrusting to 
the constituencies, along with the election of members of a 
central legislative assembly, the practical choice of the 
chief or leading members of the central executive. This 
choice, as we have seen, takes place in strikingly different 
forms in the English and American systems respectively; 
still, its effect both at the quadrennial presidential elections 
in the United States, and at ordinary general elections in 
England, is to concentrate the interest of the whole country 
on an electoral struggle, in which, if any political com- 
bination does not form part of the victorious majority, it 
has failed so far as this contest is concerned. This gives 
a powerful and continually operating inducement to the 
absorption of minor parties in one or other of two great 
combinations; the force of which is further increased in 
the United States by the " Spoils system " — the practice of 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 595 

making extensive changes in the minor posts of the executive 
to reward members of the winning party — and by the con- 
trol over legislation which the veto gives to the President ; 
while in England, again, it is importantly increased by the 
practical control over legislation which the Cabinet has 
come to possess. 

In this way the organs of representative government in 
both coimtries equally — in spite of the great differences 
in their political systems ^ — have come to be normally the 
organs of one or other of two permanently opposed and com- 
peting parties; and, correspondingly, the hostile criticism 
of governmental measures, carried on in the press and 
public meetings, is mainly directed and largely supplied by 
the systematic efiort of a defeated party to discredit and 
supplant its dominant rivaL It is true that this tendency 
to duality in the composition of parties does not altogether 
overcome the tendency to plurality ; each of the two oppos- 
ing parties is often composed of parts which very imperfectly 
cohere, and from time to time a party breaks up and new 
combinations are formed; also, independent parties of 
minor importance may exist side by side with the two 
chief divisions; but in the main the tendency to duality 
predominates. 

§ 3. I shall presently consider how &r it is possible, by 
any constitutional arrangement, to overcome this tendency 
to a dual division into parties ; but before considering this, 
it will be well to examine carefully its drawbacks and 
advantages. 

The advantage that would probably first suggest itself 
to an Englishman, or to a member of any European com- 
munity that has imitated England in organising repre- 
sentative government, is the gain in stability obtained from 

^ Especially the very important difference that in England the Supreme 
Executive Cabinet must always — except for rare and very brief intervals 
— belong to the same party as the majority in the House of Commons ; 
whereas in the United States the party to which the President belongs 
might easily be in a minority in the House of Representatives during half 
the period of the President's tenure of office, and in a minority in the Senate 
during the whole period. 



596 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

the dual division. Where there is a multiplicity of parties, 
the chances are that no single party will have a majority in 
the legislature ; hence any majority that may be temporarily 
formed from a combination of parties is likely to lack in- 
ternal coherence ; its elements — and similarly the elements 
of the opposing minority — will be easily separated, and 
easily made to recombine into a differently composed 
majority and minority. In this way the instability, which 
we have been led to regard as a probable defect of Parlia- 
mentary government, is likely to be on the average much 
more marked if there is not a firm dual organisation of 
parties. 

This advantage of the dual system is mainly important 
when the executive is dismissible at any time by a Parlia- 
mentary majority. The next that I shall notice applies to a 
great extent to almost any mode of organising representative 
institutions. It consists in the more regular, systematic, 
and sober criticism of governmental measures to which the 
dual party system lead& The object of the " outs " as a 
party being to get '' in,'' it becomes the business of the leaders 
to scrutinise the measures of the ministry continuaUy and 
closely, and bring to light cdl their weak points in order if 
possible to overthrow the ministry, or, at least, to inflict on 
it a loss of prestige. At the same time there are strong 
inducements — apart from patriotism — to make the leaders 
of an opposition, who naturally look forward to becoming 
ministers, al>8tain from attacking measures that are wisely 
chosen and framed. For if they do not defeat the ministers, 
the blow they have tried to deliver is likely to recoil on 
themselves ; while, if they succeed, and bring their party 
into power, they may find themselves seriously hampered 
in the management of affairs if circumstances should arise 
in which a measure similar to that which they have at> 
tacked may appear obviously expedient. In short, under 
the dual |varty system, the leaders of the opposition tend to 
criticist* keenly, from desire to oust the holders of power, 
and yet circumspectly, being aware of the responsibilities 
and difficulties which success, bringing power, must entail 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 597 

A more doubtful argument sometimes urged for the dual 
party system is that it is required to maintain a permanent 
and comprehensive interest in political struggles. With- 
out this system, it is said, the centres of political influence 
would be chiefly leaders or organisers of more or less narrow 
combinations on behalf of avowedly sectional interests, or 
of more or less fanatical combinations to promote certain 
measures of a violent change. From such parties, it is said, 
the quiet steady-going citizens — who form the best element 
of any electorate — would mostly stand aloof, and con- 
sequently they would take comparatively little interest in 
the elections and gradually lose the habit of fulfilling their 
constitutional duties. It is, I think, likely that this result 
would happen to some extent ; for the dual party system 
certainly tends to make party feeUng more general, and 
strong party feeling is, in average men, a more powerful 
impulse to action than a mere sense of civic duty. But I 
do not feel sure that serious loss would result to the com- 
munity if such of the citizens as can only be induced to 
perform their electoral duties by the tie of party should 
withdraw altogether from political functions. 

For it is, on the other hand, a fundamental objection to 
the dual party system that it tends to make party-spirit, if 
perhaps less narrow and fanatical, at any rate more compre- 
hensive and absorbing. Where parties are numerous and 
limited in their scope, there are likely to be many cross- 
divisions, so that persons who are opposed on some ques- 
tions will be allied on others, and there is less probability 
that they will regard all questions habitually and system- 
atically from a party point of view. Whereas, where the 
system of two permanently opposed parties is firmly estab- 
lished, the sentiment of " loyalty to party *' becomes almost 
as tenacious and exacting as patriotism, and sometimes 
almost equally independent of intellectual convictions; so 
that a man remains attached to his party from old habit 
and sentiment, or from fear of being called a renegade, when 
he can no longer even imagine that he holds its " funda- 
mental principlea" A sentiment and habit are thus semi- 



598 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

unconsciously substituted in many cases for intellectual 
agreement as the bond of party-union, the fundamental 
principles of either party become obscure ; — a result which 
each party keenly perceives in the case of the other, though 
remaining partially unconscious of it in its own case. 

One consequence of this is, that while the two-party 
system diminishes in some respects the defects of parlia- 
mentary government, it intensifies them in other respects. 
The attack on governmental measures by the part^ in 
opposition tends, as I have said, to be less rash and fanatical 
than it might otherwise be ; but, on the other hand, it tends 
to be more systematically factious and disingenuoua Good 
legislation has to be avoided by the party in power, not 
only when it is such as would be naturally unpopular, but 
when it can be successfully discredited by partisan ingenu- 
ity ; and the same cause is Uable to hamper the operation, 
or impair the effect, of necessary or highly expedient 
measures of administration. 

Again, the tendency before noted in parliamentary 
government of the English type, to entrust executive power 
to parliamentary leaders who are not specially qualified for 
their administrative functions, is aggravated by the per- 
manent division into two competing parties. Even if there 
were no such division, a parliamentary executive would be 
always liable to include orators and parliamentary tacticians 
devoid of administrative skill ; but it might be possible to 
retain in office an administrator of conspicuous merit, even 
though his political opinions, in matters outside his depart- 
ment, were opposed to those of the majority for the time 
being ; and this becomes impossible when the dual division 
is thoroughly established. 

Further, the dual system seems to have a dangerous 
tendency to degrade the profession of politics: partly 
from the inevitable insincerity of the relation of a party 
leader to the membera of his own party, partly from 
the insincerity of his relation to the party opposed to him. 
To keep up the vigour and zeal of his own side, he has to 
maintain the fiction that under the heterogeneous medley of 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 599 

opinions and sectional interests represented by either the 
" ins " or the " outs " at any particular time there is a funda- 
mental underlying agreement in sound political principles ; 
and he has to attribute to the other side a similar agree- 
ment in unsound doctrines. Thus the best political talent 
and energy of the country acquires a fatal bias in the 
direction of insincere advocacy; indeed the old objection 
against forensic advocacy as a means of obtaining right 
judicial conclusions — that one section of the experts em- 
ployed are professionally required to make the worse seem 
the better reason — applies with much more real force here 
than in the case of the law-courts. For in the case of the 
forensic advocate this attitude is frankly avowed and re- 
cognised by all concerned: every plain man knows that a 
lawyer in court is exempt from the ordinary rule that binds 
an honest man only to use arguments which he believes to 
be sound ; and that it is the duty of every member of a jury 
to consider only the value of an advocate's arguments, and 
disregard, as far as possible, the air of conviction with 
which they are uttered. The political advocate or party 
leader tends to acquire a similar professional habit of 
using bad argimients with an air of conviction where he 
cannot get good ones, or when bad ones are more likely to 
be popularly effective ; but, unlike the forensic advocate, he 
is understood, in so doing, to imply his personal belief in 
the validity of his argimients and the truth of the conclu- 
sions to which he desires to lead up. And the case is made 
worse by the fact that political advocacy is not controlled 
by expert and responsible judges, whose business it is to 
sift out and scatter to the winds whatever chaff the pleader 
may mingle with such grains of sound argument as his brief 
affords ; the position of the political advocate is like what 
that of a forensic advocate would be, if it was his business 
to address a jury not presided over by a judge, and largely 
composed of persons who only heard the pleadings on the 
other side in an imperfect and partial way.^ 

^ The demoralising effect of politics under the party system seems to me 
an argument of weight for keeping the husiness of statesmanship as far as 



6oo ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

What has just been said applies primarily to the lead- 
ing members of a party who undertake the task of advo- 
cacy. But the artificiality of combination which the dual 
system involves has to some extent a demoralising effect on 
other members of the legislature; they acquire a habit 
either of voting frankly without conviction at the summons 
of the " whip," or of feigning convictions which they do not 
really hold in order to justify their votes. 

And the same cause impairs the security for good legis- 
lation, apparently furnished by the fact that a measure can 
only be passed if it has the approval of a majority of the 
legislators ; since it increases the danger that measures may 
be passed which are only desired and really approved by a 
minority — it may even be not a large minority if it be 
sufficiently fanatical or selfish ; — such measures being ac- 
quiesced in by the rest, under the guidance of their leaders, 
in order to maintain the party majority. 

§ 4. Of the gravity of these disadvantages it is difficult 
to form a general estimate, as it depends largely on the 
condition of political morality, which is influenced by many 
causes more or less independent of the form of government : 
but we may reasonably regard the disadvantages as sufficiently 
grave to justify a serious consideration of the means of remov- 
ing or mitigating them. The available remedies are partly 
political, partly moral : the former will naturally vary much 
according to the precise form of government adopted. If the 
Supreme Executive is practically dismissible at any time by 
a Parliamentary majority — even with the possibility of 
appealing to the country — the danger of transient and 
shifting Parliamentary majorities is so great and obvious, 
that a nation in which the two-party system is firmly 
established is hardly likely to abandon it. But the case is 
different with other forms of Eepresentative Government. 
For instance, where there is a supreme executive appointed 

possible unromunerated by money ; the work itself is liable to be so degrad- 
ing, when carried on under the conditions above described, that its dignity 
can hardly bo maintained unless it is performed gratuitously : if the business 
of keeping a party together and leading it on to victory becomes a trade, it 
becomes a vile trade. 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 6oi 

for a fixed period, without the power of dissolving Parliament, 
there is less manifest need of this system than where the 
executive holds office on the English tenure, and less tend- 
ency, ceteris paribtts, to promote its development : since, in 
the former case, the party struggle in parliament is not kept 
always active — ^as it is in the latter case — by the conscious- 
ness that the Cabinet or the ParKament may come to an 
end at any moment. It is true that the example of the 
United States might be quoted on the other side, since there 
the fixed tenure of the Presidency has not interfered with 
the fullest development of dual party government that the 
modem world has seen. Here, however, I conceive that (1) 
the election of the President by the people at large, and (2) 
the " spoils " system, have operated powerfully to foster this 
development : if there were a Supreme Executive elected by 
the legislature,^ with subordinate officials holding office 
independently of party ties, I think it probable that the 
tendency to a dual division of parties — and generally the 
influence of party on government — would be materially 
reduced. 

Assuming that a Parliamentary Executive is retained, the 
bad effects of two-party government might still be mitigated 
in various ways. Substantial portions of legislative and 
administrative work might be withdrawn from the control of 
the party system, under the influence of public opinion, 
aided by minor changes in parliamentary rules and in the 
customary tenure of executive offices. Firstly, as I have 

^ It may be said that the choice of a President by the legislators would 
become practically the same thing as a choice by the citizens at large, as the 
latter would elect representatives pledged to elect a certain President. I do 
not think that this result would necessarily occur : but it would no doubt be 
not unlikely to occur, especially if the two-party system were already fully 
developed before this mode of electing the head of the Executive was intro- 
duced. In any case I think that the result would probably be prevented 
either (a) by entrusting Supreme Executive power to a Council instead of to 
an individual, or (b) by placing the time for electing the Executive in the 
middle of the Parliamentary period. There would, however, be drawbacks to 
either expedient ; as the former would lose the advantage of a monarchical 
organisation of the Executive, and the latter would somewliat diminish the 
chance of there being harmony at any given time between the legislature and 
the executive. 



6o2 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

before suggested/ on certain important questions, not closely 
connected with the business of the executive departments, 
the preparation of legislation might be entrusted to parlia- 
mentary committees other than the executive cabinet : and 
the natural tendency to different lines of divisions on 
different subjects might thus be allowed fair play. 

Secondly, certain headships of departments, in which a 
peculiar need of knowledge, trained skill, and special experi- 
ence was generally recognised, might be filled by persons 
not expected normally to retire with their colleagues, when 
the parliamentary majority supporting the government of 
which they were members was turned into a minority ; but 
only expected to retire when the questions on which issue 
was joined between the parties related to the administration 
of their special department& 

Again, it would seem possible, by certain changes in the 
customary relation between the Cabinet and Parliament, to 
allow free play to the natural working of political convic- 
tions without increasing the instability of government. 
Thus, it might be the established custom for ministers not 
to resign office because the legislative measures proposed by 
them were defeated, — unless the need of these measures was 
regarded by them as so urgent that they could not con- 
scientiously carry on the administration of public affairs 
without them, — but only to resign when a formal vote of 
want of confidence was carried against them in the House 
of Representatives. This change would at once promote, and 
be facilitated by, an increased separation of the work of 
legislation from that of administration. 

Again, the introduction of the " Referendum "—even to 
the limited extent suggested in chapter xxvii. — would at any 
rate reduce the danger that a minority, concentrating its 
energies on narrow political aims, may force through legisla- 
tion not really approved by a majority of the assembly that 
adopts it. 

Finally, the operation of the party -system might be 
checked and controlled — more effectuaUy than it now is in 

^ See p. 458. 



XXIX PARTIES AND PARTY GOVERNMENT 603 

England and the United States by a change in current 
morality, which does not seem to be beyond the limits of 
possibility. It might be regarded as the duty of educated 
persons generally to aim at a judicial frame of mind on 
questions of current politics, whether they are inside parties 
or outside. If it is the business of the professional politician 
to prove his own side always in the right, it should be the 
point of honour of the " arm-chair " politician, if he belongs 
to a party, to make plain when and why he thinks his party 
in the wrong. And probably the country would gain from 
an increase in the number of persons taking a serious interest 
in politics who keep out of party ties altogether. 



n 



CHAPTER XXX 

CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNBfENTS 

§ 1. The reader who has accompanied me so far may have 
observed — ^perhaps with surprise — that I have made little 
use of the current terms " democracy " and " aristocracy 
and though I have spoken of the functions of the " monarch,' 
the functionary so named has been conceived as a part of a 
government which can only be called " monarchical " in a 
wide sense. I adopted this course, because it seemed to me 
that the current classification of forms of governments was 
liable to involve serious ambiguities, and that it would be 
more convenient to remove those ambiguities at the present 
stage of our discussion ; and, in removing them, to give a 
final cliaracterisation of the type or types of government 
which the reasonings contained in chaps. xx.-xxvi have 
gradually led me to delineate.^ 

Let us begin by examining the origin of the current 
classification. We are at once reminded by the derivation 
of tlie names of the main classes — monarchy, aristocracy, 
oligarchy, democracy — that it was originally the result of 
reflection on the varieties of government exhibited in the 
history of the Greek city-states ; and it will, accordingly, 
be instructive to note the form wliich the classification 
assumed in the remarkable treatise in which Aristotle 

' It may be thought, perhaps, that in the following discussion I have 
not sufficiently concentrated attention on the question ** Where supreme 
political power — or sovereignty — resides in the modern forms of govern- 
ment that come under our consideration." The reason why I have reserved 
this question will bo explained in the next chapter. 



CHAP. XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 605 

gathered together the fruits of Greek political experience. 
Aristotle recognises ^ six leading types of government, three 
good or normal, and three bad or perverted. The names 
of the three bad types, which I take first, as they were 
unhappily those that experience chiefly presented, are 
Democracy, Oligarchy, and the irregular and lawless 
despotic Monarchy which the Greeks called "Tyrannis"; 
the three good types are called by Aristotle Constitutional 
Government, Aristocracy, and Kingship. In the three bad 
types the ruling element — whether one, few, or many — 
governs unrestrainedly in its own selfish interest; in the 
good types it aims at the good of the whole community. 
Of the three good types, the simplest is true Kingship, 
the rule of a single man of pre-eminent wisdom and good- 
ness, the " hero as king," * if such a unique being can be 
found ; the emergence of such royal heroes in primitive 
times was affirmed by tradition in Greece as in other 
countries, but it is evident that even an approximate 
realisation of this type is not regarded by Aristotle as 
within the range of practical politica A less purely ideal 
and more vaguely defined type is Aristocracy, in the sense 
of the rule of the Best, being more than ona The number 
of these in a state would vary with social conditions ; but 
it was at any rate clear to Aristotle that the persons well 
qualified for government could only be a minority in any 
political society, owing to the need of leisure for the attain- 
ment of the required qualification.' 

But the drift towards democracy in the city-states of 
Aristotle's time was so strong that he could not hope for any 
widespread realisation of anything like his ideal Aristocracy;* 

^ The general idea of this classification is substantially derived from 
Plato {Polilicus) ; but it is sufficient here to take it in the Aristotelian 
form. ' Carlyle. 

' It is to be observed that in Aristotle's ideal State important govern- 
mental functions are allotted to all fully qualified citizens who have 
attained a certain age ; but these fully qualified citizens are all persons of 
leisure, living on the produce of lands tilled by serf-cultivators. I think, 
however, that the line drawn by Aristotle between Aristocracy and Constitu- 
tional Government is somewhat obscure and varying. 

* The term '* aristocracy " is applied by Aristotle in two ways : (1) strictly 



6o6 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chap. 

accordingly, the form of government which he recommends 
as a more practical ideal for general imitation is a kind of 
middle form between oligarchy and democracy — but inclin- 
ing to democracy — which he calls Constitutional Govern- 
ment^ In this a majority of the free citizens — the poorest 
dass being excluded — would possess important governmental 
functions, especially the right of electing their magistrates, 
and calling them to account, and a sort of balance would 
be maintained between rich and poor by the preponderant 
political influence of men of moderate means. But even 
this type was but rarely realised within the range of 
Aristotle's experience ; the predominant characteristic of the 
later political development of free Greece was a struggle 
between rich and poor, in which the winning party set up 
either selfish and oppressive oligarchy, or selfish and oppres- 
sive democracy; unless, as sometimes happened, an ambi- 
tious individual took advantage of disorder to establish 
himself as a Tyrannus. If we wish to arrange these bad 
forms of government in the order of demerit, we have to 
invert the numerical order ; since of all bad governments 
the rule of a single individual in his own interest is the 
worst, and the oppressive rule of the few is worse than the 
oppressive rule of the many. 

It should be observed that Aristotle also uses the terms 
" aristocratic," " oligarchic," and " democratic " to denote 
characteristics which the same polity may possess in different 
elements or features of its constitution ; indeed, what he calls 
constitutional government is conceived by him as a kind of 
mixture of oligarchy and democracy, — which may also have 
in some degree an aristocratic character, so far as the con- 
stitutional arrangements tend to allot governmental functions 
to persons of merit. 

Turning now to the modem use of the terms, I note first 

to his ideal State, and (2) more loosely to actual States in which the aUot- 
ment of political functions is jNiW/y determined by merit. 

^ We may note as a sign of the drift towards democracy of which I have 
spoken that Aristotle uses the general term ** constitution " or *' constitutional 
government " (voXireta) to mean constitutional democracy. 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 607 

that the notions of " monarchy," and " kingship," ^ " tyranny," 
and " despotism," are materially changed. The modem term 
" monarchy " is largely used to denote governments in which 
only a share of power is left to the single individual called 
the " monarch." ^ Again, if the power of the monarch is not 
constitutionally limited we call it " despotism " ; but as this 
term does not necessarily suggest a power irregular and 
lawless in its origin, it does not correspond to the Greek 
"Tyrannis." On the other hand, this latter term is not 
accurately expressed by the modem "tyranny," because a 
modern despot would not be called a tyrant unless his rule 
were harshly oppressive, whereas a Greek Tyrannus might 
find his interests best subserved by mild and benevolent 
government: moreover, we consider that oligarchs and 
democrats can exercise "tyranny" as well as monarchs. 
Indeed, in a modem discussion we should not mention 
tyranny except as an evil to be guarded against : nor, in 
constructing a suitable government for a modem State, 
have we had occasion to consider despotism.* We have, 
however, noted important reasons for allotting extensive 
powers to a single individual in the organisations of modem 
government : not because a modern thinker can, any more 
than Aristotle, hope to obtain by any practicable mode of 
appointment a man unique in wisdom and virtue to fill the 
place of king or president ; but rather on account of the 
greater unity and consistency in design attained by leaving 
the management of governmental work to a single man, 
and the greater vigour in execution attained by leaving 
him unfettered control and imdivided responsibility. How 
far and under what circumstances the executive government 
should be organised on what may — in this wide sense — be 
called a "monarchical" plan, has been already to some 
extent considered: and it will be convenient to defer 
further discussion of it till we have examined the modem 
conceptions of oligarchy, aristocracy, and democracy. 

^ Aristotle's ** Monarchy" inolndes both Tyrannis and true Kingship. 
^ Aristotle notes a similar use : but he pays little attention to it. 
* See, however, p. 621. 



6o8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

In the whole nomenclature the term which has least 
altered its signification in its modem use is " oligarchy " : for 
we, like Aristotle, commonly denote by this the government 
of a wealthy minority in their own interest But the 
Aristotelian distinction between "oligarchy" and "aristo- 
cracy " has been largely obliterated, so that the two terms 
are often used almost as convertible : still the distinction so 
far lingers that " oligarchical " has generally a bad signifi- 
cation, wliile " aristocratic " is felt to be in itself at least a 
neutral term, even if the person using it disapproves of 
aristocracy. Moreover, the " aristocratic " element of a 
modem community is vaguely understood to be not merely 
rich, but to have acquired, on the average, tlirough hereditary 
wealth, leisure, and social position, a cultivation of mind 
above tliat of the " masses " and also certain valuable tradi- 
tions of political experience : so that its claim to a share in 
government disproportionate to its members is based on a 
belief in its superior intellectual qualifications. It therefore 
seems to me possible, without doing too much violence to 
current usage, to give the term a signification akin to the 
Aristotelian ; accordingly I shall meiin by " aristocracy " the 
government of persons specially qualified by abilities, train- 
ing, and experience for the work of government. 

I liave Siiid " specially qualified," and not " best qualified," 
because it is a widespread opinion in modern times that tlie 
mass of adults — or male adults — in any civilised state is 
better qualified for the most important political decisions, 
than any small minority of persons, however much they 
may be chosen with a view to special qualifications. For, in 
passing from Aristotelian to modern thought, the associations 
and sentiments which the word " democracy " carries with it 
have become very different : the term represents for us not 
merely a depressingly prevalent political fact, but a widely 
and enthusiastically accepted politiciil ideal The drift to- 
wards democracy which we note in the later history of free 
Greece does not appear to have had either as cause or effect 
a corresponding movement in philosophic thought : but the 
corresponding drift in modem times is even more marked in 



XXX CLASSIFICA TION OF GO VERNMENTS 609 

the history of political ideas than it is in the history of 
political facts. But this tendency to idealise democracy is 
liable to involve some confusion of thought, which I will 
now attempt to remove. 

§ 2. Firstly, persons who adopt a democratic ideal some- 
times put forward as a principle of democracy a proposition 
which is indistinguishable from what I have taken as the 
principle of good government : viz. that all laws and political 
institutions should be framed with a view to the welfare of 
the people at large, so that no privileges should be given to 
any particular individual or class except on grounds of public 
utility. I conceive, however, that this principle not only 
might but would be universally conceded by the modem 
advocates of every form of civilised government : ^ so that 
to treat it as a characteristic principle of democracy intro- 
duces fundamental confusion. There is more to be said for 
distinguishing as democratic the principle that in estimat- 
ing public welfare, conceived as " general happiness " of the 
members of the community, " everybody is to coimt for one 
and nobody for more than one." ^ So far, indeed, as this 
merely means that the happiness of any one member of 
society should be no more the concern of the legislator than 
the eqyixd happiness of any other member, it is obviously 
implied in the acceptance of '' greatest general happiness " 
as the ultimate end : but if it is meant that equality in 
the distribution of happiness is to be sought even at the 
cost of diminishing the total amount of happiness attained, 
the maxim is certainly difTerent from the general utilitarian 
principle which I have taken as fundamental ; * while yet 
its practical adoption may not improbably follow from giving 

^ I here overlook, for brevity, the possible divergence between the welfare 
of any one political society and the welfiEU'e of humanity at large. 

^ The quotation is from Bentham : I do not, however, think that Bentham 
intended to deny (1) that one person may be more capable of happiness than 
another ; or (2) that, if so, the former's happiness is more important than the 
latter's as an element of general happiness. 

^ To aim at equality in distribution of happiness may obviously be 
incompatible with aiming at the greatest happiness on the whole, if the 
happiness of one person can ever be increased by diminishing to a less extent 
the happiness of another already less happy. 

2r 



6io ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

supreme control to the mass of adults. To this interpretation 
of " democracy " I shall therefore return ; but I conceive that 
— according to the original derivation and prevalent use of 
the word^-4emocrac7 ought to be interpreted as relating 
primarily to the structure of government and not to the 
mode in which its functions should be exercised. 

How then are we to formulate the fundamental principle 
of democracy in relation to the structure of government ? 
There seem to be two competing principles, one or other of 
which is more or less definitely assumed in current argu- 
ments for democratic institutions. One of these, — ^which 
I myself accept, with important qualifications/ — is "that 
government should rest on the active consent of the 
governed"; the other is "that any one honest and self- 
supporting citizen is, on the average, as well qualified as 
another for the work of government" This latter proposi- 
tion I in the main reject ; but I admit that, in one view of 
the proof of the first proposition, the second is to some 
extent implied, and that where democracy — as defined by the 
first proposition — is fully developed, there is likely to be a 
tendency to accept and act upon the second to some extent. 

In order to examine the relation between the two proposi- 
tions, it will be well to define the former more precisely. Iii 
the first place, I mean by " active consent " something quite 
different from the passive acquiescence, the absence of any 
conscious desire to change the structure or modify the action 
of government, which may exist imder a pure monarchy or 
oligarchy no less than under a democracy, wherever the 
members of the conmiunity have lost or never acquired 
the habit of regarding their government as a condition of 
life which it is in their power to change. Even in such 
a society the views and sentiments of the governed ordin- 
arily impose certain limits on their government — there 
are certain things which the latter abstains from doing for 
fear of exciting discontent and possible disaster : — but this 
effect is normally produced without any conscious exercise of 
power. By "active consent," on the other hand, I imply that 

^ For these qualifications see chap. xx. ^ 3-5. 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 6ii 

the citizens are conscious that they can legitimately alter the 
structure or the action of their government if a sufficient 
nimiber of them choose to go through a certain process ; so 
that if they make no effort to alter either, they exercise a 
distinct act of choice: — they may not like their govern- 
ment or its ways, but they at least prefer not to take the 
trouble of trying to change them. 

Secondly, when we speak of the consent of "the governed," 
we never mean to imply that all the human beings governed 
are to have a voice in the matter. The most ardent demo- 
crat does not wish to give votes to lunatics, criminals, or 
infants ; and the modem movement towards democracy has, 
in the main, stopped short of enfranchising women. This 
latter exclusion, indeed, is hardly defensible except on 
groimds that would justify limitations going much further ; 
still, if we seek for a definition of democracy applicable to 
modern facts, it seems necessary to limit the " governed " 
whose consent is required to " sane law-abiding adult men." 
For convenience, in the argument that follows, I shall use 
the term " citizens " in this sense. 

But further, in desiring the active consent "of the 
citizens," I do not of course imply that all must be 
agreed. In the various conflicts of desires and interests 
that must be expected to arise continually within any 
modern community, a democratic government cannot please 
everybody any more than a monarchical or oligarchical 
government; and if the right of the government of the 
commimity to determine the legal relations of the persons 
inhabiting its territory — which we have regarded as almost 
indispensable for political order and wellbeing — is to be 
maintained, dissentient minorities must submit or depart. 
At the same time, it must be admitted that the coercion 
of a dissentient minority constitutes a special difficulty 
for a government founded on the principle of consent, 
especially if the dissentient minority includes a decided 
majority within a considerable and continuous portion 
of territory, and prefers separation to submission; since 
in this case the right of the majority of the whole 




6i2 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

community to ooeice the local majoritj seems to depend 
on an accidental union of territoriea^ Hence I conceive 
that a democratic government will be reasonably averse to 
such coercion, and will aim at giving the inhabitants of each 
of the districts comprising it as much independence as the 
interests of the whole community allow, and deciding doubt- 
ful points in favour of local self-government 

However this may be, we may agree that the principle 
of democracy requires the constitution of government, and 
the general line of its action in reference to the common 
interests of the whole, to have the active consent of at least 
a majority of the citizeua And this majority must be 
living, — it would be paradoxical to interpret " consent " as 
meaning the consent of the most overwhelming majority of 
the dead Hence, strictly taken, the principle excludes any 
fundamental laws which it requires more than a bare 
majority* to alter; if such laws are established — as (e.g.) in 
the United States of North America modem constitutions — 
the application of the principle of democracy must be con- 
ceived to be limited in the interest of stability.' 

But, finally, the modem advocates of democracy do not 
ordinarily contend that the consent of at least a majority 
of the citizens should be necessary to the validity of every 
governmental decision. Nor is this merely because the people 
has not time to consider all matters, and must therefore 
leave some to the judgment of its servants, the Grovernment, 
just as a private individual with large aflfairs must do. For 

^ See the concluding section of the next chapter. 

^ It may even be doubted whether it is consistent with the principle 
of democracy to require an absolute majority of the citizens — instead of a 
majority of voters — for any change in the constitution. But I think that, 
when adequate ])rovision is made to enable all citizens to vote vrithout serious 
inconvenience, those who prefer not to vote for a pro|)osal of change may be 
said to give *' active consent" to what is established. 

' And it is to be observed that this limitation may conceivably be so strin- 
gent as practically to nullify the operation of the principle : t.e. the majority 
required for changing the laws of the constitutional code may be so large 
that change is practically precluded. The f ths majority (of state legislatures 
or conventions) required in the Constitution of the United States has nearly 
had this effect. 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 613 

a private individual can interfere whenever he likes, and to 
any extent he likes, in any department of his affairs ; any 
decision he may communicate at any moment must be 
obeyed by the servant or agent to whom it is communicated. 
Now, as we have seen, it is sometimes implied in the utter- 
ances of orators appealing to democratic sentiment that the 
judgment of the majority should similarly always be obeyed 
when it is declared. But the inconvenience of sudden 
irruptions of uninstructed popular opinion into matters 
which cannot be imderstood without prolonged and careful 
study is so obvious and palpable, that, so far as I am aware, 
no practical statesman, however demagogic, has ever proposed 
such an arrangement in the most democratic of modem 
States. At any rate we may take it as most commonly 
admitted that the democratic principle must practically be 
limited by confining the authoritative decisions of the people 
at large to certain matters and certain periodically recur- 
ring times ; and committing the great majority of govern- 
mental decisions to bodies or individuals who must have the 
power — and, I may add, the duty — of deciding according 
to their own judgment without the active consent of the 
majority and even against its wish. 

§ 3. The question then arises on what principle, in a 
democracy, the particular persons should be selected to 
whom this large part of the work of government which 
cannot advantageously be undertaken by the people at 
large is to be entrusted 

Here we have to consider the second definition that I 
gave of the fundamental principle of democracy, " that one 
honest and self-supporting citizen is as well qualified as 
another for the work of government." This principle was 
largely carried out in Athens, and elsewhere in the city- 
states of ancient Greece, by the method of choosing officials 
by lot, from among the citizens of unblemished civic 
character. And though no similar attempt to realise this 
principle is as yet discernible in modem arrangements for 
democratic government, it seems necessary to consider it ; 
since it may be plausibly argued that its rejection logicaUy 



6i4 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

involves the rejection of the principle that government 
must rest on popular consent. For, it may be urged, if we 
require special qualifications for the minor decisions which 
even democracy leaves to particular persons and bodies, we 
ought to require them still more for the more important 
decisions reserved to the people at larga 

In considering this argument we have to take into 
account partly intellectual, partly moral qualifications. As 
regards the intellectual qualifications, the analogy of economic 
relations may be adduced; since in these it is generally 
admitted that the judgment of the consimier must be com- 
bined with that of the producer to obtain the right result ; 
and in political matters the people as a whole seems to be 
related to the experts who perform the detailed work of 
governing, much as the consumers are to the producers in 
other arts. The analogy is no doubt vague, as the relation 
varies in different arts. E,g, in house-building the con- 
sumer is better qualified to form a judgment on some of 
the particular questions that arise than the producer is ; 
knowing his own needs and habits he can generally decide 
the number, size, and to some extent shape of rooms that he 
wants better than the architect can, though he cannot so 
well determine how they should be put together. In other 
cases there are no particular matters in deciding which the 
consimier hcis a similar advantage ; — t,g, in medicine, though 
the patient can tell whether a certain treatment makes him 
uncomfortable, he cannot usually tell whether this dis- 
comfort should prudently be endured, for the sake of the 
ultimate gain to health that may be expected to accrue 
from it. Still, as time goes on, if the patient grows steadily 
worse, and especially if a promised amendment does not 
realise itself, he will be thought right in taking other 
medical advice. Accordingly, among those who accept 
generally the principle of democracy, there are some who 
consider the art of government more analogous to house- 
building, and regard the people at large as best qualified 
to determine the main lines of legislation and administration ; 
while others consider it more analogous to medicine, and 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 615 

hold that the people should judge for itself from time to 
time as to the general success of its government in pro- 
moting the wellbeing of the country, but should not judge 
for itself on particular questions. It is in harmony with 
either view that the people's assenting judgment — whether 
directly or indirectly given — should be regarded as indis- 
pensable to the determination of the aggregate expenditure 
for governmental purposes : as in the case of other arts no 
one would recommend that the consiuner in employing any 
expert should give the latter carte ilanche to apply his 
skill regardless of expensa 

As regards moral qualifications, it would be going too far 
to say that the " people " — ^as politically defined — has no 
" sinister interests " opposed to the interests of the com- 
munity as a whole. It is obvious that in the most demo- 
cratic state there is a mass of non-voters whose interests 
may be unduly postponed to those of the voters, that the 
interests of posterity may be imduly sacrificed to those of 
the present generation, and that a minority of the voters may 
be unduly sacrificed to the majority. Still, though the 
electorate as a body may possibly be swayed by narrow 
and sectional interests, any particular section of it is, 
primd facie, more likely to be so swayed ; and it may be 
truly said that the people at large is free from certain 
sinister interests by which governing persons are liable to be 
influenced : as the latter are under temptations to confer on 
themselves emoluments, privileges, and powers beyond what 
is expedient for the public good, and to extend the work of 
government in order to increase the mass of these advan- 
tages. Hence, there is a strong reason for giving weight to 
the judgment of the people at large in the decision of these 
and similar matters, however completely we admit the need 
of experts for the decision of most details of governmental 
work. 

But further, democratic government, in the sense of 
government resting on the active consent of the citizens, 
may — as we have seen — reasonably be preferred, not be- 
cause it is likely to be better conducted, but because it is 



6i6 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

likely to be better obeyed, — because it reduces the danger 
of revolution. If the majority of a nation are able to 
modify, in an orderly and regular way, their laws and the 
action of their government, a minority desirous of change 
will, ordinarily, be only tempted to resort to physical 
force when it is hopeless of becoming a majority ; and as 
such a minority must expect to have opposed not only the 
majority of persons averse to the change, but also all other 
citizens who consider the advantages of the change, if any, to 
be outweighed by the evils of revolution, it will only be 
under exceptional circumstances that the temptation to 
revolution will be strong.^ Here again, so far as our 
acceptance of democracy rests on this latter ground, it is 
obvious that it does not logically lead us any way towards 
the conclusion that any ordinary honest citizen is as qualified 
for government work as any other. 

§ 4. Accordingly, it is generally admitted by theoretical 
advocates of democracy in modem times that the part of 
governmental work which is entrusted to particular indi- 
viduals or elected assemblies should be entrusted to per- 
sons specially qualified. And so far as this is admitted, the 
principle of aristocracy, as above defined, — that the work of 
government is a form of skilled labour which should be in 
the hands of those who possess the requisite skill — is im- 
plicitly accepted. Hence, I do not consider representative 
government — even when the suffrage is universal — as 

^ On the other hand, the habit of regarding government as something 
which an ordinary citizen may reasonably hope and try to get changed, if 
he dislikes it, supplies a powerful force on the side of political change in 
democratic communities ; and, admitting that the majority of such changes 
will be conducted in an orderly manner, we cannot be sure that they will all 
be so conducted, es|>ecially where there are large standing armies ; since the 
decision, in a conflict of physical force, is likely to rest with the trained 
soldiers ; so that a party defeated at the polls will have a temptation to 
achieve its ends by caressing or corrupting the army. I think, therefore, 
that there is, on the whole, no adequate reason to assume that democratic 
governments are likely to be less in danger of violent revolution than other 
forms of government in States of which the members do not regard govern- 
ment as something naturally changeable. But I should still hold that when 
government has come to be thus regarded, a democratic form of government 
— in the sense above defined — affords the best chance of stability. 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 617 

merely a mode of organising democracy, but rather as a 
combination or fusion of democracy and aristocracy. This 
fusion or combination may become less or more aristocratic 
in character through various minor modificationa Thus, it 
may be made less aristocratic by increasing the intervention 
of the people at large in legislation — through measures like 
the " referendum " and " initiative " before mentioned — by 
shortening the time for which the legislature or the ex- 
ecutive is appointed, by the habit of demanding elaborate 
pledges at elections, or even imposing " mandates " at other 
times to which the representatives submit, and by the 
practice of appointing executive officials on groimds other 
than their qualifications for office. Correspondingly it tends 
to be made more aristocratic by lengthening the duration 
of parliaments, by the habit of choosing representatives for 
proved ability, and abstaining from the exaction of pledges 
and the imposition of mandates, and by the practice of 
giving executive appointments to the persons best qualified 
to fill them. But these latter modifications can hardly be 
said to make it less democratic, in the sense in which I first 
defined — and in which alone I accept — the democratic 
principle: at least so long as the consciousness of active 
consent remains vigorous in the citizens generally. 

It may be said, however, that such an introduction of the 
aristocratic principle as is involved in the representative form 
of government will not be sufficient to prevent the masses, 
stimulated by demagogues, from forcing on legislation having 
the character which Aristotle attaches to the term " demo- 
cracy " ; i.e. legislation oppressive to the rich, and therefore 
sacrificing the interest of the community as a whole to the 
sectional interest of the poor majority. As we have already 
seen, some persons regard it as an essential characteristic of 
the democratic form of government, that the power of govern- 
ment is used to promote the equalisation of happiness as a 
paramount end ; and certainly in any dispute between the 
poor majority and the rich minority, the former, being 
through democracy "judges in their own cause," are likely 
to give a verdict in their own favour : especially as, from 



6i8 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

their numerical preponderance, it is easy to confound their 
interests with that of the community as a whola Henoe it 
may be plausibly maintained that, even if the principle of 
electing the best qualified be carried out successfully to 
some extent, it will not prevent the real ultimate interest of 
the community from being sacrificed to the immediate or the 
apparent interests of the masses ; however the persons chosen 
as legislators or administrators may be really skilful and 
able in adapting means to political ends, they will be under 
irresistible pressure to use their talents in promoting sec- 
tional rather than national interest& I myself recognise 
that there is a serious danger of this result ; but I 
am inclined to hope that it may be materially reduced if 
the legislators receive no salary; since they will then be 
more independent, and being drawn in the main from 
the minority of persons of wealth and leisure, will be 
generally disposed, from training and habit, and also from 
regard to the sentiment of their class, to do justice to 
the reasonable claims of the rich in any disputed question 
on which rich and poor are opposed. 

In fact, by establishing non-payment of legislators, we 
introduce an oligarchical element into the government, and 
effect in some degree the kind of fusion between oligarchy 
and democracy which Aristotle reconunended as the best 
practical solution of the war of classes in the city-states of 
Greece. And I think that non-payment of legislators is 
likely to be an institution more easy to maintain against a 
strong drift towards democracy than other oligarchical ex- 
pedients — ^limited suffrage, plural vote, etc. — because it has 
the advantage, which the poor are likely to appreciate, of 
saving money. For the same reason the oligarchical effect 
of the measure is not likely to be extensively neutralised — 
though it may be to some extent — by combinations of the 
poor to elect members of their own class and pay them a 
salary. 

According to my view, then, the representative system 
in its best form will realise to a substantial extent the 
principle of aristocracy in combination with the principle of 



XXX CLASSIFICATION OF GOVERNMENTS 619 

democracy. More often, however, in modem constitutions, 
the principle of aristocracy has been thought to find a 
partial application in the construction of a Senate or "upper" 
chamber, on a non-representative basis, side by side with 
a representative branch of the legislature. And such a 
Senate may fairly be called "aristocratic" — in the sense 
here given to the word — if its members sire selected by the 
executive on the groimd of special qualifications, or obtain 
their seats ex officio. On the other hand, heredity, pure and 
simple — the inheritance of membership of a class absolutely 
closed — is, as a mode of assigning governmental functions, 
but doubtfully aristocratic;^ while it is intensely oligar- 
chical, in the strict numerical sense of the term, and 
tends to be so in the Aristotelian sense also; since 
such members of the governing caste as have not in- 
herited wealth are likely to use their inherited power, 
if it be substantial in amoimt, as a means of obtaining 
wealth. So far, however, as merit opens an entrance into 
the privileged body and demerit excludes from it, it acquires 
a partially aristocratic character.^ 

In any case, whether we view these modes of appoint- 
ment as aristocratic or oligarchic, I conceive that any or all 
of them are perfectly reconcilable with democracy if they are 
only applied to a part of the supreme government, and if the 
constitution imder which they are applied rests on the active 
consent of the citizens. It is quite conceivable that a people 
might at once maintain a full consciousness of being able to 
alter their government if they chose, and yet maintain even 
heredity as an element in the construction of one or more 
among the highest organs of government — from a strong 
apprehension of its advantages as compared with any 
available alternative.' 

^ See chap, xxiii. § 3. 

' The English peerage has the former of these charactcristios ; and should 
it ever be thought worth while to reform the House of Lords while retaining 
its hereditary basis, it would seem desirable to increase its aristocratic quality 
by some arrangement tending to exclude the sons of peers who have given 
no evidence of qualification for the work of government. 

^ I do not, however, think this result probable. See ch. xxiii. § 3. 



620 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 5. The last statement applies equally to the case in 
which one of the highest organs of government is an 
individuaL Indeed the principle of monarchy in the wide 
sense before explained — the attribution of large govern- 
mental powers to a single individual — would seem, so far 
as rationally justifiable, to be a particular application of 
the principle of aristocracy ; since it is obviously desirable 
that such an individual should possess very special qualifica- 
tions for government. Still, it seems better to treat the two 
principles as distinct ; since, as we saw, the main argument 
for monarchy does not xiepend on the possibility of finding 
an individual uniquely qualified for the work entrusted to 
him ; but rather on the advantages gained by the concen- 
tration of power and responsibility ^ in one man's hands, 
even when the individual selected may not be markedly 
superior to several other available candidates for the post. 
It is to be observed that the importance of these advantages 
— ^as compared with the gain of the more many-sided and 
balanced consideration of questions, and the more circum- 
spect and generally more influential judgments, that may 
be expected to be obtained from a bench or coimcil or 
assembly, — is very different in different departments of 
work. No one, I think, doubts that it is better to entrust 
the management of a campaign to a single man ; on the 
other hand, it is generally agreed that the legislative organ 
in a modem State must, with a view to eflBciency as 
well as to popular acceptance, include a number of persons 
representing respectively different sections of the com- 
munity; nor would any one propose that the supreme 
court of justice should consist of a single judge. The sphere 
of the monarchical principle is to be found, if anywhere, in 
the organisation of the executiva^ The practical questions, 
then, for modern states, so far as monarchy is concerned, are 
(1) how far is it desirable that the executive should be under 

' It must be obeerved that if the monarch obtains his post by inherit* 
ance, the responsibility is only maintained by the fear of disapprobation and 
disorder. 

^ It should be observed that the monarchical principle— in the wide sense 
here used — may be applied in a subordinate way by organising each separate 



XXX CLASSIFICA TION OF GO VERNMENTS 62 1 

a single head ? and (2) how far is this arrangement recon- 
cilable with the prevalence of democracy ? 

The first question has been fully considered in a previous 
chapter (xxii.)^,. We saw that in the English system of 
parliamentary government, though the supreme executive 
cabinet may be for long periods completely under the 
control of the prime minister, it is hardly possible to %tcwrt 
this result ; since the extent of the predominance of the 
prime minister over his colleagues must largely depend on 
his personal influence with Parliament and with the peopla 
It seems therefore necessary, in order to give the supreme 
executive a regularly monarchical organisation, that the 
eflEective head of the executive — whether holding oflBce for 
life or for a short period — should be irremovable by Parlia- 
ment. Accordingly, in chapter xxii I discussed the ad- 
vantages and drawbacks of various measures designed to 
secure a substantial amoimt of independence to a president 
appointed for a fixed period, or a hereditary monarch who is 
understood to govern as well as reign. And — turning now 
to the second question — I do not think that such measures 
can be properly regarded as " anti-democratic," if it be once 
admitted that it is not inconsistent with democracy for the 
people to entrust a part of the work of government to par- 
ticular individuals or bodies. I do not even conceive it to be 
in any way imdemocratic in principle, though it would doubt- 
less be practically dangerous, to give the supreme control of 
the whole current work of government, legislative, adminis- 
trative, and judicial, to a single ruler for a limited period : 
provided the period be sufficiently short to make the respon- 
sibility of the ruler to the people a reality, and to keep alive 
both in his mind and theirs the consciousness of their con- 
stitutional function of judging their rider's work. But such 
a concentration of power no one woidd propose for a West- 
department of the executive under a single head, with a considerable power 
of making independent decisions, even though supreme executive power is 
vested in a council or assembly. The expediency of this mode of organisation 
has been already discussed (chap, xxi.), and I have thought it best not to 
complicate the present discussion by introducing this question here. 



622 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap, xxx 

European State— except, perhaps, tempomrily as a remedy 
for prolonged disorder; it is agreed that the monarch in 
the most monarchical modem State must normally govern 
along with a legislature independently elected, and judges 
whom he cannot of his own sole will dismisa And, as 
I before argued in considering aristocracy, it seems to me 
not inconsistent with the principle of democracy, as I have 
defined it, that a power of this latter kind shoidd be held 
for life, and even transmitted by inheritance, instead of 
being obtained for a short period by election. 

In conclusion, it may be observed that when we compare 
the forms of government of the ancient Greek city-state 
with those of the modem West-European state, we cannot 
but note the diminished one-sidedness with which the 
different principles that we have been discussing tend to 
manifest themselves in the latter case. In the most civilised 
period of the Greek city-states we find oligarchical govern- 
ment maintained or revived in a certain nimiber of cases, 
with occasional lapses into imqualified despotism; while, 
where the democratic principle is triumphant, it manifests 
itself in institutions — such as huge popular juries and 
magistrates chosen by lot — which the most democratic of 
modern publicists cannot approve. In modem West- 
European states we see no tendency to pure oligarchy 
and but little tendency to pure despotism : the representa- 
tive system naturally combines with democracy an element 
of aristocracy — in the sense of government by persons 
specially qualified : and the principle of monarchy has also 
been to an important extent maintained in combination with 
that of democracy. Nor do I see any reason to think that 
either the need of special qualifications for the efl&cient 
performance of governmental work, or the advantages of 
unity of administration, are likely to diminish, or to be less 
appreciated, in the future history of these states, so far as 
we may without rashness conjecturally forecast it 



CHAPTEE XXXI 



SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDEK 



§ 1. In discussing, in chapter ii, the relation between Law 
and Grovemment, we were led to consider the widely-afl&rmed 
proposition that the power of the Sovereign or Supreme 
Government in a state is legally unlimited. The view I 
took was that there is usually a sense in which this pro- 
position is true; i.e. there is usually some legislature, 
ordinary or extraordinary — some individual body, or com- 
plex system of bodies — that has the legal right to alter 
any law whatever : but that in many cases it woidd be at 
least misleading to say that there is no legal limit to its 
power ; since the very structure of this supreme legislature, 
being legally determined, may practically limit its power of 
acting. But in the course of the discussion it became 
evident that the question " where supreme political power 
actually and idtimately resides " in any society is a diflScult 
and complex one ; and that we do not by any means obtain 
a dear answer to it when we have ascertained where the 
legal right of altering the laws of the state idtimately lies. 
It is this more difficult question that I propose now to 
consider. 

Before attempting to answer the question it is important 
to obtain as clear a conception as possible of its meaning. 
"Power," in the widest sense in which we are here con- 
cerned with its definition, is said to be exercised by any 
person whose directions are habitually carried into effect by 



624 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 



other persons.^ But political power is clearly only one 
species of this. Thus, a leading critic of literature may be 
said to exercise power when his directions to buy and read 
certain books are widely carried out by cidtivated members 
of his community ; but be would not be said to exercise 
political power. And this is not merely because the regula- 
tion of literary taste is not a normal function of government. 
For similarly, if a physician's directions to parents in general 
to vaccinate their children were widely obeyed from general 
confidence in his medical skill, he might be said to exercise 
power ; but it would still not be political power ; ^ though 
if the legislature issued the same orders and obtained similar 
obedience it would be exercising political power. The 
obvious difference is that the legislature's orders might be 
enforced by physical violence : if it commanded vaodnation 
under penalties, the requisite physical force would be 
exercised by certain other members of the conmiunity for 
the enforcement of the penalties, and this exercise of force 
would not be resisted by the bulk of the rest of the com- 
munity. 

But then directions, backed with physical force, might be 
similarly given by a secret agrarian society in Ireland, or a 
" Mafia " or " Camorra " in Italy, with the effect of securing 
obedience. Would this be an exercise of political power ? 
Our answer to this question would depend on the exttid of 
the obedience. In any case the physical force would be 
illegal and anti-governmental ; but if the directions backed 
by this illegal force were obeyed to anything like the same 
extent as the directions of Grovernment, we should recognise 
that the power normally belonging to Government had been 
partly transferred to the illegal directors, in a disorderly 
way. It may, however, be held that the power thus trans- 
ferred would not be properly political, on the ground that 

' In a stricter sense, ** power " is only exercised when the obedience which 
is its counterpart is prompted by the prospect of consequences depending on 
the will of the person obeyed. See p. 626. 

' Unless the physician's directions were obeyed in spite of an order of 
Qovernment prohibiting vaccination. In this case it would at least be 
doubtful whether he had not a share of political power. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 625 

the "political" character of a society is lost or impaired 
when it falls into disorder and anarchy. Hence, in con- 
sidering where supreme political power resides in a state 
that has a certain constitution, it seems best to assume the 
state to be orderly ; i,t, to assume that no commands are 
widely * obeyed by adults from fear of physical force, except 
those issued by or under the authority of Government. 
In such a state, then, political power of any importance, if 
not solely exercised by the organs of Government, must at 
least take effect through them. 

At the same time it cannot be said that the motive to 
the general obedience which is the coimterpart of political 
power is always fear of the physical force which (Jovern- 
ment is able, in the last resort, to wield ; experience shows 
that various other motives co-operate in producing obedience 
to Government. Apart from mere habit and custom, the 
predominant motive in any particulsu: case may be moral, 
springing from the opinion that Government has a right to 
command. Or — especially in the case of those who are 
" servants " as well as subjects of (Jovemment — it may be 
hope of remuneration, or fear of dismissal from service. Or, 
again, in some cases the motive may be fear, not of the 
exercise of the physical force which Government directs, but 
of its non-exercise; fear of the withdrawal of the aid or 
protection of (Jovemment In short, while the fear of 
physical force must be recognised as having a place among 
the motives that produce general obedience to the commands 
of (Jovemment, it need not be the sole motive, nor that 
actually operative in any particular case.^ 

^ I say ** widely," because the normal structure of govemment — including 
as it does an apparatus for detecting, judging, and punishing crime — implies 
that a certain amount of illegal force will continually be exercised, and it is 
probable that some of this force will be occasionally used to procure obedience 
to illegal orders ; therefore, when we speak of a state as in an orderly con- 
dition, we must be understood to mean that the illegal coercion exercised in it 
does not exceed a certain vaguely defined amount — being due not to abnormal 
weakness on the part of the Qovernment, but chiefly to the difficulty of 
capturing all criminals and proving all crimes. 

' It is, indeed, conceivable that order might be maintained throughout a 
certain region by a Government resting on public opinion or supernatural 

2s 



626 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

§ 2. Hence arises a question of great importance in deter- 
mining the attribution of supreme political power. Suppose 
that an individual or body which is a recognised organ of 
Grovemment, and whose orders accordingly obtain general 
obedience partly from fear of orderly physical force, habitu- 
ally obeys the directions of another individual or body from 
fear not of physical force at all, but of other consequences : 
is the power exercised by the latter political power ? E.g, 
if a monarch habitually obeys the directions of his uiinister, 
believing in the latter's wisdom and fearing the discredit of 
acting foolishly — but no further evil — does the minister 
exercise political power over the monarch ? Or, again, if a 
secular monarch habitually obeys the directions of a priest in 
matters of secular government, from fear of the extra-mundane 
consequences — divine wrath or disfavour — which he expects 
to follow from disobedience, is the priest, so far as he obeys 
no one else, politically supreme ? Or if the monarch has 
an ambitious mistress, able to dictate to him through his 
fear of offending her, are we therefore to attribute supreme 
political power to the mistress ? 

Perhaps in the first two cases, it may be said to be rather 
" influence " than " power," strictly so called, that is exer- 
cised ; if the minister is not supposed to cause the bad con- 
sequences of nonconformity to his directions, and if the 
priest is merely understood to warn the monarch of the 
extra-mundane penalties that will attend certain kinds of 
conduct, independently of the priest's volition. Accepting 
this limitation, we may observe that the priest, at any rate, 
may also be naturally understood to threaten divine wrath 
of which he can control the operation, in virtue of a divine 
commission to " bind or loose " ; and if by such threats he 
induces the monarch to issue commands in conformity to 
his priestly dictation, we shall agree that he exercises 

sanctions alone ; which would accordingly be distinguishable from the 
government of any voluntary association that exists in modern States only 
by its power of compelling those who would not obey it to emigrate. But 
such a Oovemment — at least in a modem civilised State — is so purely 
imaginary that I need not discuss it further. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 627 

power, political in its effects if not in its nature. And, 
generally, if a monarch, otherwise clearly supreme, habitually 
conforms to the directions of another person from fear of 
consequences which are believed to depend on that other 
person's volition — and if that other person is not similarly 
directed by a third party — it seems clear that the ultimate 
power of producing political effects has temporarily passed 
from the monarch to his director. At the same time 
we should hesitate to afSrm a transfer of sovereignty in 
such cases ; the reason being, that the consequences feared 
are not supposed to be of a kind which would still prevent 
the monarch from exercising supreme power imimpaired, if 
he made up his mind to face them.^ It would seem, there- 
fore, that power exercised on an organ of Government is not 
to be regarded as the power of a political superior unless the 
person or body of persons exercising it is able to enforce 
obedience to its dictates by withdrawing or diminishing the 
governmental power of the organ. 

To make this clearer, let us take another case — otherwise 
very similar to those just discussed — in which the conse- 
quences feared are incompatible with the unimpaired exercise 
of political power by the person who obeys from fear of 
them. Suppose that a monarch habitually obeys a priest, 
not from fear of the extra-mimdane penalties threatened by 
the latter, but from fear of finding it difficult to obtain 
obedience from his subjects if they believe him to be a 
special object of Grod's anger, — we shall agree that he no 
longer completely possesses supreme political power. And 
if the influence of the priesthood over the monarch's subjects 
were so strong that the bulk of them would unquestioningly 
obey a direction of the chief priest to cease obeying the 
monarch, and if, therefore, the chief priest's directions were 

^ It would no doubt be rhetoricaUy admissible to say that under Louis 
XIII. Richelieu, or under Louis XV. the Pompadour, was the political sove- 
reign of France ; but the phrase would be recognised as a flight of rhetoric. 
And the reason for this clearly is, that the minister and the mistress would have 
lost their power the moment they lost the king's favour ; the king would 
have retained his power whether Richelieu or the Pompadour had been dis- 
pleased with him or not. 



628 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

habitually obeyed by the monarch, — it would hardly be 
denied that the priest had become, really if not nominally, 
the political superior of the monarch, and that the type of 
government had been transformed &om a monarchy to a 
theocracy. This would be the case even though the priest 
never tried — and might not have been obeyed if he had 
tried — to assume the monarch's place, and give commands 
regularly, as a political superior, on the ordinary matters 
of secular government. E,g, if, in the Middle Ages, the 
Pope could have deposed and appointed secular monarchs 
at will, without meeting with serious resistance, he would 
surely have been supreme in western Christendom, although 
the Church, while claiming to control the " two swords " — 
secular and spiritual — never claimed to widd the secular 
sword And speaking more generally, if any individual 
has unquestioned ^ power of withdrawing power from the 
— otherwise supreme — ^government of a state, and is habitu- 
ally obeyed by this government from fear of such with- 
drawal, we must regard the said individual as possessing 
supreme — I do not say unlimited — political power. The 
same may be said if, in place of an individual, we have a 
body completely capable of corporate action, — i.t, a body 
that can act corporately at any time without material 
delay, and not so constructed as to have materially more 
difficulty in acting than in not acting. For instance if, 
in a country under simple parliamentary government, any 
constituency could dismiss its representatives at any time 
by the vote of a simple majority, — means being provided 
for enabling it to meet and vote, on the requisition of an 
adequate number of electors, — and if, in consequence, the 
mandates of the constituencies were habitually obeyed by 
the representatives, it could hardly be doubted that the 
electorate was sovereign. 

§ 3. There are other cases, however, in which it is less 
clear whether the power of dismissal implies supreme 
political power. 

^ The case in which the attempt to withdraw power would lead to conflict 
and disorderly violence will be considered later. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 629 

Suppose that the body which can dismiss the other- 
wise supreme government does not dismiss it and gives no 
directions. Is it still supreme? — assuming that its in- 
activity is not due to fear. I think we must say that the 
power of dismissal — or any other power of giving orders 
— is still possessed though it is not exercised; assimiing 
that the inactive organ would be obeyed if it gave orders. 
But it should be noted that in practice there is usually a 
difficulty in ascertaining whether a power that has remained 
long unexercised has not wholly or partially decayed. This 
point will be further discussed presently : — meanwhile, on 
the assumption that no such decay has taken place, I think 
we must attribute supreme power to any individual or body 
completely capable of corporate action, which admittedly 
can withdraw power at will from a Grovernment otherwise 
suprema 

But the case is difierent if the power can only be with- 
drawn at the end of a certain period ; since then it is 
possible that the organ which can thus withdraw power 
might not be obeyed during the interval by the organ from 
which it can withdraw it. Suppose an irresponsible dic- 
tator appointed by a popular assembly for a term of years 
and not desiring reappointment ; surely he must be held to 
be temporarily sovereign. Suppose, however, that, holding 
office for a fixed period, he desires reappointment ; then, so 
far as the directions of the assembly are in consequence 
habitually obeyed by him, we must say that it exercises 
supreme power ; and if we can be sure that they would be 
obeyed, we must say that it has supreme power though it 
does not exercise it. But it is obvious that the extent 
to which power is possessed under these circumstances 
by a body that does not exercise it cannot be certainly 
known but only conjectured with a varying degree of 
probability. 

But further ; we have to take note of cases in which 
the body constitutionally qualified to dismiss and direct the 
permanent organ of (ordinarily) supreme government is not 
completely capable of corporate action. For instance, the 



630 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

body in question may not be always in existence as a body, 
or may be incapable of acting corporately in relation to a 
given question, unless the agreement of considerably more 
than a simple majority of its members can be attained. 
Suppose that a Parliament can dismiss the executive, but 
cannot meet without the consent of the executive except in 
the first year of every four ; it is evident that for three years 
its power over the executive will not be greater than if the 
latter held office for a fixed period. Suppose, again, that in 
a federal polity the legislatures of the part-states have an 
undisputed right to change the constitution, but only by 
the vote of three-fourths of their nimiber ; it may be that, 
although there are many changes desired by a clear majority 
of part-states, there is no change whatever on which the 
agreement of so large a number is attainable ; the body that 
would be supreme if it acted may be unable to act at all 
We may still say in a certain sense that sovereignty belongs 
to the aggregate of the legislatures of the part-states ; but 
only in a very peculiar sense, which it is necessary to 
explain if the statement is not to be misleading. 

§ 4. This last consideration leads naturally to a question 
which has sometimes been placed in the forefront of the 
whole discussion. If we attribute supreme power to a body 
that has a constitutional right to change the structure and 
regulate the action of government, even when this power can 
only be exercised by a majority so large as to be rarely I 

attainable, ought we not on similar grounds to attribute 
it to the mass of the people in any state ? since in any state, 
if a sufficiently large majority of the people altogether refused 
obedience, the power of government would come to an end. 

I think we must admit ^ that there is, for this reason, a 
certain sense in which the mass of the people in any country 
may be said to be the ultimate depository of supreme political 
power. Still, to say without qualification that the people is 
everywhere sovereign would be altogether misleading ; since 
the statement would ignore the fundamental distinction 

^ Unless we deny that the possession of |iower can be unconscious ; and it 
would be paradoxical to deny this in the case of an individual. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 631 

between power that is unconsciously possessed — and therefore 
cannot be exercised at will — and power consciously pos- 
sessed. An aggregate of men do not become conscious of 
their power as a body, until they become confident of 
mutual co-operation for the realisation of common wishes ; 
and this confidence is, under ordinary circimistances/ only 
acquired gradually by the habit of acting in concert. 
Accordingly, when the governed are without the habit of 
acting in concert, they are, as a body, imconscious that they 
possess the power of refusing obedience to their govern- 
ment. Even the knowledge that obedience could not be 
enforced if an overwhelming majority agreed to refuse 
it, and that an overwhelming majority would be glad to 
disobey if each could rely on the co-operation of the others, 
would not necessarily give a consciousness of power to dis- 
obey with impunity : since mutual communication sufficient 
to produce the requisite mutual reliance may be wanting ; 
and in its absence, each and all may be effectually restrained 
from disobedience by fear of the penalties it woidd entail. 
So far as the Grovernment is, for this reason, able to count 
on the obedience of the mass of the people even when they 
dislike what it commands, though we may still attribute 
power to the people, we must add the fundamentally im- 
portant qualification that it is an unconscious and unexer- 
cised power. 

The case is different if the conduct of Government is 
to any extent determined by fear of a general refusal of 
obedience on the part of the governed, even though the 
latter are not conscious of so determining it. It may 
perhaps be urged that this hypothesis has hardly any 
practical importance ; for granting that Government might 
behave so as to cause a complete refusal of obedience 
by an overwhelming majority, no such behaviour is within 
the limits of probability, and the fear of it is not actually 
a motive influencing Government. The worst that any 
Government actually fears from its subjects is 'partial 

^ In exceptional cases it might be called out rapidly, by some violent and 
sustained excitement of popular emotion. 



632 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

resistanoe, disorder, and conflict, in which Gk>Yeniinent may 
be beaten ; and it may be said that the suggestion of sach 
conflict is incompatible with our fundamental assumption 
that order is maintedned. But I think that — though it is 
legitimate to assiune that the States which we contem- 
plate are not actually anarchical and disorderly, since 
many States are for long periods approximately exempt 
from these conditions — our suppositions will be too remote 
from the facts if we assume that the fear of causing dis- 
order is not a restraining force, operating to keep the 
exercise of the power of any nominally supreme government 
within Umits. Such restraints to governmental power 
are doubtless ordinarily indefinite, but they must be held 
to exist in the most orderly States; though in some 
cases they may be only potential restraints, because the 
Grovernment has no actual desire to do anything which would 
provoke disorder. And, so fieir as we thus recognise the 
fear of disorder as an actual force restraining Government, 
we must correspondingly recognise an unconscious exercise 
of political power by the people at large, even in the least 
democratic communities. 

The difference is doubtless vast between such unconscious 
exercise of power by the mass of the governed, as may exist 
under an oligarchy or an absolute monarchy, and the 
" active consent " to the operations of government which we 
have regarded as characteristic of democracy. Still the 
interval between the two is filled up by various degrees of 
conscious imposition of popular wishes on government, which 
we may regard as inchoate democracy. I do not consider 
that democracy is fully developed until the mass of (at 
least) the male adults have the regular function of electing 
their government or determining its rules of action, or 
both. But before this stage is reached the mass of the 
people may have more or less eflfective means of impressing 
their wishes on their government. 

A case deserving special notice is where the mass of the 
people have no constitutional rights, but have recognised 
leaders whom the Government credit with the power of 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 633 

producing dangerous disorder, and consequently fear to dis- 
please. In this case, though the influence of the leaders 
over their followers is not strictly political power, — 
since the obedience of the followers is not due to their 
fear of the leaders, — the power of the leaders over the 
Gtovernment must be admitted to be political We should, 
indeed, regard its existence as incompatible with perfect 
political order : but it is important to recognise that without 
actual disorderly violence, or refusal of obedience to the 
ordinary government, the distribution of political power may 
be materially modified for an indefinite period by the fear of 
possible disorder. In considering before the case of a chief 
priest dismissing the secular government, I assumed for 
simplicity that his power to dismiss was so unquestioned 
that its exercise would not be resisted. But more ordinarily 
the extent to which obedience would be withdrawn, if the 
monarch refused to conform to the priest's direction, would 
only be partial : so that the priest's power, like that of the 
popular leader here spoken of, would be based on the fear of 
disorder. 

Here we may recur again to the question before raised, 
whether political power long unexercised has decayed or still 
exists unchanged : since the reason why it is often difBcult 
to answer this question is that a power formally attributed 
to a certain organ of government which has for a long time 
not been exercised, cannot be exercised without a breach of 
custom. It may be that this breach of custom would only 
cause surprise and moral disapprobation : if so, the power in 
question must be held to be still in full vigour : but if there 
is a danger that its exercise would provoke resistance and 
disorder, and if the fear of these consequences prevents its 
exercise, it must be admitted to have decayed. 

§ 5. The modifications in the distribution of political 
power produced by the fear of disorder, in any of the ways 
just discussed, cannot be ignored if we are seeking a com- 
plete answer to the question where supreme political power 
rests in a given State. At the same time, if the question is 
asked with reference to a class of States defined as pos- 



634 ELEMENTS OF POUTICS chai 

sessing a certain governmental structure — especially a cei 
tain definite allotment of Legislative, Executive, and Judicii 
functions to distinct organs, — we cannot take account c 
modifications of this kind ; as we cannot infer from a mer 
contemplation of the form of the polity to what exteii 
or in what precise manner they will occur. For a simila 
reason, if we are considering this abstract question, wi 
must extend still further the assumption that the Stati 
contemplated is in an " orderly " condition : we must tab 
" order " to include not only obedience on the part o\ 
the bulk of the governed, but observance of assigned limitc 
on the part of the organs. In illustrating this, I shall 
assimie for simplicity that the constitution provides no l^al 
method of changing the constitutional allotment of powers, 
though it may be substantially modified by custom and con- 
vention. As we saw before, so far as the constitution is legally 
changeable, it is obviously in a sense true that supreme 
power rests with the aggregate of individuals or bodies 
whose consent can legally change it ; — putting disorder and 
the fear of disorder out of account Still, in proportion as 
the process of change is diflBcult, and requires the concur- 
rence of several distinct bodies or individuals, and perhaps 
also more than a bare majority in one or more of these 
bodies, the formally unlimited power of changing the 
constitution becomes practically reduced by the difficulty 
of putting it into operation ; so that the question how 
political power is distributed so long as the constitution is 

' imchanged becomes correspondingly more important.^ And 

this is, of course, the only question that we have to consider, 
in respect of the attribution of supreme power, if the con- 
stitution is legally unchangeable, — so long as we exclude 

! disorder and the fear of disorder. If then, we are to answer 

this question from a consideration of the constitutional 
allotment of powers, we must assume that no organ will 
act contrary to the design of the constitution and misuse 
the power entrusted to it, in order to encroach on the sphere 

' * This is strikingly exemplified — as 1 have before observed — by the United 

I States of North America. 



I , 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 635 

of power assigned to any other organ. For such encroach- 
ment is likely to be resisted by other parts of government : 
and we cannot say whether it will be successful or not, 
without knowing more of the state of public opinion than 
we can reasonably infer from the form of the polity. It is 
quite conceivable that an attempted perversion of the 
original design of a constitution might — by favour of public 
opinion — be successful in one State, though it would be 
generally disapproved and successfully resisted in another 
State with a similar constitution: the manifestation of 
public opinion acting partly as moral pressure on the other 
organs that might otherwise resist the encroachment, partly 
as indicating on which side the physical force would lie if 
the dispute between the organs of government became a 
conflict A outrance. 

For instance, suppose that, in a State with a new 
Constitution, all appointments in the military and civil 
service have been expressly given to a hereditary (or elected) 
head of the executive, while the power of determining the 
annual budget is given to a representative assembly ; and 
suppose that the assembly refuses its assent to necessary 
taxation in order to force the head of the Executive to 
give the most important employments to members of 
Parliament. This might fairly be regarded as a clear 
perversion of the design of the constitution: and being 
so regarded, it might be held to justify the Executive in 
raising, without the consent of the assembly, taxes pre- 
viously granted ; — even though the latter step would be a 
more palpable violation of the constitution than the former. 
For since this step would be taken in order to defend the con- 
stitutional division of powers, its conservative intent might be 
so widely held to justify its revolutionary character that the 
unconstitutional taxes would be paid without serious resist- 
ance. Whether this would or would not be the case cannot 
be predicted from a mere study of the form of government : 
it must depend on the actual condition of public opinion in 
the community in which the experiment is tried. 

So again: where the Executive has the power of 



IJ 636 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS cha 

L 

# adding new members to the Senate vdthout a definii 

j limit of number/ it may fairly be contended that it 

the constitutional duty of the Executive to select the persoi 
^^ generally best qualified to be senators, and that it woul 

J therefore be a palpable misuse of the power if an unusual] 

^ large addition were made to the Senate in order to obtai 

a majority in favour of a particular measure ; and if tl 

Senate were strong in prestige and popularity, public opinio 

\ might support it in treating this use of the {>ower of tb 

Executive as a disorderly proceeding, and meeting it with 
{ novel resistance. 

Similarly, in any constitution, encroachments by on 
organ of government at the expense of another, and consc 
quent changes in the distribution of power, will be prac 
tically possible in certain states of public opinion, and no 
possible in others : so that the actual distribution of poll 
tical power at any time cannot be determined from a mer 
knowledge of the legal structure of government. 

I have above taken cases of conscious and manifes 
1 encroachment. But it is to be observed that if the clause 

of the constitution are ambiguous, similar conflicts ma] 
'■ arise between different parts of the supreme Grovernmem 

without any intention of encroachment on either side ; eacl 
party being sincerely convinced that it is acting in accord 
ance with the design of the constitution. Now, if the func 
tion of interpreting the Constitution is definitely assignee 
to a particular organ, it may seem that, in such cases of dis 
pute, this organ must decisively determine the legal distri 
bution of power, though the customary or conventiona 
distribution may diverge from the legal. And if so, it maj 
seem that this organ, having the function of determining th( 
precise extent of the powers of other organs — and of its owi 
powers, — will be practically supreme, at least so far as the con 
stitution may at any time be regarded as practically perma 
nent. But the matter is not really so simple as this Let ui 
suppose, for definiteness, that the interpreting body is th< 
supreme court of judicature ; since such a court will, througl 

' As is the case in England with the House of Lords. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 637 

the professional training of its members, have an obvious fit- 
ness for the function of interpretation. In considering how 
this court will decide a constitutional dispute we have to 
distinguish between what the judges would decide as ex- 
perts, assumed to have the single-minded aim of performing 
properly the function assigned by the Constitution, and what 
they are likely to decide, assuming them to be average 
men, morally speaking, and accordingly actuated by mixed 
motives. 

So far as they decide as experts, they will be bound by 
recognised maxims of legal interpretation, applied to the 
clauses of the Constitution (if written), or to the precedents 
of constitutional practice ; thus they will obviously have no 
such liberty of deciding by their own judgment of what is 
best as a supreme legislature would hava On the other 
hand, it cannot be said that, whatever be the duty of the 
judges, they have clearly the 'powtr of deciding what they 
choose; for, even if their constitutional independence is 
duly secured, they will almost always be restrained by more 
than moral sanctions from a palpably perverse interpreta- 
tion. For firstly, the due independence of the judiciary is 
compatible with liability to impeachment for palpable breach 
of duty ; and if this liability be imposed, it is clear that 
the judges will act under the restraint of the fear of im- 
peachment. Secondly, even if they are constitutionally 
irremovable by impeachment or otherwise, the supreme 
court may be not constitutionally limited in numbers ; and 
in this case it will be possible for the legislature or the 
Executive to prevent or cancel a hostile decision of the 
court by adding new judges; and this measure, though 
semi-revolutionary, would be probably supported by public 
opinion, if provoked by a palpable breach of duty on the 
part of the existing judgea Finally, even if the court is 
constitutionally irremovable and absolutely limited in 
number, I conceive that it wiU be restrained from perverse 
interpretation by a special fear of provoking disorder; — 
that is, by a fear of provoking the other organs of govern- 
ment to revolutionary measures which the judges would be 



638 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS cha?. 



powerless to resist I have supposed that the judges are 
not dismissible by the Legislature or the Executive or — as 
in England — by both combined ; since no one would con- 
tend that judges so dismissible have supreme power aa 
interpreters of the Constitution.^ 

Finally, before concluding this discussion, I must notice 
another transfer of political power which may take place 
without disorder in a polity where the governed elect the 
governors — i.«. transfer to leaders of opinion outside the 
Grovemment, whose directions to the Grovernment are to 
some extent obeyed, from fear that otherwise they will use 
their influence over the electors to prevent the reappoint- 
ment of the governing persons. To what extent this 
transfer will take place we cannot tell from the form of 
the polity, but we must recognise that it wjay take place 
to an indefinite extent. 

§ 6. I have discussed at length the various points to be de- 
termined in seeking a precise answer to the question '' where 
supreme political power resides " in any State ; partly be- 
cause I think that they have not been adequately considei^ 
by Austin and other expositors of the modem doctrine of 
sovereignty, who usually appear to assume that the question 
always admits of a simple answer.^ My view, on the con- 
trary, is that in a modern constitutional State, political 
power that is not merely exercised at the discretion of a 
political superior, — and that must therefore be regarded as 
supreme or ultimate — is usually distributed in a rather com- 
plex way among different bodies and individuals ; though, 
as I have said, it is also important to bear in mind that 
from the mere form of government in any state we can 

^ In this case what actual judges are likely to decide must always be 
doubtful, since the force that the power of dismissal is likely to exexx^ise can- 
not be easily estimated. E.g. if a monarch alone can appoint or dismiss the 
members of the body that interprets the Constitution, this makes it more 
likely that they will decide in his favour a question disputed between 
him and Parliament ; but it is not therefore certain that they will do this 
in cases in wliich the judgment of unbiassed experts would clearly go the 
other way : since they will both themselves fear the censure of such experts, 
and expect the monarch to be more or less influenced by it. 
^ See Appendix A. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 639 

only conjecture very incompletely the actual distribution 
of the power of producing political efFecta 

My reasons for this view have been sufficiently explained 
in the preceding discussion ; but they will be further illus- 
trated by considering the question in relation to the forms 
of government which we have been chiefly led to contem- 
plate in our attempts at political construction. 

I. Let us first assume that the Constitution is what I 
have called flexible — ix, that there is no formal distinction 
between ordinary legislation and the process of changing the 
Constitution. Primd fcxie, in such a form of government 
supreme power rests with the ordinary legislature, as it can 
make any change in the Constitution, without regard to the 
wishes of any other body. But we have to recognise that 
this power is confined within limits by the fear of provoking 
disorder ; and in the case of a legislature that contains a 
representative assembly, it is, I conceive, ordinarily, limited 
by a clear, even if unexpressed, understanding that this part 
of the legislature shall not be deprived of its representative 
character. A state of opinion is indeed conceivable in 
which the English — or any similar — Legislature might 
abolish the representative character of the House of 
Commons by statute : but I conceive that such a change 
would, in any case, be regarded as a breach of established 
order. I shall assume, therefore, that however flexible a 
Constitution may be, its flexibility is limited by the condi- 
tion that elective organs must remain elective. The further 
limitations on its power will depend partly on the form of 
government, partly on other conditions which we will 
proceed to analyse, taking different cases. 

1. Suppose Simple Parliamentary Grovernment, with a 
single chamber appointed for a fixed period, the executive 
having no share in legislation. Here the chamber tnay be 
temporarily the sole possessor of supreme power — within 
the vague limits which it could not transgress without 
danger of causing disorder — but only if the members do 
not desire re-election ; so far as they desire re-election — 
whether on public or on private grounds — a share of 



640 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS ci 

supreme power will be possesaed by the electorate, in vii 
of their power of future dismissal. But the extent of 
electorate's power may vary very much with variations 
(1) the duration of Parliament, (2) the activity of the p 
tical consciousness of the electors, (3) their personal in 
pendence, (4) the possibilities of modifying the franch; 
It would be practically at the maximum if parliamei 
were annual, if all the electors had a continued acti 
interest in public aflairs, and were prepared at any momf 
to meet and vote resolutions or sign petitions, and if 
alterations of the franchise were practically available 
the interest of the party dominant in Parliament ; provid 
also that the l^islators could not personally influen 
the electors by hope or fear without losing more thronj 
general disapprobation than they would gain by bribe) 
and intimidation. But in any particular case it may 1 
indefinitely less than this.' 

Further, the influence exercised by leading men on tl 
people at large, or by committees of a party characte 
elected to watch legislation and advise the representative 
may give these individuals or bodies some power on 
Parliament, and therefore some share of supreme politic! 
power; though it will not diminish the political power ( 
the electorate — according to the view that we have been le 
to take of political power. 

2. If the Supreme Executive have the right of dissolvin 
Parliament, the power of the latter will be diminished i 
two ways : it will have less control over the executive, an 
will itself be more under the control of the electorate, I 
which appeal may be made at any moment 

3. Suppose Simple Parliamentary' Government with tw 
chambers formally co-ordinate in power. If they are bot 
elected, the share of power belonging to the electorate wi 
not be greatly affected by the duality of the chambeta ] 

' On the other haod, if the eleotorkta had the conatitutional right to 00 
trol by binding reaolutions the MtioD of Herabere of ParUament, it won 
cle>rl; have ths Bupreme power. But wa should hardly call tbia Parli 
nuDtary OoTenuneot. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 641 

one chamber were hereditary or co-optative, then its power — 
if the two were really co-ordinate — would be equal to that of 
the electorate and the elected chamber taken together, within 
the limits imposed on Parliament by the fear of provoking 
disorder, if these limits could be definitely known ; but as 
they cannot be definitely known, the elected chamber is 
likely always to have more weight, whenever the danger of 
disorder comes into consideration at all, because the physical 
force of the mass of the people is likely to be on its side. 

But a further consequence follows from the duality 
of the chambers : the legislative body formed by the two 
chambers is not " completely capable of corporate action ; " 
it can only control the Executive by fresh legislation if the 
two chambers agree, and a minority of the whole body — i.e. 
somewhat more than half the members of either chamber 
— suflSces to prevent such agreement. Hence the power of 
the Executive is increased, though precariously : it becomes 
independent within the limits of the existing law and any 
further limits imposed by the known opinions of the elec- 
torate, so long as the two chambers do not agree. 

So far as the two chambers are not really co-ordinate, 
the distribution of power will be further varied. 

4. Suppose the Executive has an effective absolute veto 
on legislation and is imdismissible by the Legislature : then 
it has independently of the Legislative power given it by 
the existing law, except so far as it is restrained by the fear 
(1) of provoking disorder, or (2) of the refusal of supplies 
by the Legislature. The extent of the latter restraint 
will depend, as we have seen, partly on the completeness 
of the control over the taxes which the constitution gives 
to the legislature, partly on the state of public opinion. If, 
again, the Executive has a qualified veto, capable of being 
over-ridden by a two-thirds majority of the legislature; 
then its power — though it may at any given time be as 
great as if it had an absolute veto — is necessarily more 
precarious, and fluctuates with the state of parties in 
Parliament. 

II. Let us now assume that the legislature is controlled 

2t 






642 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS CH 

j by a rigid constitutiou, not capable of being altered exa 

by consent of the electorate. Then two fresh consideratic 
^ affect the distribution of political power: the mode 

altering the constitution, and the mode of interpreting 
If any change supported by a considerable body of citize 
must necessarily be brought before the electorate for decisic 
and might be carried by a bare majority of voters, t 
electorate would be undoubtedly supreme ; but it would 
f* misleading to call it sovereign, without qualification, unle 

i it could decide all matters by a bare majority ; since, : 

I proportion as the majority required for making constiti 

tional changes is increased, an increasing share of power 
k.: left, though precariously, to the ordinary legislature. 

If, on the other hand, changes in the constitution ca 
only be initiated by Parliament, the distribution of pow^ 
between Parliament and the electorate at any given tim 
will be practically the same as if the constitution wei 
flexible, within the limits fixed by the constitution : onlj 
in proportion to the difficulty of formally altering th 
constitution, both Parliament and the electorate will b 
restrained l)y the action of their predecessora 

In any case, the greater the difficulty of altering th 
constitution, the more important becomes the question o 
its interpretation. 

1. If an elected Legislature is the authorised inter 
preter, the constitutional restraint on legislation become 
insignificant, so far as the meaning of the rules is am 
biguous; since we may assume that the legislature wil 
decide doubtful points in favour of its own powers an< 
aims. But we cannot assume that an express and clea 
constitutional nile will Ixi disregarded either by th( 
legislature or by the electonite. Such a perversion of tht 
function of interpretation might no doubt occur ; but i 
would be disorderly, and would go far to justify tht 
resistance that it would be likely to provoke. 

2. This is still more clear if the interpretation of th< 
constitution is entrusted to an adequately independen 
judiciary : as the professional function of judges is t 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 643 



interpret faithfully rules of law, it would be a still more 
palpable and inexcusable breach of duty on their part to 
pervert the plain meaning of the constitution* Neverthe- 
less, so far as the meaning of any constitutional rule is 
ambiguous, the interpretative function will give them a 
limited power of practically determining it.^ 

3. If the interpretation of the constitution is entrusted 
to a body of judges whose conditions of appointment and 
removal are cedculated to impair their independence, the 
power normally connected with the interpretative function 
is liable to be partly transferred to the organ or organs that 
appoint or remove the judges. This transfer, however, is of 
the kind that I have regarded as essentially disorderly, as 
it depends on an actual or expected misuse of the power of 
appointment and removal 

To carry the analysis further would be easy but tedious : 
as enough has been said to show clearly the complex and 
varying manner in which supreme political power tends to 
be distributed, in the different forms of constitutional 
government that we have occasion practically to consider. 

§ 7. I have spoken of the power exercised on govern- 
ment by the fear of violent disorder as belonging to the 
"mass of the people." In using this phrase I have 
not intended to imply that different sections of the people 
are formidable in proportion to their nimibers : or that when 
appeal is made to physical force, the victory is certain to 
rest with the nimierical majority. This seems, indeed, to 
be vaguely assumed in some arguments for pure demo- 
cracy ; but there is no ground for assuming more than 
that numbers vdll prevail other things being equal ; and in 
fact other things never are equal Some members of 
a community always greatly surpass others in fighting 
force, either through physical strength and endurance, or 

^ Accordingly Mr. Dicey says {Law of the ConstitrUian, p. 165, 4th 
ed.) that in a confederation like the United .States *' the bench of judges is 
not only the guardian but also at a given moment the master of the con- 
stitution." The phrase, however, seems to me too strong, — in view of the 
considerations above urged (pp. 637, 638). 



6xi ELEMESJ- CF P CLITICS CH.\: 

viji/:r ■>! r-^rolutxon. or habits of ccHoperation, or ski 
■i'ir: to •..-liLi:;^ and prdCtic*-. or the pcwer to pardu: 
Wrsaporj", 

Thi* i- in-ietir*] rei.offnised by tbcee advocates of d* 
in«'xr4.v -aK ■ -.vish to confine the franchise to male adulu 
th-y :;:ik- 1 pTiint of iirrrinj: that if it came to physics 
=tr-r:^':h th-f women would have to trive way. and iherefo! 
that a d'^mc^: ratio i«>vemment which might have a ar^ 
majority f»f iii»^n opposed to it would l« wanting in stabilii; 
There is s^irae fort-e in this argument : but in a civilis 
^y.'ietv th»r dirtVrrtrnce Vjetwetn s-^ldiers and ordinarv citize: 
ijB prjii.'tioally even more imprirtant ; since in any modei 
Stat*.- tlien- is more dan^r of a division of opinion or k 
aim'. \\\i'\xi'^ the maas of the army in opposition to tt 
civili^ius, thm there is of a similar opposition between li 
masiS of mvn and the mass of women. 

In fa'.t. if '\\\ a modem civilised state there is a standin 
army of ronriid^rable size — as large as the actual standio 
aniiie-? of the larger States of the continent of Europe- 
and if the re-t of the community are untrained in tt 
!Lse of arms and in military movements, it must be CA-iden 
that the action of the soldiers will l>e decisive in an 
civil conrii'.-t, unless a substantial \m\x\. of the army is o\ 
pos*fd to thn n^st. And owini; to tlie habit of prompt an 
unq nest if in iri:^' oWlieiice to sujx'rioi'S that is ordinarily 
maiiitain»fd in an armv — and must l:»e maintained if it is t 
\nt ♦iHi:ient — it is not unlikelv that the concert of a smal 
numb»;r of oriic<*rs of high p4.isition may determine th 
actitiii of the wliole armv, or at least of an overwludinin! 
majoritv of soldiijr-s. 

Hi;ri«e arisi's a serious danger to constitutional govern 
merit. Th«' U'st political method for meeting this seems to b 
a g»^ii»-ral military training of the citizens: s<> that thei> 
may hi? always a large pro[>ortion of them who, while no 
forming' jiart of the a^ tual standing army, are capible o 
IxMiig rapidly organised into an effective military force 
Other .vise the ir.esistibility of the army will be liable t( 

> Si.e chap. xx. § 4, pp. 385, 386. 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 645 

cause a strong temptation to use it to cut the tangled knot 
of a serious political dispute ; and the habitual consciousness 
that there exists in the state a power superior both to the 
law and to the popular will may materially interfere in 
various ways with the proper working of the constitution. 
At the same time even universal military training is liable 
to be of little avail at a crisis without arms and ammunition ; 
while, if we suppose these to be extensively possessed by 
ordinary citizens, the danger of violent civil strife would 
seem to be materially increased 

§ 8. The question remains, how far we may rely on 
constitutional or political morality, under such a form of 
government as I have gradually sketched out, to obviate 
the danger of violent disorder. And this leads us once 
more to the more general question of the right of insurrec- 
tion against an established government, which we already 
had occasion partially to consider.^ A legal or constitu- 
tional right of insurrection is an absurdity; but, in the 
present period of political thought, few would contest 
the moral right to resist and overthrow established rulers 
in extreme cases of misrule, under most forms of govern- 
ment; and, accordingly, I have assumed the existence of 
such a right in earlier chapters. Few, on the other hand, 
would deny that such attempts at resistance and revolution 
ought only to take place in extreme cases, when there 
appear to be no milder means available for remedying 
either grave practical misgovernment, or persistent deliberate 
violation of established and important guarantees for good 
government. In some arguments for democracy, however, 
it seems to be implied — I do not remember to have seen it 
expressly asserted — that when popular government is fully 
developed the right of insurrection must be held to have 
become obsolete ; on the grounds that the resistance of any 
part of a community to the " will of the whole " must be 
(1) immoral, owing to the indisputably superior right of 
the whole ; and (2) futile, owing to its irresistibly superior 
might. In either argimient there is an element of sound 

^ See chap. xiv. § 8, chap. xv. § 6, chap. xvi. § 6. 



646 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 

reason, but in both cases it is palpably inadequate to support 
the practical conclusion.^ 

Firstly, the community has, in my view, an indisputaUe 
right to impose on its members the observance of whatever 
rules it is conducive to the general happiness that they 
should be made to observa And if it is disputed what 
rules have this quality, there is a certain presumption, other 
things being equal, that the regulations preferred by the 
majority are more likely to be conducive to the general 
happiness than those preferred by the minority ; since, so 
far as each knows best and is most concerned to provide 
what tends to his own happiness, the alternative preferred 
by the larger number may, ceteris paribus, be expected to be 
productive of the larger amount of happinesa But where 
parties are nearly evenly divided, this presumption is 
obviously very slight; and even if the majority is more 
decided, the presumption may easily be overborne in parti- 
cular cases by other considerations. For those who form 
the minority may possess superior knowledge and foresight 
of consequences ; or the damage done to them by the regula- 
tions preferred by the majority may decidedly outweigh 
the gain to the latter; or, for some other reason, their immedi- 
ate or apparent interests may be more likely to coincide 
with the real ultimate interests of the whole conmiunity 
than the immediate or apparent interests of the majority. 

On one or other of these grounds the evils of insurrection 
may reasonably be thought to be outweighed by the evils of 
submission, when the question at issue is of vital import- 
ance, if the insurgents have a fair chance of maintaining an 
equal fight, or even sometimes if they can only give trouble 
enough to alarm the majority. Even the former supposition 
is not violently improbable, for, as we have already seen, the 
presumption that the preponderance of physical force will be 

* In the discussion that follows I omit, for simplicity, the consideration of 
cases in which, owing to a conflict among the recognised organs of supreme 
government, it is doubtful which of the contending parties really represents 
the established constitutional order. But we hardly hope that the most oare- 
folly devised constitutional arrangements can altogether prevent conflicts of 
this kind. 



XXXI so VEREIGNTY AND ORDER 647 

on the side of the majority is almost as slight as the pre- 
sumption that it will be in the right. It may, indeed, be 
said that an insurrection against a government supported by 
an organised democratic majority is, on the whole, likely to 
be more disastrous in its effects than an insurrection against 
a tyranniced monarchy or oligarchy ; since the latter may be 
brief and bloodless, owing to the manifestation of over- 
whelming physical force opposed to the government, whereas 
in the former case the rebels can at best expect a balanced 
conflict.^ But granting this, the conflict, though balanced, 
need not be prolonged ; for where there are solid reasons for 
insurrection, the manifest determination of the minority to 
fight may dispose the majority to a reasonable compromise ; 
since they may easily be less eager to oppress than the others 
to escape oppression. For this latter reason an insurrection 
may sometimes induce redress of grievances, even when the 
insurgents are clearly weaker in physical force ; since it 
may bring home to the majority the intensity of the sense 
of injury aroused by their actiona^ For similar reasons, 
again, a conflict in prospect may be anticipated by a 
compromise ; in short, the fear of provoking disorder may 
be a salutary check on the persons constitutionally invested 
with supreme power under a democratic as under other 
forms of government. 

I conceive, then, that a moral right of insurrection must 
be held to exist in the most popularly governed commimity. 
In saying this I do not mean to imply that this violent 
remedy ought to be, or is likely to be, brought into opera- 

^ This difference would not hold universally, even apart from the possi- 
bility of compromise ; since, on the one hand, habits of obedience, regard for 
legitimacy, and aversion to disorder, would often secure strong support even 
for a tyrannical and unpopular monarchy and oligarchy ; and, on the other 
hand, when there is a large standing army, a democratic government may be 
briefly and almost bloodlcssly overthrown by a military combination. But 
in the latter case the resulting government is not genendly likely to be stable 
or beneficent ; so that the bad consequences of the conflict are likely to be 
grave and profound, even though the conflict is brief. 

^ There is, I conceive, no presumption that superiority in intensity of con- 
viction wiU be found on the side of the majority ; the presiunption is rather 
the other way. 



648 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chap. 



tion frequently in a modem civilised society. In such a 
society, the interest of the citizens generally in the mainten- 
ance of order is so great, that the victims of democratic 
oppression will usually find resistance hopeless ; they will 
have to submit or depart with the best terms that they can 
obtain from the triumphant majority. Still I think it 
important to dispel the allusion that any form of govern- 
ment can ever give a complete security against civil war. 
Such a security, if attained, must rest on a moral rather than 
a political basis ; it must be maintained by the moderation 
and justice, the comprehensive sympathies and enlightened 
public spirit of the better citizens, keeping within bounds 
the fanaticism of sects, the cupidities of classes, and the 
violence of victorious partisanship ; it cannot be found in 
any indisputable right of a numerical majority of persons 
inhabiting any part of the earth's surface, to be obeyed by 
the minority who live within the same district 

Indeed, if the "divine right of majorities" was ever 
accepted as a rational basis for political construction, its 
application could hardly be made to depend on the estab- 
lished boundaries of actual states, in the determination of 
which historical accidents have played so large a part; 
while if it is applied without regard to these established 
boundaries, it would lead naturally to an indefinite dis- 
integration of political societies; since a faction that was 
in a minority in the whole state would probably be in a 
majority in some districts, and might accordingly, on this 
principle, claim to be governed according to its wishes in 
these districts. And, in fact, some of those who hold that 
a government, to be legitimate, must rest on the consent of 
the governed, appear not to shrink from drawing this infer- 
ence ; they appear to quahfy the right of the majority of 
members of a state to rule by allowing the claim of a 
minority that suffers from the exercise of this right to secede 
and form a new state, when it is in a majority in a con- 
tinuous portion of its old state's territory.^ 

* The right of disruption was peurtially considered in chap. xiv. § 3, but 
I there deferred the final discussion of it, because it seemed to mo then 



XXXI SOVEREIGNTY AND ORDER 649 

I have already suggested that a democratic state will 
naturally be disposed to concede local autonomy to its parts, 
to the utmost extent compatible with the interests of the 
whole; and I conceive that there are cases in which the 
true interests of the whole may be promoted by disruption. 
For instance, where two portions of a state's territory are 
separated by a long interval of sea, or other physical 
obstacles, from any very active intercommunication, and 
when, from differences of race or religion, past history or 
present social conditions, their respective inhabitants have 
divergent needs and demands in respect of legislation and 
other governmental interference, it may easily be inexpedient 
that they should have a common government for internal 
affairs ; while if, at the same time, their external relations, 
apart from their union, would be very different, it is quite 
possible that each part may lose more through the risk of 
implication in the other's quarrels, than it is likely to gain 
from the aid of its military force. Under such conditions 
as these, it is not to be desired that any sentiment of 
historical patriotism, or any pride in the national owner- 
ship of an extensive territory, should permanently prevent 
a peaceful dissolution of the incoherent whole into its 
natural parts. But to allow a general right of secession on 
the ground of its conduciveness to the interests of the 
seceders alone, would be inconsistent with the fundamental 
principles of political reasoning assumed throughout this 
treatise. And I may observe that if such a right be once 
admitted, I see no reason why its application should be 
limited by any consideration of the size or continuity of 
the territory in which the seceders were in a majority ; 
consistency seems to require us to allow the whole com- 
munity to be resolved into a congeries of separately governed 
groups, each member being free to select his own political 
government, without changing his residence, just as he is 
now free to select the ecclesiastical government that he will 

premature to explain exactly in what sense and with what qualifications I 
accept the proposition that the legitimacy of government depends on the 
consent of the governed. 



6SO ELEMENTS OF POLITICS chaf. x 

obey. For though the secession of any such group wo 
iafiict extreme inconvenience on the rest, it would of 
not iaflict more inconvenience than the aeparation o 
continuous portion of territory. E.g. if, in the time of 
Commune, a separation of Pahe &om France had b 
peacefully decreed by a majority of Communards, it wo 
have been aa great a blow to the national existena 
France as if the Froteatante throughout the country 1 
been allowed to live imder their own government. 

The su^estion just made may seem too absurd ; 1 
principles are often best tested by extreme cases. It 
important to see clearly that a form of government wh 
shall enable evei? one to " obey himself alone " is chimerii 
The coercion, by physical force in the last resort, of w 
inteationed adults, is an evil which we cannot hope 
eliminate by any constitutional reforms ; though to dimin 
it without sacrificing other benefits is doubtless among ' 
most legitimate and important aims whidi constltutio 
reformers can propose to themselvca 



APPENDIX (A) 

ON AUSTIN'S THEORY OF SOVEREIGNTY 

In chap. ii. of this book and the concluding chapter, taken 
together, I have put forward a view of the relation of Law to 
Government, and of Sovereignty or supreme political power, 
materially different from that which has for more than a genera- 
tion been widely accepted in England, under the influence of 
John Austin. In the first edition I included in chap. ii. a critical 
account of Austin's doctrine: but in revising the book for a 
second edition it seemed to me a mistake to introduce so much 
critical matter at so early a stage of the discussion. I therefore 
determined to transfer the main part of it to this Appendix, and 
at the same time make it somewhat more complete. 

Austin's view may be briefly stated thus : Every Positive 
Law of any State is a general command to do or abstain from 
certain acts, which is issued directly or indirectly by the Sovereign 
of the State to a person or persons subject to his authority : the 
Sovereign being that determinate person, or body of persons 
combing in a certain manner, that the bulk of the members 
of the State habitually obey, provided that he or it does not 
habitually obey any one else. It is implied in the conception 
of Sovereign that the community that has a Sovereign is inde- 
pendeni — ^in the sense that its government does not habitually 
obey a foreign power ; and orderly — in the sense that the bulk 
of the community habitually obey the laws. 

From this definition — together with the assumption that 
facts exist corresponding to the definition — two important 
consequences are inferred : 

(a) The power of the Sovereign cannot be legally limited — 
for, obviously, the Sovereign cannot be coerced to act in a 
certain way by any command of his own. 

(b) Sovereignty cannot, strictly speaking, be legally divided 



652 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

between two or more persons, or bodies of persons, acting 
separately : because any such persons or bodies must have, a 
hypothesi, powers legally limited in certain directions — ^there are 
certain things which each of them is by law prevented from 
doing : but, if so, they are in habitual obedience to the authority 
that laid down the law, and it is this latter that is the real 
Sovereign. 

E.g, in a federal state, such as the United States of America, 
sovereignty, strictly speaking, does not belong to the central 
government nor to the separate governments of the federated 
states ; but to the body, whatever it may be, that is recognised 
as having authority to alter the conditions of federation. 

Now this view of the relation of law to government does, no 
doubt, correspond primd facie to the facts existing in such a 
community as England is at the present day. The great bulk 
of Englishmen habitually obey the general directions as to their 
external conduct that are contained in Acts of Parliament : and 
though an important part of the laws applied — and occasionally 
modified — by the decisions of our judges is not derived from 
Acts of Parliament, still, the interference of Parliament by new 
statutes has long been so active in all departments of our law, 
that we may, without a very violent fiction, regard it as 
approving of whatever it does not abrogate or modifiy, and as 
approving the action of the judges in occasionally modifying 
law : and we incur at least no practically important error in 
saying, that any new laws that Parliament chose to lay down 
would be unquestionably adopted by our law-courts as the basis 
of judicial decisions. But if we regard Austin's theory as 
intended to represent the relation of what has been commonly 
recognised as Law to Government in human societies always 
and everywhere, it seems to me quite unacceptable. In 
arguing this it is not necessary to take into account states of 
society in which, as Maine points out,^ the social order is main- 
tained by customary rules, to which obedience is secured by 
forces other than political : i.e. by " partly opinion, partly super- 
stition, but to a far greater extent an instinct almost as blind 
and unconscious as that which produces some of the movements 
of our bodies." Even if we only consider communities, in which 
the '* law of the land " is administered by judges whose penalties 
constitute the most effective motive to its observance, it still 
does not follow that such law is generally conceived as a body 
of rules depending for its force on the approval of the supreme 
legislature. Thus at an earlier period of our own history law 

^ Maine, Early History of InstUutums^ Lee. xiii. p. 392. 



APPENDIX (A) 653 



was to an important extent conceived both by governors and 
governed as a subject of science, capable of being learnt by 
special study, but not capable of being altered by the mere 
arbitrary will of government, any more than the principles or 
conclusions of mathematics. 

During such periods in the history of progressive communi- 
ties important changes are continually taking place in law : but 
they are not mainly introduced in the way of conscious legisla- 
tion, but by the decisions of judges either (1) professing to 
interpret pre-existing rules of law, but really modifying them in 
order to adapt them to new circumstances, or (2) overruling 
them in conformity to a higher law as apprehended by the 
conscience of an enlightened and equitable judge. And I 
cannot admit that, as Austin and his followers contend, we may 
even in such periods legitimately regard the new elements of 
law as commands of the Sovereign, because we may fairly 
suppose the Sovereign to command whatever rules he allows his 
subordinates to apply. For (1) such a statement appears to me 
a misleading fiction, if it is clear that the supreme government 
was itself under the dominion of the ideas just described, and 
regarded law as something with which, to a great extent, it was 
beyond its province to interfere. And (2) even supposing that, 
in such periods, the supreme government would have been 
obeyed without a struggle, if it had gone beyond its recognised 
province and commanded what was contrary to the principles 
of civil justice generally accepted by judges and legal experts ; 
it still does not follow that such commands could at the time 
have been regarded as Laws. As Maine aptly reminds us, 
" the tyrant in a Greek city often satisfied every one of Austin's 
tests of sovereignty ; yet it was part of the accepted definition 
of a tyrant that he 'subverted the laws,'" whereas the true 
monarch governed according to law: and this distinction be- 
tween the tyrant and the true monarch was generally accepted 
by modern European thought in its earliest stage. But (3) we 
are not warranted in assuming that any commands of the (so- 
called) Sovereign would have been obeyed, even by its official 
subordinates. In what Austin and his followers say of '* habi- 
tual obedience," it seems often to be tacitly implied that such 
obedience is unconditional, or at least not definitely limited by 
generally recognised conditions : but as a matter of fact it has 
been so limited in European countries during the greater part 
of their history, and in most important ways. For instance, it 
is not only a true statement of the political ideas prevalent 
during the Middle Ages, to say that no governing individual or 



654 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

body, from the Emperor downwards, had more than limited 
powers : it was continually proved by experience to be a true 
statement of political Ja<i% also, since attempts made by govern- 
ing persons to exceed their powers were frequently resisted as 
illegitimate. And much later than the Middle Ages, in Catholic 
countries, the power of secular governments to interfere in the 
departments of civil conduct which the Church claimed to 
regulate was most effectually limited. It was commonly 
recognised that the spiritual and temporal power had respec- 
tively different spheres, and that each was supreme within its 
own sphere : and though the boundary between the two spheres 
was somewhat vague and continually disputed, there seems to 
have been always a point beyond which any attempted encroach- 
ment would have met with successful resistance, — ^the ecclesi- 
astical courts would have refused to recognise the validity of 
the secular law or edict : the bulk of the laity would have 
supported them in their refusal ; and the secular government 
would have had to give way. But if it be admitted that the 
obedience of subjects may be actually limited by distinctly 
recognised conditions, the proposition that the power of the 
Sovereign is not legally limited becomes insignificant : since it 
merely means that it is not limited by the Sovereign's own 
commands — which no one can ever have supposed it to be. 

It may be said, however, that in the cases to which I have 
referred, society was in a partially anarchical and disorderly 
condition : and that when, in the course of historical develop- 
ment, the stage of political order has been attained, Austin's 
analysis is found to apply : and that — speaking broadly and 
allowing (as Austin's phrases do) for the imperfections of all 
human institutions — this stage of orderliness has now been 
reached in modern communities generally. And it is certainly 
true that in most modern communities there is a determinate 
complex body of persons, which we may call the supreme 
legislature, recognised as having authority to make any change 
that it may think fit in the established law of the state ; and 
that whatever laws it may lay down are habitually obeyed by 
the bulk of the members of the community. But it still seems 
to me seriously misleading to say that the power of this 
legislature has ''no legal limits in modern states." Let 
us first take the case of a community where there are con- 
stitutional laws limiting legislative competence of the ordinary 
legislature. Here, in Austin's view, it is not the ordinary 
legislature that is sovereign, but the complex body that has 
the power of altering the Constitution. Now it is doubtless 



APPENDIX KA) 6S5 



true that the power of this complex body to make laws is in 
a sense legally unlimited, — %,e, it is not circumscribed by any 
legal rules ; but in another sense it has legal limits of great 
importance, since it is prevented from acting except under 
certain conditions by the legal rules determining its structure 
and procedure, these rules being in most cases such as to 
prevent any constitutional change unless there is a very 
decided preponderance of opinion in its favour. In chap. ii. 
I illustrated this latter kind of limitation by the example of 
the United States of North America : but I might equally well 
have selected any one of several European States. Let us 
take (t,g^ the Constitution of Belgium. A Belgian's rights to 
worship or not worship as he pleases, to start a school or a 
newspaper, to assemble without arms (if not in the open air), 
and the very important right of not being deprived of his 
property without compensation, are guaranteed by the Con- 
stitution, and cannot legitimately be impaired by ordinary 
legislation. The Constitution itself, however, is alterable by 
a process determined in the Constitution itself, of which the 
main points are (1) that no constitutional change can be made 
without a general election intervening between its commence- 
ment and its conclusion, so that two successive pairs of 
chambers must concur in it ; and (2) that when the change is 
finally passed, two-thirds of the members of each chamber must 
be present, and two-thirds of those present must vote for the 
change. Now surely it is misleading to say that there is in 
Belgium a sovereign with power legally unlimited, when the 
process of changing constitutional laws is hampered by these 
elaborate legal conditions ! 

The assertion is at first sight more plausible in such a 
case as that of England, where the ordinary process of legisla- 
tion is also the process by which the Constitution is changed. 
Here, however, there is another great difficulty in the way 
of the Austinian theory, arising from the elective character 
of the most important portion of the supreme legislature.^ 
For simplicity let us suppose that the aspirations of a demo- 
cratic section of English politicians have been realised, and 
that the power of Parliament is concentrated in the House 
of Commons — the House of Lords as well as the Crown 
being reduced to a nullity. Where then in England is 
the sovereign with power free from "legal limitation"? Is 
it the House of Commons, or is it the body of enfranchised 

^ This difficulty also exists in the case before discussed, but it was not 
necessary for my argument to refer to it. 



656 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

Englishmen that periodically elects its members f Austin 
shrinks from the paradox of affirming the former, which would 
compel him to view the government of England as an extremely 
narrow oligarchy : he cannot consistently affirm the latter, since 
it is obvious that no command of the electorate as such has any 
legal force : while at the same time he is precluded by hu 
conception of sovereignty from adopting the view that I have 
put forward in the concluding chapter — ^that supreme political 
power, in the case supposed, is shared between Parliament and 
the electorate. Consequently he is in an embarrassment which 
reveals itself in the following remarkable series of contradictory 
statements {Theory of Jurisprudence, vol. i. ch. vi. pp. 200-204). 

" In our own country, one component part of the sovereign 
or supreme body is the numerous body of the commons. . . . 
The commons exercise through representatives the whole of 
their sovereign powers; or they exercise through representatives 
the whole of their sovereign powers, excepting their sovereign 
power of electing and appointing representatives. . . . When a 
sovereign body exercises through representatives the whole of 
its sovereign powers, it may delegate those its powers to those 
its representatives 'in either of two modes,' that is, either 
' subject to a trust or trusts,' or ' absolutely and uncondition- 
ally.' . . . The commons delegate their powers to the members 
of the commons' house in the second of the above-mentioned 
modes : so that during the parliament ' the sovereignty is 
possessed by the king and peers, with the members of the 
commons' house, and not by the king and peers with the 
delegating body of the commons ' ; it is only when parliament 
is resolved that the ' delegated share in the sovereignty reverts 
to that delegating body.' Hence if the commons were sovereign 
without the king and the peers, their present representatives 
in Parliament would be the sovereign in effect or would possess 
the entire sovereignty free from trust or obligation. The 
powers of the commons are delegated so absolutely to the 
members of the commons' house that this representative 
assembly might concur with the king and the peers in defeat- 
ing the principal ends for which it is elected or appointed. It 
might concur, for instance, in making a statute which would 
. . . annihilate completely the actual constitution of the govern- 
ment, by transferring the sovereignty to the king or the peers 
from the tripartite body wherein it resides at present." 

That is, the electorate is a component part of the sovereign, 
and its election of representatives is only the adoption of a 
certain mode of exercising its powers: at the same time. 



APPENDIX {A) 657 



Parliament possesses sovereignty so completely that it can if 
it likes deprive the electorate altogether of its electoral 
function ! 

But this is not all. He goes on to say that though actually 
the commons delegate their powers absolutely or uncondition- 
ally, *'it is clear that they might delegate them subject to a 
trust or trusts." ..." Where such a trust is imposed by a 
sovereign or supreme body," it is — he goes on to say — " enforced 
by legal or by merely moral sanctions. The representative 
body is bound by a positive law or laws ; or it is merely bound 
by a fear that it may offend the bulk of the community, in case 
it shall break the engagement which it has contracted." The 
distinction is clear : but it would seem to be irrelevant to the 
present discussion, as we have just been told that Parliament 
possesses sovereignty "free from trust." However, much to 
our astonishment, Austin calmly adds : "I commonly suppose 
that the parliament for the time being is possessed of the 
sovereignty. . . . But, speaking accurately, the members of the 
commons' house are merely trustees for the body by which 
they are elected or appointed ; and consequently the sovereignty 
always resides in the king and the peers, with the electoral 
body of the commons." He goes on to say that such a trust is 
implied in the notions of delegation and representation : since 
"it is absurd to suppose that the delegating empowers the 
representative party to defeat or abandon any of the purposes 
for which the latter is appointed." 

It would seem, then, that — supposing the peers and the 
Crown out of the way — the electorate is sovereign, and at the 
same time the House of Commons is sovereign ; that sovereignty 
always resides in the electorate, and at the same time only 
reverts to it when Parliament is dissolved ; that the House of 
Commons possesses the entire sovereignty free from trust or 
obligation, and at the same time the members of the House of 
Commons are merely trustees for the electorate. This is 
certainly an extraordinary combination of statements to be 
made by a writer who always affects elaborate precision of 
thought and expression I 

If, indeed, in saying that the House of Commons "might 
concur with the king and the peers " in destroying the repre- 
sentative element of Parliament, Austin means to imply that 
Parliament could pass a statute to this effect, against the wish 
of the electorate, and yet retain the " habitual obedience " of 
Englishmen — then I can see no valid ground for his hesitation 
to attribute sovereignty to Parliament. If there is really reason 

2 U 



658 ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 

to believe that, after such a transformation of their Govern- 
ment, Englishmen would merely grumble and submit, and go 
on paying their taxes, Rousseau's assertion that the English 
people is only free at election times would be difficult to con- 
trovert, since even this transient freedom would be only enjoyed 
by favour of king, lords, and 670 oligarchs euphemistically 
called '* commons." But if, as I venture to hold, it is more 
probable that the Government that forced this transformation 
on an unwilling people would rapidly cease to be a government 
through a general refusal of obedience, then the statement that 
the power of Parliament is " legally unlimited " is — not exactly 
imtrue but — trivial and insignificant : since the habitual obedi- 
ence on which this power depends is limited by a definitely 
understood condition, the recognition of which is as habitual 
as the obedience. 

And, if it be admitted that the English Parliament prac- 
tically " cannot " deprive the electorate of their electoral rights, 
further limitations of this power, involved in the exercise of 
their practically indefeasible right, must be admitted also. 
These cannot, indeed, be stated with perfect exactness, since 
they depend on the efficacy of the " fear of dismissal," regarded 
as a motive influencing legislators ; and this is very different 
with different legislators and different constituencies. It would 
be going too far to say that Members of Parliament in England 
are in "habitual obedience" to their constituents. But it 
would be, on the whole, less misleading to say this than to 
make no distinction between the effect of this "fear of dis- 
missal " and that of the fear of disapproval and dislike, to which 
the most absolute despot is exposed. My friend Mr. Dicey 
has tried (Law of the ConstittUiany chap, i.) to represent the facts 
by a dual application of the term "sovereign" — saying that 
Parliament is the "legal sovereign," and the electorate the 
" political sovereign " ; and if it is desired to retain the word 
" sovereign " in legal exposition and discussion, and at the same 
time to i^se it in a fruitful analysis of political facts, I know 
no better device than Mr. Dicey's for avoiding the embarrass- 
ments in which Austin is entangled. But it must be observed 
that this new view of a double sovereign differs essentially from 
the traditional doctrine, handed down to Austin from Bodin 
and Hobbes, — since it was a cardinal point in that doctrine 
that there could be only one sovereign in a State : and the con- 
venience of using the same term to express two such very 
different kinds of power seems to me highly dubious. 



INDEX 



Abobioinbs and Colonists, 321-7 
Active consent of citizens in Qovem- 

ment, 610-3 ; 615 
Administrative Courts, 505-7 
Aliens : admission of, 307-9 

: treatment of, 247-251 
Animals : property in, 74-5 
Annoyance : mental, protection from, 

65-6 
Appeal : right of; 502-4 
Appointment of Government officials, 

415-8 
Appropriation, 68-70 

of animals, 74-5 

of land, 72-4 ; 77 

of material things, 70-2 

of minerals, 75-7 

of vegetable products, 74 
Arbitration, 263-6 ; 295-6 
Areas for Local Government, 515-6 
Aristocracy, 608 
Aristocratic Element in Representative 

Government, 616-9 
Aristotie's Classification of Govern- 
ments, 604-6 
Armies : standing, 644-5 
Assembly, Legislative : size oi^ 405-6 
Associations, Religious : bequests to, 
587-8 

: privileges o^ 585-6 

: relation to SUte, 212-6 ; 583-8 

: subventions to, 586 

: Voluntary : moral coercion by, 
577-581 

: powers of, 673-4 

: quasi-govemment of, 572-3 

: relation to Government, 572-588 
Austin : his conception of Government 
and Law, 27, 29, and Appendix 

: on Sovereignty, Appendix 

Baobhot : on Parliamentary Heads of 
Departments, 446 
: on Presidential government, 451-3 



Bain : on Logic of Politics, 18-9 
Ballot, 382 

Bankruptcy, 93 ; 157 ; 383, noU 
Basis of International Duty, 237-246 
Belgium : constitution of; Appendix, 

655 
Belligerents: mutual duties of, 267- 
273 
: relations to neutrals, 273-6 
Bentham : fundamental propositions, 
11-12 
: on humiliating punishments, 121 
: on intestate inheritance, 105-8 
: on limitation of bequest, 104 
: principle of utilitarian politics, 609 
Bequest : late growth of, 99 
limitations of, 100-5 
right of, 52-3 ; 70 ; 98-100 
to Religious Associations, 587-8 
Blackstone : on Law of Nature, 22 
Blockade, 275 

Bluntschli : on ultimate end of govern- 
ment, 39 
: on trial by Jury, 494 
Boycotting, 578-581 
Breach of Contract, 61 
Bribery, 380-1 

: of Legislators by Executive, 462-4 

Cabinet, 422-7 ; 435-6 ; 443-4 

: Government : defects of, 444-7 
Censure : moral, 209-211 
Central and Local Government, 364 
Centralisation : advantages of, 523-4 
Chambers, Legislative, number of, 466-7 

: different functions of, 478-9 
Changes in International Law, 292-5 

: in Taxation, 197 
Children : care of, 56 ; 140-1 
Choice of Representatives, 557-8 
Churches : bequests to, 587-8 

: privileges of^ 585-6 

: relation to State, 212-6 ; 583-8 

: subventions to, 586 



66o 



ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



Citizeus, 387-8 

: active consent in Government, 
584-6 ; 589 

: political equality ot, 587-9 
Civil actions, 499 

and constitutional rights, 85-7 

Service Appointments : selection for, 
415-8 

: tenure of, 420-2 

war : intervention of foreign States 
in, 258-262 

: regulation of, 276-8 
Classification of Governments, 604-622 
Codification of Laws, 848 
Coercion : moral, 64-6 ; 577-581 
CognoscibUity of Laws, 337-340 
Collective ownership, 96-7 
Collectivism, 158-9 
Colonies : G<>vemment of, 546-550 
Colonisation, 313-4 ; 318-321 
Colonists and Aborigines, 321-7 ; 549- 

550 
Committees of Legislative Assembly, 

466 
Comparison of Greek City -State and 

West-European State, 622 
Compensation, for private wrong, 48 ; 
114-7 ; 120-2 

: for breach of contract, 94 ; 120-1 

: for Government interference, 187- 
199 
Competitive Examination, 416-7 
Compulsory Military Service, 173-4 ; 
644-5 

cession of territory, 279-282 

purchase of land, 191-3 
Confederation of States : characteristics 
of, 537 

: compared with Federal State, 538-9 

: transitional nature of, 544 
Conquest: expansion of territory by, 

309-312 
Constituencies : relations to Repre- 
sentatives, 553-8 
Constitution : flexible, 561 

: modifications of, 559-562 

: of Belgium, Appendix, 655 

: perversions of, 633-6 

: rigid, 562-9 
Constitutional Freedom, 46 ; 375-6 

Law 25-9 

Monarchy, 427-8; 437-442; 447-451 
Consuls, 334 
Contraband of War, 273 
Contract, 83-6 

and limited liability, 97 

: breach of, 61 ; 93-5 

: conditions of enforcement, 85-90 



Contract : importance of^ 82-3 

: limitations of enforcement^ 94-5; 

157 
: one-sided, 95-6 

Contracts between States, 257-8 ; 279- 
283 

Control of Police, 620 

Copyrights, 51 ; 78-9 ; 157 

Councils : consultative, 419-420 

Court of Appeal, 562-3 

Crime : punishment of^ 110-4 ; 122-5 

Criminal actions, 499-502 

Criminals : extradition of, 250-1 

Criticism of Government, 570-1 

Damaqbs, 114-122 

Dangers of over-centralisation, 512-3 
Defects of Cabinet Government, 444-7 
Degressive taxation, 182 
Delegates, 554-6 
Demagogy, 380-1 

Democracy : fundamental principles o( 
610-6 

: interpretation of, 609-610 
Democratic element in Representative 

Government, 616-9 
Departments of Executive, 408-415 

: heads of; 419-420 ; 422-6 ; 433-4 
Dependencies, 531 ; 544-550 
Development of Law, 202-4 
Disruption : right of, 226-9 ; 648-650 
Dissolution of Parliament, 434-6 ; 489- 

441 ; 454-5 
Distribution of political power, 628- 
638 

of voting power (unequal), 388-394 
Divergencies in laws, local, 233-6 
Division of functions between Central 
and Local Governments, 513-525 

of Politics, 15-7 
Divisions, electoral, 394-9 
Dominion over sea, 252-3 
Dual party organisation, 593-603 
Duration of Parliaments, 656-7 

Educative efi'ects of Representative 

Government, 874-7 
Election, indirect, 403-4 ; 475 
Electoral divisions, 394-9 
Electorate : constitution of; 383-8 
Eligibility for Legislature, 400-1 
Emigration, 814-321 
End of Govemraent, 38-9 
Endowment of Churches, 586 
Enforcement of Contract, 85-95 ; 157 
English Constitutional Monarchy, 

426-8 ; 432-442 
Equalisation of opportuniUes, 162-3 



INDEX 



66i 



Equality (political) of citizens, 613-6 

of taxation, 179-184 
Ethical Socialism, 42 
Executive : appointment of, 415-8 ; 
422-6 ; 487-443 ; 447-454 
: departments of, 408-415 
: duties of, 834-5 ; 845-7 
: in foreign affairs, 352-3 ; 461-2 
: officials of, 412-8 ; 462-3 
: relation to Justiciary, 355 ; 358-860 
: relation to Legislature, 847>354 ; 

360-2 
Supreme, 422-6 ; 487-454 

and taxation, 335-6 ; 449 ; 459 
: legislative functions of, 455-7 
: extra-legal action of, 457 
: ordinances of, 456 
: relation to Legislature, 429-464 ; 
565 
Expansion of territory by conquest, 

309-312 
Expatriation, 225 ; 231 ; 247 
Extradition, 250-1 

Faction, 590 ; 598-600 
Family rights and duties, 56-8 

and bequest, 100-1 
Federalism : advantages of, 542-3 

: disadvantages of, 543-4 

: transitional nature of^ 544 
Federodistj The : on Faction, 590 
Federal State : characteristics of, 582-7 

: compared with Confederation of 
SUtes, 538-9 

: compared with Unitary State, 532-7 

: oiigin of, 531-2 ; 542 

: relation ofpartstowholein, 532-7 ; 
541 

Union : reasons for forming, 542-8 
Federation of West European States, 

218-9 
Female Suffrage, 385-7 ; 644 
Fiduciary ownership, 101-2 
Financial department of Government : 

necessity for, 335-6 ; 349-350 
Flexible Constitution, 561-2 
Foreign affairs : Executive in, 352-3 ; 
461-2 

: influence of L^islature on, 461-2 
Formation of parties, 591-5 
Franchise, restrictions of, 378-887 
Freedom and Utility, 45-55 

: as ultimate end of Qoremment, 
44-55 

: civil and constitutional, 46 ; 875-6 

of Press, 569-570 

of Speech, 570-1 
Free Trade, 302-7 



French Law of Bequest, 100-1 
Functions of Senate and House of 

Representatives, 469-473 ; 478-480 
Fusion of Aristocracy and Democracy 

in Representative Government, 616-8 

Gbnebal principles of Legislation, 33- 

43 
(German Constitutional Monarchy, 

427-8; 447-451 
Gerrymandering, 399 
Goodwill of a business, 80 
Government : active consent of citizens 
in, 610-3 ; 615 

and Churches, 212-6 ; 583-8 

and Law, 19-80 ; 38-5 

and teaching of mondity, 212-5 

: criticism of, 570-1 

: end of, 87-9 

of colonies, 546-550 

: ownership of land by, 175 

: paternal, 41 ; 132-142 

: races without, 2-3 

: relation to Voluntary Associations, 
572-588 

: sectional, 528-9 
Governmental interference, chaps, iv.-x. 

: individualistic, 40-3 ; 55-136 

: paternal, 136-142 

: socialistic, 42 ; 143-168 
Governments : classification of, 604-622 
Greek City-State and West European 

State compared, 622 

Happiness : as end of Government 

38-9 
Hare : on representation of minorities, 

394-6 ; 398 
Heads of Departments, 419-420 ; 422-6 ; 

433-4 
Hereditary element in Parliamentar}- 
Government, 476-7 ; 619-622 

: Monarch, 427-8 ; 437-442 ; 447-451 

: Senate, 476-7 
Hobbes : on Civil Freedom, 45 
Hume : on object of Government, 17 

Incidence of Taxation, 184-6 
Increase of population, 316-7 
Indigence : relief of, 164-7 
Indirect Election, 403-4 ; 475 

Taxation, 183-5 
Indirectly Individualistic Interference 

129-136 
Individualism : assumptions of, 144-5 

: definition of, 42-7 ; 58 

: examination of, 44-58 



662 



ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



IndividnaliBm : theoretical limitations 

oi; 136-7 ; 146-161 ; 164 
Individualistic Minimum, 55 ; 59-60 
Inheritance, 98-108 

: taxation of, 185-6 
Initiative : right of^ 554 
Iigury : physical, protection from, 47 ; 

60 
Insurrection, right of^ 645-8 
Interference, Governmental : principles 
of; compared, 40-3 ; 143-5 

: compensationfor, 178-180; 184-190 

: indirectly individualistic and 
paternal, 129-186 

: paternal, 136-142 

: socialistic, 143-168 
International duty : basis of, 237-244 

Law : changes in, 292-6 

: and Morality, 284-*296 

: duty of conformity to, 297-9 

: Ideal and Actual, 290-1 

: sanctions of, 285-6 
Intervention of foreign States in civil 

strife, 260-2 
Intestate Succession, 105-8 
Intimidation, 64-5 

: of electors, 380-2 

JUDQB-MADE Law, 21 ; 202-3 ; 840-1 ; 

483-4 
Judges : tenure of office by, 488-9 
Judiciary : arbiter between Executive 
and Legislature, 563-4 
: functions of, 481-4 
: lay element in, 490-9 
: necessity for, 20 ; 338 
: relation to Executive, 354-5 ; 358- 

360 
: relation to Legislature, 355-6 ; 
362-3 ; 482-4 
Jury : trial by, 491-9 

Laisser fairk, 40-1 ; 44-58 

: assumptions of; 144-5 

: limitations of, 136-7 ; 146-151 
Land : compulsory purchase of, 191-3 

: private property in, 72-4 ; 76-7 

: taxation of, 185 
Law : actuad and ideal, 221 

: criterion of gooduess of, 37-9 

: definition of, 20 ; 30 ; 33 

: development of, 202-4 

: International : basis of, 237-244 

: Judge-made, 21 ; 202-3 ; 340-1 ; 
483-4 

: of Nature, 22 ; 243 

: positive, 22 ; 24 
Law Council, 482-3 



Laws : codification of^ 343 
: cognoscibility of, 837-340 
: local divergencies in, 233-6 
Lawyers: their share in legisUtioiw 

368-870 
Leagues : political, 591 
Legal Right and Obligation, 30-2 
Legislation : basis of, 39-48 
definition oi; 357-8 
general principles of; 37-43 
intervention of people in, 558-5(K) 
localised, 521-5 
popular initiative in, 554 
ultimate end of; 37-9 
Legislative Assembly: committees ol^ 406 
: power over its members, 435-6 
: quorum of, 407 
: size of, 405-6 
Legislature : constitution of, chaps, xx. 
and xxiiL 
: identity with money - granting 

organ, 350 
: influence in foreign affairs, 461-2 
: legal restraints on ordinary, 480 ; 

484-5 ; 560-9 
: necessity for, 337-343 
: relation to Executive, 347-354 ; 
860-2 ; 429-464 ; 565 

: relationtoJudiciary, 355-6; 362-8; 
482-4 

: sessions of, 456-8 
Libel, 62-3 ; 342 
Liberty, su Freedom 
Limited Liability, 97 

ownership and Bequest, 102 
Limitations of Enforcement of Contract, 
94-5; 157 

of right of bequest, 100-5 
Loans, 177 
Local divergencies in laws, 233-6 

expenditure, 517-9 ; 527-8 
Local Government : areas of, 515-7 

: definition of, 511 

: functions of, 517-525 

: reasons for, 512-4 

: relation to Central Government, 
364 ; 514 ; 517-525 

: structure of, 525-6 
Local L^islation, 521-5 
Locke on property in land, 50 ; 72 
Lunatics : care of, 141 

: support of, 519 

Madison : on Faction, 590 
Maine : on Austin's tests of sove- 
reignty, Appendix, 653 

: on Brehon Law, 204 

: on customary law. Appendix, 652 



INDEX 



663 



Maine : on Roman criminal jurisprnd- 

ence, 117 
Marine dominion of States, 252-3 
Marriage, 66-7 
Maximum Happiness : as end of GU>- 

vemment, 88-9 
Meetings : unlawftil, 576-7 
Membership of a ^tate, 230-2 
Mental Annoyance, protection from, 65-6 
Method of Politics, 7-15 

: historical, 7-10 
Military Service, 173-4 

Tribunals, 507 
Mill, J. S. : Individualistic assumption 
of, 12-8 

: on dangers of a single-chambered 
Legislature, 430-1 

: on intestate inheritance, 106-7 

: on limitation of bequest, 104 

: on qualifications of legislators, 
368-9 

: on social feeling, 42 

: on the method of politics, 5-6 ; 12 
Minerals : property in, 75-7 
Minorities : representation ot, 394-9 
Misrepresentation, 62-3 ; 88-90 
Modem classification of Governments, 

607-8 
Modification of Constitution, 561-2; 

565-6 
Monarch : functions of; 437-442 ; 447- 
451 

: hereditary, 442-3 
Monarchical element in modem govern- 
ments, 619-622 
Monarchy, constitutional : English and 

German types, 427-8; 437-442; 

447-451 
Monopolies, 149 ; 582 
Montesquieu : on the Judicature, 355 
Moral censure, 209-211 

code : and positive morality, 23 

coercion, 64-5 ; 577-581 

praise, 211-2 
Morality: governmental teaching of, 
212-6 

: influence on legislation, 206-8 

: compared with Law, 204-6 

: practical relations to Law, 206-412 

Nation and State, 220-5 
National character, 13-4 
Nature : Law of, 22 ; 243 

: state of, Hobbes's view, 45 
Negligence, 115-6 
Neutrals in war, 273-6 
New States : recognition of, 259-60 
New territory : occupation of, 253-6 



Non-combatants : treatment of, 268-9 ; 
270-1 

Obuoation and Right, 30-2 
Occupation of new territory, 253-6 
OflSdals : appointment of, 415-8 
Oligarchical element in Representative 

Government, 618 
Oligarchy, 604-6 ; 608 
Opportunities : equalisation of; 162-8 
Ordinances of Executive, 456 
Over-centralisation : dangers of, 512-3 
Ownership : collective, 96-7 

: fiduciary, 101-2 

: limited, 102 

Palst : on Hobbes's view of Freedom 
46 

: on the Judicature, 355-6 
Parliamentary Government, 429-447 

Executive, 432-4 
Parliament : power of English, 28, and 

Appendix, 656-8 
Parliaments : duration of; 556-7 
Parties : dual organisation of, 593-603 

: formation of, 591-5 
Patents, 51 ; 78-9 ; 342 
Paternal Government, 41 ; 132-142 

Interference, 132-142 
Pensions, bribery by, 463 
People: intervention in legislation, 
554-660 

: political power of, 630-3 
Periodical Executive, 451-4 
Permanent Heads of Departments, 433 
Personal Rights, 47-8 
Physical iiyury, 47 ; 60 
Pledges of Representatives, 557 
Police : control of, 620 
Political Leagues, 591 

offenders : extradition of; 250-1 
Political power: distribution of; 626-648 

: in abeyance, 629 ; 633 

: meaning of, 623-5 

: of people, 630-3 

: unconscious exercise o^ 630-2 
Politics : divisions, 15-7 

: formal 18-9 

: fundamental conceptions, 18-32 

: method, 7-15 

: relation to Political Economy, 3 

: relation to Sociology, 2-3 ; 5-6 

: scope, 1-7 
Poor Relief, 164-7 ; 519 
Population : increase of; 316-7 
Positive Law, 22 ; 24 

Morality, 23 

: compared with law, 204-6 



664 



ELEMENTS OF POLITICS 



Post Office, 345 ; 347 

Power, Political, 626-643 

Praise : moral, 211-2 

Precautions against wrongs, 129-180 

Preparation for war, 301 

President, 443 ; 451-4 

Presidential system, 451-4 

PresM : freedom of, 569-570 

Prime Minister, 426-7; 435-6 

Primogeniture, 108 

Principles of Democracy, 610-6 

of Legislation, 37-43 
Prisoners of war, 270 
Private property, 49-51 ; 67-81 
Privateering, 270 
Property : in animals, 74-5 

: in land, 72-4 ; 76-7 

: in minerals, 75-7 

: in vegetable products 74-5 

: origin of, 71-2 

: right of, 67-70 

: seizure in war, 270-3 
Public Prosecutor, 500 
Punishment : degree of, 122-3 

: disabling, 122 

: machinery for, 522-3 

: reformatory, 122 

: retributive, 110-4 
Purchase of laud : compulsory, 191-3 

QuASi-GOVERNMEKT of Voluntary Asso- 
ciations, 572-3 
Quorum of Legislative Assembly, 407 

Recognition of new States, 259-260 
Referendum, 554 ; 559-560 
Regulation of War, 263-283 
RclatiouH between colonists and abo- 
rigines, 321-7 ; 549-550 
between Executive and Judiciarj-, 

355; 358-360 
between Executive and Legislature^ 

347-354 ; 360-2 ; 429-464 ; 565 
between Judiciary and Legislature, 

355-6 ; 362-3 ; 482-4 
between representatives and consti- 
tuencies, 553-8 
Relief of Indigence, 164-7; 519 
Religious Associations ; bequests to, 
587-8 
: privileges of, 585-6 
: relation to State, 212-6 ; 583-8 
: subventions to, 586 
Reparation, 120-2 

and Punishment, 110-2; lU-120; 
125 
Representation of minorities, 394-9 



Representative €k>vemment, 871-3 ; 
616-8 

: educative effect of^ 374-7 

: ftision of Aristocracy and Demo- 
cracy in, 616-8 
Representatives as delegates, 554-6 

: choice of, 555-8 

: pledges of^ 557 

: relation to constitaenciea, 553-8 
Resistance to OoTemment offidals, 

170-2 
Retaliatory duties on imports, 305 
Retributive Punishment, 110-4 
Right and obligation, 30-2 

of Appeal, 502-4 

of Bequest, 52-3 ; 70 ; 98-100 

: late growth of, 99 

: limitations of, 100-5 

of contract, 54 ; 83-5 

of Disruption, 226-9 ; 648-650 

of Inheritance, 98-108 

of Insurrection, 645-8 

of Property, 67-70 
Rights : civil and constitutional, 35-6 

: family, 56-8 

: in personam^ 83-4 

: in renit 83-4 

: personal, 47-8 

: remedial, 37 
Rigid Constitution, 560-6 
Roads : maintenance of, 517 
Rousseau : on legislative power and 
general will," 360-1 



(i 



Sanctions of International Law, 285-6 

Sanitation, 518 

Scope of Politics, 1-7 

Sea : dominion over, 252-3 

Secession : right of, 225-9 

Sectional Government, 528-9 

Seizure of property in war, 270-3 

Selection for Civil Service Appoint- 
ments 415-8 

Semi-public Institutions, 345-6 

Senate : advantages of, 466-8 
: appointment of, 473-8 
: functions of, 467-8 ; 478-9 
: hereditary, 476-7 
: powers of, 469-473 
: relation to House of Representa- 
tives, 468-473 

Sessions of Legislature, 456-8 

Simple Constitutional Monarchy, 447. 
451 
Parliamentary Government, 430-4 

Slander, 48 ; 62-3 

Smith, Prof. M. : on local variations of 
law in America, 235 



INDEX 



665 



Socialism, 158-163 

: ethical and political, 42 
Socialistic interference, 143-168 
Sociology and Politics, 2-3 ; 5-6 
Sovereign : Austin's view of, 29 ; 

Appendix, 651-8 
Sovereignty,623-643; inabeyance,627-9 
of people, 630-2 

: possession and exercise of, 629-633 
: unconscious possession of, 631 
Speech : fk-eedom of, 570-1 
Spencer, H. : on private ownership of 
land, 147-8 
: on races without Government, 2 
Standing Armies, 644-5 
State and Nation, 220-5 
: definition of, 220-2 
: Federal, 532-7 

: compared with Confederation 

of SUtes, 538-9 
: compared with Unitary State, 

532-7 
: relation of parts to whole in, 
532-7 ; 541 
: membership of, 230-2 
of Nature : Hobbes's view, 45 
: relation to Church, 212-6 ; 583-8 
Subventions to Religious Associations, 

586 
Succession : intestate, 105-8 
Suflfrage, 378-394 
: female, 385-7 
Supreme Executive, 422-6 ; 437 
and taxation, 335-6 ; 449 ; 459 
: influence on legislation of, 458-9 
: extra-legal action o^ 457 
: ordinances of, 455-7 
: relation to Legislature, 429-464 ; 
565 

Taxation, 178-186 

changes in, 197 

degressive, 182 

equality of, 181-4 

incidence of, 184-5 

indirect, 183-4 
of inheritance, 185-6 
of land, 185 



Teaching of morality by Government, 

212-5 
Tenure of Civil Service appointments, 
415-8 

of Judicial appointments, 488-9 
Territory : compulsory cession of, 279- 
282 

new : occupation of, 253-6 

not under civilised government, 
256-7 
Title to property and possession, 81 
Trade, Free, 302-7 

in war, 274-6 
Trades Unions and moral coercion, 578- 

581 
Transfer of Rights, 51-2 ; 83-91 
Treaty obligations, 257-8 ; 278-282 
Trial by Jury, 491-9 
Two Chambers, 465-480 

: powers of; 469-473 

: different Ainctions o^ 478-9 

Unconscious possession and exercise 

of political power, 631-2 
Unitary State : definition of, 331-2 

: compared with Federal, 532-7 
Unlawful meetings, 576-7 
Utilitarian conception of end of 
Government, 38-9 

Individualism, 44-58 

Veq STABLE products : property in, 

74-5 
Voluntary Associations : moral coer- 
cion by, 577 581 

: powers of, 573-4 

: quasi-government of, 572-3 

: relation to the State, 572-588 
Voting power : unequal distribution of^ 

389-394 

War : preparation for, 301 

regulation of, 263-283 

: civil, 276-8 
West European States : compared with 
Greek City-SUtes, 622 

: Federation of, 218-9 
Women, enfranchisement of, 384-7; 644 



THE END 



Printed by R. & R. Clark, Limited, Edinhurgh 



': ;{ 



ti 



i 



In 



h* 



ME88R8. MAGMILLAN AND GO.'S PUBLICATIONS. 

BY THE SAME AUTHOR, 

Fifth Edition. 8vo. Us. 

THE METHODS OP ETHICS. By Henry Sidgwick, 
LL.D., D.C.L., Knightbridge Professor of Moral Philosophy 
in the University of Cambridge. 

SATURDAY REVIEW.— ''Yov the many-sidedness with which every 
possible aspect of a subject is brought into notice, and the judicial fairness 
with which each consideration is allowed its due weight, and assigned its proper 
place, few modem books can compare with Mr. Siq^ck's present volume." 

ATHENAEUM, — ''The excellent and very welcome volume . . . leaving 
to metaphysicians any further discussion that may be needed respecting the 
already over-discussed problem of tlie origin of the moral faculty, ne takes it 
for granted as readily as the geometrician takes space for granted, or the 

Shvsicist the existence of matter. But he takes little else for granted, and 
enning Ethics as the 'science of conduct,' he carefully exammes, not the 
various ethical systems that have been propounded by Aristotle and Aristotle's 
followers downwards, but the principles upon which, so far as they confine 
themselves to the strict province of Ethics, they are based." 

Third Edition. Crown 8vo. 3s. 6d. 

OUTLINES OP THE HISTORY OP ETHICS POR 
ENGLISH READERS. 

8vo. 14s. net. 

THE ELEMENTS OP POLITICS. By Henry Sidgwick, 
Litt.D. 

TIMES. — "No serious student of politics can afford to neglect it, and 
none can read it without deriving instruction and profit from ^most every 
page. . . . An important contribution to the higher political thought of our 
time." 

SATURDAY REVIEW.— '* Taking his own conception of hi^ book, we 
have almost unqualified admiration for it." 

Second Edition, Revised. 8vo. 16s. 

THE PRINCIPLES OP POLITICAL ECONOMY. By 
Henry Sidgwick, M.A., LL.D., Knightbridge Professor of 
Moral Philosophy in the University of Cambridge. 

PALL MALL GAZETTE.— '* lit. Sidgwick is one of the most precise, 
careful, and impartial of contemporary writers. Whatever may be the bearing 
of his views on the burning questions of to-dav, such a book is sure to help 
politicians and others to know what they are talking about, when they refer, 
as they will do more and more, to economic subjects." 

BRITISH QUARTERLY REVIEW.—'' Will take the first place as the 
authority on poUtical economy. . . . Mr. Sidgwick has discarded none of the 
old authorities, but he has thrown upon their generalisations some fresh light, 
because he has carefully observed the new forces and relations of facts which 
are available in these nineteenth-century times." 

MACMILLAN AND CO., Ltd., LONDON. 



BOOKS FOR STUDENTS OF ECONOMICS. 

SOCIAL EVOLUTION. By Benjamin Kidd. New and Cheaper 
Edition (Seventeenth thousand), revised, with a New Preface. Crown 8ro. 
5s. net. 

THE EVOLUTION OF INDUSTRY. By Henry Dykr, CLE., 
M.A., D.Sc. 8vo. lOs. net. 

EVOLUTION AND EFFORT, AND THEIR RELATION TO 
RELIGION AND POLITICS. By Edmund Kkllt, M.A., F.G.a 
Cro\*'n 8vo. 48. 6d. net. 



ECONOMIC CLASSICS. 

Edited by Prof, W. J. AsniEY. GlcUte 8vo. 

SELECT CHAPTERS AND PASSAGES FROM THE « WEALTH 
OF NATIONS" of Adam Smith, 1776. Ss. net. 

THE FIRST SIX CHAPTERS OF "THE PRINCIPLES OF 
POLITICAL ECONOMY AND TAXATION " of David Ricardo, 1817. 
Ss. net. 

PARALLEL (CHAPTERS FROM THE FIRST AND SECOND 
EDITIONS OF "AN ESSAY ON THE PRINCIPLE OF POPULA- 
TION." By T. R Malthus, 1798-1808. 3s. net 

PEASANT RENTS. Being the First Half of an Essay on the 
Distribution of Wealth and on the Soiurces of Taxation. By Richard 
Jones, 1831. 3s. not. 

ENGLAND'S TREASURE BY FORRAIGN TRADE. By Thomas 

MuN, 1664. 3s. net. 

THE MERCANTILE SYSTEM AND ITS HISTORICAL SIG- 
NIFICANCE. Ilhistratcd chiefly from Prussian History. Being a 
Chapter from tlie "Studicii ueber die Wirthschaftliche Politik Friedrichs 
d»'8 Grossen." By (Justav Schmollkh, 1884. 3s. net. 



HONEST MONEY. By Arthur J. Fonda. Crown 8vo. 3s. 6d. net 

THE AMERICAN COMMERCIAL POLICY. Three Historical 
Essays. By U«:o Raiibkno. Scjcond Edition. 8vo. 128. net. 

ASPECTS OF THE SOCIAL PROBLEM. By Various Writers. 
Edited by liKKNAiii) Bosanqukt. Crown 8vo. 28. 6d. net. 

RICH AND POOR. By Mrs. Bernard Bosanquet. Crown Sva 
3s. 6d. net 

DICTIONARY OF POLITICAL ECONOMY. Edited bv R. H. 
Inglks I'alcjrave, F.R.S. Vol. I. (A-E). Vol. II. (F-M). Medium Svo. 
21 8. net. «'ach. 

STUDIES IN ECONOMICS. By AVilliam Smart, M.A., LL.1). 

Extra Crown Svo. 8s. (>d. not. 

PRINCIPLES OF FXJONOMICS. By Alfred Marshall, MA. 
Two Vols. Vol. I. Third Edition. 8vo. 128. 6d. net. 

ELEMENTS OF THE ECONOMICS OF INDUSTRY. Being the 
first volume of " Elements of Economics." By Prof. A. Marshall. 
Ci'own Svo. 3s. 6d. 

MACMILLAN AND CO., Ltd., LONDON. 



C 



^^H 




-' 


^^^1 


mu^ 






^^^^^^^H 


.-?«.%>»'-.' 


'^\ 'V., 




^^^^^^H 


« 


• 


i= 


^^^^^H 


■rt 


;%-., - 


*t 


^^^^^^^^^1 


•■ ** 


> . 


* «'- 


^^1 








^^^^^1 




b'l ■ ■ ■ • 


^ ■ "■ *C 


^1 






^^H 






* 


^^M 




- 




^^ 




,' i -* ■■ " 


. r'z 



